-- MySQL dump 10.13  Distrib 8.0.19, for Win64 (x86_64)
--
-- Host: localhost    Database: animals
-- ------------------------------------------------------
-- Server version	8.0.19

/*!40101 SET @OLD_CHARACTER_SET_CLIENT=@@CHARACTER_SET_CLIENT */;
/*!40101 SET @OLD_CHARACTER_SET_RESULTS=@@CHARACTER_SET_RESULTS */;
/*!40101 SET @OLD_COLLATION_CONNECTION=@@COLLATION_CONNECTION */;
/*!50503 SET NAMES utf8 */;
/*!40103 SET @OLD_TIME_ZONE=@@TIME_ZONE */;
/*!40103 SET TIME_ZONE='+00:00' */;
/*!40014 SET @OLD_UNIQUE_CHECKS=@@UNIQUE_CHECKS, UNIQUE_CHECKS=0 */;
/*!40014 SET @OLD_FOREIGN_KEY_CHECKS=@@FOREIGN_KEY_CHECKS, FOREIGN_KEY_CHECKS=0 */;
/*!40101 SET @OLD_SQL_MODE=@@SQL_MODE, SQL_MODE='NO_AUTO_VALUE_ON_ZERO' */;
/*!40111 SET @OLD_SQL_NOTES=@@SQL_NOTES, SQL_NOTES=0 */;

--
-- Table structure for table `animals_profile`
--

DROP TABLE IF EXISTS `animals_profile`;
/*!40101 SET @saved_cs_client     = @@character_set_client */;
/*!50503 SET character_set_client = utf8mb4 */;
CREATE TABLE `animals_profile` (
  `SPART_ID` varchar(20) NOT NULL,
  `Scientific_Name` varchar(255) NOT NULL,
  `Threatened_Status` varchar(255) NOT NULL,
  `Class` varchar(255) NOT NULL,
  `Family` varchar(255) NOT NULL,
  `Descriptions` text,
  `Habitat` text,
  `Feeding` text,
  `Threats` text,
  `Profile_link` text NOT NULL,
  PRIMARY KEY (`SPART_ID`)
) ENGINE=InnoDB DEFAULT CHARSET=utf8mb4 COLLATE=utf8mb4_general_ci;
/*!40101 SET character_set_client = @saved_cs_client */;

--
-- Dumping data for table `animals_profile`
--

LOCK TABLES `animals_profile` WRITE;
/*!40000 ALTER TABLE `animals_profile` DISABLE KEYS */;
INSERT INTO `animals_profile` VALUES ('1001','Botaurus poiciloptilus','Endangered','Aves','Ardeidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1001'),('1011','Fregata andrewsi','Endangered','Aves','Fregatidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1011'),('1012','Fregata ariel','','Aves','Fregatidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1012'),('1013','Fregata minor','','Aves','Fregatidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1013'),('1014','Phaethon lepturus','','Aves','Phaethontidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1014'),('1021','Sula dactylatra','','Aves','Sulidae','The largest and heaviest of the booby (Sulidae) family, the Masked Booby has a streamlined white body with a narrow (from base of bill to just behind the eyes) black mask on the face, and long narrow wings of mainly white with black tips to the flight feathers. The pointed bill on most individuals is yellow with a black base, however can vary from yellow-green, olive, rosy pink to orange (NSW NPWS 1999cq). The tail is also pointed. The Lord Howe Island population, which belongs to the  S. d. tasmani  subspecies, has brownish eyes, compared to birds at most other locations which have yellow eyes (NSW DECCW 2005op).','The Masked Booby is a pelagic marine bird using tropical and subtropical waters, although off Peru where warm water extends into the temperate zone, the species is found further south than usual. Distribution of the species may be determined by the distribution of flying fish (Exocoetidae family), the main food resource. In tropical zones, the species possibly forages at up-wellings of cool nutrient-rich waters, especially when breeding (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The Masked Booby breeds on tropical oceanic islands, atolls and cays, usually far from mainland areas. Proximity to clear, deep water is important in choice of nesting grounds. Areas of level open ground are preferred for nest sites and colonies extend from central areas to water\'s edge, just above high-water marks, on bare surfaces of sand, guano, coral fragments or lava, or among low cover of grasses, herbs or shrubs. Where vegetation encroaches, colonies may become restricted to smaller and smaller areas of bare ground (Marchant & Higgins 1990). On Lord Howe Island, the Masked Booby is said to breed on high open areas where they can take off directly into the wind (NSW DECCW 2005op).The Masked Booby roosts on the ground beside their nests when breeding, although sometimes breeding birds roost on beaches near colonies. Non-breeding adults and juveniles roost on the ground near colonies in small groups. Outside of the breeding season, birds roost on other islands or on the sea surface. After foraging, birds may rest on beaches or sand banks, often in mixed species flocks (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The diet of the Masked Booby is primarily comprised of fish with some cephalopods (squids, Teuthida order). Food is obtained by deep plunging in the ocean from a height of 12–100 m, mostly 15–35 m to depths probably exceeding 3 m, although sometimes in water as shallow as 1.5 m (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Most prey is swallowed head first, under water after being speared with the bird\'s sharp beak (Hutton 1991). The species rarely takes flying fish by flight-feeding and have been observed using aerial piracy, but most food is taken under water. The Masked Booby usually fish in pairs or small groups, and sometimes in association with other species. The extent of feeding home-ranges is unknown. On return to breeding colonies after foraging, Masked Boobys are often harassed by frigatebirds (fregatidae family) to regurgitate food, so birds will often form groups before entering the colony (Marchant & Higgins 1990). During the breeding season the Masked Booby is recorded foraging far offshore. Off Hawaii, birds have been seen more than 80 km from shore and in the Indian Ocean most adults are recorded foraging 160 to 320 km from breeding islands (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','Guano digging at Raine Island in the 1800s negatively affected the breeding colony, but that population is now recovering. Mining may have improved breeding habitat for the long-term by providing flat bare exposed ground (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Human predation still impacts the Masked Booby. Eggs and chicks are taken and general disturbance of nesting colonies increases breeding failures. Other predators include rats ( Rattus  spp.), the Silver Gull ( Larus novaehollandiae ) and the Buff-banded Rail ( Gallirallus philippensis ) which take eggs and small chicks. At Raine Island and Pandora Cay, the Green Turtle ( Chelonia mydas ) destroy some nests (Marchant & Higgins 1990; Garnett & Crowley 2000).Human visitation or disturbance of breeding sites may also impact on the species via an increase in the numbers of gulls (Laridae family), usually due to foodscraps, and hence increased predation pressure (Walker 1988). Increases in numbers of tourists visiting the Great Barrier Reef and advances in vessel technology are also likely to lead to an increasing demand for visitation to seabird islands in this region (Stokes et al. 1996; WBM Oceanics & Claridge 1997).Climate change and associated changes in weather, ocean currents and sea levels may have a dramatic impact on this species, since it nests on low islands and nests can be inundated by high tides or flooded (Coate 1997; Marchant & Higgins 1990). The El Niño Southern Oscillation has been suggested as the reason for previous breeding failures on Christmas Island, where increased sea surface-temperature, deepened thermocline and high sea-level preceded a failure of food supplies and heavy rainfall may have flooded nests and inhibited breeding activity (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1021'),('1022','Sula leucogaster','','Aves','Sulidae','The smallest of the Sulidae family, the Brown Booby is deep brown in colour on the back, upper breast, upper wing, head and throat. A strong demarcation is seen on the breast with white undersides. Under wings display a distinct white patch to the centre margined by deep brown. The iris may be cream, yellow, grey or deep brown. The bill is creamy-grey and males have a deep blue base (close to the head). Legs and feet are yellow. The average length of the Brown Booby is 65–75 cm with a wingspan of 130–150 cm. Birds weigh from 900–1500 g. (Lindsay 1986; Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Brown Booby uses both marine and terrestrial habitat. The species occurs in, but is not restricted to, tropical waters of all major oceans, often staying close to breeding islands. The species is known to approach mainland coastlines more than other boobies and has been recorded in coastal waters, harbours and estuaries and near offshore islands but seldom flying over land (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Off north-west Western Australia, Brown Boobies are most abundant 18–36 km from land, but also occur inside and outside these limits. The species is often concentrated where wavelets are about 2 m high (just high enough to break), and sea surface-temperature is less than 25.5 °C (Abbott 1979b). The Brown Booby flies low, seldom higher than 30 m above the sea surface (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The Brown Booby utilises tropical islands, continental islands, sand cays and atolls for breeding. The Brown Booby nests on the ground in a variety of sites, from rugged rocky terrain (cliffs, steep slopes) on larger islands, to beaches, sand bards, coral rubble and guano flats on cays. The species also readily roosts on artificial structures (such as, navigation beacons, buoys, piles, railings, shipwrecks). Whilst the species does not need sheltering vegetation for breeding, it may be used where present (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Sites may be physically unstable under action of winds, currents and waves. For example, Brown Boobies have been recorded to nest as low as 1 m above high water, as well as sites submerged by above average high tides and storm surges (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Brown Booby generally feeds in inshore waters (del Hoyo et al. 1992) in both shallow and deep water, and in areas of rough water where water masses converge (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The diet is comprised mainly of flying-fish, squid and some other cephalopods, as well as mullet ( Mugil  spp.) and anchovy ( Engraulis  spp.) (Blaber et al. 1995; Marchant & Higgins 1990). Prey is usually caught by plunge-diving and the species can also snatch prey off the surface of water. Kleptoparasitism (stealing of food or resources from other animals), mostly by females, has been observed (del Hoyo 1992).Brown Boobys sometimes feed in flocks, in association with other seabirds, or in association with cetaceans (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','PredationThe Brown Booby has historically been susceptible to predation by humans. In certain parts of Australia, eggs, chicks and some adults were, or still are, taken for food (Marchant & Higgins 1990; WBM Oceanics & Claridge 1997). On Bramble Cay, the colony was severely depleted by harvesting of eggs and chicks (Elvish & Walker 1991). Boobys have been caught on baited hooks in the Great Barrier Reef (O\'Neill 2002 pers. comm.), where it feeds on trawl discards (Blaber et al. 1995). In addition, commercial fishing could potentially affect prey availability.Human visitation or disturbance of breeding sites may also impact on the species via an increase in the numbers of gulls (usually due to foodscraps) and hence increased predation pressure (Walker 1988). Increases in numbers of tourists visiting the Great Barrier Reef and advances in vessel technology are also likely to lead to an increasing demand for visitation to seabird islands in this region (Stokes et al. 1996; WBM Oceanics & Claridge 1997).Other predators that have impacted on the Brown Booby include the Bramble Cay Melomys ( Melomys rubicola ) on Bramble Cay and the Black Rat ( Rattus rattus ) on South-west Coringa Islet in the Coral Sea (Environment Australia 2001g; Marchant & Higgins 1990). A rat eradication program from 1985–91 on South-west Coringa Islet appears to have been successful, with no further evidence of rats found on the island (Environment Australia 2001g).The Land Crab ( Birgus latro ) may also predate on the species and has been recorded taking eggs and chicks on Christmas Island and Cocos-Keeling Island (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The Silver Gull ( Chroicocephalus novaehollandiae ), Buff-banded Rail ( Gallirallus philippensis ), and possibly frigatebirds ( Fregata  spp.) and the Nankeen Night Heron ( Nycticorax caledonicus ) take unattended eggs and small chicks on Raine Island (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The Silver Gull is a major predator of eggs and chicks at East Fairfax Island and surrounding regions, and also at Adele Island in Western Australia (Coate 1997; Walker 1988).DisturbanceSome areas of Christmas Island utilised by the Brown Booby have most likely been affected by settlement, associated disturbance and predation, and settling of dust from a phosphate drying plant (Stokes 1988). Historically, some colonies which declined due to human activities, such as guano mining, have recovered with the cessation of these activities (Marchant & Higgins 1990).PollutionAs a deep, pursuit plunging diver, the Brown Booby is predicted by Dann and Jessop (1994) to be at risk from oil pollution.Climate ChangeClimate change and associated changes in weather, ocean currents and sea levels may have a dramatic impact on this species, since its nests on low islands can be inundated by high tides (Coate 1997; Marchant & Higgins 1990). Reduction in food availability, possibly associated with El Niño, has been implicated in breeding population declines at Swain Reefs (Heatwole et al. 1996) and Christmas Island (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1022'),('1023','Sula sula','','Aves','Sulidae','The Red-footed Booby is a slender bird with conspicuous red feet, long tail and a bill that can be blackish to pale blue. The eye is grey to grey-green and skin around the eye can vary from dark grey to blue to purplish in colour. Plumage colouring is extremely varied, with two main \'morphs\' recognized: a white morph in which plumage is mainly white except the head area that is strongly tinged yellow, and black primary and secondary flight feathers; and an ash-brown morph in which feathers are pale to dark brown , except the tail which is usually white. A range of intermediate forms are also known and the two morphs intermix regularly (Lindsey 1986; Marchant & Higgins 1990).','Tropical, pelagic and aerial, the Red-footed Booby resides in and over waters of greater than 22 °C surface-temperature in three major oceans. Distribution may be determined by the presence of important prey, especially flying fish, and vegetated islands for nesting. The species readily flies over land near shore, but does not cross wide areas of land. The Red-footed Booby flies within 30–40 m of the sea surface, often just clearing wave crests, but flies high when soaring in updrafts on the windward side of steep islands, usually in the evening (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The species forages in deep water up to 150 km from the nearest breeding island; but also forages near islands, outside reefs or occasionally in lagoons, but rarely close to continental land-masses. It may depend on cooler nutrient-rich waters for feeding, especially when breeding. A decline in numbers and breeding failure on Christmas Island (Pacific Ocean) during an El Nino Southern Oscillation occured when sea surface-temperature was high and food supply poor. The Red-footed Booby breeds on vegetated oceanic islands near deep water, usually at a low altitude on beaches or ridges of atolls and cays, or, on mountainous islands, on terraces and slopes around the perimeter up to 70 m above sea level. Nests may be placed in any vegetation dense enough to provide support and extended enough to accommodate a colony. These included forest canopy, shrubs, or, on cays, low cover of shrubs, herbs and grasses. Individuals prefer inner parts of vegetated areas rather than edges.Generally, the Red-footed Booby roosts on land in groups with individuals closely spaced, usually in the branches of trees or shrubs. The species has been recorded to roost on the ground in dense grass, and on the superstructure of ships at sea, and occasionally to rest on the sea, floating buoyantly. During breeding, incubating or brooding, birds sleep on the nest. The partner, when present, roosts on the side of nest or on perch close by. Juveniles, immatures and non-breeding adults roost together near breeding colonies. Activities of adults outside breeding period are not fully known. Some pairs roost in their same territories at night, whilst others depart for periods of uncertain length and roost elsewhere. (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Red-footed Booby mostly feeds on fish, especially flying fish, and also cephalopods (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Birds often follow boats, sometimes for hundreds of kilometres. In the tropical Pacific region, Red-footed Booby\'s feed in association with other birds including the White-tailed Tropicbird ( Phaethon lepturus ), White Tern ( Gygis alba ) and the Common Noddy ( Anous stolidus ). The species has also been seen associated with dolphins, such as the Spotted Dolphin ( Stenella attenuata ), Spinner Dolphin ( S. longirostris ), Striped Dolphin ( S. coeruleoalba ), Common Dolphin ( Delphinus delphis ) and Rough-toothed Dolphin ( Steno bredanensis ). These Dolphins are themselves often associated with schools of tuna ( Katsuwonus pelamis ) (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Feeding is by plunge diving to small depths and the species is usually known to feed in groups (Le Corre 1997).Adult Red-footed Booby\'s can forage up to 11–13 hours per day in the breeding season. This contrasts with total fasting that each bird undertakes whilst incubating the egg which is undertaken in shifts. Post egg hatching foraging trips are shorter in length, and though both males and females share nest responsibilities equally, males spend more time at sea foraging, affecting body condition (Lormée et al. 2003).Some populations of Red-footed Booby\'s show nocturnal foraging characteristics, suggested to be in response to the stealing of food by othe bird species such as Frigatebirds ( Fregata spp),  Skuas ( Stercorariidae ) and Sheathbills ( Chionididae ) (Le Corre & Jouventin 1997).','Tree-nesting habit has largely enabled the species to avoid the impacts of humans, rats, cats and wild pigs. However, direct exploitation by humans and destruction of nesting habitat has occurred, with at least twelve colonies being lost in the west Indian Ocean during the last 100 years, and in the South Atlantic, where only 100 pairs remain (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Increasing numbers have been killed on the Cocos-Keeling Island by Malays and large scale egg-collecting continues (Stokes et al. 1984). Following a cyclone, a moratorium was placed on harvesting in 1989 to allow the colony to recover. However, in contravention of Australian legislation enacted in 1992, illegal harvesting continues (Ross et al. 1996a). The annual illegal harvest is estimated at 3000-10 000 birds (Baker et al, 2004; Hicks, J. pers. comm. in Ross et al. 1996a).The species is susceptible to changes of habitat on breeding islands. Clearing of vegetation for mining, settlement, crops and coconut plantations, and effects of dust from mining operations have been implicated in the desertion of former breeding areas on Christmas Island and the main atoll of Cocos-Keeling Island (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Internationally, populations are probably still limited by egg-collecting, poaching, predation by rats and disturbance caused by tourism (del Hoyo et al. 1992). Climate change may affect food supply (Heatwole et al. 1996) and other generic threats such as increased pressure from tourism and fisheries may also be significant (Stokes et al. 1996). As the Red-footed Booby is a deep, pursuit plunging diver, the species could be at risk from oil pollution (Dann & Jessop 1994).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1023'),('1034','Oceanites oceanicus','','Aves','Hydrobatidae','Wilson\'s Storm-Petrel is one of the world\'s most abundant seabirds and the smallest endotherm (generating its own heat for warmth) that breeds in Antarctic waters (Büßer et al. 2004; Quillfeldt & Möstl 2003).','Wilson\'s Storm-Petrel spends much of its life at sea (Marchant & Higgins 1990).MigrationOn migration in the Indian and Pacific Oceans, the species remains far out to sea; although first-year birds may follow the coasts of southern continents. Birds often congregate and feed at ocean fronts, and are occasionally sighted inshore (Marchant & Higgins 1990). In south-east Australia, Wilson\'s Storm-Petrels are found over waters of surface temperatures between 9.4–22.0 °C (Reid et al. 2002).Non-Breeding SeasonIn the non-breeding season, the birds are mainly seen in tropical and subtropical waters (Marchant & Higgins 1990). In pack-ice, the species rests on ice-floes and flies in the shelter of floes during gales. Outside of the breeding season, the Wilson\'s Storm-Petrel roosts on the sea surface (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Breeding SeasonBreeding habitat for the species is on the Antarctic Continent and Peninsula, and peri-Antarctic and Subantarctic islands. The birds are found in snow and ice-free areas utilising cliffs, scree slopes, moraines, rocky headlands, hills, and broken or boulder-strewn low-lying ground, fissures or crevices. Breeding distribution in high latitudes may be limited by the extent of ice-free land (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','DietWilson\'s Storm-Petrels are diurnal feeders, consuming mainly pelagic (marine) crustaceans and fish with some cephalopods, polychaetes, gastropods and carrion.In Antarctic waters, the species mainly eats euphausiid crustaceans (krill, especially  Euphausia superba  and  Thysanoessa  sp.) and to a lesser extent, juvenile and larval fish, amphipods (such as  Themisto gaudichaudii ) and small quantities of copepods and isopods (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Seasonality of DietThe diet of the Wilson\'s Storm-Petrel shifts from mainly crustaceans during egg formation to an increased proportion of fish during chick-rearing and moulting (Quillfeldt et al. 2005). Fish prey includes Antarctic Silverside ( Pleuragramma antarcticum ), Lanternfish ( Protomyctophum bolini ) and Norman\'s Lanternfish ( P. normani ). Squid are usually taken in higher proportions outside the breeding season. Species consumed include the Glacial Squid ( Psychroteuthis glacialis ) and  Orchomene  sp. Other items eaten include cirriped larvae, gastropods and nereid worms (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Feeding TechniquesFeeding is mainly carried out in cold waters over continental shelves or inshore (del Hoyo et al. 1992). It is accomplished by \'pattering\', with birds hovering over the water with feet skimming or running over the surface. The species take prey from the sea surface or from depths shallower than 10–15 cm. Food is also taken by dipping, surface-seizing, shallow-plunging and, rarely, surface-diving (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Birds are also known to scavenge offal, particularly on the oil slicks of  E. superba  (Marchant & Higgins 1990) and readily follow ships, trawlers or cetaceans in order to scavenge for \'left-overs\' (AAD 2010). Wilson\'s Storm-Petrels rarely alights on the water to feed (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Around Antarctica, 72.9% of observations of the feeding systems of Wilson\'s Storm-Petrel were of pattering with 27.1% of observations being of dipping (n=284) (Harper 1987). Comparatively, in the Ross Sea, 74% of observations were of pattering, 23% were of dipping and 3% were of surface-seizing (n=35) (Harper 1987).Most food is taken in small pieces by seemingly sucking up particles of floating oil but they will readily feed at larger pieces of offal and carcasses. The species appears to locate food partly by scent, being attracted to sponges soaked with cod liver oil but not those soaked with mineral oil (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','Identified ThreatsContact With Man-Made MaterialsIngestion of plastics is a primary threat to Wilson\'s Storm-Petrels, with a high proportion of adults and pre-fledged chicks reported to have plastic in stomachs (Moser & Lee 1992).Entanglement of legs by fishing mesh or nylon line has occurred in the Northern Atlantic (Moore 1992).PredationEggs and chicks are predated by sheathbills ( Chionis  sp.), Kelp Gulls ( Larus dominicanus ) and skuas ( Catharacta  sp.), and also by rats ( Rattus rattus  and  R. norvegicu ) and cats ( Felis  sp.) where they occur, such as on Iles Crozet and Iles Kerguelen (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Adults are taken mostly by Great Skuas ( C. skua ) which take Wilson\'s Storm-Petrels from the ground and in flight. Remains of Wilson\'s Storm-Petrels are frequent in Skuas\' middens (ground burrow used for food) at many sites. At South Georgia, some birds may be taken by Southern Giant-Petrels ( Macronectes giganteus ) and Northern Giant-Petrels ( M. halli ). There is one record of predation of a Wilson\'s Storm-Petrel by a shark (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Potential ThreatsHabitat loss or modification and human disturbance around Antarctic scientific bases are potentially a threat, although difficult to quantify (Woehler 1993b).Pesticide residues and traces of heavy metals are also potentially threatening (Marchant & Higgins 1990; Moser & Lee 1992; van Franeker & Bell 1988; Woehler 1993b), as is competition with fisheries (especially for krill) (del Hoyo et al. 1992).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1034'),('1036','Pterodroma mollis','Vulnerable','Aves','Procellariidae','The Soft-plumaged Petrel has a whitish forehead with darker mottling, and a broad blackish eye-mark. The back is blue-grey, wings similar, but with dark brownish slate \'M\' shaped band, and the tail is grey. The bill is black. The legs are flesh-pink with black tipped webs (Pizzey & Knight 1999).','The Soft-plumaged Petrel is a marine, oceanic species. Soft-plumaged Petrels are mainly subantarctic, but occur over a wide range of sea surface-temperatures. They have been observed over waters of 0 to 21°C, and off south-east Australia in temperatures between 9.8 to 21.0°C (Reid et al. 2002). In the Weddell Sea, the species is attracted to areas with icebergs with a surface-temperature of 0.7 to 1.0°C.Birds breeding at Iles Crozet forage mainly to the north of the islands, over subtropical waters (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The birds breed on islands off Tasmania (n=1), in the New Zealand region (n=1), and in the Indian and South Atlantic Oceans.The birds burrow among tussock grass and ferns on slopes and valleys.The species is mainly coastal but occasionally occurs inland (Imber 1983; Marchant & Higgins 1990; Wiltshire & Hamilton 2002).','The food of the Soft-plumaged Petrel consists mostly of cephalopods, some fish and crustaceans.During the breeding season at Marion Island, cephalopods recorded were mainly  Gonatus antarcticus, Discoteuthis, Chiroteuthis  and  Teuthowenia spp . At Iles Crozet, cephalopods comprised 100% of the diet by frequency of occurrence (n=6 stomachs). At Prince Edward Island (n=2 stomachs), cephalopod families recorded were Histioteuthidae, Mastigoteuthidae and Cranchiidae (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Fish recorded included  Electrona sp .The main crustaceans were amphipods  Eurythenes spp.  especially  E. obesus,  and also mysidaceans  Vibilia sp ., prawns  Sergestes sp . and shrimps  Parapasiphae sp .Soft-plumaged Petrels apparently take food by surface-seizing. Occasionally, they follow cetaceans including pilot whales  Globicephalus spp.  and Southern Right Whale Dolphins  Lissodelphis peronii  (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','Feral cats  Felis catus  and Great Skuas  Catharacta skua  are major predators of the Soft-plumaged Petrel at Marion Island. It is estimated that cats killed 38 000 birds out of a population of more than 400 000 on Marion Island. Cats are also a menace on Iles Kerguelen, Iles Crozet, and have nearly extirpated this species on Ile Amsterdam (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Marchant & Higgins 1990). Rats  Rattus spp . also prey upon this species in Iles Crozet (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The species is also susceptible to habitat destruction or alteration, e.g. erosion caused by fur seals  Arctocephalus spp . (Woehler, E.J. 2002, pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1036'),('1047','Procellaria cinerea','','Aves','Procellariidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1047'),('1059','Halobaena caerulea','Vulnerable','Aves','Procellariidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1059'),('1060','Macronectes giganteus','Endangered','Aves','Procellariidae','The Southern Giant Petrel is the largest petrel, and has been described as looking like a small, ungainly brown albatross with a massive greenish-tipped straw coloured bill, surmounted by a large single nostril-tube (Pizzey & Knight 1999). Mature adults are grey-brown with a faded and mottled-white head, neck and breast. The underwing has a pale leading edge, near the body, which should aid in discrimination from the Northern Giant Petrel, in which this area is dark brown (Pizzey & Knight 1999).','The Southern Giant-Petrel is marine bird that occurs in Antarctic to subtropical waters. In summer, it mainly occurs over Antarctic waters, and it is widespread south as far as the pack-ice and onto the Antarctic continent (Marchant & Higgins 1990). In the Ross Sea, the Southern Giant-Petrel ranges from the Antarctic continent to the 3° C sea surface temperature isotherm. In early summer, it is most abundant over the continental slope, and in late summer, it has a uniform distribution from the continental slope north to the Antarctic Polar Front. It also occurs south to the Ross Ice Shelf at low densities. It has no preference for pack-ice of a particular density, but it may avoid crossing extensive ice sheets, which dampen sea swell and inhibit soaring.The Southern Giant-Petrel is abundant over the pack-ice near penguin colonies. In summer, it also occurs over subantarctic waters near its breeding islands in the Atlantic and Indian Oceans, in subantarctic to southern subtropical waters on the Argentinean continental shelf and off New Zealand  and the cold eastern boundary current off South America. It possibly concentrates north of 50° S in winter, as it is rare in waters of the southern Indian Ocean, but common off South America, South Africa, Australia and New Zealand. It occurs in both pelagic and inshore waters. It is attracted to land at sewage outfalls. It scavenges ashore, so at Iles Crozet, its distribution shifts towards land in summer, when birds frequent penguin and seal colonies (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The Southern Giant-Petrel breeds on the Antarctic Continent, Peninsula and islands, and on subantarctic islands and South America. The large nests are normally built in exposed areas of open vegetation (Voisin 1988) or, in Antarctic colonies, of no vegetation (E.J. Woehler, AAD  2002, pers. comm.). In the southern Antarctic zone, it nests in exposed snow- and ice-free coastal areas, open gravel areas rocky bluffs, outcrops, ridges, slopes, mounds, raised beaches, open flats, edges of plateaux or offshore rocks from five to 120 m above sea level. Colonies often nest near a steep drop or on slope.Nest material used by the Southern Giant-Petrel depends on availability, for example it uses tussock, moss in the Subantarctic, and small stones and bones in the Antarctic. Some nests are simply scratched in grass, bare peat or sand, or consist of a mere depression in the rock.In Terre Adélie, the colony faces the prevailing wind, apparently because exposure assists take-off and prevents snow drift over nests. At Signy Island, drifting snow sometimes kills chicks in sheltered nests. At northern localities, colonies occur on open vegetated flats, hill sides with gentle slopes, or ridge tops. The Southern Giant-Petrel avoids tussocks at Iles Crozet and South Georgia. It nests in dense vegetation at Gough Island and Isla Noir, on sandy beaches on the Falkland Islands, and on rocky open terrain on Isla Ance off Argentina (Marchant & Higgins 1990). If the breeding colony suffers disturbance, it may use other nearby breeding habitat if it is available (Woehler et al. 2001; Woehler et al. in press). The Southern Giant-Petrel is not as common among tussocks as in Northern Giant-Petrel  Macronectes halli . It nests in dense vegetation (tussock, tree ferns) at Gough Island and among scrub at Isla Noir (Marchant & Higgins 1990).At sea, the Southern Giant-Petrel feeds mainly on the surface, but might occasionally dive to shallow depths. On the pack-ice, it will roost on icebergs and snow slopes at the sea edge (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Southern Giant-Petrel is an opportunist scavenger and predator. In summer at least, it will scavenge primarily penguin carcasses, although it will also feed on seal and whale carrion. It catches and kills live birds including Albatrosses  Diomedea , a wide variety of smaller seabirds, and penguin chicks. Cephalopods (octopus and squids) are taken by surface-seizing, euphausiids (krill) are scooped from the surface of the water. It is also recorded consuming other crustaceans, kelp, fish, jellyfish, and rabbits  Oryctolagus cuniculus.  Males eat more penguins and fewer euphausiids than do females (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The breeding diet is as follows (from Marchant & Higgins 1990, each column represents a different study):Component of diet% mass% frequencyTotal birds 81.9 71-93 80-87 75-85 82-100 70 Penguins 4.7 71 80 75 82 - Other birds 7.2 22 7 10 10-25 - Crustaceans 10.7 22 13 49-54 - 22 Euphausiids 10.7 22 13 49 - - Fish 0.8 4 6 3 13 11 Cephalopods 1.7 12 36 49 3 11 Mammals 3.3 5 1 15 12-15 28 Other 1.8 4 60-64 3-8 - 6 At sea, the Southern Giant-Petrel forages largely by surface-seizing. It also scavenges on land and regularly follows ships. It apparently locates food by smell, and feeds its chicks both day and night. It possibly does not dive from the surface, unlike the Northern Giant-Petrel. Males and females have different diets (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Giant-petrels follow fishing vessels and compete for baits. Many are hooked and drown, or are seriously injured, and others ingest hooks while they are scavenging offal, particularly if they scavenge hooked fish heads if these are discarded inappropriately (EABG 2001).','Longline fishing causes two main forms of mortality in the Southern Giant-Petrel; by-catch during line-setting, and ingestion of discarded fishing hooks. Hook ingestion by albatross and giant-petrels appears to have increased in recent years. Between 50 and 100 million hooks are set each year in the Southern Ocean and as many as 1.1 billion hooks are set globally. Both seabirds and fishing vessels concentrate in areas of high biological productivity. Consequently, giant-petrels are seriously threatened by longline fishing (EABG 1998).Oceanic longline fishing has been used to target pelagic and demersal fish in the southern oceans since the 1950s, and is used in almost all Australian waters today (DEH 2006). Gales and Brothers (1995) reported that 75% of the birds killed on longlines and retained for identification were albatrosses. Internationally, some longline fishing fleets still operate without important by-catch mitigation measures. Therefore, Southern Giant-Petrels breeding within the Australian Fishing Zone are still killed on longlines from vessels operating outside the Australian Fishing Zone (EABG 2001). The recent decrease in breeding population counts at Marion Island may be due to the Patagonian toothfish  Dissostichus eliginoides  longline fishery (Woehler et al. 2001). Recent increases in longline hook retrieval at Palmer Island indicate this is an immediate threat to the local population (Woehler et al. 2001).Other fishing practices, such as trawling, can also cause injury or death, but this may occur only rarely, especially if vessels employ simple mitigation measures; outside of the Australian Fishing Zone, trawlers carrying netsonde monitor cables or their equivalent may cause substantial mortality. Trolling (trailing a line with baited hooks) for pelagic species such as Albacore Tuna  Thunnus alalunga  is another potential threat to the Southern Giant-Petrel (EABG 1998).The Southern Giant-Petrel may be shot for sport or to reduce scavenging from commercial fishing vessels. Ingestion of plastics, entanglement in marine debris, oil spills, reduced genetic variability (inbreeding depression) and accumulation of chemical contamiNAts also pose risks to this species (EABG 1998; Garnett & Crowley 2000).Disturbance of breeding sites associated with the development of research stations or human visitation to breeding colonies has the potential to cause serious impacts on the Southern Giant-Petrel, through a reduction in breeding success, or because birds abandoning the colony (EABG 1998; Woehler et al. 2001; Woehler et al. in press). For example, the establishment of a field station at Signy Island (off the Antarctic Peninsula) led, within eight years, to the complete desertion of the colony of 200 breeding pairs and caused a decrease in the breeding population elsewhere on the island (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Similarly, the establishment of an Antarctic research station at Dumont d\'Urville resulted in the breeding population decreasing from 69 pairs in 1969 to only two pairs in 1980 (Jouventin et al. 1984). The Falkland Island (Islas Malvinas) populations have been seriously reduced following shooting of adults and destruction of eggs, as the Southern Giant-Petrels were thought to menace sheep (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Within the King George Island area (off the Antarctic Peninsula), local populations appear to have responded to anthropogenic influences such as station construction, helicopter overflights and colony visitation (Woehler et al. 2001).Breeding success and/or nest-site selection have probably been adversely affected by rats, cats and an elevated number of Subantarctic Skuas  Catharacta lonnbergi  (EABG 1998; Garnett & Crowley 2000), although the threat from the latter two has been substantially reduced (G. Copson, as cited in Garnett & Crowley 2000).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1060'),('1061','Macronectes halli','Vulnerable','Aves','Procellariidae','The Northern Giant Petrel is a large dark seabird with a wing span of between 1.5-2.1 m (Pizzey & Knight 1999). They have a massive straw-coloured bill, tipped with pinkish-red or orange. The eye is pale grey. The dark crown over a whitish face and throat gives it a capped appearance, although there is a slight dark mask through the eye. Juveniles are a uniform sooty brown, with a dark brown eye (Pizzey & Knight 1999).','The Northern Giant-Petrel is marine and oceanic. It mainly occurs in sub-Antarctic waters, but regularly occurs in Antarctic waters of the southwestern Indian Ocean, the Drake Passage and west of the Antarctic Peninsula (Marchant & Higgins 1990).  The range of the Northern Giant-Petrel extends into subtropical waters mainly between winter and spring. It frequents both oceanic and inshore waters near breeding islands and in the non-breeding range.During its first year, it probably occurs mainly on continental shelves, slopes and cold eastern boundary currents off South America, South Africa, Australia and New Zealand. It may be more oceanic from its second year. It is attracted to land at sewage outfalls, and scavenges at colonies of penguins and seals (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The Northern Giant-Petrel breeds on sub-Antarctic islands. Its breeding range extends into the Antarctic zone at South Georgia. It nests in coastal areas where vegetation or broken terrain offers shelter, on sea-facing slopes, headlands, in the lee of banks, under or against vegetation clumps, below cliffs or overhanging rocks, or in hollows. On Campbell Island, it nests on the edge of the coastal plateau. Tussock-grass ( Poa ) is widespread at many breeding sites. Its nests are built in secluded, coastal sites, sheltered by heavy vegetation. On Antipodes Island, it nests under  Senecio antipoda  (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Northern Giant-Petrel eats seal, whale, and penguin carrion, and seal placentae. It often attends and follow ships to obtain offal. It also eats substantial quantities of euphausiids (krill) and other crustaceans, cephalopods (octopus and squid), and fish. It will kill and eat immature Albatross  Diomedea , and a variety of other seabirds, which are either consumed as carrion or captured at sea. Kelp is also recorded in its diet (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The breeding diet of the Northern Giant-Petrel is as follows (from Marchant & Higgins 1990):% mass% frequencyBird Island   Bird Island   Macquarie Island   male female male female combined Total birds 63.9 52.6 62-80 46-65 60-80 Penguins 59.6 41.5 62 46 60 Other birds 4.3 11.1 18 19 16-20 Crustaceans 13.6 31.7 19 42-51 5 Euphausiids 13.6 30.4 19 42 0 Fish 1.9 4.6 9 10 7 Cephalopods 2.9 2.8 7 17 21 Mammals 17.9 8.3 19 7 6 Other 0 0 0 0 32-34 There are marked differences in foraging behaviour between the sexes of the Northern Giant-Petrel. Females obtain most of their prey from the sea, while males will also scavenge from the carcasses of penguins and seals. At sea, both sexes are aggressive opportunists. Most prey is taken via surface-seizing, but it is also capable of surface-diving and pursuit-plunging down to about 2 m, and it has been observed swimming under water with their feet in pursuit of prey (EABG 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1990). Foraging behaviours of Giant-Petrels, such as following boats, feeding aggressively on offal and diving for baits make them susceptible to being drowned in longline fishing gear (DEH 2006). It is thought to be a predomiNAtly diurnal forager, but it feeds its chicks during both the day and at night. It drinks both salt and fresh water (EABG 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1990).','Longline fishing causes two main forms of mortality in the Northern Giant-Petrel; by-catch during line-setting, and ingestion of discarded fishing hooks. Giant-Petrels follow fishing vessels and compete for baits. Many are hooked and drown, or are seriously injured, and others ingest hooks while they are scavenging offal, particularly if they scavenge hooked fish heads that are discarded inappropriately. Hook ingestion by albatross and Giant-Petrels appears to have increased in recent years. Between 50 and 100 million hooks are set each year in the Southern Ocean and as many as 1.1 billion hooks are set globally. Both seabirds and fishing vessels concentrate in areas of high biological productivity. Consequently, Giant petrels are seriously threatened by longline fishing (AGDEH 2006q).Internationally, some longline fishing fleets still operate without important by-catch mitigation measures. Therefore, Northern Giant-Petrels breeding within the Australian Fishing Zone are still killed on longlines from vessels operating outside the Australian Fishing Zone (AGDEH 2006q).Other fishing practices, such as trawling can also cause injury or death, but this may occur only rarely, especially if vessels employ simple mitigation measures; outside of the Australian Fishing Zone, trawlers carrying netsonde monitor cables or their equivalent may cause substantial mortality. Trolling (trailing a line with baited hooks) for pelagic species such as Albacore Tuna  Thunnus alalunga  is another potential threat to the Northern Giant-Petrel (AGDEH 2006q).The Northern Giant-Petrel may be shot for sport or to reduce scavenging from commercial fishing vessels. Ingestion of plastics, entanglement in marine debris, oil spills, reduced genetic variability (inbreeding depression) and accumulation of chemical contamiNAts also pose risks to this species (AGDEH 2006q; Garnett & Crowley 2000).Disturbance of breeding sites associated with the development of research stations or human visitation to breeding colonies has the potential to cause serious impacts on the Northern Giant-Petrel, through a reduction in breeding success, or because birds abandon the colony (AGDEH 2006q; Woehler et al. 2001; Woehler et al., in press).Breeding success and/or nest-site selection have probably been adversely affected by rats, cats and an elevated number of Subantarctic Skuas  Catharacta lonnbergi  (AGDEH 2006q; Garnett & Crowley 2000), although the threat from the latter two has been substantially reduced (G. Copson, as cited in Garnett & Crowley 2000).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1061'),('1075','Phoebetria fusca','Vulnerable','Aves','Diomedeidae','Sooty Albatross are, like their name suggests, a sooty brown colour, although the nape, back and sides of the neck may be paler in adults with worn plumage. The head is slightly darker than the body and there is a partial fine white ring around the eyes. The shafts of the primary feathers and central tail feathers are white. The lower mandible is black with a pale yellow to orange stripe. The wings of the Sooty Albatross are very slender and pointed, while the tail is wedge shaped (Pizzey & Knight 1999).','The Sooty Albatross is marine and pelagic. In summer, the species occurs mainly south of 35° S in subtropical and subantarctic waters, but it is most abundant near the Subtropical Convergence (Falla 1937a; Tickell & Woods 1972; Weimerskirch et al .  1986). It ranges south of the Antarctic Convergence in the south-western Indian Ocean, but rarely elsewhere (Biermann & Voous 1950; Weimerskirch et al .  1986). In late autumn and winter, the Sooty Albatross occurs mainly in the Subtropical Zone (Rand 1963; Tickell & Woods 1972). Immature albatrosses are restricted to the Subtropical zone throughout the year (Stahl 1987).The Sooty Albatross tolerates a wide range of sea surface temperatures and salinities (Biermann & Voous 1950; Jouventin & Weimerskirch 1984).  During both the breeding and non-breeding seasons, the species occurs widely over pelagic waters, exploiting dispersed sources of food (Weimerskirch et al .  1986). It forages over coastal kelp beds around Tristan da Cunha (Richardson 1984).The species breeds on subtropical and subantarctic islands in the Indian and Atlantic Oceans, on vegetated cliffs and steep slopes that are sheltered from prevailing winds, often amongst tussock grass (Weimerskirch et al .  1986). On Marion Island, Prince Edward Island, Iles Kerguelen and Crozet Island, breeding is confined to coastal sites. Nests are inland on Ile Amsterdam, Gough Island and the Tristan da Cunha Group, on ridges, cliffs, high slopes and plateaux (Hagen 1952; Segonzac 1972; Shaughnessy & Fairall 1976).','The Sooty Albatross eats cephalopods (fish and octopuses), fish, crustaceans, siphonophores and penguin carrion on the high seas (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The species flies within 10 to 15 m of the sea surface, using updrafts from wave fronts for lift. It forages at the sea surface (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The Sooty Albatross associates with whales and fishing boats (Gales 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1990). Foraging behaviours of albatrosses, such as following boats, flying long distances to search for food, and feeding on offal make them susceptible to being drowned in longline fishing gear (AGDEH 2006q).','The primary threat to the Sooty Albatross is drowning in longline fishing gear (Garnett & Crowley 2000). Until recently up to 150 Sooty Albatrosses per year were being caught by the Japanese Tuna Fleet in the Australian Fishing Zone (Gales 1998; Gales et al .  1998; Weimerskirch & Jouventin 1998). Oceanic longline fishing has been used to target pelagic and demersal fish in the southern oceans since the 1950s, and is used in almost all Australian waters today (AGDEH 2006q). Gales and Brothers (1995) reported that 75% of the birds killed on longlines and retained for identification were albatrosses. Internationally, some longline fishing fleets still operate without substantial by-catch mitigation measures. Therefore, birds breeding within the Australian Fishing Zone are still killed on longlines from vessels operating outside the Australian Fishing Zone (EABG 2001).Hook and plastic ingestion also potentially threaten the Sooty Albatross. Hook ingestion by albatross and giant-petrels appears to have increased in recent years. Between 50 and 100 million hooks are set each year in the Southern Ocean and as many as 1.1 billion hooks are set globally. Both seabirds and fishing vessels concentrate in areas of high biological productivity (EABG 2001).The Sooty Albatross may also die from collisions with cables and warps used on fishing trawlers. Outside of the Australian Fishing Zone, trawlers carrying netsonde monitor cables or their equivalent may cause substantial mortality in albatrosses. Trolling (trailing a line with baited hooks) for pelagic species such as Albacore Tuna  Thunnus alalunga  is another potential threat (EABG 2001; Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1998; Weimerskirch et al. 1997; Weimerskirch & Jouventin 1998).A global population decrease of 20 to 50% is likely in this species over the next three generations (45 years) as a result of fishing bycatch (Environment Australia 2001f; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Marchant & Higgins 1990).Recent evidence suggests that the Sooty Albatross on Amsterdam Island is also threatened by outbreaks of avian cholera and the bacterial disease  Erysipelas . The diseases apparently resulted in high mortality of chicks in 2003 (Weimerskirch 2004).The Sooty Albatross is also affected by breeding failures. Predation by introduced rats was the most likely cause of breeding failure on Ile St Paul (Segonzac 1972). Repeated fires at Iles St Paul and Amsterdam Island may have caused a decrease in the vegetation cover at breeding sites, so that material for nest construction is now scarce (Jouventin et al .  1984; Segonzac 1972).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1075'),('1076','Phoebetria palpebrata','','Aves','Diomedeidae','The Light-mantled Sooty Albatross is a medium-sized albatross (length 78–90 cm; wingspan 1.8–2.2 m; weight 2.5–3.7 kg). Its plumage is sooty-brown except for a white crescent around each eye; a grey or light-grey mantle, back and rump; and a pale brownish-grey breast and belly. It has brown irides, a black bill with a pale blue or violet sulcus, and mauve or greyish-flesh legs and feet (Brooke 2004; Marchant & Higgins 1990; Tickell 2000). Juveniles are similar to adults but have a grey (rather than white) crescent around each eye; dark (rather than whitish) shafts to the primaries and rectrices; a grey, brownish or pale yellow sulcus; and, in older immatures, mottled plumage (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Light-mantled Sooty Albatross is a pelagic marine species that occurs over continental shelf/slope and deeper waters in the sub-tropical, sub-Antarctic and Antarctic zones. The species breeds on sub-Antarctic islands and rocky islets where pairs nest on cliffs and steep slopes (Downes et al. 1959; Marchant & Higgins 1990; Reid et al. 2002; Tickell 2000).The Light-mantled Sooty Albatross does not occur in any of the threatened ecological communities listed under the EPBC Act.Light-mantled Sooty Albatross pairs sometimes breed in mixed colonies with Cape Petrels ( Daption capense ), Grey-headed Albatrosses ( Thalassarche chrysostoma ) and Sooty Albatrosses ( Phoebetria fusca ) on islands outside of Australian jurisdiction (Berruti 1979; Mougin 1970; Weimerskirch et al. 1986), or near Black-browed Albatrosses ( Thalassarche melanophris ) on Heard Island (E.J. Woehler 2007a, pers. comm.). Each of these species is listed as a Marine species, and the Sooty Albatross is also listed as a Migratory species, under the EPBC Act.At sea, Light-mantled Sooty Albatrosses sometimes forage in association with Wandering Albatrosses ( Diomedea exulans ) (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The Wandering Albatross is listed as a Threatened, Marine and Migratory species under the EPBC Act.','The Light-mantled Sooty Albatross feeds on fish, cephalopods (for example squid and octopus), crustaceans and carrion (for example penguins, prions and seals) (Cherel & Klages 1998; Green et al. 1998).The Light-mantled Sooty Albatross forages entirely at sea. It obtains most of its food by floating on the surface of the ocean and plucking prey items from the water with its bill (termed \'surface seizing\'). It occasionally forages by diving under water while floating on the surface (\'surface diving\') or by plunging into the water from in flight and partially submerging or submerging to just below the surface (\'surface plunging\' and \'shallow plunging\') (Harper et al. 1985). Individuals fitted with depth gauges have recorded dives to 12 m below the surface. The depths of these dives, combined with the streamlined body of the Light-mantled Sooty Albatross, suggests that individuals probably employ some form of active swimming to attain such depths (Prince et al. 1994b).Light-mantled Sooty Albatrosses follow longline fishing vessels to feed on cast baits and discarded scraps. This behaviour exposes them to incidental mortality through interactions with fishing vessels (Baker et al. 2002; Gales 1993, 1998).','The principal threat to the Light-mantled Sooty Albatross within Australian jurisdiction is incidental mortality arising from interactions with longline fishing operations (Gales 1998; Baker et al. 2002). Light-mantled Sooty Albatrosses and other albatrosses and petrels routinely attend longline fishing vessels to feed on cast baits and discarded scraps. Death or injury can occur when birds ingest baited hooks during the setting or hauling of longlines; become hooked or entangled in fishing gear other than that being targeted; ingest hooks embedded in discarded scraps; or are shot by fishermen. The death of breeding birds can also result in the loss of eggs or dependent young. The primary cause of mortality is drowning when hooked birds are dragged underwater by the weight of the longline. This most frequently occurs during setting of the longline (Australian Antarctic Division 2005a; Baker et al. 2002; Environment Australia 2001f). The ability of Light-mantled Sooty Albatrosses to dive to depths of 12 m after prey (Prince et al. 1994b) makes them particularly susceptible to capture (Gales 1998).A Japanese longline fishery for Southern Bluefin Tuna ( Thunnus maccoyii ) that operated in the Australian Fishing Zone (AFZ) from 1986 to 1997 (Australian Antarctic Division 2005a; Caton 2003) is estimated to have captured up to 80 Light-mantled Albatross per year from 1989 to 1995 (Gales et al. 1998). Longline fishing by Australian vessels continues within the AFZ, but the introduction of compulsory mitigation measures by the federal government has seen total seabird bycatch rates drop from an observed rate of 0.92 birds/1000 hooks in the Australian longline fishery for Southern Bluefin Tuna (Brothers & Foster 1997) and an estimated minimum rate of 0.15 birds/1000 hooks in the Japanese longline fishery for Southern Bluefin Tuna (Gales et al. 1998) in the mid 1990s, to less than 0.05 birds/1000 hooks in a number of Australian longline fisheries in recent years (Australian Antarctic Division 2005a). The proportion of albatrosses in the bycatch of longline fisheries has also decreased from 74% in the Japanese longline fishery for Southern Bluefin Tuna from 1998 to 1995 (Gales et al. 1998) to less than 10% in Australian pelagic longline fisheries in recent years (Australian Antarctic Division 2005a; Baker & Wise 2005), most likely reflecting a change in the distribution of longline fishing effort within the AFZ (Australian Antarctic Division 2005a).Satellite tracking studies of Light-mantled Sooty Albatrosses breeding on Macquarie Island and the Crozet Islands suggest that interactions with longline vessels may be limited during the breeding season because foraging is concentrated over waters located south of longline fishing grounds (Gales 1998; Weimerskirch 1998; Weimerskirch & Robertson 1994). However, non-breeding individuals roam widely over the southern oceans, and both breeding and non-breeding individuals move northward in winter at the completion of the breeding season (Gales 1998; Weimerskirch 1998). As longline fisheries also operate on the high seas and in territorial waters of New Zealand and countries of southern Africa and South America (Australian Antarctic Division 2005a), potential exists for individuals from breeding colonies within Australian jurisdiction to come in contact with longline fisheries elsewhere in the Southern Hemisphere. Furthermore, many longline fisheries operating outside of Australian jurisdiction continue to operate without bycatch mitigation measures, thus increasing the potential for seabird mortality (Environment Australia 2001f).The impacts of other threats operating within Australian jurisdiction are essentially unknown. The breeding success and/or nest site selection of individuals that frequent Macquarie Island have probably been adversely affected by the introduction of cats ( Felis catus ), which were potential predators but were eradicated from Macquarie Island in 2000, and by an increase in numbers of Brown Skua ( Stercorarius antarcticus lonnbergi ), an opportunistic predator of seabird eggs and chicks, which have attained high densities by feeding on introduced European Rabbits ( Oryctolagus cuniculus ) (Carmichael 2007; Environment Australia 2001f; Garnett & Crowley 2000).Other potential threats to albatrosses and petrels within Australian jurisdiction include interactions with trawl and gillnet fisheries, dependence on fishery discards, over-extraction of prey species by fisheries, marine pollution (chemicals and solids), introduced rats and rabbits and avian parasites and disease (Baker et al. 2002). It is not known what impacts, if any, these threats are having on Light-mantled Sooty Albatrosses within Australian jurisdiction.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1076'),('1077','Calonectris leucomelas','','Aves','Procellariidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1077'),('108','Pseudomys australis','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Muridae','The Plains Rat is a small rodent with thick, soft, silver-grey fur above; white to cream underneath; and with relatively large ears. This species grows to 14 cm long and weighs up to 80 g. Its tail is brown to grey and grows to 12 cm long and ends in a white tip (Cronin 1991; Strahan 1998).','The Plains Rat is primarily found in gibber (stone-covered) plains and mid slopes with boulders, small stones and gilgais (water soaks, depressions) (SAALNRM 2008). In years of very good rainfall, this species occur on adjoining sandy plains (SAALNRM 2008). During poor conditions, core refuge areas may occur on low-lying gilgais and watercourses of gibbber plains (SAALNRM 2008). Historically, this species occupied a wider variaty of habitats including sand ridges and dense grasslands (Brandle et al. 1999).Asociated vegetation is predomiNAtly chenopod as well as ephemeral plants that require good rains to flourish. Associated species includes perennial  Atriplex - Maireana  open shrubland on gibber (Todmorden Station, Macumba Station and Witjira National Park) and gypseous cracking clay plains dominated by low  Sclerolaena  sub-shrubs (Billa Kalina Station; Moon Plain north of Coober Pedy) (Lee 1995).This species is most commonly found in areas that are regularly inundated, often for extended periods. It is probable that individuals would be constantly displaced from these habitats for extended periods, preventing recolonisation, burrowing and breeding (Brandle et al. 1999). During poor rainfall years, Plain Rat populations are maintained in drainage depressions and areas of cracking clays. Such water run-on areas are generally more productive than surrounding habitats and probably hold a greater concentration of shed seeds and dry plant matter than most other habitats (Brandle et al. 1999). The cracks in the soil trap wind-blown material and decrease its likelihood of harvest by other species such as parrots and other birds (Brandle et al. 1999). It has been suggested that these areas are the most productive areas of stony desert landscapes compared to sodic and unstable sections of gibber that restrict plant growth (Hunt & Gilkes 1992 cited in Brandle et al. 1999; Wright et al. 1990 cited in Brandle et al. 1999).A detailed vegetation analysis showed that the Plains Rat only occurred in four of the nine vegetation classes associated with gibber. The primary habitat was considered to be the drainage channels and depressions with deep friable cracking clays. These habitats were considered to be best able to collect water from even minor falls of rain. Secondary habitats were associated with gilgais and minor drainage areas with low perennial chenopod shrublands and heavier cracking clays (Brandle et al. 1999).Most core habitat occurs in areas well away from areas of stock concentration such as watering points and floodplains, however, the current pastoral practice of piping water across prevoiusly unwatered country may alter this balance (Brandle et al. 1999). The Plains Rat occurs in habitat shared by the Stripe-faced Dunnart ( Sminthopsis macroura ), the Fat-tailed Dunnart ( Sminthopsis crassicaudata ), the Narrow-nosed Planigale ( Planigale tenuirostris ), the Paucident Planigale ( Planigale gilesi ), Kultarr ( Antechinomys laniger ), Forrests Mouse ( Leggadina forresti ) and the Desert Mouse ( Pseudomys desertor ).','The major component of the Plains Rat diet is seeds with other plant material, while invertebrates and fungi are a minor component (Murray et al. 1999). This species forages and is active during the cool night (Qld EPA 2008). It is able to survive without drinking, as water is obtained from the metabolism of starches in its food (Qld EPA 2008).','The Plains Rat has had a significant reduction in total distribution since European colonisation. Habitat degradation, trampling and over grazing by rabbits and cattle is of particular concern. Also, foxes and dingoes are reported to prey on the Plains Rat and may have contributed to its contraction in range. The Letter-winged Kite ( Elanus scriptus ) is also reported to prey on the Plains Rat (Brandle & Moseby 1999). The role of these threats is exacerbated during periods of extreme weather and periods of restricted resource availability (SAALNRM 2008).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=108'),('1115','Aipysurus apraefrontalis','Critically Endangered','Reptilia','Hydrophiidae','The Short-nosed Seasnake is a fully aquatic, small, rather slender snake with a small head and pointed snout. The head is generally brown, as is the body, with 24–27 purplish brown crossbands over the body. The head scales are mostly symmetrical. The prefrontal scales are absent thus enabling the nasal scales to touch the frontal scale. The body scales are extremely imbricate (overlapping), or leaf-like and are in 17 rows at the mid-body. The 142–160 ventral scales are broad with 18–25 subcaudal scales. The Short-nosed Seasnake grows to 60 cm in total length (Cogger 2000; Ehmann 1992b; Smith 1926; Storr et al. 2002).','The species prefers the reef flats or shallow waters along the outer reef edge in water depths to 10 m (Cogger 2000; Guinea 1993, 1995; McCosker 1975). The species has been observed during daylight hours, resting beneath small coral overhangs or coral heads in 1–2 m of water (McCosker 1975). Guinea and Whiting (2005) reported that very few Short-nosed Seasnakes moved even as far as 50 m away from the reef flat.','Stomach contents reveals that the Short-nosed Seasnake eats fish (Gobiidae:  Eviota  sp.) (Voris 1972) and eels (Smith 1926).','Human activitiesIndirectly, human activities can interact with seasnakes through the degradation of seasnake habitat. Seasnakes may be affected by oil spills and other contamination, dredging activities and increased boat traffic causing boat strikes and disruption of feeding behaviour (Cogger 2000; Hobday et al. 2006).Climate changeThe long-term effect of climate change on seasnakes is unclear but an increase in the water temperature, frequency of bleaching events, reduced rates of calcification, increased sediment loads, higher sea levels and changes in the intensity and frequency of storm activity are also likely to have a negative effect on coral reef habitats, which are used by Short-nosed Seasnakes (Cogger 2000; Hobday et al. 2006).Commercial fish and prawn trawlingWhile the Short-nosed Seasnake inhabits coral reefs, and is rare in the by-catch of trawling operations (M. Guinea 2001, pers. comm.), trawling for fish now occurs closer to reefs than it did a decade ago (Milton 2001). Wassenberg and colleagues (2001) reported that around a quarter to three-quarters of seasnakes caught during trawling operations drowned or died from injuries, depending on the duration of trawling.Incidental catch and death in commercial prawn trawling fisheries appears to be the biggest threat to seasnakes in the North-west Marine Bioregion (Guinea 2007). High catch rates are exacerbated by the high death rate of snakes caught in trawl nets. Even when retained aboard to recuperate, seasnakes seldom survive (Guinea 2007). Seasnakes may be more vulnerable to overfishing than other species because of their longevity and low reproductive rates. In addition, females appear to be caught more often than males (Fry et al. 2001).The Northern Prawn Fishery (NPF) extends into the easternmost part of the North-west Marine Bioregion to Cape Londonderry and has historically had high levels of interaction with seasnakes. However, due to the small area and shorter season of the Northern Prawn Fishery in the North-west Marine Region, the number of seasnakes caught in the region is likely to be much lower (DEWHA 2008b).Other prawn fisheries in the North-west Bioregion, such as the Pilbara Trawl Fishery, the Exmouth Gulf Prawn Fishery and the Shark Bay Prawn Fishery, also occasionally catch small numbers of seasnakes, however, their impact on seasnake populations is considered negligible (DEWHA 2008b).Ashmore ReefThe decline of sea snakes at Asmore Reef are likely to be multi faceted and possibly related to overall ecosystemdecline. If habitat degradation has driven declines at the reefm than increases in live coral cover in the late 2000s may point to a potential recovery of sea snakeas (Lukoschek et al. 2013). Nevertheless, declines of this species at that reef preceeded major bleaching events in late 1990s (Lukoschek et al. 2013).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1115'),('1118','Aipysurus foliosquama','Critically Endangered','Reptilia','Hydrophiidae','The Leaf-scaled Seasnake is a small, slender snake with a small head and pointed snout. The dorsal surface is dark (reddish brown or purplish) with paler cross-bands. The head scales are large and usually symmetrical. Body scales are imbricate (strongly overlapping), or leaf-like, and are in 19–21 rows at the mid-body. Ventral scales are deeply notched, and number 135–155. The anal scale is divided. Subcaudal scales vary between 20–30. The Leaf-scaled Seasnake grows to about 60 cm in total length (Cogger 2000; Smith 1926; Storr et al. 2002) but specimens up to 90 cm have been reported (Guinea 1995). Sexual dimorphism is present in the number of subcaudal scales, with males having 24–27 and females having 20–29 (Greer 1997).','The Leaf-scaled Seasnake occurs in shallow water (less than 10 m in depth), in the protected parts of the reef flat, adjacent to living coral and on coral substrates (Ehmann 1992b; McCosker 1975).At Ashmore Reef, the Leaf-scaled Seasnake occurs on the reef flat during both high and low tides. It is found in exposed tidal pools during low tide, and has behavioural adaptations that enable it to tolerate the high water temperatures in pools (Guinea & Whiting 2005).','Prey items recorded in the diet of the Leaf-scaled Seasnake include shallow water coral-associated Wrasse ( Halichoeres  sp.), gudgeons (Eleotridae), clinids ( Tripterygion  sp.) and eels (Anguilliformes) (McCosker 1975; Voris 1972; Voris & Voris 1983).The Leaf-scaled Seasnake forages by searching in fish burrows on the reef flat (Guinea & Whiting 2005).','Threats to the Leaf-scaled Seasnake are: the direct threat from commercial fish and prawn trawling; and indirect threats from human activities and climate change.Direct threatCommercial fish and prawn trawlingWhile the Leaf-scaled Seasnake inhabits coral reefs, and is rare in the by-catch of trawling operations (M. Guinea 2001, pers. comm.), trawling for fish now occurs closer to reefs than it did a decade ago (Milton 2001). However, the Leaf-scaled Seasnake is seldom present in the incidental by-catch of trawl fisheries. It represented 2% of the snakes captured in trawling operations in the Arafura Sea (Shuntov 1971), and 2.9% of the by-catch during more recent fish trawling operations on the northern Australian continental shelf (Ward 1996a). Wassenberg and colleagues (2001) reported that around a quarter to three-quarters of seasnakes caught during trawling operations drowned or died from injuries, depending on the duration of trawling.Incidental catch and death in commercial prawn trawling fisheries appears to be the biggest threat to seasnakes in the North-west Marine Bioregion (Guinea 2007). High catch rates are exacerbated by the high death rate of snakes caught in trawl nets. Even when retained aboard to recuperate, seasnakes seldom survive (Guinea 2007). Seasnakes may be more vulnerable to overfishing than other species because of their longevity and low reproductive rates. In addition, females appear to be caught more often than males (Fry et al. 2001).The Northern Prawn Fishery (NPF) extends into the easternmost part of the North-west Marine Bioregion to Cape Londonderry and has historically had high levels of interaction with seasnakes. However, due to the small area and shorter season of the Northern Prawn Fishery in the North-west Marine Region, the number of seasnakes caught in the Region is likely to be much lower (DEWHA 2008b).Other prawn fisheries in the North-west Bioregion, such as the Pilbara Trawl Fishery, the Exmouth Gulf Prawn Fishery and the Shark Bay Prawn Fishery, also occasionally catch small numbers of seasnakes, however, their impact on seasnake populations is considered negligible (DEWHA 2008b).Indirect threatsClimate changeThe long-term effect of climate change on seasnakes is unclear but an increase in the water temperature, frequency of bleaching events, reduced rates of calcification, increased sediment loads, higher sea levels and changes in the intensity and frequency of storm activity are also likely to have a negative effect on coral reef habitats, which are used by the Leaf-scaled Seasnake (Cogger 2000; Hobday et al. 2006).Human activitiesHuman activities can interact with seasnakes through the degradation of seasnake habitat. Seasnakes may be affected by oil spills and other contamination, dredging activities and increased boat traffic causing boat strikes and disruption of feeding behaviour (Cogger 2000; Hobday et al. 2006).Ashmore ReefThe decline of sea snakes at Asmore Reef are likely to be multi faceted and possibly related to overall ecosystemdecline. If habitat degradation has driven declines at the reefm than increases in live coral cover in the late 2000s may point to a potential recovery of sea snakeas (Lukoschek et al. 2013). Nevertheless, declines of this species at that reef preceeded major bleaching events in late 1990s (Lukoschek et al. 2013).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1118'),('113','Pseudomys fieldi','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Muridae','The Shark Bay mouse is a moderately-sized rodent (body mass 30-61 g, average 45 g) with dark brown, shaggy fur above (Watts & Aslin 1981 cited in Pavey 2006p) and pure white fur underneath. It has a fully furred tail which grows to 12.5 cm long (Strahan 1998), slightly longer than the head-body (8-11.5 cm) (Pavey 2006p).','On Bernier Island, the Shark Bay mouse inhabits coastal dune vegetation dominated by Beach Spinifex ( Spinifex longifolius ) and Coastal Daisybush ( Olearia axillaris ) (Morris & Robinson 2008 cited in Woinarski et al. 2014). It occurs in most coastal sandy areas around the island (Morris et al. 2000), and at lower densities in inland  Triodia / Acacia  heath (Robinson et al. 1976 cited in Woinarski et al. 2014). Little is known of the former habitat use on the mainland. On Shark Bay mainland it was last collected in Coastal Beach Spinifex at Herald Bight. This species does not appear to use burrows as commonly as most other  Pseudomys  species. They are known to construct tunnels and runways in heaps of seagrass piled up on Bernier Island beaches during winter storms (Robinson et al. 1976 cited in Woinarski et al. 2012) and use above ground nests as diurnal refuges. More use of burrows is made during the breeding season (Morris & Speldewinde 1992 cited in Woinarski et al. 2014). Animals translocated to Doole Island used hollows located in White mangrove ( Avicennia marina ) trees above high water level as well as sites among rocks and under  Triodia  for day time refuges (Morris et al. 2000).','The Shark Bay mouse is omnivorous, with a varied diet consisting of flowers (likely from the Coastal Daisy Bush), leaves and stems from fleshy plant species, as well as fungi, insects and spiders (Morris & Robinson 1995; WA DEC 2010s).','Several factors are thought to be responsible for the decline of the Shark Bay mouse on the mainland, such as, predation by feral cats and foxes, habitat changes (specifically soil compaction and vegetation trampling and grazing) by introducted hooved herbivores and competition with introduced pests (NT DLRM 2006; WA DEC 2010s).  Potential threats to the Shark Bay mouse in the three island subpopulations include: climate change leading to lower rainfall, predation by feral cats, foxes and black rats and altered fire patterns due to introduced pasture grasses on Faure Island. The outcome would be severe to catastrophic if the predatory threats were to establish on the islands (Woinarski et al. 2014).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=113'),('1182','Hoplocephalus bungaroides','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Elapidae','The Broad-headed Snake is black above with numerous bright yellow scales forming a series of irregular, narrow cross-bands. The belly is grey to grey-black, sometimes with yellow blotches. The head also has yellow blotches and the labials are barred yellow. It grows to a maximum length of 90 cm, however its average length is 60 cm (Cogger 2000).','The Broad-headed Snake is often found in rocky outcrops and adjacent sclerophyll forest and woodland (Cogger et al. 1993; NSW NPWS 2001). The most suitable sites occur in sandstone ridgetops (Cogger et al. 1993). Near Bathurst snakes occur in forest growing on shale or conglomerate slopes and bluffs (G. Shea in Cogger et al. 1993). Common canopy species include  Corymbia eximia, C. gummifera, Eucalyptus sieberi, E. punctata  and  E. piperita . Snakes prefer sites with a west to north-west aspect (NSW NPWS 2001). Studies using radio-telemetry have never found individuals sheltering under rocks on easterly cliff tops (J.K. Webb, unpublished data in Pringle et al. 2003). Suitable habitat is patchily distributed throughout the species range (Cogger et al. 1993).Adult snakes show a seasonal, temperature induced, shift in habitat use (Webb & Shine 1998b). Adults use rocks and crevices as shelter sites in rocky outcrops in autumn, winter and early spring (Webb & Shine 1994). Juvenile snakes remain in rocky habitat year round (Downes 1999). Snakes shelter under thin (below 20 cm) rocks on exposed sites, which fit closely with a rocky substrate (Webb & Shine 1994; Webb & Shine 1998b). Occupied crevices have a sunny aspect (Webb & Shine 1998b) and rocks used by snakes are those that receive the most warmth from the sun (Pringle et al. 2003). The majority of occupied retreat sites occur on exposed cliff edges (Webb & Shine 1994). Thermally suitable microhabitat may be a limiting resource for the species (Pringle et al. 2003).Snakes often spend long periods of inactivity in a retreat site, such as under rocks or in crevices (Webb & Shine 1998b). The mean number of rocks used by individual snakes in a single year was 2.03 (n = 33) (Webb & Shine 1998b).In late spring and summer, when temperatures under rocks become too hot for many snakes, adult males and non-breeding adult females move up to 780 m above sea level into adjacent woodland (Webb & Shine 1997a). Gravid females and juveniles remain in rocky habitat, using cooler, shaded rocks and crevices (Webb & Shine 1998a). In woodland, snakes shelter in hollows in a variety of tree species including Red Bloodwood ( Eucalyptus gummifera ), Grey Gum ( E. punctata ), Sydney Peppermint ( E. piperita ) and Blue Leaf Stringybark ( E. agglomerata ). Snakes show preferences for large trees, trees with multiple hollows, and dead trees. Most snakes use hollow branches rather than hollow stems. Individual snakes use between one and nine trees. Snakes spend long periods of inactivity in a single hollow, up to 48 days (Webb & Shine 1997a).','The Broad-Headed snake is an ambush predator, spending up to four weeks in the same retreat site (Webb & Shine 1997a) and preying on small reptiles and mammals that enter the retreat (Webb & Shine 1997a; Wells 1981).Snakes feed very infrequently, with less than 20% of captured adults showing signs of having fed recently (Webb & Shine 1994). Juveniles feed more frequently than adults (Webb & Shine 1994; Webb & Shine 1998c). Captive snakes maintain condition or gain weight when kept on a diet of one or two pre-killed mice or rats per month (Shine & Fitzgerald 1989). One captive specimen is known to have survived a 12-month fast (Anstis in Wells 1981).Juvenile snakes feed primarily on Velvet Geckos ( Oedura lesuerii ) (up to 70% of prey items) and occasionally on small skinks ( Lampropholis spp. ) (Downes 1999; Webb & Shine 1998c).  Juveniles regularly eat geckos that are almost 60% of their own body mass (Webb & Shine 1994). Young snakes grow slowly, possibly due to their inability to handle large prey (Webb & Shine 1998c).Adult snakes also consume Velvet Geckos, although they only comprise 27% of prey items (Webb & Shine 1998c). Other prey items include the lizards  Cryptoblepharus virgatus, Eulamprus quoyii, Ctenotus taeniolatus, Eulamprus tenuis  and  Amphibolurus muricatus ; Small-eyed Snakes  Cryptophis nigrescens ; and the mammals  Mus domesticus  and  Antechinus stuartii  (Downes 1999; G. Turner in NSW NPWS 2001; Shine 1983b; Webb & Shine 1998c; White 1973). One adult had consumed a juvenile conspecific (an individual of the same species) half its size (Webb & Shine 1994).Broad-headed Snakes show a greater degree of prey specificity than many other Australian elapid snakes (Webb & Shine 1998c).','The entire range of the Broad-headed Snake occurs in an area with the highest density of human population in Australia, and accordingly has wide-scale habitat degradation (Shine & Fitzgerald 1989; Cogger et al. 1993).Clearance of habitat has resulted in fragmentation and isolation of populations. High levels of human visitation and associated habitat disturbance threaten remaining populations (Cogger et al. 1993).The disturbance and removal of rocks used as retreat sites has the greatest effect on snake abundance. The rocks preferred by both snakes and their gecko prey are similar in diameter, thickness and underlying substrate to the rocks preferred by \'bushrock\' collectors. The amount of rock disturbance through overturning, piling up, removal or smashing has an impact on the abundance of snakes as well as on geckos preyed on by the snakes (Shine et al. 1998; Webb et al 2008 ) and spiders preyed on by the geckos (NSW NPWS 2001). Also, rock collectors may deliberately kill snakes (Cogger et al. 1993). Illegal rock removal and disturbance remains a common practice in national parks (Goldingay & Newell 2000; Shine & Fitzgerald 1989). Disturbance is most common near roads and walking tracks, and snakes are more common away from access routes (Goldingay 1998; Goldingay & Newell 2000).Broad-headed Snakes were collected in large numbers from the 1950s to the 1970s for pets (H. Cogger in Shine et al. 1998). A mark-recapture study carried out in Morton National Park, NSW from 1992 to 2002 found that the population of snakes was stable over 1992–96 but declined dramatically in 1997, coincident with evidence of illegal collecting, possibly stimulated by a government amnesty that allowed pet owners to obtain permits for illegally held reptiles. In 1997, 85% of adult females disappeared from the population, and the data indicate that reptile collectors were causing the local extinction of Broad-headed Snakes from the study site (Webb et al. 2002c).Bushfires may pose a threat to snake populations through altering the availability of hollows and prey, or endangering snakes when occupying hollows (NSW NPWS 2001).The importance of tree hollows as summer habitat for snakes means that forestry activities may also threaten some populations (NSW NPWS 2001; Webb & Shine 1997a) and post-logging burning may impact upon prey populations. \'Habitat\' trees left by foresters are smaller and contain fewer hollows than trees preferred by snakes (Webb & Shine 1997a).The species requires shelter rocks that receive high levels of solar radiation. Local increases in vegetation density could result in increased shading of retreat sites, potentially rendering them thermally unsuitable. It is likely that fire deterrence since European arrival has led to an increase in vegetation density and this may have contributed to the decline of the species, however this is yet to be objectively demonstrated (Pringle et al. 2003).The presence of beak marks on the occasional snake indicates that predatory birds may prey on the species (J.K. Webb, personal observation in Pringle et al. 2003).Foxes and cats are potential predators of the Broad-headed Snake (NSW NPWS 2001).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1182'),('1193','Denisonia maculata','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Elapidae','The Ornamental Snake is a brown, grey-brown or black snake growing up to 50 cm in length with lighter coloured body scales, often with darker streaks/flecks. The crown of the head is darker brown/black with lighter flecks, it has distinctly barred lips, a white/cream belly with dark spots/flecks on the outer edges, and smooth scales (Cogger 2000).','Preferred HabitatThe Ornamental Snake\'s preferred habitat is within, or close to, habitat that is favoured by its prey - frogs. The species is known to prefer woodlands and open forests associated with moist areas, particularly gilgai (melon-hole) mounds and depressions in Queensland Regional Ecosystem Land Zone 4, but also lake margins and wetlands (Agnew 2010 pers. comm.; Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010;Wilson & Knowles 1988). Gilgai formations are found where deep-cracking alluvial soils with high clay contents occur (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).For more information on Queensland Regional Ecosystems, please visit the Queensland Department of Environment and Resource Management website at  http://www.derm.qld.gov.au/wildlife-ecosystems/biodiversity/regional_ecosystems/ .Vegetation typesOrnamental Snake habitat is likely to be found in Brigalow ( Acacia harpophylla ), Gidgee ( Acacia cambagei ), Blackwood ( Acacia argyrodendron ) or Coolibah ( Eucalyptus coolabah )-dominated vegetation communities, or pure grassland associated with gilgais (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010). Whilst the species shows a preference for moist areas, and there are records from riparian areas, the species\' presumed preference for riparian habitat is questionable (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).The most common Queensland Regional Ecosystems (RE) in which the species has been recorded is RE 11.4.3. Other common RE types where the species has been recorded are (Agnew 2010 pers. comm.; Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010):11.4.3 - Open forest dominated by Brigalow and/or Belah clay soils not associated with current alluvium.11.4.6 - Gidgee woodland clay soils not associated with current alluvium.11.4.8 - Woodland to open forest dominated by Dawson Gum ( Eucalyptus cambageana ) and Brigalow or, sometimes in the north of the species\' range, Blackwood/Black Gidgee. Yapunyah        ( E. thozetiana ) is sometimes present on shallower clay soils not associated with current alluvium.11.4.9 - Open forest, occasionally woodland, dominated by Brigalow on clay soils not associated with current alluvium.  A low tree mid-storey of Yellow-wood ( Terminalia oblongata ) and False Sandalwood ( Eremophila mitchellii ) is usually present. Belah sometimes dominates in place of Brigalow in the overstory and Bauhinia ( Lysiphyllum cunninghamii ) sometimes co-dominates.Other Queensland Regional Ecosystems where the species has been recorded (Agnew 2010 pers. comm.) are:11.3.3 - Coolibah woodland adjacent to a large, treeless, ephemeral wetland on alluvium (river and creek flats).11.5.16 - Brigalow and/or Belah open-forest in depressions in Cainozoic old loamy and sandy plains. Associated with gilgai with one-metre local relief and 5–6 m in diameter.Note : Whilst several of the above RE descriptions make reference to Belah, it has tended to be absent or rare where the Ornamental Snake has been recorded in surveys conducted by Agnew (Agnew 2010 pers. comm.).MicrohabitatThe Ornamental Snake shelters in logs and under coarse woody debris and ground litter (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).Sites where Ornamental Snakes have been recorded in abundance share the following habitat characteristics (Agnew 2010 pers. comm.):They are located within the lowest part of the catchment. The Ornamental Snake has been found in greatest numbers in shallow water where some aquatic vegetation is present, or where fringing groundcover vegetation has been inundated, especially in flooded gilgais where the domiNAt aquatic macrophyte is Bog Hyacinth ( Monochoria cyanea ) (Agnew 2010 pers. comm.).They have diversity of gilgai size and depth (if deep, then broad with gently sloping gradients at the sides).There are soils of high clay content and deep-cracking characteristics. Water retention capacity increases with an increase in the fine clay particle fraction of soils. This, in turn, influences certain habitat conditions that are important for the Ornamental Snake and the frog species it preys upon. Cracking clays with higher sand and more sodic cracking clays, often associated with Brigalow / Belah-dominated communities, have a lower fine clay particle fraction and are likely to have lesser water retention capacity.Ground timber is usually relatively common (especially piles adjacent to or close by to gilgais).Where burrowing frogs ( Cyclorana  species) are abundant (see information on the feeding behaviour of the species).Habitat patches are typically greater than 10 hectares in area and are within, or connected, to larger areas of remNAt vegetation.One site in Brigalow woodland near Nebo had ample ground cover in the form of fallen timber, thickets of Currant Bush ( Carissa spinarum ) and small tussock grasses. Snakes at this site were only found in the vicinity of a complex of flooded gilgai, and were not located in nearby riparian and floodplain woodland. The gilgai had an abundance of frog prey (Melzer 2001 pers. comm.).During surveys in the Brigalow Belt near Coppabella in 2009, an Ornamental Snake was caught in a small dry sandy creek bed, fringed by scattered River Red Gums ( Eucalyptus camaldulensis ) within a Poplar Box ( Eucalyptus populnea ) and Poplar Gum ( Eucalyptus platyphylla ) woodland, with very small (less than one hectare) pockets of Brigalow and Belah woodland some distance from the creek on cracking clays. The snake was caught on sand, which is generally considered not suitable for this species (Marston 2010 pers. comm.). The specimen was likely, however, to be moving between preferred habitats in the surrounding area (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).Refuge habitatDuring dry periods, the species typically seeks refuge within soil cracks on gilgai mounds within the habitat area (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).','The diet of this species consists predomiNAtly of frogs (Cogger et al. 1993). The most commonly recorded frog species present where Ornamental Snakes occur (Agnew 2010 pers. comm.; Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Veary 2010 pers. comm.) are the:Striped Burrowing Frog ( Cyclorana alboguttata  formerly  Litoria alboguttata )Short-footed Frog ( Cyclorana breviceps )Wide-mouthed Frog ( Cyclorana novaehollandiae )Water-holding Frog ( Cyclorana platycephala )Spotted Marsh Frog ( Limnodynastes tasmaniensis )Green Tree Frog ( Litoria caerulea )Flooplain Frog ( Litoria inermis )Broad-palmed Frog ( Litoria latopalmata )Desert Tree Frog ( Litoria rubella )Ornate Burrowing Frog ( Opisthodon ornatus  formerly  Limnodynastes ornatus  or  Platypectron ornatus ).Other frog species where Ornamental Snakes have been found are (Agnew 2010 pers. comm.; Shine 1983):Knife-footed Frog ( Cyclorana cultripes )Rough Frog ( Cyclorana verrucosa )Dwarf Eastern Tree Frog/Green Reed Frog ( Litoria fallax )Roth\'s Tree Frog ( Litoria rothii ).A high abundance of snakes at a site near Nebo was observed to coincide with an abundance of young frogs emerging from an ephemeral pool. Many frogs ( Cyclorana breviceps, C. novaehollandia, Limnodynastes ornatus  and  Litoria alboguttata ) and Cane Toads ( Bufo marinus ) found in and around the trap site each morning showed signs of snakebite suggesting repeated striking, but not immediate consumption, by the trapped Ornamental Snake. Some very large Cane Toads were killed or near death. Most bitten animals appeared to have undergone extensive cell breakdown and were reminiscent of \"bags of fluid\"\". Desert Tree Frogs and Floodplain Frogs were also present but none appeared to have been struck by the snake (Melzer 2001 pers. comm.).\"','The Ornamental Snake has undergone a decline in abundance in the past few decades. There are a variety of factors that are possibly contributing to this decline, including (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Cogger et al. 1993):Habitat loss through clearing (roads, ploughing, railways, mining-related activities, pipeline constructions)Habitat fragmentationHabitat degradation by overgrazing by stock, especially cattle, or grazing of gilgais during the wet season leads to soil compaction and compromising of soil structureAlteration of landscape hydrology in and around gilgai environmentsAlteration of water quality through chemical and sediment pollution of wet areasContact with the Cane ToadPredation by feral speciesInvasive weeds.The species occurs in the Brigalow Belt bioregion, where the majority of natural vegetation has been cleared for agriculture, mining and urban development, and has been degraded by overgrazing by stock (Cogger et al. 1993; Covacevich 1995; Covacevich et al. 1998; McDonald et al. 1991).As the Ornamental Snake has a diet almost exclusively of various frog species, the species is susceptible to being lethally poisoned by ingesting Cane Toads, which are abundant within its range (G. Ingram, cited in Cogger et al. 1993; Phillips et al. 2003). The two species have often been recorded in the same areas, though the Cane Toad is never found where the Ornamental Snake is in high numbers (Agnew 2010 pers. comm.). In addition, numerous intensive studies, in seemingly optimal Ornamental Snake habitats, have resulted in no snakes being found where Cane Toads were in abundance (Agnew 2010 pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1193'),('123','Notomys aquilo','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Muridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=123'),('125','Notomys fuscus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Muridae','The Dusky Hopping-mouse is an attractive rodent with long, rounded, furless ears and prominent dark eyes. It has light orange, pale brown or grey fur with grey streaks and a white belly. This mouse grows to 11.5 cm long and has a tail to 15.5 cm long that ends in a tuft of dark hairs. It has strong front teeth and extremely long and narrow hind feet that contrast with small front paws. Both the males and females possess well developed throat pouches which are characterised by fleshy margins with stiff white hairs pointing into the centre of the pouch. The average weight of the Dusky Hopping-mouse is 35 g (Crowley & Ziembicki 2009; Strahan 1998; Watts & Aslin 1981).','The Dusky Hopping-mouse inhabits arid areas of Australia with sand dunes or sand plains with hummocks and water nearby. The species is predomiNAtly restricted to the dune crests with only a few observations of the species in the surrounding gibber areas (which are utilised by Fawn Hopping-mouse ( N. cervinus )) or inter-dune swales and scalded areas. The Dusky Hopping-mouse does move across inter-dune clay flats within their home range (Moseby et al. 1999).  Nitraria billarderei  and Sandhill Cane-grass ( Zygochloa paradoxa ) may be important in supporting persistent populations. After seasons of good rainfall the species may occur in atypical habitat such as chenopod (e.g. Black Bluebush ( Maireana pyramidata )) shrubland on gibber plains, acacia shrubland and sandy creek lines (Val et al. 2012; Waudby & How 2008).The most northerly population near Betoota in south-west Queensland is found on a 20 x 20 km patch of red sand ridges. The vegetation is dominated by thick Sandhill Cane-grass and a sparse tall shrub layer of Dune Wattle ( Acacia ligulata ). The ridges are surrounded by gibber plains and low  Triodia  spp. covered dunes, which is habitat favoured by the related Spinifex Hopping-mouse ( Notomys alexis ) (Moseby et al. 1999; Watts & Aslin 1981).In SA, the species is found in areas of continuous sand dune habitat. At Montecollina Bore, Cobbler Dunes predominate with  Nitraria billardieri  the domiNAt plant species. The area was formerly vegetated with stands of Sandhill Cane-grass but was removed by historical overgrazing.Vegetation differs between sites but much of the variation can be attributed to disturbance by human activity, and grazing by the Rabbit ( Oryctolagus cuniculus ) and domestic stock (Moseby et al. 1999). All known locations have supported sheep or cattle grazing in the past and all currently support populations of introduced Rabbits (although Rabbit Calicivirus has decreased these populations).','The Dusky Hopping-mouse eats seed, green plants and some insects and small lizards. The species does not need to drink water (Dickman 1993).','All sites where the Dusky Hopping-mouse was recorded by Moseby and colleagues (1999) showed evidence of historical overgrazing (by Domestic stock, the Rabbit ( Oryctolagus cuniculus ) and the House Mouse ( Mus musculus )), including sheet erosion, scalding and the presence of vegetation known to flourish in overgrazed areas. Predation by the Cat ( Felis catus ) and the Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) may also pose a significant threat (NSW SC 2003k). Extended periods of drought in grazed areas could cause significant declines in Dusky Hopping-mouse populationsOf all the sites surveyed during the 1990’s, the one at Pelican Waterhole appeared to be the least degraded despite the presence of livestock and the Rabbit. Moseby and colleagues (1999) suggest that the higher average rainfall (compared to SA sites) and the nature of the landform (the dunes are surrounded by productive floodout country that is more attractive to herbivores) has resulted in this site maintaining a more stable population of Dusky Hopping-mouse.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=125'),('1262','Ramphotyphlops exocoeti','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Typhlopidae','The Christmas Island Blind Snake is a bright pink or pinkish-brown snake with a pale brown belly. This species grows to 35 cm in length, has a rounded snout (from above and in profile), scales in 20 rows at mid-body and an oval rostral scale (at the tip of the snout) (Cogger 2014). The eyes are vestigial and reduced to a pair of small pigmented organs lying beneath the skin of the head. The mouth is small and underslung and closes tightly to avoid ingesting soil when burrowing. The very short tail ends in a blunt spine that the snake uses to gain leverage in the soil when burrowing (Cogger 2006).','The Christmas Island Blind Snake is a fossorial snake that occurs in tall closed forest on deeper soils on the island\'s central plateau where it occupies the sub-surface and litter layer of the forest floor (Cogger 2006). The 2009 specimen was found in evergreen tall closed forest under a small piece of rotting wood at the periphery of a Yellow Crazy Ant ( Anoplolepis gracilipes ) colony and at 361 m altitude (the island\'s maximum elevation) (Maple et al. 2012). At this site, understorey vegetation was  Pandanus elatus  and the domiNAt canopy was Tahitian Chestnut ( Inocarpus fagifer ) and the emergent Gowok ( Syzygium nervosum ) was also present (DNP 2014). The 1975 collection was in primary rainforest on the plateau at a site that is now cleared land (Cogger et al. 1983). Gibson-Hill (1947 cited in Cogger 2005) describes this species as usually found in dampish situation under the trunks of fallen trees, and only comes out into the open on dark, overcast days or during heavy rain. Any habitat in which the species is found in future should be regarded as habitat critical to the species’ survival and the discovered population treated as an important population (Cogger 2006).','The Christmas Island Blind Snake preys on eggs, larvae and pupae of ants and termites that it devours in large numbers (Cogger 2006). It is usually only active above ground at night (Cogger 2006). The species body is covered by tough, glossy scales that are virtually impervious to the bites of the workers of the ants and termites on which they feed (Cogger 2006), although it is unknown whether the scales afford protection from Yellow Crazy Ants.','Threats to the Christmas Island Blind Snake include (Cogger et al. 1993; DNP 2014):clearing of primary rainforest habitatdisturbance by phosphate mining and the removal of topsoil from mined areas which leaves areas uninhabitable, even after partial revegetationsoil compaction and erosionintroduced predators, such as the Black Rat ( Rattus rattus ), the Giant Centipede ( Scolopendra morsitans ) and the Wolf Snake ( Lycodon aulicus )competition with the Brahminy Blind Snakepredation and habitat degradation by the Yellow Crazy Ant.The Yellow Crazy Ant may displace the Christmas Island Blind Snake through predation and construction of supecolonies, although a specimen has been found adjacent to a supercolony (Maple et al. 2012). The Yellow Crazy Ant is a predator of the Red Land Crab ( Gecarcoidea natalis ), a species that regulates seedling recruitment and litter breakdown. Absence of the crab increases litter density (O’Dowd & Green 2010 cited in Maple et al. 2012), an impact that may affect the Christmas Island Blind Snake.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1262'),('1270','Tiliqua adelaidensis','Endangered','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard is a grey, grey-brown or orange-brown reptile that grows to a total length of less than 20 cm. It has pale flanks, body, limbs and tail with scattered darker spots and blotches mixed with paler scales, a white/cream belly, scales with pale brown margins, and short limbs (Cogger 2000). On average, adult males have wider heads but are shorter than females (Hutchinson et al. 1994). The Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard is the smallest of the genus  Tiliqua  and, unlike the other members of the genus, it has a pink tongue (Duffy et al. 2012).','Pre-1992 specimens of the Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard were collected in chenopod and mallee scrublands with compacting or crusty sandy soils associated with hollow mallee lignotubers, low stump hollows, near surface limestone sheets, and large slab floaters. The species was thought to burrow into moisture pockets in limestone sheeting, under outcroppings and slabs, between mallee lignotubers and sheeting, and into insect hollowed lignotubers and trunks (Duffy et al. 2012; Ehmann 1982).Post-1992 specimens of the Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard have been found in a variety of habitats, ranging from highly degraded grasslands (dominated by exotic grasses) to grasslands with high native biodiversity. In addition, vegetation cover ranges from moderate to sparse or light (Pettigrew & Bull 2011 cited in Duffy et al. 2012). The lizard uses empty spider burrows of wolf (lycosid) and trapdoor (mygalomorph) spiders as refuges, basking sites and hunting ambush sites. Whilst Ehmann (1982) originally suggested the Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard was adapted for digging, further studies have shown the species does not dig its own burrows nor adapt those it utilises to any great extent (Clarke 2000; Duffy et al. 2012).The region in which Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizards occur has hot, dry summers and cool, moist winters, with mean annual rainfall ranging from 366 mm at Yongala, 446 mm at Burra, to 632 mm at Clare (Duffy et al. 2012; Milne & Bull 2000). The species is found in a variety of soil types, but are known to be more abundant in areas of free-draining grey-brown or red calcareous soils and lithosol soils (Duffy et al. 2012). The Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard are found in higher abundances on the lower slopes of hillsides (Duffy et al. 2012).Spider holesThe species uses spider burrows approximately 20 mm in diameter within the spaces between tussocks in grasslands (or grassy woodlands). These burrows range in depth (from 10–75 cm), but are approximately 25 cm deep on average. Different sized burrows are favoured by adults (greater than 16 mm in diameter and with a depth of approximately 20 cm) and juveniles (smaller burrows often made by wolf spiders) (Clarke 2000; Milne et al. 2002). Aside from a slight bevelling of the burrow edges, caused by their movement, the Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizards make no obvious external modifications to the holes (Duffy et al. 2012). In one study of ungrazed plots, spider burrows increased over one spring and summer period, particularly after a summer rain event that softened the soil (Clayton & Bull 2015).The lizards use the narrow, vertical spider burrows for shelter during the day, retreat sites for hiding, ambush sites for hunting passing prey, basking sites for thermoregulation, and birthing sites (Milne 1999 cited in Milne & Bull 2000). The Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard prefers deeper burrows when available. The species requires narrow diameters, often choosing holes that suit the width of the head to help avoid predation. A variety of burrow sizes would be required to support a population of different aged individuals (Duffy et al. 2012; Milne et al. 2002; Milne & Bull 2000; Souter et al. 2007).In one study, it was found that when lizards chose burrows in spring, burrows in moderately grazed paddocks had higher vegetation cover compared to random plots (Nielsen et al. 2017). In another study, sheep grazing was found to destroy shallow burrows, probably through trampling and because sheep produce filling debris, however, grazing did not affect deeper burrows occupied by the species (Clayton & Bull 2017). One study found that increased grazing pressure led to decreased persistence of lizard burrows, but burrows with an overwintering lizard had a greater chance of persisting (Nielsen & Bull 2017).GrasslandsThe species does not favour any particular grassland type, having been recorded at sites dominated by native species including Spear Grasses ( Austrostipa  spp.), Wallaby Grass ( Austrodanthonia  spp.), Bluebush ( Maireana  spp.), Brush Wire-grass ( Aristida behriana ) and Iron-grasses ( Lomandra  spp.); and exotic vegetation including Thread Iris ( GyNAdriris setifolia ), Onion Grass ( Romulearosea  spp.), Wild Oats ( Avena barbata ), Rats Tail Fescue ( Vulpia myuros f. myuros ) and Storks Bills ( Erodium botrys  and  E. brachycarpum ) (Hutchinson et al. 1994; Souter et al. 2007). The density of cover at ground and mid storey levels also varied at sites with ground cover varying from 62–74%, and shrubs cover varying from 5–30% (Duffy et al. 2012; Souter et al. 2007).The Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard occurs in the Iron-grass Natural Temperate Grassland of South Australia ecological community, which is listed as Critically Endangered under the EPBC Act (DSEWPaC 2012s).','FeedingThe Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard is a generalist feeder. The spider burrows are used for both shelter and as vantage points from which to ambush passing invertebrate prey (Duffy et al. 2012; Ehmann 1982; Milne & Bull 2000). Ebrahimi and colleagues (2015) used camera monitoring to measure the proportion of unsuccessful foraging attempts, the proportion of foraging attempts that involved full emergence, the mean distance a lizard moved away from the burrow entrance, and the proportion of plant parts in the diet.Water is taken from drops of morning dew or from rain drops accumulated on vegetation close to their burrow entrances (Nielsen et al. 2015). The water collecting function of vegetation should be included as a factor in short-term management decisions about the level of grazing in the lizard’s habitat. In the longer term, the benefits of having plants that can accumulate water drops will need to be considered if suitable relocation sites are to be found (Nielsen et al. 2015).DietThe Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard is an omnivorous species that mainly feeds on medium-sized arthropods. In a study by Ehmann (1982), the stomach contents of four individuals contained mostly invertebrates, including ants, cockroaches, a beetle, a cricket, and a spider. One captive specimen had the tail of the skink  Hemiergus  in its gut.  Observations by Milne and colleagues (2003) have found that the species will consume flowers in the early part of spring. Analysis of scats (Fenner et al. 2007) suggests that, whilst the species is largely an opportunistic predator of mainly arthropod prey, vegetative material plays an important part of the diet as summer progresses. Seeds of  Dianella  and leaves and flowers of the introduced herb  Medicago  have been found in the scats. Generally, as summer progresses, more plant material is incorporated into the diet of the Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard (Duffy et al. 2012; Fenner et al. 2007).Movement PatternsTopFeedingThe Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard is a generalist feeder. The spider burrows are used for both shelter and as vantage points from which to ambush passing invertebrate prey (Duffy et al. 2012; Ehmann 1982; Milne & Bull 2000). Ebrahimi and colleagues (2015) used camera monitoring to measure the proportion of unsuccessful foraging attempts, the proportion of foraging attempts that involved full emergence, the mean distance a lizard moved away from the burrow entrance, and the proportion of plant parts in the diet.Water is taken from drops of morning dew or from rain drops accumulated on vegetation close to their burrow entrances (Nielsen et al. 2015). The water collecting function of vegetation should be included as a factor in short-term management decisions about the level of grazing in the lizard’s habitat. In the longer term, the benefits of having plants that can accumulate water drops will need to be considered if suitable relocation sites are to be found (Nielsen et al. 2015).DietThe Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard is an omnivorous species that mainly feeds on medium-sized arthropods. In a study by Ehmann (1982), the stomach contents of four individuals contained mostly invertebrates, including ants, cockroaches, a beetle, a cricket, and a spider. One captive specimen had the tail of the skink  Hemiergus  in its gut.  Observations by Milne and colleagues (2003) have found that the species will consume flowers in the early part of spring. Analysis of scats (Fenner et al. 2007) suggests that, whilst the species is largely an opportunistic predator of mainly arthropod prey, vegetative material plays an important part of the diet as summer progresses. Seeds of  Dianella  and leaves and flowers of the introduced herb  Medicago  have been found in the scats. Generally, as summer progresses, more plant material is incorporated into the diet of the Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard (Duffy et al. 2012; Fenner et al. 2007).Movement PatternsTopThe Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard is a largely sedentary species, with most adults in a three year study by Milne (1999, cited in Milne & Bull 2000) moving no greater than 20 metres from their burrows (Milne 1999, cited in Milne & Bull 2000).A study over two spring-summer seasons, the period when the lizards are active, found that the population contained a mixture of dispersers that remained in a burrow briefly, and residents that occupy a burrow for the entire study period. There were more females than males among the residents and most of the burrow abandonment happened in the early spring, the time when male lizards probably move around to seek matings (Bull et al. 2015). Spring is the peak movement time for adults, particularly males, whereas movement of juveniles occurred in autumn (Schofield et al. 2013).Scats may be used to mark burrow ownership and lizards moved an average of 68 cm from their burrow entrance to deposit scats (Ebrahimi et al. 2016).','Habitat Loss, Disturbance and FragmentationAgricultureAll known populations of the Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard occur on private land and may be threatened by agricultural disturbance or any changes that would permanently alter large areas of lizard habitat (Duffy et al. 2012; Milne 1999 cited in Milne & Bull 2000). Ploughing is a significant threat as it displaces lizards, destroys the spider burrows that are their main habitat requirement and breaks up the soil making any burrows that are subsequently created unstable and unsuitable for the lizards (Cogger et al. 1993; Duffy et al. 2012; Souter et al. 2007). Ripping is also a threat to the species, as any lizards or burrows in the path of ripping lines will be destroyed (Duffy et al. 2012; Ebrahimi & Bull 2015).  GrazingInappropriate grazing can also threaten the grassland habitat of the species, and crush spider burrows. This includes heavy grazing by hard-hoofed stock. However, removal of grazing may also threaten the Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard due to increased weed invasion, and reductions in inter-tussock spaces (Duffy et al. 2012; Souter et al. 2007). It is possible that some grazing by domestic stock might benefit predatory efficiency for this lizard, perhaps by allowing a clearer view of approaching prey when grass density is lower (Pettigrew & Bull 2014).Urban and Industrial DevelopmentHabitat modification for urban and industrial development is also a likely cause of this species\' decline (Cogger et al. 1993). This includes the development of buildings, roads, wind farms (becoming increasingly common in the region) and telecommunications infrastructure. These activities may disturb native grassland or the lizards, or destroy their burrows directly (Duffy et al. 2012).Fragmentation and ClearingMany of the native vegetation types within the historical range of the species have been extensively cleared and fragmented. By 1995, native grasslands in South Australia had been reduced to around 0.3% of their original distribution (Hyde 1995 cited in Duffy et al. 2012). Soil which is either not deep enough or free-draining enough inhibits spiders from constructing suitable burrows, and therefore these areas lack habitat suitable for Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizards (Schofield 2006 cited in Duffy et al. 2012).Smith and colleagues (2009) found restricted gene flow between sites containing the species. This resulted gene flow could be attributable to fragmentation of habitat, though there was also restricted gene flow within small sites in areas up to 30 m. This may indicate that the life history characteristics of the species are also important for the gene flow of the species. Maintaining continuous suitable habitat for the species will be important to avoid continued genetic differentiation between sites (Smith et al. 2009).Weeds and Other Introduced SpeciesWeedsHigh and dense growth of weeds (particularly Wild Oats) may lead to decreased basking, hunting and mating opportunities. In addition, however, weed control activities may also threaten the Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard if methods are high-disturbance or native species are affected (Duffy et al. 2012).PredationEhmann (1982) suggests that predation by and competition with the introduced House Mouse ( Mus musculus ) may be involved in the lizard\'s decline, based on:The irregular occurrence of mouse plagues on the Adelaide Plain.The rareness of similar sized reptiles in grain growing areas where mice are common.Observations of a high incidence of tail stumps in the skink  Ctenotus robustus  due to chewing by mice.Foxes have been observed digging out burrows. In several cases, the fox gave up before reaching the lizard. Dug out burrows were quickly abandoned by the surviving lizards and became filled in, reducing the supply of suitable burrows for the population. These data highlight the need for fox management around populations, especially if future management involves species relocation, as small newly established populations could be vulnerable to fox predation and secondary effects of burrow destruction (Nielsen & Bull 2016).The introduced Tenebrionid Beetle ( Blaps polychestra ), which has a posterior squirting chemical defence mechanism, is lethal to chickens and mice if eaten (Mathews 1975), and are now very common in the stony mallee areas of the Adelaide Plain (Ehmann 1982). A Pygmy Blue-tongue that took an offered small  Blaps  head first, exhibited salivation and eye watering after rejecting the bug quickly from its mouth. After 12 hours the lizard appeared fully recovered (Ehmann 1982).Pesticide and Herbicide SprayingThe application of insecticides and other pesticides to control species (such as locust swarms) could affect the Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard indirectly through loss of prey or perhaps directly through illness or death (as yet unknown). Direct application of pesticides to an area known to contain the species did not appear to cause any direct deaths (Clarke 2000), though both pesticides and herbicides have been attributed to fertility problems in some small vertebrates (Duffy et al. 2012).Inappropriate Fire regimesFire was most likely a natural part of the grassland habitat of the species in the past. However, the increased fragmentation of Pygmy Blue-tongue habitat suggests a more significant impact if fires occur at inappropriate times (Duffy et al. 2012). Fires that occur in spring, when males are active, or in late summer and early autumn, when juveniles are dispersing, could be particularly detrimental (Duffy et al. 2012). Fenner and Bull (2007) found that whilst activity and body condition of Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizards decreased in an area burnt in late summer by a high intensity fire, female fecundity was not affected. Furthermore, it is suggested that fire could negatively impact the survivorship and dispersal of young during periods of increased nutritional stress in fragmented landscapes (Fenner & Bull 2007).Changes to habitat structureThe planting of trees may alter the grassland nature of sites, and also provide predators with roosting and sheltering habitat, thereby increasing the predation risk to the Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard (Duffy et al. 2012).Climate changeClimate change is a potential threat to the Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizard, its prey and habitat. While there is currently little knowledge of the effects of climatic conditions on Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizards, monitoring surveys recorded significantly lower fecundity, lower grass cover and more bare earth in 2007 and 2008 than in 2006 (Fenner pers. comm., Schofield pers. comm. cited in Duffy et al. 2012). These effects may be attributable to the prolonged drought in the region. Pygmy Blue-tongue Lizards could be particularly vulnerable to climate change due to the isolation and small extent of the remaining populations and suitable habitat. There would be very limited opportunities for dispersal or translocation if the current area of occupancy became unsuitable (Duffy et al. 2012).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1270'),('1308','Lerista vittata','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Mount Cooper Striped Lerista is a pale grey or grey-brown reptile growing to 6.5 cm with faint, dark-brown flecks on the head and back, a broad, dark-brown stripe from snout to tail, whitish belly, absent forelimbs, single-digit hind limbs and 18 mid-body scale rows (Cogger 2000; Greer et al. 1983).','Mount Cooper areaIn the Mount Cooper area, south-west of Charters Towers, the species has been found in a variety of habitats. These include (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Cogger  et al . 1993; Wilson & Knowles 1988):Ironbark ( Eucalyptus crebra  and  E. melanophloia ) and bloodwood ( Corymbia clarksonia  and  C. intermedia ) dominated woodland with shrub and/or grassy ground layers on deep red earths (QLD RE 11.5.9), undulating plains and steep hills on granitic rocks (QLD RE 9.12.1a)Semi-Evergreen Vine Thicket (QLD RE 11.5.15), which extends onto areas of ironstone (duricrust)Spinifex communities.Four specimens identified in the Mt.Cooper area were found under leaf litter, loose soil under logs, and inside rotten logs in vegetation approximating semi-evergreen vine thicket (QLD RE 11.5.15) (Shea in Cogger  et al . 1993). The soils observed at these recorded locations were deep, porous, coarse, yellow-red sandy soils on sandstone and adjacent to heavier, ironstone-based substrates (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Greer  et al . 1983). A large proportion of semi-evergreen vine thicket and adjacent woodland communities (QLD RE 11.5.15) in the region has been cleared for agriculture. However, the species may be found in areas where regrowth of this vegetation type is currently mapped as cleared by the Queensland Department of Environment and Resource Management (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).Einasleigh UplandsSpecimens found in the Einasleigh Uplands Bioregion, approximately 100–200 km NNW of Hughenden, have been found in vegetation approximating (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Cogger  et al . 1993):Cotton Tree ( Cochlospermum gregorii )/Kapok Bush ( Cochlospermum gillivaraei ) dominated low woodland to low open woodland (QLD RE 9.12.36a)Narrow-leafed Ironbark ( Eucalyptus crebra )/Inland Yellow-jacket ( E. similis ) dominated grassy, low open woodland on undulating plains and granitic rises (QLD RE 9.12.14)Ironbark and Lemon-scented Gum ( Corymbia citriodora ) dominated open forest, with a well-developed grassy understorey on red and yellow earths and sandy soils on the margins of high-altitude, sandstone plateaus (QLD RE 2.10.3)Cloncurry Box ( E. leucophylla ), Inland Bloodwood ( Corymbia terminalis ) and Darwin Box ( E. tectifica ) dominated woodlands on flat sandy plains and deep yellow podzolic soils (QLD RE 2.5.10).For more information on Queensland Regional Ecosystems, please visit the Queensland Department of Environment and Resource Management website at  http://www.derm.qld.gov.au/wildlife-ecosystems/biodiversity/regional_ecosystems/ .Occurrence in a nationally listed ecological communityThe species is found in Semi-evergreen Vine Thickets of the Brigalow Belt (North and South) and Nandewar Bioregions, an ecological community listed under the  Environment Protection and Biodiversity Conservation Act 1999  as Endangered.','Termites are a primary source of food for  Lerista  species in general (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).','The key threatening processes for the Mount Cooper Striped Lerista (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Cogger et al. 1993; Richardson 2006) are:habitat clearing for agriculture and developmentstock overgrazingpasture improvementintensive croppingroad upgrades or expansions.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1308'),('132','Conilurus penicillatus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Muridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=132'),('137','Leporillus conditor','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Muridae','The greater stick-nest rat is a large rodent, ranging from 17-26 cm in body length and weighing up to 450 g. They have fluffy yellow-brown to grey fur on their back and cream fur below. A blunt snout, large, dark eyes and large, rounded ears are also characteristic of the species. They also have a long tail that is dark brown above and light brown below, and distinctive white markings on their upper feet. When resting, the species sits in a hunched position that is similar to the stance of a rabbit (Australian wildlife conservancy 2017).','The greater stick-nest rat inhabits perennial shrublands, especially of succulent and semi-succulent plant species including the chenopod genera  Atriplex ,  Rhagodia ,  Maireana ,  Chenopodium ,  Enchylaena ,  Sclerolaena ,  Threlkeldia , and pig-face genera including  Disphyma  and  Carpobrotus . On the Franklin Islands the rats use the dense shrubs, numerous short-tailed shearwater nesting burrows and crevices among rocks for shelter (Lee 1995). The three vegetation zones on Franklin Island are foreshore, slope and platform. The rats were found in all three zones wherever there was dense vegetation. Most rats were observed foraging in dense vegetation or around the edges rather than on open ground (Robinson 1975).On islands, the species lives in family groups of 10 to 20 individuals in large nests constructed of sticks. Reintroduced populations on the mainland live in family groups of about 5-6 individuals (Woinarski & Burbidge 2016). As their name suggests, stick-nest rats builds huge, communal nests out of available sticks. Groups work together to find and drag branches to a central site - usually around a bush that becomes part of the final nest. Branches are chewed to length and woven together with additionally-collected green vegetation. These nests can be up to 1 m in height and 1.5 m wide. Tunnels lead from the outside to the centre of these structures, where rats place grass and other soft green vegetation. These nests provide protection for the rats from native predators (Australian wildlife conservancy 2017).','Greater stick-nest rats are herbivores, feeding on the leaves and fruits of a wide variety of species, with a preference for succulent and semi-succulent plants (Australian wildlife conservancy 2017).','Like most other small to medium-sized Australian mammals, Greater Stick-nest Rats are highly susceptible to predation by foxes and cats. Introduced herbivores would have exacerbated population declines by competing for food and trampling nests. Remaining and reintroduced populations on islands and in predator-free enclosures do not immediately face threats from introduced predators or herbivores. However, these populations are small and geographically isolated, and at risk of extinction from localised catastrophic events such as fire, disease, or incursions of feral predators. (Australian wildlife conservancy 2017).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=137'),('1378','Lerista allanae','Endangered','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Retro Slider,  Lerista allanae , is a burrowing skink. It is grey or grey brown with darker-edged individual scales forming five longitudinal lines of dark spots (Cogger 2000). Its sides are pale, with individual scales finely spotted with dark brown. Its underside is whitish while the scales on the throat are dark-spotted. It has no fore limbs, but has single digit hind limbs. It can grow to 9 cm in length (Cogger 2000; QLD DERM 2010).','The Retro Slider is known only from black soil downs (undulating plains formed on basalt, shale, sandstone and unconsolidated sediments) of the Oxford land system in the Brigalow Belt North Biogeographic Region.Early specimens were found several centimetres under the surface of black-red soil, under tussocks of grass on farmland (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Covacevich et al. 1996b; Slevin 1955). The specimens were found in association with the following habitats:Mountain Coolibah ( Eucalyptus orgadophila )/Red Bloodwood ( E. erythrophloia ) open woodlands and Black Tea-tree ( Melaleuca bracteata ) closed scrub to low closed-forest gravely hills, ridges and gulliesscattered  Bauhinia  spp. on plains (Queensland Department of Lands as cited in Covacevich et al. 1996b).This habitat now appears to be extensively altered and little original vegetation remains (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Covacevich et al. 1996b). Recent records of the skink were from leaf litter and friable soils beneath trees and shrubs (Borsboom et al. in prep.). The soils for these records were described as chocolate to dark chocolate-coloured, non-cracking clay-based soils (30–64% clay content) in Queensland Regional Ecosystems (REs) 11.8.5 and 11.8.11/11.8.5 or were from sites where these REs were mapped as cleared (Borsboom et al. 2010; Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).For more information on Queensland Regional Ecosystems, please visit the Queensland Department of Environment and Resource Management website at  http://www.derm.qld.gov.au/wildlife-ecosystems/biodiversity/regional_ecosystems/ .','Termites are a primary source of food for  Lerista  species in general (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).','The key threatening processes for the Retro Slider (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Richardson 2006; Cogger et al. 1993) are:Habitat clearing for agriculture and developmentStock overgrazingPasture improvementIntensive croppingRoad upgrades or expansions.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1378'),('1400','Emoia nativitatis','Critically Endangered','Reptilia','Scincidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1400'),('1420','Egernia rugosa','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Yakka Skink is a pale fawn reptile growing to 40 cm. It has a broad dark brown to black stripe from nape to tail bordered on either side by a narrow, pale fawn back/side stripe. Dark brown to pale brown to reddish-brown scales on the flanks form a faintly variegated orange-brown pattern. The throat is cream-yellow in colour, with blackish flecks/spots, and the chest and abdomen are yellow-orange (Cogger 2000). This skink is often described as robust and around the same size as a Blue Tongue Lizard ( Tiliqua scincoides ) making it one of the largest skinks in sub-humid to semi-arid eastern Queensland (TSN 2008a).','MacrohabitatThe Yakka Skink is known to occur in open dry sclerophyll forest, woodland and scrub (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Cogger 2000; Wilson & Knowles 1988). The core habitat of this species is within the Mulga Lands and Brigalow Belt South Bioregions (TSN 2008b).It occurs in a wide variety of vegetation types within Queensland Regional Ecosystem Land Zones (LZ) (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010):LZ 3   - Alluvium (river and creek flats)LZ 4   - Clay plains not associated with current alluviumLZ 5   - Old loamy and sandy plainsLZ 7   - Ironstone jump-upsLZ 9   - Undulating country on fine-grained sedimentary rocksLZ 10 - Sandstone ranges.Whilst LZ 8 (basalt plains and hills) is not considered to be representative of core habitat for the Yakka Skink, the species may still occur in this land zone. Basalt-derived soils are generally suitable for burrowing, less at risk of water-logging than alluvium and often occur in a topographic mosaic with fine-grained sediments where the skink does occur (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).For more information on Queensland Regional Ecosystems, please visit the Queensland Department of Environment and Resource Management website at  http://www.derm.qld.gov.au/wildlife-ecosystems/biodiversity/regional_ecosystems/ .Common vegetation typesCommon woodland and open forest types include (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; QLD DERM 2010):Brigalow ( Acacia harpophylla )Mulga ( A. aneura )Bendee ( A. catenulata )Lancewood ( A.   shirleyi )Belah ( Casuarina cristata )Poplar Box ( Eucalyptus populnea )Ironbark ( Eucalyptus  spp.)White Cypress Pine ( Callitris   glaucophylla ).Chapple (2003) observed the species in ecotonal forest in rainforest and wet/dry sclerophyll forest.MicrohabitatThe Yakka Skink is commonly found in cavities under and between partly buried rocks, logs or tree stumps, root cavities and abandoned animal burrows (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; TSN 2008a). The species often takes refuge in large hollow logs and has been known to excavate deep burrow systems, sometimes under dense ground vegetation (Cogger 2000; Ehmann 1992b; Wilson & Knowles 1988). In cleared habitat, this species can persist where there are shelter sites such as raked log piles, deep gullies, tunnel erosion/sinkholes and rabbit warrens. The species has also been found sheltering under sheds and loading ramps (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; TSN 2008a). This species is not generally found in trees or rocky habitats (Chapple 2003).Communal latrine sitesLike many other  Egernia  species, Yakka Skinks defecate in a pile outside burrow entrances (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Wilson & Knowles 1988). A colony of Yakka Skinks may use several sites during the year with the occupied burrow identified by scat piles near the entrance (Ehmann 1992b).Co-occurrence with nationally listed ecological communitiesThe Yakka Skink is known to occur in the EPBC Act listed Brigalow ( Acacia harpophylla  domiNAt and co-domiNAt) ecological community (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Cogger 2000; Wilson & Knowles 1988).The species is also known to occur in Queensland Regional Ecosystem (RE) 11.3.2 (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010). Weeping Myall ( Acacia pendula ) can sometimes dominate the distinctly low tree layer in this RE. As such, the species may coincide with the EPBC Act-listed Endangered Weeping Myall Woodlands ecological community in a given patch of RE 11.3.2, depending on whether the vegetation meets the listing criteria for the listed community.Co-occurrence with the nationally listed Brigalow Scaly-foot ( Paradelma orientalis )The Yakka Skink is known to co-occur with the Brigalow Scaly-foot ( Paradelma orientalis ), which is listed as Vulnerable under the EPBC Act. The species may co-occur in a range of vegetation types within Queensland Regional Ecosystem Land Zones 3, 4, 5, 7, 9, 10 and possibly 8 (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).','The Yakka Skink is omnivorous, consuming soft plant materials and fruits and a wide variety of invertebrates (beetles, grasshoppers and spiders) that venture into or near the burrow entrance (TSN 2008a).','Habitat loss and degradationThe main threat to the Yakka Skink is habitat reduction and degradation. The Yakka Skink occurs in the Brigalow Belt Bioregion, an area of high human impact (Covacevich et al. 1998). Much of this land has been modified through agricultural and urban development (Cogger et al. 1993; McDonald et al. 1991).Other threatsInappropriate roadside management, including road widening and removal of microhabitat, such as rocks, logs, dense leaf litter and fallen bark, threatens the species with habitat loss and degradation. Feral animal impacts include predation by Foxes ( Vulpes vulpes ) and Feral Cats ( Felis catus ) and ripping of rabbit warrens (TSN 2008a, 2008b).Detrimental biological characteristics of the speciesThe Yakka Skink exhibits high site-fidelity, low fecundity and are long-lived. The combination of these biological factors makes this species susceptible to potential population crashes or even local extinctions given prolonged unfavourable conditions or sudden, large environmental disturbances (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1420'),('1482','Ctenotus lancelini','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Scincidae','A reptile similar to  Ctenotus labillardieri  but is larger (growing to 8 cm) with paler brown back colour, speckled back, and yellow legs spotted and streaked with blackish-brown (Cogger 2000).','Occurs in all major vegetated habitat types on the island. Preferred substrates were sand and shallow soil over limestone. The vegetation consists of low shrubs with winter annuals, predomiNAtly Rye Grass ( Lolium rigidum ) and Wild Oats ( Avena barbata ). Skinks were most dense in areas with nearby slopes facing north to northeast as these are protected from strong winds and receive early morning sunlight. The area with the highest density was the dune and swale behind the eastern beach (Pearson & Jones 2000).The vegetation at the single mainland site is structurally and floristically similar to the vegetation on the eastern side of Lancelin I. (Pearson & Jones 2000).In rocky outcrops where the species was first discovered, specimens were found sheltering under exfoliating limestone slabs, sometimes using loose sand under the slabs for cover when disturbed (Ford 1963; Wilson & Knowles 1988; Browne-Cooper & Maryan 1992, Pearson & Jones 2000). In other areas of the island, individuals were observed to use seabird nesting burrows for shelter when disturbed (Pearson & Jones 2000).','Foraging occurs within leaf litter, with the diet consisting almost entirely of insects and litter accumulations (Jones 1996).','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1482'),('1526','Cryptoblepharus egeriae','Critically Endangered','Reptilia','Scincidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1526'),('1603','Ctenophorus yinnietharra','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Agamidae','A reddish-brown reptile growing to 8 cm with a dark brown/black streak from below eye to ear, dark vertical patch on the side of the neck, orange-brown tail with four broad black bands, pale orange belly, distinct nuchal (nape of the neck) series of slightly enlarged scales and clusters of scales in skinfolds on the neck (Cogger 2000).','Generally occurs in tall open shrubland. Inhabits granite outcrops separated by stony flats supporting sparse  Acacia  shrubs. Appears to be restricted to rocks of one origin - Archean gneissic biotite granites and granodiorite - whilst nearby outcrops of Early Proterozoic migmatite are inhabited by a different species,  Ctenophorus caudicinctus  (Cogger  et al . 1993). Basks on low rocks and  Acacia  limbs (Wilson & Knowles 1988). One specimen was observed running across gibber flats between granite outcrops and climbing stunted  Acacias  (Storr 1981). Individuals have been captured sheltering beneath exfoliating granite, from burrows under granite boulders and in a hollow  Acacia  log (Storr 1981; Wilson & Knowles 1988).','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1603'),('1630','Ophidiocephalus taeniatus','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Pygopodidae','The Bronzeback Snake-lizard is a rich fawn-colored legless lizard with a pale grey head. A broad dark brown lateral band extending from the snout to the tip of the tail merges into the grayish-brown coloured belly. The scales of the belly and lower side surfaces have white free margins forming a reticulated pattern. The species possesses small limb flaps and a protruding snout. There are 16 mid-body scale rows. Adults reach a snout-vent length of around 100 mm. Patches of optimal habitat may support reasonably high numbers of individuals. Juveniles may actively disperse, possibly out of areas of optimal habitat into less preferred habitat (Ehmann 1981).','The Bronzeback Snake-lizard species is fossorial (burrowing) and occurs along drainage lines on dissected tablelands characteristic of the rim of the Lake Eyre Basin. Vegetation consists of low open woodland dominated by Gidgee ( Acacia cambagei ), Mulga ( Acacia aneura ) or Dead Finish ( Acacia tetragonophylla ) (Brandle 1998; Cogger et al. 1993).Microhabitat consists of deep, matted leaf litter and plant debris overlying deep cracking clays, often near the bases of trees and shrubs (Brandle 1998; Cogger et al. 1993; Ehmann 1981). The species only occurs in areas with an uncompacted, heterogeneous soil horizon. Adequate drainage may be critical to maintaining this habitat feature (Ehmann 1981). The species uses deep cracks for refuge sites when disturbed (Ehmann 1981).Within South Australia, the species has been recorded in the leaf litter of several different plant species, including Gidgee ( Acacia cambagei ), Mulga ( Acacia aneura ), Dead Finish ( Acacia tetragonaphylla ), Western Myall ( Acacia papyrocarpa ) and Leafless Exocarpus ( Exocarpus aphylla ) in drainage lines flowing out of stony tablelands and breakaways (Pedler 2008, 2009). The southern Northern Territory population was found in Mulga and Gidgee litter as well as Latz\'s Wattle ( A. latzii ) and Witchetty Bush ( A. kempeana ) (McDonald & Fyfe 2008).','Roach nymphs of the genus  Calolampra  are common in leaf litter and are an important food source for Bronzeback Snake-lizards at Abminga, South Australia. At least two species appear to be eaten by the Bronzeback Snake-lizard. In addition, some gut samples (total n = 12) included  Lepidopteran  larvae, termites,  Coleopteran  larvae, spiders, a pseudoscorpion and other unidentified insects. The gut of a Snake-lizard individual from Coober Pedy contained the remains of two  Coleopteran  larvae (Ehmann 1981).The discovery of severed pieces of prey in gut contents suggests that the lizards do not always grasp their prey securely, only consuming severed or shed pieces (Ehmann 1981).Captive specimens eat termites, small mealworms, small roaches and  Tribolium  beetles. Captive specimens drink free water by lapping from the edge of a small dish or water droplets on grass or on leaves (Ehmann 1981).','Habitat change was hypothesised as the major cause of Bronzeback Snake-lizard population decline at Abminga, South Australia, with the stable leaf litter blanket observed in earlier surveys completely gone or buried under a sheet of dry and cohesive sediment ranging from 3 to 15 cm thick. In some areas, loosely packed gibber, 10 to 30 cm deep, replaced the previous surface of sandy loam. Habitat changes appear to be due to major flooding in 1989, perhaps exacerbated by changes to the ground surface from the impacts of grazing animals (Ehmann 1992).Potential threatening processes to the Bronzeback Snake-lizard include overgrazing and trampling by cattle, grazing by rabbits, soil compaction and erosion, flooding, and loss of leaf litter (Cogger et al. 1993) however the habitat at the known localities was not under threat from current land uses (Brandle 1998). More recent surveys for the species found that proliferation of new stock watering points, in parts of the species\' known range within South Australia, may potentially threaten the species (Pedler 2008).Monitoring of fauna falling into abandoned opal mining shafts by the South Australian Arid Lands Natural Resource Management Board has also detected this species (Pedler 2009). Abandoned shafts produced by opal prospecting closely resemble conventional pitfall traps used in small vertebrate trapping, but are permanently open and may be up to 20 metres deep. In appropriate Bronzeback Snake-lizard habitat surrounding Coober Pedy, there are between 1–2 million of these abandoned shafts left uncapped. Preliminary data on the impact of these shafts has been gathered by installing bucket traps inside them to collect all fauna that may fall in. Captures from 35 shafts over six months yielded 14 species including two Bronzeback Snake-Lizards (Pedler 2009). This preliminary data suggests that opal mining may present a significant threat to the species in certain parts of its range.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1630'),('1649','Delma impar','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Pygopodidae','The Striped Legless Lizard is a member of the family Pygopodidae, the legless or flap-footed lizards (Cogger 1992). As with other members of the legless lizard family, Striped Legless Lizards lack forelimbs and have only very reduced hind limbs. These hind limbs are apparent only as small flaps on either side of the vent. Superficially, these animals resemble snakes, but can be readily distinguished from the latter by the presence of external ear openings, a fleshy undivided tongue and a tail which is longer than the body (Cogger 1992). Striped Legless Lizards can be readily distinguished from other legless lizards by body colouration, body size and head scalation.','The Striped Legless Lizard is a grassland specialist. Potential habitat for the Striped Legless Lizard includes all areas which have, or once had, native grasslands or grassy woodlands (including derived grasslands) across the historical range of the speices, provided that area retains suitable tussock structure, the soil is of appropriate type and structure, and the site has not had major disturbance such as ploughing (Coulson 1990; Dorrough & Ash 1999; Hadden 1995; O\'Shea 1996). All occupied sites have a grassy ground cover, often with a mixture of native and exotic perennial and annual species of tussock-forming grasses (often >20–50% cover) (Dorrough 1995). Until recently, this species was thought to inhabit only native grasslands dominated by species such as Spear Grass ( Stipa bigeniculata ) and Kangaroo Grass ( Themeda triandra ) (Cogger et al. 1993; Coulson 1995). However, the species is now known to occur in some areas dominated by introduced species such as  Phalaris aquatica , Serated Tussock ( Nasella trichotoma ) and  Hypocharis radicata (Corrigan et al. 1996; Coulson 1990; Hadden 1995; Kukolic 1994; O\'Shea 1996; Rauhala 1996; Rauhala et al. 1995), and at sites with a history of grazing and pasture improvement (Coulson 1995; Dorrough 1995; Smith & Robertson 1999). It is not known if grassland dominated by introduced species can support Striped Legless Lizard populations in the long term, but there is evidence that they do reproduce in these habitats (Corrigan et al. 1996; Rauhala et al. 1995).Striped Legless Lizards shelter in grass tussocks, thick ground cover, soil cracks, under rocks, spider burrows, and under ground debris such as timber (Smith & Robertson 1999). The majority of sites in Victoria and NSW occur on cracking clay soils with some surface rock which provide shelter for the species (Cogger et al. 1993; Coulson 1995). These features are rare at sites in the ACT, where Striped Legless Lizards commonly use grass tussocks and burrows for shelter (Coulson 1995). Turner (2014) describes the species as \"possibly a habitual burrower',' but also utilises natural soil cavities and surface stones as refugia\"\".Population size in the ACT does not appear to be limited by burrow abundance (Dorrough 1995). At Lake Omerod',' South Australia',' a belt of  Juncus  sp. (a rush) may provide important refuge during periods of heavy grazing (Milne 1999). On the Werribee-Keilor plains (basalts north and west of Melbourne)'),('1656','Delma torquata','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Pygopodidae','The Collared Delma is endemic to Queensland and is the smallest member of the family Pygopodidae. The species is generally uniform brown; but with belly shields that are darker at the margins, and a dark-brown banded head and neck with cream-yellow interspaces. The species has a maximum snout-vent length of 7 cm and maximum total length of approximately 19 cm (Peck & Hobson 2007). The species\' average weight is about 2 g, making it one of the smallest members of the Pygopodidae family. The mid-body scales are in 16 rows. The snout is short and blunt (Cogger 2000).','MacrohabitatThe Collared Delma normally inhabits eucalypt-dominated woodlands and open-forests in Queensland Regional Ecosystem Land Zones (LZ) (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010):LZ 3   - Alluvium (river and creek flats)LZ 9   - Undulating country on fine-grained sedimentary rocksLZ 10 - Sandstone ranges.Regional ecosystems (REs) include (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010):RE 11.3.2   - Poplar Box ( Eucalyptus populnea ) woodland on alluvial plains.RE 11.9.10 - Poplar Box/ Brigalow ( Acacia harpophylla ) open-forest on fine-grained sedimentary rocks.RE 11.10.1 - Lemon-scented Gum (Blue Spotted Gum) ( Corymbia citriodora ) open forest on coarse-grained sedimentary rocksRE 11.10.4 - Gum-topped Ironbark ( Eucalyptus decorticans ), Budgeroo/ Brown Hazelwood ( Lysicarpus angustifolius ) +/-  Eucalyptus  species,  Corymbia  species,  Acacia  species woodland on coarse-grained sedimentary rocks.For more information on Queensland Regional Ecosystems, please visit the Queensland Department of Environment and Resource Management website at  http://www.derm.qld.gov.au/wildlife-ecosystems/biodiversity/regional_ecosystems/ .Eastern parts of the species\' distributionIn the eastern parts of the species\' range (i.e. the Toowoomba Range), suitable habitats are commonly associated with exposed rocky outcrops on ridges or slopes in vegetation communities dominated by Narrow-leafed Ironbark ( Eucalyptus crebra ) (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010). Other vegetation communities in this region are typically dominated by Lemon-scented Gum.Other canopy species include (Cogger et al. 1993; Davidson 1993; Peck 2003; Porter 1998):Silver-leaved Ironbark ( E. melanophloia )Moreton Bay Ash ( E. tessellaris )Gum Top Box ( E. moluccana )Tallowwood ( E. microcorys )Queensland Blue Gum ( E. tereticornis ) in the Bunya Mountains.Habitats in the region west of BrisbaneA typical mid-story for the Brisbane populations consists of Red Ash ( Alphitonia excelsa ), Wattles including Brisbane Wattle ( Acacia fimbriata ), Hickory Wattle ( A. concurrens ), Brush Box ( Lophostemon confertus ), Hovea ( Hovea longifolia ), and Lantana ( Lantana camara ) (Peck 2003). The ground cover is predomiNAtly native grasses such as Kangaroo Grass ( Themeda triandra ), Barbed-wire Grass ( Cymbopogon refractus ), Wiregrass ( Aristida  sp) and Lomandra ( Lomandra  sp).Introduced ground covers are often present but are not domiNAt and include Dwarf Lantana ( Lantana montividensis ) and introduced grasses (Peck 2003).Western parts of the species\' distributionThe most westerly records were made in Popular Box ( Eucalyptus populnea ) open woodland on alluvial plains (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Venz 2010 pers. comm.).AspectSuitable habitat on the Toowoomba Range was identified as ridgelines with a south–west to north–west aspect (Peck 2003).Soil typesThe Collared Delma has been recorded from a number of different soil types throughout south-east Queensland (e.g. sandy loams, grey and black cracking clays, stony lithosols and basalt derived Podzolics).In Brisbane City, the Collared Delma has been recorded from two soil type based habitats: stony lithosols soil with exposed quartzite rock ridges typical of the Mt Crosby and Moggill State Forest sites (designated as Soil Landscapes of Brisbane and south-eastern Environs); and basalt derived podzolic soils with exposed basalt rocks typical of the Anstead and Pinjarra Hills sites (designated as MCk, in Soil Landscapes of Brisbane and South-eastern Environs) (Peck 2003).MicrohabitatThe presence of rocks, logs, bark and other coarse woody debris, and mats of leaf litter (typically 30–100 mm thick) appears to be an essential characteristic of the Collared Delma microhabitat and is always present where the species occurs (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Davidson 1993). This may be the limiting factor for the Collared Delma recolonising in recently burnt areas (Peck 2003).One individual at Mount Crosby was sighted moving through short grass. All specimens found at Mount Crosby were on the soil surface, suggesting the species is not adapted to digging and life underground (Porter 1998).At Mount Crosby, lizards showed a preference for larger than average rocks (preferred average 172 cm) and vegetation cover lower than that available (preferred average 31%). Pitfall trapping captured lizards in vegetation some distance from rocky outcrops, suggesting the species is not totally reliant on rocky habitat (Porter 1998).Whilst Collared Delmas are often found associated with small rocks, the presence of small rocks is not an essential habitat characteristic (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).','The Collared Delma feeds on insects and spiders, with small cockroaches the most common prey item. Some individuals have been captured in subterranean termite colonies (Davidson 1993; Porter 1998).','The Collared Delma has undergone decline in the past few decades. A number of factors that may contribute to this decline have been identified (Cogger et al. 1993; TSN 2008b) including:habitat loss through clearing for agriculturehabitat degradation by overgrazing by stockremoval of rocks, course woody debris and ground litteruse of agricultural chemicalspredation by feral Cats ( Felis catus ) and Foxes ( Vulpes vulpes )weed invasion.Loss of HabitatA large proportion of Collared Delma habitat has been cleared for various purposes across the species\' range. Land clearing for agriculture has been particularly severe within the species range; cattle grazing, wheat and cotton growing are particularly common and resource extraction is rapidly expanding throughout the species\' range (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).The removal of rocks, logs and timber from the Collared Delma\'s microhabitat also reduces the amount of shelter available to the species (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Davidson 1993). Research in 1998 revealed that Collared Delmas avoid areas in which rocks have been previously disturbed during recent surveys (Porter 1998).Habitat degradationOvergrazing is known to compact soil, making it difficult for the species to find suitable shelter. This means the soils are drier, making it harder for the species to access suitable habitat (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).FireThe response of the Collared Delma to fire is unknown, however a decline in reptile diversity is usually observed directly after a fire (Peck & Hobson 2007). Extensive fire or inappropriate fire regimes may be a threat to some populations (Davidson 1993).WeedsSome sites may be under threat from the invasion of weeds, particularly Dwarf Lantana (Davidson 1993).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1656'),('1665','Aprasia parapulchella','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Pygopodidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1665'),('1666','Aprasia pseudopulchella','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Pygopodidae','The Flinders Ranges Worm-lizard is a very small, worm-like, burrowing lizard with no obvious external ear opening (Cogger 2000). It is a legless lizard with poorly developed hind limb flaps and a dark brown head that gradually merges with a pale grey or grey-brown body, which in turn merges with a reddish-brown terminal half of the tail. The Flinders Ranges Worm-lizard has median longitudinal dark bars on the dorsal scales of the tail and part of the body, giving the impression of longitudinal lines (TSSC 2008dj). This species can be distinguished from its close relative, the Pink-tailed Worm-lizard ( A. parapulchella ), by having a greater average number of belly scales, two preorbital scales and frequent presence of a faint lateral head pattern (Cogger 2000).','The Flinders Ranges Worm-lizard burrows freely in loose sand and soil, under rocks and litter (EBS 2008). The species occurs in open woodland, native tussock grassland, riparian habitats and rocky isolates (Cogger et al. 1993).  It prefers stony soils, or clay soils with a stony surface, and has been found sheltering beneath stones and rotting stumps (Cogger et al. 1993; Wilson & Knowles 1988). The species is sometimes found under ground debris and logs, or in ant and termite nests (Cogger 2000). The distribution of Flinders Ranges Worm-lizard overlaps with the following EPBC Act-listed threatened ecological communities (TSSC 2008dj):The community of native species dependent on natural discharge of groundwater from the Great Artesian BasinBuloke Woodlands of the Riverina and Murray-Darling Depresion Bioregions, Iron-grass natural Temperate Grassland of South AustraliaPeppermint Box ( Eucalyptus odorata ) Grassy Woodland of South Australia.','The diet of most  Aprasia  species consists almost entirely (95%) of the larvae and pupae of ants and it can consume large numbers of prey items in a single meal. Individuals may feed only infrequently and only in warmer months of the year (Webb & Shine 1994a).','The main threats to the Flinders Ranges Worm-lizard inlcude clearance of habitat, grazing by stock, cropping, pasture improvement and urbanisation (TSSC 2008dj).The majority of the preferred habitat of this species has been significantly removed or disturbed. Flinders Ranges Worm-lizards have been recorded in degraded habitat where scattered surface stone is present, however, it does not persist in areas that have been regularly cropped (EBS 2008).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1666'),('1711','Lepidodactylus listeri','Critically Endangered','Reptilia','Gekkonidae','A brown reptile growing to 5cm with a broad, pale fawn/grey vertebral stripe which expands to cover the top of the head and matches the colour and pattern of the tail, scattered darker-brown flecks/blotches on the back, whitish belly and body covered with small, smooth scales (Cogger 2000).','Most abundant in primary rainforest on the plateau, but also occurs in disturbed plateau habitat including secondary forest growth.  Least abundant on terraces and absent from mined areas. Does not utilise areas revegetated after mining activities (Cogger  et al . 1983).','Eats a broad spectrum of small invertebrates, with termites, small beetles, bugs and slaters predominating. Distribution on the island is unlikely to be limited by prey type or diversity (Cogger  et al . 1983).','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1711'),('174','Macroderma gigas','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Megadermatidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=174'),('1760','Pseudemydura umbrina','Critically Endangered','Reptilia','Chelidae','The Western Swamp Tortoise is a brown turtle growing up to 150 mm in length with a squarish shell, flat and broad lower shell and a broad, flat head with a horny casque (helmet) (Cogger 2000). Males do not exceed a carapace length of 155 mm or a weight of 550 g; females are smaller and do not grow beyond 135 mm carapace length or a weight of 410 g (Burbidge & Kuchling 2004). Hatchlings have a carapace length of 24–29 mm and weigh 3.2–6.6 g (Burbidge & Kuchling 2004).','Habitat critical for the survival of this species includes land within the fox-proof fenced areas at Twin Swamps Nature Reserve and Ellen Brook Nature Reserve; all land within Mogumber Nature Reserve; land in which surface water catchments extend outside of the nature reserves; any land where wild populations are detected in the future; and land targeted for the introduction or reintroduction of this species (Burbidge & Kuchling 2004).','The Western Swamp Tortoise is restricted to feeding in winter and spring when the swamps hold water (King et al. 1998). Feeding only occurs when water temperatures are between 14 °C and 28 °C (King et al. 1998). During much of winter and early spring water temperatures may fall below 14 °C (King et al. 1998). The species is therefore forced to consume much of its food in early spring, growing and laying down fat for the coming summer (Burbidge & Kuchling 2007; Kuchling & DeJose 1989).The inspection of one dead female and faeces indicates a carnivorous diet consisting of insects, insect larvae, aquatic crustaceans, tadpoles and aquatic earthworms (Burbidge 1981).','The decline of the Western Swamp Tortoise is believed to be due to a combination of a restricted geographic range, habitat clearance for agriculture, urban and industrial development (including clay mining), increasing aridity (due to climate change), predation by foxes and other animals, inappropriate fire regimes and drainage of swamp habitat (Cogger et al. 1993; Burbidge & Kuchling 2004). Reserved areas that this species occurs in is very restricted in area and is described as marginal habitat (Burbidge & Kuchling 2004). This species has a specialised biology and is dependant on a rare habitat, a wholly carnivorous diet, low fecundity and slow growth rates (Burbidge & Kuchling 2004).BiologyThis species has a number of biological factors that limit recruitment and population integrity including extremely low fecundity, 3–6 eggs per annum; only live food is eaten and not carrion or vegetable matter; food has a narrow seasonal availability; slow growth; and sexual maturity is reached at 10–15 years (Burbidge & Kuchling 2004).Habitat clearanceThe Swan Valley was the first part of Western Australia developed for intensive agriculture and, by the 1950s, much had been cleared, urbanised or mined for clay. That trend continues today (Burbidge & Kuchling 2007). The Western Swamp Tortoise historically may have had a restricted range, however, most of this habitat has been modified in the past 170 years and remaining suitable habitat is small and marginal.Climate ChangeClimate change poses a potential challenge for the management of the Western Swamp Tortoise. Winter rainfall is considered to have declined significantly in Perth and it is predicted that this trend will continue. The Twin Swamps Nature Reserve in Warbrook has been greatly affected by Perth\'s increasingly dry winters (Burbidge & Kuchling 2007). Rainfall is often not sufficient to create standing water throughout winter and spring. In particularly dry years, when swamps dry early, females may not reproduce, and juvenile mortality increases as hatchlings have not attained a size sufficient to survive dessication through the summer (> 20 g) (Kuchling et al. 1992). Therefore, two consecutive years of good rainfall are needed for recruitment to the population (Burbidge 1981).Farm dams adjacent to Twin Swamps Nature Reserve pose a threat in years when swamps dry early. Tortoises are attracted to the dams and die from overheating while trying to find a way through fox-proof fencing (Burbidge & Kuchling 2004).PredationPredation of eggs by European Red Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) and Southern Brown Bandicoot ( Isoodon obesulus ) may be important (Burbidge 1981). Hatchlings (about 25 mm long and weighing only 3–5 g) are also highly susceptible to predation (Burbidge & Kuchling 2007). Hatchlings may be eaten by large wading birds such as the Straw-necked Ibis ( Threskiornis spinicollis ), White-faced Herons ( Notophoyx novaehollandiae ) and introduced Laughing Kookaburras (Burbidge 1981; Burbidge & Kuchling 2004). Recently, predation of juveniles by the Australian Raven ( Corvus coronoides ), which have become more numerous in metropolitan Perth, has been recorded (Burbidge & Kuchling 2004, 2007).Predation by foxes is believed to be a reason for the decline of the species (Cogger et al. 1993). Foxes prey on tortoises during the winter and spring, but it is during the summer, when the tortoises aestivate (sleep), that they are most susceptible. Aestivation sites vary - at Ellen Brooke Nature Reserve they are usually in naturally occurring tunnels in the clay soil, but at Twin Swamps Nature Reserve they are often on the surface under leaf litter. In the mid 1960s, there were more than 200 Western Swamp Tortoises at Twin Swamps, but by the late 1980s there were less than five and, while lower rainfall averages had some effect, fox predation is thought to have been the major cause of the fall in numbers (Burbidge & Kuchling 2004, 2007).Predation by Black Rats ( Rattus rattus ) is a possible threat and is currently being investigated with an experimental rat control program in the nature reserves (Burbidge & Kuchling 2004).FireAt Twin Swamps Nature Reserve the species aestivates in leaf litter, making it vulnerable to fire during the aestivation period (Kuchling 1997).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1760'),('1761','Rheodytes leukops','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Chelidae','The Fitzroy River Turtle is a medium to dark brown turtle growing to 25 cm SL (shell length) with scattered darker spots and blotches on the upper shell surface. It has a pale yellow or cream belly and dull olive-grey exposed fleshy parts. The shell is broadly oval and the neck is covered with large, pointed conical tubercles (Cogger 2000). The back edge of the shell on hatchlings is serrated (Cogger 2000; Latta & Latta 2005; Wilson & Swan 2003). The Fitzroy River Turtle has distinctive eyes with black pupils surrounded by a narrow white inner ring (adults) or a metallic silvery-blue iris (hatchlings) (Cogger 2000; Limpus 2007). The Fitzroy River Turtle has relatively long forelimbs with five long claws and a large cloacal bursae which has a respiratory function (Cogger 2000; Wilson & Swan 2003).','The Fitzroy River Turtle is found in rivers with large deep pools with rocky, gravelly or sandy substrates, connected by shallow riffles. Preferred areas have high water clarity, and are often associated with Ribbonweed ( Vallisneria  sp.) beds (Cogger et al. 1993). Common riparian vegetation associated with the Fitzroy River Turtle includes Blue Gums ( Eucalyptus tereticornis ), River Oaks ( Casuarina cunninghamiana ), Weeping Bottlebrushes ( Callistemon viminalis ) and Paperbarks ( Melaleuca linariifolia ) (Tucker et al. 2001).Turtles often associate with logs in deeper water, and may sit on the downstream side or under rocks in fast flowing riffles (Cann 1998; Tucker et al. 2001). In order to be able to breathe in these fast flowing habitats, the Fitzroy River Turtle has adapted to be able to breathe bimodally, using either its lungs or its cloaca. Cloacal ventilation is the process where water is drawn into and expelled from the cloaca at a rate of 15–60 times per minute (Limpus 2007). Due to this mode of cloacal ventilation, the Fitzroy River Turtle is commonly referred to as the \"bum-breathing\"\" or \"\"bottom-breathing\"\" turtle (Latta & Latta 2005; Limpus 2007).It is thought that the Fitzroy River Turtle has an affinity for well-oxygenated riffle zones',' moving into deeper pools as the riffle zones cease to flow (Tucker et al. 2001). However',' recent studies have captured several turtles from deep pools (Gordos et al. 2003; 2003a; 2004).\"','The Fitzroy River Turtle forages on the river bottom (Cann 1998) and is known to consume a variety of foods, including Ribbonweed ( Vallisneria  sp.), freshwater sponge, aquatic insect larvae, algae, small snails, terrestrial insects and terrestrial plant material such as leaves and bark (Cann 1998; Tucker et al. 2001).'),('1763','Caretta caretta','Endangered','Reptilia','Cheloniidae','The Loggerhead Turtle has a heart-shaped carapace (shell), with five pairs of costal plates that are dark brown in colour (Cogger 1996), and with reddish and darker brown patches (Limpus 2008a). Mature females have a curved carapace averaging 96 cm in length (Limpus et al. 1984b). Hatchlings are dark brown and measure 4.4 cm in straight carapace length and weigh approximately 19 g (Limpus et al. 1984b).','In Australia, Loggerhead Turtles nest on open, sandy beaches (Spotila 2004). Hatchlings enter the open ocean and begin feeding on small animals. Small Loggerhead Turtles live at or near the surface of the ocean and move with the ocean currents. In eastern Australia, there is evidence that they spend around 15 years or more in the open ocean (M. Chaloupka pers. comm. cited in Bjorndal et al. 2000), with much of their feeding in the top 5 m of water (Spotila 2004), before recruiting to their chosen inshore or neritic feeding area. Loggerhead Turtles choose a wide variety of tidal and sub-tidal habitat as feeding areas (Limpus 2008a). Loggerhead Turtles show fidelity to both their foraging and breeding areas (Limpus 2008a). When ready for breeding, mature turtles migrate to their chosen breeding area. Nesting females stay within an \"internesting area\"\" during their nesting period. Once breeding and nesting is complete',' turtles return to their favoured foraging areas.Hatchling to subadult loggerheads occur in the open ocean foraging on planktonic organisms (Carr 1986',' 1987b; Limpus et al. 1994b).Loggerhead Turtles enter the benthic foraging habitat at a larger size than other hard-shelled sea turtles. Adults and large juveniles with greater than 70 cm curved carapace length (Limpus et al. 1994b) occur in waters with both hard and soft substrates including rocky and coral reefs (Limpus et al. 1984b)',' muddy bays (Conway 1994)'),('1765','Chelonia mydas','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Cheloniidae','The Green Turtle has an olive green, nearly circular or heart-shaped carapace (upper shell) up to 1 m in length.  The carapace is usually variegated with brown, reddish-brown and black on the top and whitish or cream underneath. There are four pairs of costal shields (shell plates located on either side of the mid-line) between the centre and outer margin of the upper shell (Cogger 2000; Limpus 1995a).','Green Turtles spend their first five to ten years drifting on ocean currents. During this pelagic (ocean-going) phase, they are often found in association with driftlines and rafts of  Sargassum  (a floating marine plant that is also carried by currents) (Robins et al. 2002; Poiner & Harris 1996; Carr & Meylan 1980).Once Green Turtles reach 30 to 40 cm curved carapace length, they settle in shallow benthic foraging habitats such as tropical tidal and sub-tidal coral and rocky reef habitat or inshore seagrass beds. The shallow foraging habitat of adults contains seagrass beds or algae mats on which Green Turtles mainly feed (Musick & Limpus 1997; Poiner & Harris 1996; Robins et al. 2002; Whiting 2000a).','Adult Green Turtles eat mainly seagrass and algae, although they will occasionally eat other items including mangroves (Forbes 1994; Limpus & Limpus 2000; Pendoley & Fitzpatrick 1999), fish-egg cases (Forbes 1994), jellyfish (Limpus et al. 1994a) and sponges (Whiting 2000a). Young turtles tend to be more carnivorous than adults (Brand-Gardner et al. 1999; Cogger 2000; Whiting 2000a). During their pelagic phase (while drifting on ocean currents), young Green Turtles also eat plankton (Cogger 2000).It is estimated that most (and possibly all) of the Green Turtles that nest in north-east Arnhem Land remain in the Gulf of Carpenteria to feed (Kennett et al. 1998).','In Australia, the main current threats to Green Turtles are disturbance (e.g. light disturbance) and habitat damage due to coastal development; by-catch from fisheries and shark control measures; predation on nests; boat strikes; entanglement and ingestion of marine debris; and in some areas, indigenous harvesting (DEWHA 2008; Lanyon et al. 1989). Potential threats include changes to the sea surface temperature, particularly changes to the Southern Oscillation Index, which determines breeding intervals; chance disasters (e.g. oil spills); and feral predator invasions (DEH 2005b).Disturbance of hatchlings by artificial lightsHatchling sea turtles emerge from their nests at night and are attracted to the brighter, lower elevation sea horizon and away from shadows from dunes and vegetation. Hatchlings that move towards artificial lights instead of the sea are likely to be killed by predators or exposure, or burned if they are attracted to fire (Pendoley 2005).A study on the impact of artificial lights on turtles nesting on Barrow Island, the Lowendal Islands and the Montebello Islands complex on the North West Shelf of Western Australia confirmed that sea turtle hatchlings can see ultraviolet and visible light, and respond most strongly to short wavelengths (blue and green) (Pendoley 2005). The threat to hatchlings from lights depends on its wavelength and strength, and the amount of moonlight.One study (Pendoley 2005) found that the hatchlings of a related sea turtle species (Hawksbill Turtle) were generally attracted to sources of light that were 100 to 200 m away from the nest, but generally moved towards the ocean if the lights were 500 to 800 m away. All lights (at 500 Watt) were found to affect hatchlings at a distance of 200 m. Hatchlings were found to be attracted to short-wavelength lights (UV, blue and green lights) at lower light intensities than to high pressure sodium vapour lights (e.g. streetlights, which emit yellow-orange light) and gas flares (open flames that burn excess gas, emitting mainly long wavelengths). Single 250 W sodium vapour lights that are 200 m away or further had no detectable effect, while 500 W fluorescent lights attracted hatchlings at a distance of 800 m. Some distant offshore lights from pearling vessels and drilling rigs (for example an offshore drilling rig 3.3 km away) were bright enough to affect hatchling movements. Oil and gas processing facilities and offshore vessels on the North West Shelf of Western Australia use mercury vapour, metal halide and fluorescent lamps that emit light concentrated in the short wavelength range that attracts hatchling Green Turtles. On moonlit nights, hatchlings will selectively move to the ocean rather than to gas flares, but flares may attracted them on moonless nights (Pendoley 2005).Other aspects of coastal development and industryThe number of Green Turtles affected annually from collisions with boats is unknown. However, the effect of shipping and recreational boating is likely to be similar to that of Hawksbill Turtles, with which they share much of their distribution. Hawksbill Turtles migrate close to the ocean surface along the coast and use shipping channels between their breeding and feeding grounds. In eastern Queensland, at least 65 turtles were killed between 1999 and 2002 when they were hit by vessels, a mortality risk comparable to that of trawling without Turtle Excluder Devices in the region. However, Hawksbills are not as frequently struck by boats in Queensland as some other species of turtles (Hazel & Gyuris 2006). The Dampier Archipelago in Western Australia is an important migration route for Hawksbill Turtles and one of the busiest ports in Australia. Migratory pathways north of the Dampier Archipelago are unprotected by conservation reserves, as are those between Scott Reef and the Joseph Bonaparte Gulf in the Northern Territory.Turtles may also be harmed by seismic discharges during mining and exploration, and habitat damage as a result of pipeline installation, dredging and construction (Pendoley 2005).Disruptions to nesting beaches can prevent female Green Turtles from nesting and can kill hatchlings. Disruptions include erosion and erosion control measures such as drift fencing; rubbish; recreational vehicles; shoreline developments; marina and jetty developments; beach cleaning; sand compaction and beach nourishment (adding sand) (Robins et al. 2002; US Fish & Wildlife Service 1999).By-catchTrawling is responsible for more sea turtle deaths than any other human-related factor (Bisong 2000). In the late 1980s, 5000 to 6000 sea turtles were caught each year as by-catch in the Australian Northern Prawn Fishery (off the north coast of Australia), with a mortality rate of up to 39% (14% from drowning in the net, and 25% from injury or drowning after being returned to the ocean comatose) (Poiner & Harris 1996). Robins (1995) found that around 5 300 turtles are caught in the Queensland East Coast Prawn Fishery each year. However, only 1% to 7% of these turtles die, because the duration of trawls is generally short enough not to drown them (less than 80 minutes). The use of Turtle Excluder Devices (TEDs) was made compulsory in Queensland in 1999, and in the Australian Northern Prawn Fishery in 2000. Before TEDs were introduced, an average of 0.24 turtles were caught per BaNAa Prawn trawl, and 0.30 turtles per Tiger Prawn trawl. Since the introduction, the capture rates have dropped to 0.007 and 0.009 turtles per BaNAa Prawn and Tiger Prawn trawl, respectively. Some turtles are still caught because the TED becomes blocked (e.g. with starfish), small turtles pass through it, or the net is winched up before the turtle has reached the TED. Turtles are also caught in the \'try gear\' (small trawls to sample prawn density before the main trawl, which are not required to be fitted with TEDs), but the duration of these captures is short and unlikely to drown turtles (Robins et al. 2002).Substantial numbers of turtles die during pound netting, gill-netting, purse seine netting and lobster and crab pot trapping, because they are hooked or become entangled in lines. The Australian Tuna and Billfish Longline Fisheries also catch around 400 turtles per year (DEH 2005a).Shark nets and hook lines around swimming beaches also kill turtles (Robins et al. 2002). Between 1962 and 1998, the Queensland Shark Control Program caught 4300 turtles, with about 20% dying before release (DEH 2005a).PredationIntroduced and native fauna is known to prey upon marine turtle eggs. Feral pigs, foxes, feral dogs, dingoes,bandicoots and goannas have been identified as predators on marine turtle eggs in parts of mainland Australia, and goannas are thought to be a problem on some islands (Environment Australia 2003ai). The magnitude of the problem is not known across the whole range of marine turtle nesting habitat.Predation by the European red fox has been identified as a key threatening process. A threat abatement plan has been prepared by the Commonwealth to ameliorate the impact of foxes on native species (Environment Australia 1998b). Feral pigs destroy nests in Queensland (Environment Australia 1998).Marine debris and pollutionEating discarded plastic or other debris (e.g. plastic bags, styrofoam beads, packing tape and rope fragments) can cause internal blockage, ulcers, poisoning and suffocation in Green Turtles. Turtles may also be injured or killed if they become entangled in debris. Oil and tar on beaches and on the water surface can choke or poison turtles, or inhibit swimming. Other potentially harmful pollutants include pesticides, heavy metals, organochlorides, and sewage from the land or from boats. These substances can pollute feeding grounds and increase disease in turtles (Robins et al. 2002). Floating debris particularly affects juvenile turtles, because they spend their first years drifting in convergences (rips, fronts and driftlines formed by ocean currents). Such convergences affect debris and young turtles similarly, drawing both into the convergence by downwellings in the open ocean (Carr 1987a).Discarded fishing nets (\'ghost fishing\') are responsible for a substantial number of deaths of turtles in Australia (Chatto et al. 1995). Ghost nets are an especially serious problem in the Gulf of Carpentaria, where currents draw them in from the north then circulate them indefinitely. A study in 2005 found around 170 kg of marine debris per kilometre of coast, including more than 400 ghost nets over the whole area. Green Turtles are one of the most frequently caught species in \'ghost nets\' and other discarded debris (DEH 2005a; White 2005, as cited in DEH 2005a).DiseaseThe incidence of fibropapilloma disease has increased in recent years in southern Queensland populations, with approximately 8% of Green Turtles in Moreton Bay having external symptoms of the disease. The impact of the disease on turtle populations is unknown (Limpus & Miller 1994; Limpus et al. 1994a).Boatstrike and propeller cutsIn recent decades there has been an increase in the number of turtles killed by collision with vessels and cuts from propellers (Greenland et al. 2004).  With an increase in the numbers of vessels being used in coastal waters, injuries to turtles from collisions and propeller cuts from vessels is expected to increase.Temperature change of nesting beaches and the marine habitatThe temperature of the nest affects the sex ratio of Green Turtle hatchlings. Cooler, more shaded beaches produce more males, while warmer, sunny beaches produce more females. Beaches become heated when cleared of coastal forest, or when heat-absorbing sand is imported for \'beach nourishment\' of tourist areas, and potentially through global climate change. These changes result in female-biased populations. Human alteration to the temperature of nest sites can also increase parasites and diseases in the eggs and make some beaches unsuitable for nesting (DEH 2005a; US Fish & Wildlife Service 1999). Climate change scenarios predict reduced nesting habitat for sea turtles through rising sea levels and increased storm erosion. Changing ocean circulation may also disrupt the ocean-going phase of juvenile sea turtles, and the predicted increase in coral bleaching and burning of seagrass habitats will reduce their food resources (DEH 2005a). Sea surface temperatures also have major effects on the frequency of sea turtle breeding (Solow et al. 2002). Changes to the Southern Oscillation Index will have a major effect on Australian breeding populations of Green Turtles.HuntingGreen Turtles are hunted for food (Limpus 1998). In Australia, they are favoured over other species of marine turtles for their meat (DEH 2005a). The harvest in the Northern Territory is estimated to be in the thousands. In the Torres Strait, between 4000 and 6700 Green Turtles are harvested by Indigenous people each year (Johannes & MacFarlane 1991; Kwan 1991). It has been claimed that indigenous harvest of eggs may be unsustainable in northeast Arnhem Land (Kennett et al. 1998).  There are serious concerns that the collective Indigenous harvest of marine turtles within the East marine region is not sustainable (DEW 2007a).In Indonesia in excess of 20 000 Green Turtles are killed annually and the species has suffered huge declines (Limpus 1995b; Putra 1997). Around 100 000 Green Turtles are harvested annually in the region including Indonesia, Papua New Guinea, New Caledonia, the Solomon Islands, Fiji and Vanuatu. Heavy egg harvests still occur in Malaysia and Thailand (Limpus 1995b).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1765'),('1766','Eretmochelys imbricata','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Cheloniidae','Hawksbill Turtles have a parrot-like beak. Adults have an olive-green or brown carapace (upper shell) with reddish-brown, brown or black markings in a tortoiseshell pattern. The carapace is highly domed and heart shaped with imbricate (overlapping) scale and is cream to yellowish underneath (Cogger 1994; Limpus 1995a). Adult females weigh 50 kg and have a mean curved carapace length of approximately 82 cm (Dobbs et al. 1999).','Hawksbill Turtles spend their first five to ten years drifting on ocean currents (Carr 1987a; Limpus et al. 1994e). During this pelagic (ocean-going) phase, they are often found in association with rafts of  Sargassum  (a floating marine plant that is also carried by currents) (Carr 1987a).Once Hawksbill Turtles reach 30 to 40 cm curved carapace length, they settle and forage in tropical tidal and sub-tidal coral and rocky reef habitat.  They primarily feed on sponges and algae (Whiting 2000a).  They have also been found, though less frequently, within seagrass habitats of coastal waters, as well as the deeper habitats of trawl fisheries (Poiner & Harris 1996; Robins et al. 2002).Hawksbill Turtles have been seen in temperate regions as far south as northern NSW (Limpus 1992; Robins 2002; Whiting 2000).','In the Caribbean, Hawksbill Turtles mainly eat sponges (Meylan 1984, 1988). In Australia and elsewhere, they are omnivorous, eating a variety of animals and plants including sponges, hydroids, cephalopods (octopus and squid), gastropods (marine snails), cnidarians (jellyfish), seagrass and algae (Carr & Stancyk 1975; Whiting 2000a). During their pelagic phase (while drifting on ocean currents), young Hawksbill Turtles eat plankton (Meylan 1984).','In Australia, the main current threats to Hawksbill Turtles are disturbance and habitat damage due to coastal development; by-catch from fisheries and shark control; predation on nests; boat strikes; entanglement and ingestion of marine debris; and unsustainable levels of indigenous harvest in some areas. Potential threats include climate change, chance disasters (e.g. oil spills) and feral predator invasions (DEH 2005a; Environment Australia 2003ai).Disturbance of hatchlings by artificial lightsHatchling Sea Turtles emerge from their nests at night and are attracted to the brighter, lower elevation sea horizon and away from shadows from dunes and vegetation. Hatchlings that move towards artificial lights instead of the sea are likely to be killed by predators or exposure, or burned if they are attracted to fire (Pendoley 2005).A study on the impact of artificial lights on turtles nesting on Barrow Island, the Lowendal Islands and the Montebello Islands complex on the North West Shelf of Western Australia confirmed that sea turtle hatchlings can see ultraviolet and visible light, and respond most strongly to short wavelengths (blue and green) (Pendoley 2005). The threat to hatchlings from light depends on its wavelength and strength, and the amount of moonlight. Hawksbill Turtle hatchlings are generally attracted to sources of light that are 100 to 200 m away from the nest, and generally moved towards the ocean if the lights were 500 to 800 m away. 500 Watt lights of all types affect hatchlings at a distance of 200 m. Hatchlings were found to be attracted to short-wavelength lights at lower light intensities than to high pressure sodium vapour lights (e.g. streetlights, which emit yellow-orange light) and gas flares (open flames that burn excess gas, emitting mainly long wavelengths). Single 250 W sodium vapour lights that are 200 m away or further have no detectable effect, while 500 W fluorescent lights can attract hatchlings at a distance of 800 m. Some distant offshore lights from pearling vessels and drilling rigs (for example an offshore drilling rig 3.3 km away) were bright enough to affect hatchling movements. Oil and gas processing facilities and offshore vessels on the North West Shelf use mercury vapour, metal halide and fluorescent lamps that emit light concentrated in the short wavelength range that attracts hatchling turtles. On moonlit nights, hatchlings will selectively move to the ocean rather than to gas flares, but flares may attracted them on moonless nights (Pendoley 2005).Other aspects of coastal development and industryHawksbill Turtles migrate close to the ocean surface along the coast and in shipping channels between their breeding and feeding grounds. In eastern Queensland, at least 65 turtles were killed between 1999 and 2002 when they were hit by vessels, a mortality risk comparable to that of trawling without Turtle Excluder Devices in the region. However, Hawksbills are not as frequently struck by boats in Queensland as some other species of turtles (Hazel & Gyuris 2006). The Dampier Archipelago in Western Australia is an important migration route for Hawksbill Turtles and one of the busiest ports in Australia. Migratory pathways north of the Dampier Archipelago are unprotected by conservation reserves, as are those between Scott Reef and the Joseph Bonaparte Gulf in the Northern Territory. Turtles may also be harmed by seismic discharges during mining and exploration, and habitat damage as a result of pipeline installation, dredging and construction (Pendoley 2005).Disruptions to nesting beaches can prevent females nesting and can kill hatchlings. Disruptions include erosion and erosion control measures such as drift fencing, rubbish, recreational vehicles, shoreline developments, marina and jetty developments, beach cleaning, sand compaction and beach nourishment (adding sand) (Robins et al. 2002; US Fish & Wildlife Service 1999).By-catchTrawling is responsible for more sea turtle deaths than any other human-related factor (Bisong 2000). In the late 1980s, 5000 to 6000 sea turtles were caught each year as by-catch in the Australian Northern Prawn Fishery (off the north coast of Australia), with a mortality rate of up to 39% (14% from drowning in the net, and 25% from injury or drowning after being returned to the ocean comatose) (Poiner & Harris 1996). Around 2% of turtles caught in the Northern Prawn Fishery are Hawksbills (Robins et al. 2002). Robins (1995) found that around 5300 turtles are caught in the Queensland East Coast Prawn Fishery each year. Only 1% to 7% of these turtles die, because the duration of trawls is generally short enough not to drown them (less than 80 minutes). The use of Turtle Excluder Devices (TEDs) was made compulsory in Queensland in 1999, and in the Australian Northern Prawn Fishery in 2000. Before TEDs were introduced, an average of 0.24 turtles were caught per BaNAa Prawn trawl, and 0.30 turtles per Tiger Prawn trawl. Since the introduction, the capture rate has dropped to 0.007 and 0.009 turtles per BaNAa Prawn and Tiger Prawn trawl respectively. Some turtles are still caught because the TED becomes blocked (e.g. with starfish), small turtles pass through it, or the net is winched up before the turtle has reached the TED. Turtles are also caught in the \'try gear\' (small trawls to sample prawn density before the main trawl, and not fitted with TEDs), but the duration of these captures is short and unlikely to drown them (Robins et al. 2002).Substantial numbers of turtles die during pound netting, gill-netting, purse seine netting and lobster and crab pot trapping, because they are hooked or become entangled in lines. The Australian Tuna and Billfish Longline Fisheries also catch around 400 turtles per year, but very few are Hawksbills (DEH 2005b). Shark nets and hook lines around swimming beaches also kill turtles (Robins et al. 2002). Between 1962 and 1998, the Queensland Shark Control Program caught 4300 turtles and about 20% died before release (DEH 2005b).PredationLarge numbers of Hawksbill Turtle eggs are eaten by dingos and goannas in the Northern Territory and Queensland. Feral pigs destroy nests in Queensland (Environment Australia 1998b).Marine debris and pollutionEating discarded plastic or other debris (e.g. plastic bags, styrofoam beads, packing tape and rope fragments) can cause internal blockage, ulcers, poisoning and suffocation in Hawksbill Turtles. Turtles may also be injured or killed if they become entangled in debris. Oil and tar on beaches and on the water surface can choke or poison turtles, or inhibit swimming. Other potentially harmful pollutants include pesticides, heavy metals, organochlorides, and sewage from the land or from boats. These can pollute feeding grounds and increase disease in turtles (Robins et al. 2002). Floating debris particularly affects juvenile turtles, because they spend their first years drifting in convergences (rips, fronts and driftlines formed by ocean currents). Debris and young turtles are both drawn into these convergences by down-wellings in the open ocean (Carr 1987a).Discarded fishing nets (\'ghost fishing\') are responsible for a substantial number of deaths of turtles in Australia (Chatto et al. 1995; Guinea & Chatto 1992). Ghost nets are an especially serious problem in the Gulf of Carpentaria, where currents draw them in from the north then circulate them indefinitely. A study in 2005 found around 170 kg of marine debris per kilometre of coast, including more than 400 ghost nets over the whole area. Hawksbill Turtles are one of the most frequently caught species in ghost nets (DEH 2005b; White 2005, as cited in DEH 2005b).Changing temperature of nesting beaches and the marine habitatIn Hawksbill Turtles, the temperature of the nest affects the sex ratio of hatchlings. Cooler, more shaded beaches produce more males, while warmer, sunny beaches produce more females. Beaches are heated by clearing of coastal forest, importing heat-absorbing sand for \'beach nourishment\' in tourist areas, and global climate change. These changes can result in female-biased populations. Human alteration to the temperature of nest sites can also increase parasites and diseases in the eggs and make some beaches unsuitable for nesting (DEH 2005b; US Fish & Wildlife Service 1999). Climate change scenarios predict reduced nesting habitat for sea turtles through rising sea levels and increased storm erosion. Changing ocean circulation may disrupt the ocean-going phase of juvenile sea turtles, and the predicted increased coral bleaching and burning of seagrass habitats will reduce their food resources (DEH 2005b). Sea surface temperature also has major effects on the frequency of sea turtle breeding (Solow et al. 2002).HuntingHawksbill Turtles are hunted for food and for their shell, which is used to make tortoiseshell (bekko) objects (Limpus 1998). Indigenous harvest of adults, juveniles and eggs is substantial in northern Australia and neighboring countries. Hunting and egg collection have depleted populations of Hawksbill Turtles in Indonesia, Malaysia, Thailand, Philippines, Cuba and the Solomon Islands (Limpus 1995b).  There are serious concerns that the collective indigenous harvest of these species within the Eastern marine region is not sustainable (DEW 2007a).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1766'),('1767','Lepidochelys olivacea','Endangered','Reptilia','Cheloniidae','The Olive Ridley Turtle is the smallest of the Australian sea turtles with a mean curved carapace length of approximately 70 cm and weight of 40 kg (Limpus et al. 1983a; Whiting 1997). It is characterised by more than five pairs of costal (between the centre and outer margin of shell) scales. Adults are olive-grey in colour and whitish below. The hatchlings are blackish brown and measure 4.1 cm in straight carapace length (Limpus 1995a; Whiting 1997).','Female Olive Ridley Turtles lay clutches of eggs on sandy beaches, hatchlings disperse into offshore currents and have a pelagic phase of unknown length (Musick & Limpus 1997). Small juveniles through to adults reside in coastal zones along the northern coast of Australia and historical bycatch data indicates that large immature and adult-sized Olive Ridleys are present all year round over soft bottomed habits of northern Australian continental shelf waters (Musick & Limpus 1997). NestingSuccessful incubation of eggs requires the nesting sand temperature to be between 25–33 ºC (Ackerman 1997). No studies of nest site selection for Olive Ridley Turtles have been undertaken in Australia. Olive Ridley Turtles were recorded nesting in all bioregions of the Northern Territory, nesting on both mainland and on island beaches (Chatto & Baker 2008).Post-hatchlings and small juvenile turtles occur in the surface waters of the open ocean (Bjorndal 1997; Musick & Limpus 1997).ForagingA substantial part of the immature and adult population forage over shallow benthic habitats from northern Western Australia to south-east Queensland (Harris 1994 cited in Limpus 2008) though large juvenile and adult Olive Ridley Turtles have been recorded in both benthic and pelagic foraging habitats (Musick & Limpus 1997). Foraging habitat can range from depths of several metres (Conway 1994) to over 100 m (Hughes 1974a; Whiting et al. 2005). However, most individuals captured by trawlers in the East Coast Otter Trawl fishery in Queensland were in depths of between 11–40 m (Robins 2002). Trawling data from the east coast of Queensland indicate that this benthic foraging habitat supports turtles between 20 and 80 cm curved carapace length (Robins 1995). Apart from one exception, Olive Ridley Turtles have not been recorded in coral reef habitat or shallow inshore seagrass flats (Limpus 2008).Olive Ridley Turtles do not rely on a listed threatened ecological community and they are not associated with any listed threatened species.','The most comprehensive feeding study in Australia documented mostly gastropod and bivalve molluscs from the stomachs of 36 adult Olive Ridley Turtles (Conway 1994). Crabs, shrimp, tunicates, jellyfish, salps and algae have been found in their diet in studies outside Australia. (Mortimer 1982; Bjorndal 1997). Post-hatchlings and small juveniles occur in the surface waters of the open ocean (Bjorndal 1997) but little is known about their diet during this stage.No studies have been carried out on feeding behaviour in this species.','Marine turtles face a number of threats associated with the following broad categories of human activity: commercial and recreational fishing; coastal infrastructure and development (including industrial, residential and tourism development); Indigenous harvest; feral animal predation; and climate change.Fishing - commercial and recreational TrawlingHundreds of marine turtles used to be killed annually in trawling activities in northern Australia (EA 2003ai; Limpus 2008) prior to the introduction of Turtle Excluder Devices (TEDs); data from the Northern Prawn Fishery indicate that adult sized Olive Ridley Turtles were frequently captured in this fishery prior to the introduction of TEDs (Poiner & Harris 1996; Robins et al. 2002). Guinea and colleagues (1997) documented  the possible link between the death of Olive Ridleys in Fog Bay, Northern Territory and prawn trawling activity in this area prior to the introduction of TEDs. Robins (2002) concluded that Olive Ridley Turtles comprised around 6% of all turtle species caught in the East Coast Trawl Fishery. From 2002–2004, only two Olive Ridley Turtles were recorded as killed by trawling in the Northern Prawn Fishery (Perdrau & Garvey 2005) and three and four were captured but released alive each year. Other unquantified effects of bottom trawling include the damage to benthic habitats and consequently on prey items. Gill netsMarine turtles may also become entangled in nets set for inshore fish species, such as barramundi and shark (DEWHA in prep.). Around 255 Olive Ridley Turtles were captured in a single shark mesh net in Fog Bay, 100 km south-west of Darwin, in 1991 (Guinea & Chatto 1992). The crew estimated that the single net killed approximately 300 sea turtles over 30 days in November 1991. These dead turtles included large immature and adult sized Olive Ridley Turtles (Limpus 2008). This type of fishery was banned in the Northern Territory following this event. There is no bycatch data from the current gill net fishery though the volunteer observer program in eastern Carpentaria indicated no capture of Olive Ridleys in this fishery (Limpus 2008). Longline and Pot FishingTurtles can be hooked on the front and hind flippers, head, mouth, neck and carapace or get entangled in either the monofilament, mainline or balldrop/buoy line. In pot fisheries, turtles may become entangled in the float lines or enter pot traps and drown (DEWHA in prep.). Data on the Eastern Tuna and Billfish Fishery indicate that of the 50 sea turtles captured and identified to the species level, only 2% were Olive Ridley Turtles (Robins et al. 2002). Overseas, the Costa Rican longline fishery is reported to impact on Olive Ridley Turtles (Robins et al. 2007), and observer records from 1994 to 1999 in the Hawaiian-based longline fishery record an incidental take of 32 Olive Ridleys: all were hooked (Western Pacific Regional Fishery Management Council 2002 cited in Robins et al 2002). Ghost NetsWhile ghost nets (lost and discarded fishing nets) pose a serious threat to marine turtles as they float in the ocean and coastal waters and indiscriminately capture marine animals (DEWHA in prep.), this threat is not well quantified for Olive Ridley Turtles; Limpus (2008) in his review of data suggests that hundreds and perhaps thousands of marine turtles, a proportion of which would include Olive Ridley Turtles are killed in ghost nets of the Gulf of Carpentaria while, between 1996–2003, 25 Olive Ridley Turtles were entangled in nets in north-eastern Arnhem Land. Ghost nets are a documented threat to Olive Ridley Turtles in the Cape Arnhem area of the Gulf of Carpentaria, and a probable threat in other areas of the Gulf (Leitch 1999). Indigenous Harvest Animal Predation Goannas destroy a significant number of nests in northern Australia: in Fog Bay and Cobourg Peninsula, Northern Territory,  52% (Blamires 1999) and 58% (Hope & Smit 1998) of all nests were raided by goannas. Pigs destroy up to 90% of the nests on western Cape York (Limpus et al. 1993). Foxes and dogs destroy hundreds of nests in eastern Queensland (EA 2003ai). Chatto and Baker (2008) record that around 8% of all nestings recorded in the Northern Territory between 1994–2004 were disturbed by goannas (over 500 nests), dogs (over 400 nests) or other unknown predators (nearly 300 nests). In Whiting and colleagues\' (2005) study of Olive Ridley nesting on the Tiwi Islands, Northern Territory, feral dogs were the main source of mortality of eggs at the nesting beach of Cape van Diemen. Turtle eggs were vulnerable to dog predation during the start and end of the season. Baiting was successful for some months of the nesting season but by the end of the nesting season, dogs had returned. Nesting adults at Cape van Dieman are preyed upon by the Saltwater Crocodile ( Crocodylus crocodylus ) and hatchlings from crabs and birds (Whiting et al. 2007). Marine DebrisDeath can occur when turtles become entangled in, or ingest, marine debris. Carr (1987 cited in DEWHA in prep.) records that fishing line, rope and cord fragments, styrofoam beads, tar balls, plastic bags and balloons are all known to have killed marine turtles through ingestion or entanglement. Limpus (2008) details only one death of an Olive Ridley Turtle in Queensland as a result of entanglement with fishing line over an eight year period. Coastal Infrastructure and Development Light PollutionLight pollution on nesting beaches alters nocturnal behaviors in sea turtles, including; how sea turtles choose nesting sites; how they return to the sea after nesting; and how hatchlings find the sea after emerging from their nests (Witherington & Martin 1996). Given the remote location of beaches used by nesting Olive Ridley Turtles in Australia, this threat is considered to be relatively low within Australia. Boat StrikeFast moving boats have the potential to cause marine turtle injury or death (DEWHA in prep.). Limpus (2008) details five deaths of Olive Ridley Turtles from boat strike in Queensland between 1996–2003. Seismic Survey Climate Change and Extreme Events Longevity, slow growth and delayed sexual reproduction are all life history traits of Olive Ridley Turtles that hinder efforts to identify population trends and also act to prevent fast population recovery.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1767'),('1768','Dermochelys coriacea','Endangered','Reptilia','Dermochelyidae','Leatherback Turtles are the largest of all sea turtles, with adult females having a mean size of 1.6 m curved carapace length (Limpus et al. 1984c) and some females reaching up to 1 t in weight. Both males and females have a spindled shaped body with unscaled keeled carapaces (shells) (Marquez 1990). Adults are black with pale spots. These spots turn pinkish when out of the water as blood flows to the surface of the skin to cool the body (Spotila et al. 1996).','The Leatherback Turtles is a highly pelagic species, venturing close to shore mainly during the nesting season (Sarti Martinez 2000). Houghton and colleagues (2008) tracked deep (300–1250 m) and protracted dives (> 1 hour) by Leatherback Turtles in the North Atlantic. It is known from waters all around Australia (Robins et al. 2002) and can be found foraging year round in Australian waters (Limpus in Hamann et al. 2006) over Australian continental shelf waters. Adults feed mainly on pelagic soft-bodied creatures such as jellyfish and tunicates (Bone 1998; Cogger 1992), which occur in greatest concentrations at the surface in areas of upwelling or convergence. The regular appearance of Leatherback Turtles in cool temperate waters is probably due to the seasonal occurrence of large numbers of jellyfish.Leatherback Turtles require sandy beaches to nest, with some evidence that coarser sand is more conducive to successful hatching than finer sand (Limpus et al. 1984). Sand temperatures between 24–34 °C are needed for successful incubation (Limpus et al. 1984). Beaches free from light pollution are required to prevent disorientation, disturbance and to allow nesting females to come ashore.There is no information on post hatchling dispersal although it is presumed that, like other species (except Flatback Turtles), the hatchlings are dispersed by ocean currents.Juveniles through to adults reside in a variety of ocean and coastal habitats and span a large latitudinal range (Hamann et al. 2006). The species is not known to rely on a threatened ecological community. It would co-occupy marine and nesting beach habitat with other marine turtle species.','Little is known about the diet of post-hatchlings and small juveniles as they seem to disappear for several years after entering the open ocean (Musick & Limpus 1997) though adult and immature turtles occur together in the feeding areas of Australian coastal waters (Limpus 2009).Diet is dominated by gelatinous organisms such as jellyfish, salps, squid and siphonophores (Bjorndal 1997) which influences the distribution of Leatherbacks (Leary 1957; Lazell 1980) both in the open ocean (Lazell 1980) and close to shore (Hoffman & Fritts 1982; Suarez 2000). A 250 kg Leatherback Turtle may require 65–260 kg per day of jellyfish (Lutcavage & Lutz 1986 cited in Mrosovsky et al. in press).In Australia, one Leatherback was captured at a depth of 50 m with a handline baited with squid (Limpus et al. 1984c; Eckert et al. 1989). The jellyfish  Catostylus mosaicus  is frequently reported as a prey item (Limpus & MacLachlan 1994). In the Bass Strait, Bone (1998 cited in Limpus 2009) observed that the Leatherback Turtle may congregate in areas where southward flowing warm currents converge with steep bathymetric contours, presumably because food is more readily available in these areas.Foraging behaviour has been reasonably well studied in the northern Pacific and Atlantic Oceans (Eckert et al. 1989; Houghton et al. 2006) - for example in the north-east Atlantic Ocean 22% of Leatherback Turtle distribution can be explained by \"hot spots\"\" of jelly fish abundance. Their preference for jellyfish as a primary prey item makes Leatherback Turtles particularly susceptible to ingestion of plastics. Their offshore distribution makes them susceptible to entanglement or hooking in longlines (Kaplan 1995).\"','Due to the low incidence of Leatherback Turtle nesting on Australian beaches, and their pelagic foraging habits, a number of threats faced by other marine turtles, such as coastal infrastructure and development, feral animal predation and indigenous harvest are not significant threats to those Leatherback Turtles in Australian waters. Elsewhere in the world, commercial egg harvest, harvest for meat or inappropriate coastal development are significant threats, such as in the Malaysian rookeries where there has been a well-documented decline from approximately 5000 nests per year in the 1960s down to less than 10 nests per year in the 2000s (Hamann et al. 2006). The main threats faced by Leatherback Turtles in Australia arise from accidental catch or entanglement in commercial fishing operations (Hamann et al. 2006).Fishing - commercial and recreational Longline and Pot FishingLeatherback Turtles are mostly reported as entangled in fishing line or externally hooked in the shoulder or flipper (Beverley 2004). Based on logbook records kept between 1997 to 2001, Robins and colleagues (2002) estimated that the Eastern Tuna and Billfish Fishery and the Southern and Western Tuna and Billfish Fishery may incidentally catch around 400 marine turtles each year. They estimate that over 60% of these caught are Leatherback Turtles. Mortality rates for Leatherback Turtles caught in Australian longline fisheries are unknown but are expected to be relatively low (Robins et al. 2002). Mortality rates for this bycatch have been estimated to be between 4–16% (Beverly & Chapman 2007; Lewison et al. 2004). Based on these figures, around 10 to 40 Leatherback Turtles may die through longline fishery operations in Australian waters annually (TSSC 2008aey). Logbook figures (AFMA 2009) document that the Eastern Tuna and Billfish Fishery and the Western Tuna and Billfish Fishery caught 14 Leatherback Turtles with one death,  while during this same period the Torres Strait Fisheries caught two Leatherback Turtles. Varying levels of fishing effort between years will influence levels of bycatch. While capture and mortality in Australia is relatively low (Robins et al. 2002), an estimated 50 000 Leatherback Turtles globally and 20 000 in the Pacific were caught in 2000 as bycatch by pelagic longliners (Lewison et al. 2004). Turtles can be hooked on the front and hind flippers, head, mouth, neck and carapace or get entangled in either the monofilament, mainline or balldrop/buoy line. In pot fisheries, turtles may become entangled in the float lines or enter pot traps and drown (DEWHA in prep.). In the southern Queensland crab fisheries, there were an estimated 0.14 deaths/year from entanglement in crab lines between 1990–2003 (Hamann et al. 2006). Lobster fisheries in Tasmania, Victoria, South Australian and south-west Western Australia pose a threat to Leatherback Turtles, which can become entangled in the floatlines of the traps. A Tasmanian study indicates that 75% of Leatherback Turtles entangled in lobster pot lines are released alive, although post release survival rates are unknown (Bone 1998). Limpus (2009) observes that entanglement in buoy lines to rock lobster pots may be the most significant cause of death from human related activities for the species in Australian continental shelf waters. TrawlingHundreds of marine turtles used to be killed annually in trawling activities in northern Australia (EA 2003ai) prior to the introduction of Turtle Excluder Devices (TEDs), though Hamann and colleagues (2006) report that Leatherback Turtles were rarely caught in trawling activities, with less than one death of Leatherback Turtles per year between the 1970s to the 1990s. Since the introduction of TEDs in the Northern Prawn Fishery in 2000, there has been no record of Leatherback Turtles caught at all (Perdrau & Garvey 2005). Gill netsMarine turtles may also become entangled in nets set for inshore fish species, such as barramundi and shark (DEWHA in prep.). While there have been no known occurrences of accidental catches in gillnet fisheries in recent years, the northern Australian barramundi gillnet fishery historically recorded a low rate of less than one Leatherback death per year while the tuna driftnet fisheries in southern Australia probably had an appreciable impact in previous years, though no records are available (Hamann et al. 2006). Records from Queensland\'s Shark Control Program  indicate that shark control nets represent a relatively small threat, with around 0.25 deaths/year from entaglement in shark control nets between 1996–2003 (Hamann et al 2006). Ghost NetsWhile ghost nets (lost and discarded fishing nets) pose a serious threat to marine turtles as they float in the ocean and coastal waters and indiscriminately capture marine animals (DEWHA in prep.), this threat is not well quantified for Leatherback Turtles (Hamann et al. 2006). A dead 2 m Leatherback Turtle was washed ashore in South Australia in early 2009, having been entangled in netting (The Border Watch 2009) Coastal Infrastructure and Development Coastal developments, including residential, industrial and tourism development, can directly destroy or degrade beach habitats used as nesting sites. Given the low incidence of nesting on Australian beaches by Leatherback Turtles, this threat is considered to be relatively low within Australia. Light PollutionLight pollution on nesting beaches alters nocturnal behaviors in sea turtles, including; how sea turtles choose nesting sites; how they return to the sea after nesting; and how hatchlings find the sea after emerging from their nests (Witherington & Martin 1996). Given the low incidence of nesting on Australian beaches by Leatherback Turtles, this threat is considered to be low. Boat StrikeFast moving boats have the potential to cause marine turtle injury or death (DEWHA in prep.) though in Queensland boat strike caused 0.07 deaths/year between 1990–2003 (Hamann et al. 2006). Marine DebrisDeath can occur when turtles become entangled in, or ingest, marine debris. Carr (1987 cited in DEWHA in prep.) records that fishing line, rope and cord fragments, styrofoam beads, tar balls, plastic bags and balloons are all known to have killed marine turtles through ingestion or entanglement.  Because Leatherback Turtles consume large quantities of jellyfish, some researchers propose that they are more likely to ingest plastic debris mistakenly. Mrosovsky and colleagues (2009) examined the autopsy records of 408 Leatherback Turtles, spanning 123 years (1885–2007), for the presence or absence of plastic in the digestive tract. Plastic was reported in 34% of these cases. The first mention of plastic in the gut was made in 1968. Hamann and colleagues (2006) record that in Queensland there were 0.07 deaths of Leatheback Turtles per year between 1990–2003 through ingestion of marine debris.  They note a rapid increase in the incidence of ingestion of plastic from the late 1960s to the 1980s with levelling off after that. Indigenous Harvest Marine turtles are economically and culturally significant to Indigenous Australians (Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islanders) (DEWHA in prep.).  In a summary of threats to Leatherback Turtles by Hamann and colleagues (2006), indigenous harvest for meat was not listed as a threat. Animal Predation Goannas destroy a significant number of nests in northern Australia: in Fog Bay and Cobourg Peninsula, Northern Territory,  52% (Blamires 1999) and 58% (Hope & Smit 1998) of all nests were raided by goannas. Pigs destroy up to 90% of the nests on western Cape York (Limpus et al .  1993). Foxes and dogs destroy hundreds of nests in eastern Queensland (EA 2003ai). Chatto and Baker (2008) record that around 8% of all nestings recorded in the Northern Territory between 1994–2004 were disturbed by goannas (over 500 nests), dogs (over 400 nests) or other unknown predators (nearly 300 nests). No predation of eggs or nesting female Leatherback Turtles has been recorded in Australia (Hamann et al. 2006) Seismic Survey While seismic surveys, which produce noise pollution in the water, are unlikely to cause the death of turtles, they may impact on the foraging, inter-nesting, courting or mating behaviour of turtles. McCauley and colleagues (2000, cited in Limpus 2007) document the circumstances in which turtles will change behaviour as a result of seismic surveys and recommend the timing and location of seismic surveys take into account time and place specific activities of turtles. Hamann and colleagues (2006) do not list seismic survey as a threat to Leatherback Turtles. Human Interactions with Turtles Outside Australia\'s Jurisdiction As marine turtles are migratory, threats to turtles, originating in other countries (such as nesting beach degradation, tourism, fishing and pollution of foraging areas) may result in population decline in species nesting or foraging in Australia. A comprehensive review of threats to Leatherback Turtles in territories outside Australia is provided in the  Assessment of the conservation status of the leatherback turtle in the Indian Ocean and South-East Asia  report (Hamann et al. 2006) prepared under the Indian Ocean-South-East Asian Marine Turtle Memorandum of Understanding. Some of the key threats include egg harvest (both legal and illegal), disruptive coastal infrastructure construction, bycatch and egg predation. Subsistence hunting of Leatherback Turtles occurs in Kei, Indonesia and Papua New Guinea (Hamann et al. 2006). Climate Change and Extreme Events Changing termparatures and weather patterns associated with climate change are likely to have both direct physiological impacts on marine turtles, as well as indirect effects through impacts on critical turtle habitats (DEWHA in prep.). The sex of marine turtle hatchlings is determined by the incubation termperature of the eggs, with warmer incubation temperatures leading to the production of female hatchlings and cooler incubation temperatures leading to production of male hatchlings. Climate change may alter the temperature of nesting beaches, thereby affecting the male/female ratio. Cyclones and associated storm surges are aperiodic events that can alter hatchling production in particular seasons by washing away and/or inundating clutches or create erosion banks so females cannot emerge to nest (Hamann et al. 2007). Wetter than average years can drop sand temperatures and increase the percentage of male hatchlings. Warmer than average years can increase sand temperatures and increase the percentage of females. There was considerable concern about the impact that the December 2004 tsunami had on the two key nesting areas for the Leatherback Turtle - India (Andaman and Nicobar Islands) and Sri Lanka (Hamann et al. 2006).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1768'),('1774','Crocodylus porosus','','Reptilia','Crocodylidae','The Salt-water Crocodile is the largest species of crocodile and the largest living reptile in the world. The species is sexually dimorphic (sexes are physically different); adult males are on average 5 m long and weigh more than 450 kg, whereas females are much smaller, generally around 3 m long and up to 150 kg. There are uncommon records of male Salt-water Crocodiles reaching more than 7 m in length and 1000 kg in weight. The upper body is grey, brown or almost black above, with irregular darker mottling; they are generally whitish on the underside. The snout of an adult is broad and granular; the distance from the tip to the centre of the eyes is less than twice the width of the head at eye level (Cogger 1996). The tail is highly muscular and is the main propulsion mechanism used in the water. Juveniles are generally pale tan in colour, with black stripes and spots on the body and tail. An adult Salt-water Crocodile generally has 65–67 teeth and is believed to have the greatest bite pressure of any living animal (Cogger 1996; Erickson et al. 2012).','General habitat Studies from Arnhem Land (Northern Territory) indicated that the Salt-water Crocodile mostly occurs in tidal rivers, coastal floodplains and channels, billabongs and swamps (Webb et al. 1987) up to 150 km inland from the coast (Webb et al. 1983f). It has been noted that evaporation in isolated channels may lead to salinity levels that are twice that of seawater. The Salt-water Crocodile usually inhabits the lower (estuarine) reaches of rivers, while the upper reaches are inhabited by  Crocodylus johnstoni  (Fresh-water Crocodile); although, areas of overlap occur in some rivers (Webb et al. 1983a). In Queensland, the species is usually restricted to coastal waterways and floodplain wetlands. Populations may also be found hundreds of kilometres upstream, such as in the Fitzroy River and the waterways of the southern Gulf of Carpentaria (Read et al. 2004). Nesting habitat Preferred nesting habitat of the Salt-water Crocodile includes elevated, isolated freshwater swamps that do not experience the influence of tidal movements (Webb et al. 1987). Floating rafts of vegetation also provide important nesting habitat (Webb et al. 1987). In the Northern Territory, most nest sites are found on the north-west banks of rivers (Magnusson 1980a) and are usually exposed to the midday sun, but shaded in the early morning and late evening (Webb et al. 1983f).','Feeding behaviour Studies conducted in the Northern-Territory on subadult Salt-water Crocodile individuals up to 180 cm in length have provided a detailed account of stomach contents and diet (Taylor 1979). Samples recovered from 289 Salt-water Crocodiles (209 from the dry season and 80 from the wet season) have shown that the amount of food consumed does not vary between seasons, although the type of food varies between habitats. Food sources The Salt-water Crocodile’s primary food sources are crustaceans, insects and mammals; however, only larger individuals ate mammals. Studies indicate that in areas of higher salinity (mangroves), the Salt-water Crocodile eats larger volumes of crab and a smaller volume of shrimp and insects. In freshwater swamps and upper mangroves, individuals consumed more insects (Taylor 1979). The Salt-water Crocodile is an opportunistic feeder and uses either an ‘active hunting’ or a ‘sit and wait’ strategy (Cooper & Jenkins 1993). Rocks and stones that are known to be ingested may function as gastroliths, improving digestion, or may serve other functions such as acting as ballast (Webb & Manolis 1989). Fish were previously thought to be a major component of the Salt-water Crocodile diet; however, they have only been recorded feeding regularly on Goby fish ( Pseudogobius spp. ). Individuals have been observed unsuccessfully hunting other fish species. Only larger individuals were recorded as feeing on vertebrate prey, suggesting a shift in feeding behaviour and prey with a corresponding increase in age (Taylor 1979). Adult Salt-water Crocodiles are known to prey on a variety of species, including mud crabs, birds, sea turtles, fish, flying foxes, dingoes, cats, dogs, pigs, buffalo, cattle, horses and, occasionally, humans (Webb & Manolis 1989).','In Australia, threats to the Salt-water Crocodile include mortality due to fishing nets and the effects of habitat destruction (Taplin 1987). In Arnhem Land, Northern Territory, feral animals such as the Buffalo ( Bubalus bubalis ) destroy wetland habitat by increasing drainage and reducing vegetation (Webb et al. 1984, 1987). Globally, habitat destruction and illegal harvesting of the species are the major threats (Ross 1998).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1774'),('1789','Cophixalus hosmeri','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Microhylidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1789'),('1791','Cophixalus mcdonaldi','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Microhylidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1791'),('1792','Cophixalus neglectus','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Microhylidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1792'),('180','Hipposideros semoni','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Hipposideridae','The noseleaf of Semon\'s Leaf-nosed Bat is well developed, square-shaped and covers most of the muzzle. There are two wart-like protuberances - one in the centre and another on the posterior edge. The upper portion of the noseleaf is divided into four depressions and there are two supplementary leaflets under each side of the lower portion. The ears are particularly long and narrow, with an acute point. The forearm length is between 42 and 50 mm (Churchill 1998; 2009; Hall 2002, 2008). The fur is relatively long and has a ruffled appearance; it is dark, smoky-grey in colour, though lighter on the belly (Churchill 1998, 2009). The wing membrane near the body is covered with whitish-brown hair (Hall & Richards 1979).','Semon\'s Leaf-nosed Bat is found in tropical rainforest, monsoon forest, wet sclerophyll forest and open savannah woodland.This species does not have an obligatory requirement for cave roosts. Daytime roost sites include tree hollows, deserted buildings in rainforest, road culverts and shallow caves amongst granite boulders or in fissures (Churchill 1998, 2009; de Oliveira & Schulz 1997; Hall & Richards 1979; Hall 2002). They appear to prefer rainforest and are more likely to be tree-dwelling than cave-dwelling (S.K. Churchill pers. comm. in Thomson et al. 2001). It is often observed in \"atypical places that are visited by humans\"\" and there are examples of bats being observed in unoccupied houses (in an oven',' clothes closet and on a picture rail) and the door handle of a car. The microclimate of such roosts is similar to that of ambient (Churchill 1998; 2009; de Oliveira & Schulz 1997; Hall 2002). The presence of two individuals in a warm',' humid roost at Kroombit Tops might explain their occurrence so far south of their known distribution (Churchill 1998; 2009). They might occupy caves during drier times (B. Thomson 2007a',' pers. comm.).The species generally forages within the undergrowth'),('1802','Litoria rheocola','Endangered','Amphibia','Hylidae','The Common Mistfrog is a dull grey or brown coloured frog, with irregular darker markings. There is a distinct inverted triangle marking on the top of the head, stretching between the eyes down to the coccygeal region. An obscure darker band runs along the side of the snout, through the eye and ear to the shoulder. The skin is smooth above, with scattered small tubercles. The ventral surface is granular and white in colour. The finger and toe discs are large. The fingers are moderately webbed, the toes are nearly fully webbed. The tympanum is small and covered by skin, though the rim may be distinct. The male nuptial pads are small and they do not have the enlarged arms of other Torrent Treefrog males. The tip of the snout is bluntly pointed (Cogger 2000; Cunningham 2002; Liem 1974).','The Common Mistfrog is a rainforest specialist, endemic to the Wet Tropics Bioregion (Williams & Hero 1998, 2001). The species is restricted to fast flowing rocky creeks and streams in rainforest as well as wet sclerophyll forest (Liem 1974; McDonald 1992). Within these streams this species are often found in the slower more open sections, away from waterfalls (Hodgkison & Hero 2002). Individuals can be found on rocks, logs and vegetation in or adjacent to streams (Hero & Fickling 1994).The Common Mistfrog has also been recorded at the Defence Training Area, Tully, Queensland.  The species has a high probability of occurrence in the direct impact zone (live firing training area) (Department of Defence 2002).There are reported differences in habitat use between male and female Common Mistfrogs. Females and juveniles use streamside vegetation more frequently than males. In contrast males displayed strong fidelity to the rocky stream environment (Hodgkison & Hero 2002).','Common Mistfrog tadpoles graze on algae-covered rocks in fast flowing waters (Liem 1974). Adults feed indiscriminately on both aquatic and terrestrial invertebrates. Their principle diet includes Diptera, Coleoptera, Orthoptera, Blattodea, Hemiptera and Aranea (Hodgkison & Hero 2003).','Reasons for the decline of the Common Mistfog are not well known. Drought, flood, pollution by pesticides, inorganic ions or heavy metals have been rejected as potential reasons (Richards et al. 1993). The habitat of the species in the Wet Tropics has been protected since 1988, therefore habitat destruction is no longer a threat (McDonald & Alford 1999).There has been repeated speculation that UV-B light has caused the decline in Common Mistfrog populations, but there is no evidence to support this and it is now considered unlikely as a hypothesis (NQTFRT 2001).Current research is examining the possibility that disease, such as a viral infection or chytrid fungus, may have contributed to the decline of this species (Berger et al. 1999), and there is considerable circumstantial evidence to support this hypothesis (NQTFRT 2001). However, in recent experiments involving the translocation of tadpoles and adult frogs to sites previously occupied by the species, no clear pattern was evident in the disease results, and only some of the frogs found dead showed signs of Chytridiomycosis (Retallick 1999, 2000, 2001). It is unknown as to whether this disease was solely responsible for the disappearance of the Common Mistfrog at these sites. The chytrid fungus has been found in individuals collected in a variety of locations (Speare & Berger 2000). The Common Mistfrog has less effective natural defences (protective skin peptides) against chytrid fungus than other frog species in the same habitats that have not declined (Woodhams et al. 2006).Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (AGDEH 2006o).Feral pigs are a potential cause of riparian habitat damage and adult frog mortality. The activity of feral pigs has been recorded to have increased over the period 1989 to 1992 in an area previously inhabited by the Common Mistfrog. Very little research has been conducted into the impact of feral pigs on native frog populations (Richards et al. 1993).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1802'),('1815','Cophixalus concinnus','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Microhylidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1815'),('1817','Litoria NAnotis','Endangered','Amphibia','Hylidae','The Waterfall Frog is olive to olive-green above though sometimes almost black. There is extensive, irregular mottling over the body, sometimes with a bluish metallic sheen on the flanks. There is often brown areas around the throat and the underparts are whitish. The axilla and groin area are flesh-coloured an dthe hind side of the thighs is dark brown. The skin is finely, granular with occassional small, scattered warts (Cogger 2000).','The Waterfall Frog is a stream dwelling species that is endemic to the Wet Tropics Bioregion (Hodgkison & Hero 2001; Williams & Hero 1998, 2001). It is restricted to rocky stream habitats in rainforest or wet sclerophyll forest where there is fast flowing water, waterfalls and cascades (Liem 1974; McDonald 1992).Unlike most stream-breeding frog species that live in the adjacent forest and use the stream habitat for breeding, both male and female Waterfall Frogs use the stream as primary habitat throughout the year (Hodgkison & Hero 2001, 2002). Adults and juveniles sometimes form small aggregations (4-6 individuals) amongst large boulders behind waterfalls (Liem 1974; Hero 2001, pers. comm.). Tadpoles of the Waterfall Frog are predomiNAtly found in fast flowing sections of streams, in riffles or torrents, adhering to rocks (Richards 1992).','NA','The reasons for the decline of the Waterfall Frog are unknown. Richards et al. (1993) reject drought, floods, habitat destruction or pollution by pesticides, inorganic ions or heavy metals as potential causes of decline.The habitat of the Waterfall Frog in the Wet Tropics has been protected since 1988, therefore habitat destruction is no longer a threat (McDonald & Alford 1999). There has been repeated speculation that UV-B light has caused declines, but there is no evidence to support this and it is now considered unlikely as a hypothesis (NQTFRT 2001).Current research is examining the possibility that disease, such as chytridiomycosis caused by the chytrid fungus or a viral infection, may have contributed to the decline of the Waterfall Frog (Berger et al. 1999), and there is considerable circumstantial evidence to support this hypothesis (NQTFRT 2001). The chytrid fungus has been identified in the Waterfall Frog (Speare & Berger 2000), and it has less effective natural defences (protective skin peptides) against chytrid fungus than other frog species in the same habitats that have not declined (Woodhams et al. 2006).Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (AGDEH 2006o).Feral pigs are a potential cause of habitat damage around streams, and mortality of adult Waterfall Frogs (Richards et al. 1993). The activity of feral pigs increased over the period 1989-1992 in an area previously inhabited by the Waterfall Frog (Richards et al. 1993). There is very little research, however, into the impact of feral pigs on native frog populations (Richards et al. 1993).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1817'),('1820','Litoria nyakalensis','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Hylidae','The Mountain Mistfrog is a moderate sized, robust treefrog growing 30 to 48 mm in length. The dorsal surface is uniform olive-brown or grey-brown, sometimes with irregular darker olive markings. The skin is smooth above, with scattered tubercles on the head and back. The ventral surfaces are granular, cream in colour with a reddish-pink flush on the limbs and pectoral region, and sometimes dotted or flecked with brown. The iris is brown. The finger and toe disks are large and conspicuous. The fingers have slight webbing, and the toes are fully webbed. The thumb of the Mountain Mistfrog is large up till the disc, which is reduced in size, giving the thumb a conical apprearence. The forearm is robust in the male, with a large nuptial pad with coarse spinules. The tympanum is small and indistinct and covered by skin (Cogger 1994; Cunningham 2002; Liem 1974; Richards 1993).','The Mountain Mistfrog is a rainforest specialist, endemic to the Wet Tropics Bioregion (Williams & Hero 1998, 2001). It is found in upland rainforest and wet sclerophyll forest along fast-flowing streams where there is white water from riffles and cascades (Liem 1974; McDonald 1992). It is usually found perched on rocks or overhanging vegetation adjacent to the water (Liem 1974). The tadpoles are restricted to fast-flowing waters where they cling to rocks in riffles and torrents and in highly oxygenated pools below waterfalls (Liem 1974; Richards 1992). Tadpoles also burrow into loose sand under rocks which may help them withstand the violent floods that often occur in rainforest streams (Richards 1992).','NA','The reason(s) for the decline of the Mountain Mistfrog are unknown. Richards et al. (1993) reject drought, floods, habitat destruction or pollution by pesticides, inorganic ions or heavy metals. The habitat of the species in the Wet Tropics has been protected since 1988, therefore habitat destruction is no longer a threat (McDonald & Alford 1999). There has been repeated speculation that UV-B light has caused declines, but there is no evidence to support this and it is now considered unlikely as a hypothesis (NQTFRT 2001). Current research is examining the possibility that disease, such chytridiomycosis also know as chytrid fungus disease or a viral infection, may have contributed to the decline of this species (Berger et al .  1999), and there is considerable circumstantial evidence to support this hypothesis (NQTFRT 2001).Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (DEH 2006).Feral pigs are a potential cause of riparian habitat damage and adult frog mortality. The activity of feral pigs has been recorded to have increased over the period 1989 to 1992 in an area previously inhabited by the Mountain Mistfrog. There is very little research, however, into the impact of feral pigs on native frog populations (Richards et al .  1993).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1820'),('1821','Litoria olongburensis','Vulnerable','Amphibia','Hylidae','The Wallum Sedge Frog is a small tree-frog that makes a soft \'buzzing\' call (Barker et al. 1995). The snout-to-vent length (SVL) of adult males is approximately 25 mm, while the SVL of adult females is 27–31 mm (although measurements of 22–40 mm have been recorded). The tip of the snout is pointed and protrudes beyond the lower jaw. The canthus rostralis (angle formed by the meeting of the upper and lower eyelids) is sharp and angular in cross section and the loreal region (area between the between the eye and the nostril) is flat and vertical. The dorsal colouration is grey-brown, beige or bright green, occasionally with dark flecking. Skin is smooth or shagreened above, finely granular on the throat, but coarsely granular below. The venter (underside) of frogs is usually white except for the throat, which may be peppered with brown, or a shade of green. A dark brown stripe runs from the snout through the eye and tympanum (the ear). A prominent white streak, starting below the eye, runs back over the shoulder onto the flanks, breaking up into a series of raised (glandular) spots. The vomerine teeth are between the choanae and in short rows. The hindlimbs are long and the toes are partly webbed while the fingers have vestigial webbing. The finger discs and toepads are conspicuous. The species has a moderate oval inner and a small rounded outer metatarsal tubercle. The posterior thigh is light blue or purple-blue above and orange below, or orange-pink with faint brown wash above. Usually there is some blue colouration in the groin as well (Barker et al. 1995; Cogger 2000; Hines & Meyer n.d.; Liem & Ingram 1977).','The Wallum Sedge Frog is found in ephemeral, seasonal and permanent wetlands with emergent reeds, ferns and/or sedges, in undisturbed coastal wallum swamps. Griffith and colleagues (2003) describe wallum as sandmass heathland and shrubland, and various forest, woodland, sedgeland and grassland communities (Bantianoff & Elsol 1989; Coaldrake 1961).While most common in swamps, the Wallum Sedge Frog may also be found around creeks and freshwater lakes in coastal wallum. At swamp sites, the Wallum Sedge Frog can be found sheltering amongst sedges, reeds and ferns all year round (Anstis 2002; Ehmann 1997; Ingram & Corben 1975; James 1996; Lewis & Goldingay 2005; Liem & Ingram 1977; Neilson 2000).AltitudeThe altitude range of the Wallum Sedge Frog is less than 200 m above sea level (ASL) with the highest populations in perched lakes on Fraser Island. They are typically found below 20 m ASL, and always above tidal influence (Ehmann 1997).GeologyWhere the species is found, soils are mostly deep, siliceous sands (e.g. the coastal sandy lowlands or wallum of south-east Queensland/northern NSW (Coaldrake 1961), or shallow sandy soils overlying clay or sandstone. Perched watertables are known to form over organic hardpan layers in coastal wallum soil profiles giving rise to some of the ephemeral to permanent wetlands preferred by the Wallum Sedge Frog (Bayly 1964; Bensink & Burton 1977).WaterThe Wallum Sedge Frog is typically associated with oligotrophic (nutrient poor) and acidic (pH between 3.5 and 6.0) water (Meyer et al. 2006). Water is typically clear, still and tannin stained (Ehmann 1997).VegetationIn general, vegetation types where the species may occur include wet and dry heathlands, sedgelands, woodlands and forests. There is considerable variation in plant species composition and vegetation structure between suitable habitat types for the Wallum Sedge Frog. As such, there is no clear delineation between vegetation types in terms of their suitability for the species (Wallum Sedge Frog Workshop 2010; Meyer et al 2006). However, surveys indicate that the species frequently occurs in areas of sedge swamp habitat in preference to wet heath and, to a greater extent, dry heath (Lewis & Goldingay 2005).Breeding habitatSuitable breeding habitats for the Wallum Sedge Frog occur in acidic, permanent to ephemeral, freshwater wetlands with emergent vegetation, most notably sedges, reeds or ferns, and occasionally  Melaleuca  (paperbark) woodlands. These wetlands (wallum swamps, bogs, lakes or creeks), which are considered habitats critical to the survival of the species, typically overlie deep, low-nutrient, sandy soils where groundwater levels are characteristically high (Wallum Sedge Frog Workshop 2010).Queensland Regional EcosystemsQueensland Regional Ecosystem (RE) types, within which suitable breeding habitats for the Wallum Sedge Frog (as described above) are likely to occur, are (Wallum Sedge frog Workshop 2010):all wet heathlands (RE 12.2.12).most sedgelands (RE 12.2.15 except 12.2.15a).Corymbia  spp.,  Banksia integrifolia ,  Callitris columellaris ,  Acacia  spp. open-forest to low closed-forest on beach ridges usually in southern half of bioregion (RE 12.2.5), especially  Melaleuca quinquenervia  dominated vegetation in coastal dune swales (RE 12.2.5a).Melaleuca quinquenervia  or  M. viridflora  open-forest to woodland on sand plains (RE 12.2.7).New South Wales vegetation typesNew South Wales vegetation types, within which suitable breeding habitats for the Wallum Sedge Frog (as described above) are likely to occur, are (NSW DECC 2005):Wallum sedgeland and rushland of near coastal lowlands of the North Coast.Wet heathland and shrubland of coastal lowlands of the North Coast.Coastal freshwater meadows and forblands of lagoons and wetlands.Non-breeding habitatUnder wet conditions (i.e. resulting from significant rainfall events), the Wallum Sedge Frog is known to utilize heathlands, grasslands, woodlands and forests adjoining breeding habitats in wallum environments and on near-coastal alluvial (clay) plains. The extent to which wallum frog species, including the Wallum Sedge Frog, rely on vegetation away from breeding sites is largely unknown; however, it is likely to facilitate the dispersal of frogs and gene flows between potential metapopulations. Vegetation surrounding lakes and swamps may also play an important role in maintaining hydrology and water quality at breeding site. Vegetation within swamp and lake catchments may, therefore, be considered habitat critical to the survival of the species (Wallum Sedge Frog Workshop 2010; Meyer et al. 2006).Queensland Regional EcosystemsQueensland Regional Ecosystem (RE) types, within which suitable non-breeding habitats for the Wallum Sedge Frog (as described above) are likely to occur, are:Araucarian vine forest on parabolic high dunes (RE 12.2.3).Syncarpia hillii / Lophostemon confertus  tall open to closed-forest on parabolic high dunes (RE 12.2.4).Eucalyptus racemosa  woodland on dunes and sand plains. Deeply leached soils (RE 12.2.6).Eucalyptus pilularis  open-forest on parabolic high dunes (RE 12.2.8).Banksia aemula  woodland on dunes and sand plains. Deeply leached soils (RE 12.2.9).Mallee  Eucalyptus  spp. and  Corymbia  spp. low woodland on dunes and sand plains, especially southern sand mass islands. Deeply leached soils (RE 12.2.10).Corymbia  spp./ Eucalyptus  spp./ Acacia  spp. open-forest to low closed-forest on beach ridges in northern half of bioregion (RE 12.2.11).Melaleuca quinquenervia / Eucalyptus robusta  open-forest on or near coastal alluvial plains (RE 12.3.4).Melaleuca quinquenervia  open-forest on coastal alluvial plains (RE 12.3.5).Melaleuca quinquenervia / Eucalyptus tereticornis / Lophostemon suaveolens  woodland on coastal alluvial plains (RE 12.3.6).Closed heathland on seasonally waterlogged alluvial plains near coast (RE 12.3.13).New South Wales vegetation typesNew South Wales vegetation types, within which suitable non-breeding habitats for the Wallum Sedge Frog (as described above) are likely to occur, are (NSW DECC 2005):Banksia aemula  dry shrubland on coastal sands of the North Coast.Graminoid clay heaths of the coastal lowlands of the North Coast.Coastal floodplain sedgelands, rushlands and forblands.Melaleuca quinquenervia  swamp forest of the coastal lowlands of the North Coast.Habitat suitable for breeding by the Wallum Sedge Frog may be found anywhere within the above mentioned habitat types where permanent to ephemeral wetlands occur.SympatryMeyer and colleagues (2006) state that the Wallum Sedge Frog is rarely found sympatric with the Eastern Dwarf Tree Frog ( Litoria fallax ). However, Fitzgerald and Newell (2010) indicate that the two species are commonly in sympatry around Byron Bay. Hines (2010) explains that whilst the Eastern Dwarf Tree Frog is a highly mobile species and may survive in wetlands where the Wallum Sedge Frog occurs, it cannot successfully breed at most of these sites.Association with a listed threatened ecological communityThe distribution of the Wallum Sedge Frog coincides with the distribution of the  Littoral Rainforest and Coastal Vine Thickets of Eastern Australia  threatened ecological community, which is listed as Critically Endangered under the  Environment Protection and Biodiversity Conservation Act 1999 .','Wallum Sedge Frog tadpoles forage on biofilm that covers submerged reed and sedge stems (James 1996). Metamorphs are reported to take mosquitoes (Anstis 2002). Adults have been observed eating Damselflies (Suborder: Zygoptera) (Wallum Sedge Frog Workshop 2010).','Habitat lossThe habitat utilised by the Wallum Sedge Frog, particularly that on the mainland, has been extensively cleared and/or drained for agriculture, sand-mining, resort/residential development and the establishment of pine plantations (Ehmann 1997; Ingram & McDonald 1993; Lewis & Goldingay 2005). This is especially relevant to mainland coastal areas of south-east Queensland and northern coastal NSW, which have seen a marked increase in residential and resort development in the last 10-15 years (Abbott 2003). This trend is expected to continue with rapid population growth predicted for south-east Queensland and northern coastal NSW (Abbott 2003; ABS 2010; Maganov et al. 2003). Thus, much of the remaining wallum habitat on freehold land may be under threat of development. In the longer term, predicted rises in sea levels with global warming could also bring about habitat loss on both the mainland and offshore sand islands, including the loss of habitat in conservation reserves (Meyer et al. 2006).Habitat degradationThe degradation of Wallum Sedge Frog habitat, associated with urban and resort development and other human activities, includes the trampling of reed beds, changes in hydrology, altered water chemistry, and increases in soil and water nutrient levels (Meyer et al. 2006).Trampling of reed bedsIn areas with high levels of human visitation (e.g. lakes on Fraser Island and North Stradbroke Island), trampling of reed beds has led to significant loss of sedgefrog habitat. This could impact seriously on Wallum Sedge Frog numbers at a local level (Meyer et al. 2006).Changes in hydrologyChanges in hydrology may impact negatively on the Wallum Sedge Frog in several ways, for example, a reduction in the hydroperiod for ephemeral swamps (i.e. a reduction in the permanency of water) may limit reproductive success. Conversely, increased permanence of water could lead to the establishment of predatory fish in otherwise fish-free ephemeral swamps. Changes in hydrology could affect water pH, making conditions favourable for less acid-tolerant species which might displace the Wallum Sedge Frog (i.e. the Eastern Dwarf Tree Frog ( Litoria fallax ), Rocket Frog ( Litoria nasuta ), Common Eastern Froglet ( Crinia signifera ) and the Eastern Sign-bearing Frog ( Crinia parinsignifera) ) (Meyer et al. 2006).Habitat eutrophication and pollutionStudies have shown that increased nitrate levels in water can inhibit larval growth and development as well as reduce larval survivorship in frogs and toads (Mann & Bidwell 1999). Breeding naturally in oligotrophic (nutrient poor) waters, wallum-dependent species may be especially sensitive to increased nitrate levels in water. Nutrient-laden runoff from urban areas and golf courses could therefore render wallum habitat unsuitable for wallum frog species. Nutrient enrichment of nutrient-poor wallum soils may also favour the establishment of non-wallum native plant species, including problem \'weed\' species (e.g.  Typha  spp.). This could render wallum habitat unsuitable for the Wallum Sedge Frog (Meyer et al. 2006).In addition to nutrients, runoff from urban areas may contain other toxicants such as surfactants and oils. Accumulation of these toxicants in wetland areas could also have a negative impact on the Wallum Sedge Frog in areas adjacent to developed areas (Meyer et al. 2006).Habitat fragmentation as a result of land clearingThe distribution of the Wallum Sedge Frog is highly fragmented. This fragmentation is due in part to natural processes thousands of years old, most notably a rise in sea levels at the end of the last glacial period (beginning circa 19 000 years ago) (Coaldrake 1961). More recently, land clearing has increased fragmentation of wallum frog habitat especially in mainland areas (where most land clearing has taken place) (Ehmann 1997; Hines et al. 1999).Increased fragmentation of habitat may further reduce opportunities for dispersal/ movement of frogs between wetland catchments or subpopulations within catchments. This could potentially increase the likelihood of extinction of \'sink\' populations whose viability is dependent on immigration of frogs from other (\'source\') populations. Habitat fragmentation may also reduce the likelihood of recolonisation following local extinction of frog populations/sub-populations after severe habitat disturbance (e.g. fire). Lack of movement of animals between populations or subpopulations may also lead to genetic problems (e.g. inbreeding, genetic drift), which could compromise the long-term viability of populations (Meyer et al. 2006).Inappropriate fire regimesAn increase in the frequency or intensity of fires could significantly affect frog numbers through direct mortality or loss of vegetation, the loss of cover exposing frogs to predators, extremes of temperature and dehydration. Monitoring data from Lennox Head, NSW, show fire may have a significant impact on Wallum Sedge Frog numbers, at least in the short term (Lewis & Goldingay 2005). Long term monitoring data from Western Australia also suggest frog numbers may be slow to recover following fire, even when heath vegetation is quick to do so (Driscoll & Roberts 1997). Frequent fires, especially over large areas, could therefore pose a serious threat to the long-term viability of wallum frog populations.Lennox East, NSW, was extensively burnt by wildfire in the summer of 1997-98 and no Wallum Sedge Frogs were recorded during survey effort for 18 months following this event (Lewis & Goldingay 2005). Surveys in subsequent years recorded both adults and juveniles, and suggest recruitment from nearby sites had occurred. This indicates that Wallum Sedge Frogs are capable of recolonising suitable habitat over relatively short distances (i.e. ~500 m), but the effects of repeated wildfire over larger areas may preclude recruitment for many years, if at all (Lewis & Goldingay 2005).Dry periods, when sedge swamps are devoid of water, are likely to increase the vulnerability of Wallum Sedge Frog populations to fire. Water in the swamps may allow frogs to shelter from the path of fire (Lewis & Goldingay 2005).Also see Lowe Katrin, Castley J. Guy, Hero Jean-Marc (2013) Acid frogs can stand the heat: amphibian resilience to wildfire in coastal wetlands of eastern Australia. International Journal of Wildland Fire 22, 947–958.PredationMosquito FishPredation by the introduced Mosquito Fish,  Gambusia affinis,  (listed as a key threatening process in NSW) poses a significant threat to native species (Gillespie & Hero 1999; Komak & Crossland 2000). Most of the water bodies, which wallum frog species breed in, are free of fish (Hopkins 2003; Meyer unpub. data cited in Meyer et al. 2006). These frog species may, therefore, not have evolved effective means for dealing with fish predators, especially exotic fish like the Mosquito Fish. As a result, wallum frog species may be highly susceptible to Mosquito Fish predation (Meyer et al. 2006).Eastern Dwarf Tree Frog and the Cane ToadCompetition with the related native Eastern Dwarf Tree Frog and the Cane Toad in disturbed areas is of concern (Meyer et al. 2006; Wallum Sedge Frog Workshop 2010).Use of biocides in weed and mosquito controlMany widely used pesticides have been shown to be toxic to frogs causing deformities, hermaphroditism and death (Mann & Bidwell 1999). The widespread use of pesticides in weed and mosquito control in coastal areas is another potential threat to wallum frog species (Meyer et al. 2006).Pig damageFeral pigs, which are known to occur in wallum frog habitat, are a potential threat to wallum frog species. Feral pigs may destroy breeding habitat when foraging or using breeding sites as wallows, rendering them unsuitable for wallum frog species (NSW DEH 2003). The threat posed by pigs to native species has led to the listing of predation and habitat degradation by pigs as a key threatening process under the EPBC Act (Meyer et al. 2006).Population decline at Broadwater West, NSW, was noted during surveying between 1996-2000 by Lewis and Goldingay (2005). Searches of adjacent habitat revealed that Wallum Sedge Frogs still occurred broadly throughout the site and the localised disappearance may have been due to habitat disturbance by feral pigs (Lewis & Goldingay 2005).Exotic diseaseExotic disease has emerged as a significant threat to amphibian populations here and internationally. In Australia, amphibian chytridiomycosis, an exotic disease caused by the chytrid fungus ( Batrachochytrium dendrobatidis ), is believed to be responsible for the recent decline and extinction of a number of frogs (Daszak et al. 2003). It is now listed as a key threatening process under the EPBC Act and NSW  Threatened Species Conservation Act 1995 . Until more information is known about the threat this disease poses to wallum frog species, a precautionary approach, is advisable.Vehicular trafficIn northern NSW, significant mortality of adult Wallum Sedge Frogs is known to occur on busy roads bisecting wallum swamps (Goldingay unpub. data cited in Meyer et al. 2006). Thus, in some areas, vehicular traffic may pose a threat to populations of this species (Meyer et al. 2006). From survey work undertake by Goldingay (cited in Dorey 2009), it is estimated that 10 000 Wallum Sedge Frogs are killed per annum on a 4 km section of the Coast Road near Lennox Head.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1821'),('1827','Litoria piperata','Vulnerable','Amphibia','Hylidae','The Peppered Tree Frog is a smooth, dull olive or grey-green coloured frog that grows to 30 mm.  It has irregular darker brown marbling and flecking, often peppered with white/cream on limbs and flanks.  The species has scattered tubercles on the head and well developed finger and toe discs which are markedly wider than the digits (Cogger 2000).','The Peppered Tree Frog occupies rocky streams in open forest and wet sclerophyll forest (Heatwole et al. 1995) at altitudes of 800 to 1120 m (Gillespie & Hines 1999). The general area in which this species has been recorded has been referred to as the \'dry eastern escarpment\' (NSW NPWS 1994). Common streamside vegetation at sites where records were made includes  Lomandra, Leptospermum  and  Casuarina  (Mahony 1996 in NSW NPWS 2001).','NA','The cause of the apparent decline in the Peppered Tree Frog population is unknown. However, most of the historic sites and other streams in the region have undergone substantial alteration and suffered significant habitat disturbance through land clearance, grazing and timber harvesting (Hines 2001, pers. comm.).Introduced predatory fish species (Eastern Gambusia ( Gambusia holbrooki ) and salmonids) occur in streams formerly occupied by the species and may have displaced frog populations by predation upon larvae (Gillespie & Hines 1999). These fish are likely to have had a significant impact on the Peppered Tree Frog given the vulnerability of other members of the  L. citropa  group to trout predation.Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (DEH 2006).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1827'),('1828','Litoria raniformis','Vulnerable','Amphibia','Hylidae','The Growling Grass Frog is one of the largest frog species in Australia. It reaches up to 104 mm in length, with females usually larger (60-104 mm) than males (55-65mm) (Barker et al. 1995; Tyler 1978; Tyler and Barrie 1996). Growling Grass Frogs vary in colour and pattern but in general are olive to bright emerald green, with irregular gold, brown, black or bronze spotting. Their backs are warty and usually have a pale green mid-dorsal stripe. The eardrum is pronounced. A cream or yellow stripe underlined by a dark brown stripe runs from the nostril, through the eye, above the inner ear and down the sides of the body to the groin as a dorso-lateral fold (Barker & Grigg 1977, Robinson 1993). On their bellies, Growling Grass Frogs are white and coarsely granular. During the breeding season males may become yellow or dark grey/black under the throat. The groin and posterior of the thighs are turquoise blue (DEC NSW 2005).','This species is found mostly amongst emergent vegetation (Robinson 1993), including  Typha sp.  (bullrush),  Phragmites sp.  (reeds) and  Eleocharis sp. (sedges), in or at the edges of still or slow-flowing water bodies such as lagoons, swamps, lakes, ponds and farm dams (NSW DEC 2005a). The Growling Grass Frog can be found floating in warmer waters in temperatures between 18–25°C.Additionally, this species occurs in:clays or well-watered sandy soils;open grassland, open forest, and ephemeral and permanent non-saline marshes and swamps;montane eucalypt forest, dry schlerophyll forest in coastal Victoria;steep-banked water edges (like ditches and drains) and gently graded edges containing fringing plants; andformerly, areas of high altitudes (Ehmann & White 1997; NSW DEC 2005a).Submerged vegetation is important habitat for breeding success as it provides egg-laying sites, calling stages for males, and food and shelter for tadpoles. Grassland provides habitat for foraging, dispersal and shelter, and may also provide overwintering sites for Growling Grass Frogs (Clemann & Gillespie 2004; Hamer & Organ 2006). Hamer and Organ (2006) found that large and relatively permanent waterbodies, with a high proportion of emergent vegetation cover, were more likely to be occupied by the Growling Grass Frog.The Growling Grass Frog can also inhabit agricultural and higher rainfall pastoral lands so long as permanent and non-permanent water sites are available with dense emergent or fringing vegetation (Ehmann & White 1997; S. Wassens pers. comm. cited in NSW DEC 2005a). The wetland systems that the Growling Grass Frog occupies in NSW consists of a mosaic of permanent and ephemeral waterbodies which flood in the spring of most years. Within these habitats, the greater the water depth and aquatic vegetation cover, the higher the probability that the Growling Grass Frog will be present. In the Lowbidgee Irrigation Area, NSW, Growling Grass Frogs occur in a series of small water bodies.The species is thought to retreat to these small water bodies during the dry season (between January and August). When the area is flooded during the wet season, these small waters bodies flood to form a large wetland, which is used by the species for breeding, tadpole habitat and tadpole morphosis (NSW DEC 2005a; Wassens 2005; Wassens et al. 2008). In the Coleambally Irrigation Area, NSW, the Growling Grass Frog occurs in irrigation channels and crops (NSW DEC 2005a). The species also occurs in lignum shrublands, black box and river red gum woodlands (S. Wassens undated, pers. comm. cited in NSW DEC 2005a) and alongside rivers in the southern parts of NSW (NSW DEC 2005a).Basking Habitat  Growling Grass Frogs are active during both day and night throughout the warmer months and can be seen basking out of water amongst vegetation or on rocks and logs. In Tasmania, it is the only frog to exhibit this behaviour (Threatened Species Unit 2001). Growling Grass Frogs are known to bask in filtered sunlight, that is, under partly cloudy conditions or in deep vegetation (Ehmann & White 1997). The Growling Grass Frog is frequently found basking on grassy banks near water (Courtice & Grigg 1975). Its behaviour during winter is not well known, although it is speculated that it hibernates in warm, moist areas such as the mud at the bottom of ponds, under logs, rocks and debris or beneath thick vegetation (Ayers et al. 1996; G. Pyke undated, pers. comm. cited in NSW DEC 2005a, S. Wassens undated, pers. comm. cited in NSW DEC 2005a). Radio-tracking of some individuals has suggested that the species winter under dense vegetation (S. Wassens undated, pers. comm. cited in NSW DEC 2005a). Breeding Habitat The Growling Grass Frog is dependent upon permanent freshwater lagoons for breeding. The ideal breeding habitat is the shallow part of lagoons (up to approximately 1.5 m) where there is generally a complex vegetation structure. Breeding sites in Tasmania often contain vegetation communities dominated by emergent plants such as water ribbons ( Triglochin ) and spikerush ( Eleocharis ) and submerged plants such as water milfoil ( Myriophyllum ), marsh-flower ( Villarsia ), and pondweed ( Potamogeton ). However, other plant communities can form equally suitable habitat (Threatened Species Unit 2001).Refuge habitat The variety of habitats this species utilises for refuge includes soil cracks, fallen timber, debris and dense vegetation on low, frequently inundated floodplains (Cogger 2000; S. Wassens undated, pers. comm. cited in NSW DEC 2005a). Clemann and colleagues (2013) identify that habitat characteristics are more important indicators of the quality of drought refugia for the species than the type of water body. Consequently aquatic vegetation and salinity are important targets for management when planning the retention, creation and restoration of habitat to facilitate persistence during drought (Clemann et al. 2013). Heard and colleagues (2015) identified relatively warm and saline wetlands as providing refuge from disease.','Growling Grass Frogs feed mainly on terrestrial invertebrates such as beetles, termites, cockroaches, moths, butterflies and various insect larvae (M. Christy undated, pers. comm. cited in NSW DEC 2005a). They sometimes prey on other frogs, including younger frogs of their own species (Barker and Grigg 1977; Hero et al. 1991). They also feed on vertebrates such as lizards, snakes and small fish (Martin and Littlejohn 1982).This species is described as being a \'sit-and-wait\' predator, that is, they do not actively hunt for food but rather sit and wait for prey to move into feeding range (M. Christy undated, pers. comm. cited in NSW DEC 2005a). The Growling Grass Frog is also believed to be a nocturnal feeder (G. Pyke undated, pers. comm. cited in NSW DEC 2005a).','The NSW Department of Environment and Conservation (2005a) identified the following list of threats to the Growling Grass Frog:Habitat loss and fragmentation Habitat loss and fragmentation are considered to be the primary threat to Growling Grass Frog populations. The draining and infilling or flooding of permanent and non-permanent wetlands plus their adjoining watercourses and vegetation removes critical movement corridors, refuge and breeding habitat and displaces the species from their natural habitat. Artificially irrigated areas and farm dams have replaced some habitat, but these do not provide shelter and foraging habitat (NSW DEC 2005a). Over-grazing by cattle and the burning of canal edges has the capacity to reduce the vegetation cover. This may impact upon Growling Grass Frog populations as the species preferentially occupies habitats with a high percentage of aquatic and fringing vegetation cover (Wassens 2005).Habitat degradation Overgrazing by livestock around the edges of wetlands disturbs essential habitat by destroying the surrounding vegetation and affecting the quality of the water (Jansen & Healey 2003; Tyler 1993). The removal of aquatic vegetation destroys refuge habitat and shelter for tadpoles. The clearing of terrestrial vegetation, fallen logs and ground debris surrounding wetlands removes essential habitat (NSW DEC 2005a). The practise of dredging to remove aquatic vegetation and spraying or burning vegetation along the edges of irrigation canals is likely to be an important factor in limiting the distribution of the Growling Grass Frog in an irrigation landscape (Wassens et al. 2008).Altered flooding regimes The number of potential breeding sites for the Growling Grass Frog along natural drainage systems has been reduced through local changes in land contours as a result of drainage earthworks (NSW DEC 2005a). Local extinctions of Growling Grass Frog coincide with a significant reduction in flood frequency during the early 1980s. Local extinctions also occur in wetland systems that have been converted to permanent water storages (Wassens 2005).Disease Chytrid fungus, a water-borne pathogen responsible for the Chytridiomycosis (an infectious disease which affects amphibians worldwide), is widespread in frog populations in eastern Australia and has recently been detected in the Growling Grass Frog and the closely related Green and Golden Bell Frog (Berger et al. 1999). Chytridiomycosis disease is believed to be a significant cause of death in some frog species in recent years and is also found in a small proportion of apparently healthy frogs and tadpoles (Berger et al. 1999). Chytridiomycosis has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (DEH 2006o).Predation by introduced fish In controlled laboratory and field experiments (Morgan and Buttemer 1996; Pyke and White 2000) introduced Mosquito Fish or Plague Minnow ( Gambusia holbrooki ) have preyed on eggs, fry and tadpoles of the Green and Golden Bell Frog ( L. aurea ) and may potentially prey on the eggs and tadpoles of the Growling Grass Frog (Ehamnn and White 1997; Sadlier and Pressey 1994). Although there is some overlap in range and habitat requirements of the Growling Grass Frog and Mosquito Fish, there is no evidence to show that predation by the Mosquito Fish is directly responsible for the decline of Growling Grass Frog population numbers (review in McKay et al. 2001). For example, in a 2002/03 survey of the species in the Merri Creek Corridor (Heard et al. 2004), eight monitored breeding sites of the Growling Grass Frog were found to be inhabited by moderate to high numbers of frog metamorphlings, even though these sites contained Mosquito Fish. There is evidence to show that the impact of Mosquito Fish predation is magnified when it is combined with other threatening processes such as habitat degradation and salinity (Morgan and Buttemer 1996). According to Gillespie & Hero (1999), a rigorous assessment of the impacts of fish other than Gambusia on the Growling Grass Frog is required.Drought Long periods of drought may act in combination with other threats to cause declines of the Growling Grass Frog population. In the Southern Tablelands, NSW, the decline of the species coincided with a series of severe droughts between 1978 and 1980 (Osborne et al. 1996). This is thought to be due to the fact that the species has a very narrow window of opportunity for breeding and any stochastic event (i.e. drought) that prevents animals from breeding for more than a year is likely to have profound detrimental effects on the population (Mann et al. 2010).Chemical pollutions of water bodies Herbicides, insecticides or other such chemical substances that may be introduced inadvertently or intentionally into the species\' habitat may be lethal to frogs and tadpoles (Ehmann and White 1997; Robertson et al. 1994).Biocides Because this species has a semi-aquatic lifestyle and semi-permeable epidermis that is used for gas exchange with the environment, amphibians are particularly susceptible to toxins. Toxic compounds in various biocides have been demonstrated to cause death, morbidity and/or abnormalities in many frog species (Mann and Bidwell 1999; Tyler 1989).Salinisation Salinisation of key water bodies, including billabongs along the Murray River, is a potential threat to the Growling Grass Frog. Research has shown that the Green and Golden Bell Frog ( L. aurea ) tadpoles are unable to survive in salinity levels higher than 8-9 parts per thousand (seawater is 35 ppt) (Christy and Dickman 2002; G. Pyke undated, pers. comm. cited in NSW DEC 2005a).Road kills Growling Grass Frogs frequently cross roads, particularly in rice growing areas where rice bays and supply channels are adjacent to roads and major highways, therefore road kills of this species may have a significant impact on the Growling Grass Frog population (NSW DEC 2005a).Ultraviolet-B radiation Ambient ultraviolet-B (UV-B) radiation, levels of which have increased due to anthropogenic depletion of the ozone layer (Kerr and McElroy 1993), are known to have an adverse impact on amphibians (Blaustein et al. 1994; 1995; 1997). As Growling Grass Frogs are frequently active during the day, exposure to harmful levels of UV-B radiation has been postulated as a potential cause of decline (Tyler 1997). The deleterious effects of UV-B radiation on the larvae of a congeneric taxon have been demonstrated (Broomhall et al. 2000), although the affected subspecies (L. verreauxii alpina) occurs at high altitude where the effects of UV-B radiation may be more pronounced (Clemann and Gillespie 2004).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1828'),('183','Chalinolobus dwyeri','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Vespertilionidae','The Large-eared Pied Bat is a medium-sized insectivorous bat measuring a total length of approximately 100 mm and weighing 7–12 grams. It has shiny, black fur on the body with a white stripe on the ventral side of the torso where it adjoins the wings and tail. The ears are large, and lobes of skin adorn the lower lip and between the corner of the mouth and the bottom of the ear (Hoye & Dwyer 1995; Ryan 1966). Its relatively short, broad wings suggest it flies slowly and with considerable maneuverability (Hoye 2005).','Roosting habitatSandstone cliffs and fertile woodland valley habitat within close proximity of each other is habitat of importance to the Large-eared Pied Bat (NSW DECC 2007d). Records from south-east Queensland suggest that rainforest and moist eucalypt forest habitats on other geological substrates (rhyolite, trachyte and basalt) at high elevation are of similar importance to the species (Gynther 2011 pers. comm. cited in Hoye 2005; Mathieson 2011 pers. comm. cited in Hoye 2005).Available roosts are not evenly distributed throughout the landscape. The species requires a combination of sandstone cliff/escarpment to provide roosting habitat that is adjacent to higher fertility sites, particularly box gum woodlands or river/rainforest corridors which are used for foraging (Pennay 2010 pers. comm. cited in TSSC 2012ad). Almost all records have been found within several kilometres of cliff lines or rocky terrain (Hoye 2005). Roosting has also been observed in disused mine shafts, caves, overhangs and disused Fairy Martin ( Hirundo ariel ) nests (Hoye & Dwyer 1995; Schulz 1998). It also possibly roosts in the hollows of trees (Duncan et al. 1999).The structure of primary nursery roosts appears to be very specific, i.e. arch caves with dome roofs (that need to be deep enough to allow juvenile bats to learn to fly safely inside) and with indentations in the roof (presumably to allow the capture of heat). These physical characteristics are not very common in the landscape and therefore a limiting factor. Retaining connectivity between remNAt vegetation is likely to be important (NSW DECC 2007d; Pennay 2008; Pennay 2010 pers. comm. cited in TSSC 2012ad).Landscape asso ciationsThe majority of records are from canopied habitat, suggesting a sensitivity to clearing, although narrow connecting riparian strips in otherwise cleared habitat are sometimes quite heavily used (NSW DECC 2007d).In NSW this species has been recorded from a large range of vegetation types including: dry and wet sclerophyll forest; Cyprus Pine ( Callitris glauca ) dominated forest; tall open eucalypt forest with a rainforest sub-canopy; sub-alpine woodland; and sandstone outcrop country. In south-east Queensland the species has primarily been recorded from higher altitude moist tall open forest adjacent to rainforest (Duncan et al. 1999).Dwyer (1966) originally recorded breeding Large-eared Pied Bats in a disused mine at Copeton, NSW. However, this mine has since been flooded by Copeton Dam (Hoye & Dwyer 1995). Lactating and pregNAt females have been captured adjacent to sandstone escarpments near Ulan, NSW (Fly By Night 2004) and adjacent to rhyolite cliffs near Lismore (Parnaby 1984). Breeding females have also recently been recorded in sandstone caves near Coonabarabran, NSW (Pennay 2008).During fire and periods of extreme rainfall, Large-eared Pied Bats are likely to shelter within their roosts in caves, sandstone overhangs, tunnels and culverts (Hoye 2006 pers. comm.).Habitat modellingHabitat modelling based on surveys in the southern Sydney region (NSW DECC 2007d) suggest that the Large-eared Pied Bat is largely restricted to the interface of sandstone escarpment (for roost habitat) and relatively fertile valleys (for foraging habitat) (Pennay 2008). Survey work in the Brigalow Belt South region of NSW supports this modelling (Pennay 2008).Some populations of the Large-eared Pied Bat would rely in part on the following threatened ecological communities:Cumberland Plain Shale Woodlands and Shale-Gravel Transition ForestBrigalow ( Acacia harpophylla  domiNAt and co-domiNAt)White Box-Yellow Box-Blakely\'s Red Gum Grassy Woodland and Derived Native GrasslandWeeping Myall - Coobah - Scrub Wilga Shrubland of the Hunter ValleyTemperate Highland Peat Swamps on SandstoneGrey Box ( Eucalyptus microcarpa ) Grassy Woodlands and Derived Native Grasslands of South-eastern AustraliaNew England Peppermint ( Eucalyptus nova-anglica ) Grassy Woodlands.','The diet and foraging behaviour of the Large-eared Pied Bat has not been well studied. The relatively short broad wings of this bat suggest that it is maneuverable and forages below the canopy (Hoye 2005). Hoye (2006 pers. comm.) notes that the species forages for insects at night around roost sites for a distance of up to several kilometres. However, it is not known if it targets particular groups of insects, such as moths (Hoye 2005).','Known threatsThe only confirmed threat the Large-eared Pied Bat is disturbance and damage to primary nursery sites (Duncan et al. 1999) by animals (particularly Goats ( Capra hircus )) and humans (Pennay 2010 pers. comm. cited in TSSC 2012ad). The first known primary nursery site was destroyed by the flooding of Copeton Dam in 1976 (Hoye 2005). One of the other three known primary nursery sites being monitored was abandoned after disturbance by macropods (TSSC 2012ad). Many suitable roost caves in the Pilliga have been used by Goats and/or other animals and these are not used by the bats (Pennay 2010 pers. comm. cited in TSSC 2012ad).Clearing or timber harvesting in or around roosts has the potential to affect foraging resources and fragment surrounding vegetation. This is likely to be particularly detrimental in the vicinity of maternity roosts where pregNAt and lactating females sufficient food resources to raise young. Also, clearing could alter microclimate, including solar radiation and groundwater levels (Hoye 2005).One of the two currently known breeding sites is a disused mine in Barraba, NSW (Hoye 2005). These sites may be important, particularly where caves are uncommon or not suitable for roosting. However, disused mines often become active if commodity prices make them economical or they can be filled for safety reasons (Hoye 2005).Portions of the range of the Large-eared Pied Bat occur in conjunction with mine leases for underground coal in both NSW and Queensland. Alteration of habitat following subsidence due to longwall mining has been listed as a key threatening process in NSW. Much of the habitat of the Large-eared Pied Bat occurs in sandstone that is underlain by coal seams and are potentially at risk of collapse from underground mining (Hoye 2005).Potential threatsPotential threats to the species include loss of foraging habitat; predation by Foxes ( Vulpes vulpes ) and other predators; habitat destruction for agriculture and urban development; severe drought; and impacts of forestry operations (Duncan et al. 1999; Dwyer 1964; Hoye 2006 pers. comm.; Pennay 2008; Pennay 2010 pers. comm. cited in TSSC 2012ad).Genetic bottlenecks and inbreeding depressionColonies of the Large-eared Pied Bat may be at a greater risk of extinction from random events when the colonies become small through the loss of genetic variability, enabling factors such as genetic bottlenecks and inbreeding depression to affect the population (Hoye 2005).At present nothing is known about the genetic similarities between populations of Large-eared Pied Bats. Movement of this species between areas has not been noted and its dispersal ability and habits are not known. It has relatively short broad wings that suggest it forages below the canopy (Hoye & Dwyer 1995). This would also suggest that its dispersal ability is significantly less than another better studied cave roosting species, the Eastern Bent-wing Bat ( Miniopterus schreibersii oceanensis ). Significant clearing of vegetation in the range of the Large-eared Pied Bat since European settlement is likely to have further decreased the ability of individuals to move between areas of suitable habitat.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=183'),('1841','Litoria lorica','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Hylidae','The Armoured Mistfrog is a medium sized frog. Males grow to 29.6 - 33.1 mm and females grow to 32.9 - 37.3 mm (Davies & McDonald 1979). The species is a uniform grey or grey-brown frog with white ventral surfaces peppered with dark brown on the throat (Cogger 2000). The skin is finely tubercular dorsally, prominently so on the upper eyelids and in the tympanic region. The lower surfaces are granular on the thorax, abdomen and backs of the thighs, but smooth elsewhere. The finger and toe discs are well developed. The fingers have basal webbing and the toes are fully webbed. The hands have an enlarged prepollex. Males have black spiny nuptial pads and accessory spines on the chest. The head is evenly rounded, with a truncate snout and terminal nostrils. The tympanum is small and indistinct. The vocal sac is absent (Davies and McDonald 1979).','The Armoured Mistfrog is a rainforest species endemic to the Wet Tropics Bioregion (Williams & Hero 1998, 2001). A stream dwelling/stream breeding species (Hero & Fickling 1994), it prefers fast flowing streams in upland rainforest between 640 and 1000 m altitude (McDonald 1992), although it may have been present at lower altitudes (Cunningham 2001, pers. comm.). It has usually been found on granite boulders in  notophyll  vine forest in the splash zone near turbulent fast flowing water (Davies & McDonald 1979).The only known population of the species occurs in a high elevation dry sclerophyll forest (Puschendorf et al. 2011).','NA','The reason(s) for the decline of the Armoured Mistfrog are unknown. The habitat of the species in the Wet Tropics has been protected since 1988, therefore habitat destruction is no longer a threat (McDonald & Alford 1999). There has been repeated speculation that UV-B light has caused declines, but there is no evidence to support this and it is now considered unlikely as a hypothesis (NQTFRT 2001). Current research is examining the possibility that disease, such as chytridiomycosis caused by the chytrid fungus or a viral infection, may have contributed to the decline of this species (Berger et al. 1999), and there is considerable circumstantial evidence to support this hypothesis (NQTFRT 2001). However, in 2008, a healthy population of the Armoured Mistrog was located in Far North Queensland, co-existing with a population of the Waterfall Frog, another species that is thought to have declined due to the fungus. All frogs of both species are in good health, although most individuals are infected wwith the chytrid fungus (JCU 2008). The persisting population may perch on sun-warmed rocks, possibly keep infections below threatening thresholds (Daskin et al. 2011).Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (AGDEH 2006o).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1841'),('1844','Litoria booroolongensis','Endangered','Amphibia','Hylidae','The Booroolong Frog is a medium sized tree frog. Adults grow to about 40 mm (males) to 55 mm (females). Their body colour may be dull grey, olive or reddish brown, and may be uniform or consist of indistinct black markings and salmon-coloured flecks. The abdomen is white. The backs of the thighs are dark brown, with a few small pale spots. The dorsum usually has a slightly warty appearance, while the ventral surface is pale and finely granular. The throat is smooth and white in females and dark in males. A faint, thin, black strip begins at the snout and passes through the eye, curving slightly over the small tympanum to the shoulder. The back of the thighs may be dark brown or covered in a yellow and black reticulated pattern. The fingers and toes have well developed discs, but of moderate size, and the toes are strongly, nearly fully webbed while the fingers are web-free. Webbing extends to the base of all discs except the second toe. The vomerine teeth (on roof of mouth) extend from between to behind the choanae (opening in roof of skull forming one end of nasal passage), and there are also small maxillary teeth (Barker et al. 1995; Moore 1961).','The Booroolong Frog occurs along permanent streams with some fringing vegetation cover such as ferns, sedges or grasses (Anstis 2002; Robinson 1993). Adults occur on or near cobble banks and other rock structures within stream margins, or near slow-flowing connected or isolated pools that contain suitable rock habitats (NSW OEH 2011b). Streams range from small slow-flowing creeks to large rivers (The Victorian Frog Group 1999) in dissected mountainous country, tablelands, foothills and lowland plains (Anstis et al. 1998; Gillespie 1999). The species is associated with the following vegetation associations (NSW DECC 2005ap):wet sclerophyll forests (shrubby and grassy sub-formation)dry sclerophyll forest (shrub/grass and shrubby sub-formation)grassy woodlandheathlandforested wetlandfreshwater wetlandrainforestcleared grazing land and pasture.Primary habitat requirements for the Booroolong Frog are extensive rock bank structures along permanent rivers (Gillespie 1999; Hunter & Smith 2006). Individuals have also been observed using artificial man made structure, such as weirs (Spark pers. comm. cited in NSW OEH 2011b). The key feature of these rock structures are rock crevices in relatively shallow, slow to medium flowing sections of stream (Hunter & Smith 2006). Failure to locate the Booroolong Frog along ephemeral streams, and the decline of the species from streams that dried during recent severe droughts demonstrates the reliance of this species on permanent water (Hunter & Smith 2006; Hunter 2013a).','Anuran frogs, such as the Booroolong Frog, are generalist predators of arthropods (Duellman & Trueb 1994 cited in Hunter 2013a). Booroolong Frog Tadpoles are generalist benthic grazers and probably feed on algae and other organic detritis (Inger 1986 cited in Hunter 2013a).','DryingWeeds and sedimentationMurrayJingelic CreekJingelic Creek7.50XXXCoppabella Creek130XXXLankeys Creek9.50XXXHorse CreekHorse Creek0.10XXManus CreekManus Creek19.580XXSappling Yards Creek5.590XXMcCabe CreekMcCabe Creek0.10XXXMaragle CreekMaragle Creek150XXXMaragle Back Creek40XXTooma RiverTooma River6.5100Burrowye Creek (Victorian population)Burrowye Creek/Guy Forest Creek200XXXKoetong Creek (Victorian population)Koetong CreekunknownunknownXXMurrumbidgeeGoobragandra RiverGoobragandra River4050XSandy Waterfall Creek50Stony Creek0.50XPeak River1080Mountain CreekMountain Creek4.50XXMacpherson Swamp CreekMacpherson Swamp Creek450XXBrungle CreekBrungle Creek15.50XXBombowlee CreekBombowlee Creek80XXGilmore CreekGilmore Creek230XXXAdelong CreekAdelong Creek180XXYaven Yaven CreekYaven Yaven Creek3020XXUmbango CreekUmbango Creek120XXCarabost Creek150XXJounama CreekJounama Creek7100Yarrangobilly RiverYarrangobilly River10.5100LachlanAbercrombie RiverAbercrombie River> 2020XXXGove Creek4.340XCopperhannia Creekunknown0XRetreat River1890XXSilent Creek1080XCooksvale Creekunknown0XXBurra Burra Creekunknown0XXTuena Creek> 580XCentral WestSewells CreekCampbell River2.50XChain of Ponds Creek30XXNative Dog Creek3.50XXCaptain Kings Creek70XXWisemans Creek20XXSewells Creek200XXUpper Fish RiverFish River1.50XXDuckmaloi River> 10XXLower Fish RiverFish River20XXTuron RiverCoolamigal Creek3.5100XXTuron River4030XXRound Swamp Creek> 20XXNamoiCockburn RiverCockburn River310XMulla Mulla Creek> 100Swamp Oak Creek210Oakey Creek or Jamiesons Creek40XPeel RiverSwamp Creek or Burrow Creek0.10Peel River180XWombramurra Creek> 71XHunterIsis RiverIsis River> 10XManningBarnard RiverBarnard River> 1100XHabitatTopThe Booroolong Frog occurs along permanent streams with some fringing vegetation cover such as ferns, sedges or grasses (Anstis 2002; Robinson 1993). Adults occur on or near cobble banks and other rock structures within stream margins, or near slow-flowing connected or isolated pools that contain suitable rock habitats (NSW OEH 2011b). Streams range from small slow-flowing creeks to large rivers (The Victorian Frog Group 1999) in dissected mountainous country, tablelands, foothills and lowland plains (Anstis et al. 1998; Gillespie 1999). The species is associated with the following vegetation associations (NSW DECC 2005ap):wet sclerophyll forests (shrubby and grassy sub-formation)dry sclerophyll forest (shrub/grass and shrubby sub-formation)grassy woodlandheathlandforested wetlandfreshwater wetlandrainforestcleared grazing land and pasture.Primary habitat requirements for the Booroolong Frog are extensive rock bank structures along permanent rivers (Gillespie 1999; Hunter & Smith 2006). Individuals have also been observed using artificial man made structure, such as weirs (Spark pers. comm. cited in NSW OEH 2011b). The key feature of these rock structures are rock crevices in relatively shallow, slow to medium flowing sections of stream (Hunter & Smith 2006). Failure to locate the Booroolong Frog along ephemeral streams, and the decline of the species from streams that dried during recent severe droughts demonstrates the reliance of this species on permanent water (Hunter & Smith 2006; Hunter 2013a).Life CycleTopThreatsTopStream drying (drought and climate change)The Booroolong Frog\'s short life means that failed recruitment over one or two years can cause localised extinction (NSW OEH 2011b). Agriculture has severely modified streams, eradicating refugia and limiting the Booroolong Frog\'s resilience to drought. Localised extinctions were caused by drought in the 1980s and the 2000s when many previously permanent streams dried in the southern and central tablelands of NSW and Victoria (Vic. DSE 2001; NSW OEH 2011b). Extreme drought is predicted to be more severe and prolonged with climate change (CSIRO 2007) and, as a result, localised extinction events may become more severe (NSW OEH 2011b).DiseaseThe timing and rapid nature of the Booroolong Frogs\' decline from the New England Tablelands, which coincided with the disappearance of several other frog species in this region (Berger et al. 1998; Mahony 1999), is likely to be due to an outbreak of Chytridiomycosis (NSW OEH 2011b). Declines have been recorded from higher altitude sites, where the habitat remains intact (TSSC 2007k; Hunter & Gillespie 1999), compared to persistence at lower altitudes, which is consistent with other Chytridiomycosis induced declines (Berger et al. 1998; Lips 1999). Sick and dead infected Booroolong Frogs have been observed in the wild on several occasions, and healthy frogs have tested positive for infection (NSW OEH 2011b; Spark 2009). Chytridiomycosis is unlikely to be the cause of declines at lower altitudes (Hunter 2013a).Habitat degradationDegradation of Boorolong Frog habitat is caused by land clearance, overgrazing, timber harvesting, use of heavy machinery in the riparian zone and soil ripping to establish crops adjacent to occupied streams, or in the headwaters of catchments in which the species has been recorded (Gillespie 1999, 2000; NSW OEH 2011b). These activities increase erosion and sediment loads, smother and entrain rock crevices by sediments and weeds, and reduce the quality and extent of breeding habitat for the species (Hunter 2007; Hunter & Smith 2006). The colonisation of the riparian zone by environmental weeds (particularly willows ( Salix  spp.) and the Blackberry ( Rubus fruticosus )) also significantly reduces the extent of suitable habitat for the Booroolong Frog (Hunter & Smith 2006). Willows disrupt the life-cycle of the Booroolong Frog as their surface roots fill all rock crevices required by this species for oviposition.In the southern part of its range the Booroolong Frog persists in areas that have been cleared for pasture (Gillespie 1999), however these populations are typically small and highly fragmented (Hunter 2003). The species\' habitat is continuing to be modified, primarily through cattle grazing and weed invasion, in a manner that is likely to continue to contribute to the decline of this species (Gillespie 1999; Hunter & Smith 2006; Smith & Hunter 2008).Changes in hydrologyThe modification of hydrological regimes as a result of irrigation and hydro-electric power generation has an adverse affect on the Booroolong Frog. Specific changes to the aquatic environment that adversely impact the species include (Bevitt et al. 1998; Doeg 1987; Erskine 1996; Ligon et al. 1995; Clemann 2003a):Significant rises in water level and velocity during the breeding period that may flush eggs and larvae downstream.Reduced temperatures of sub-surface releases of water from dams during the summer months that are likely to inhibit larval growth and development of obligate stream breeders.Reduced temperatures that may favour trout, a predator of the species.Sub-surface waters that may be anoxic (lacking/low in oxygen), have different pH and higher concentrations of activated heavy metals, which in turn may be detrimental to eggs, embryos and tadpoles.Reduced peak flows resulting from dams that may allow build-up of sediments and colonisation of stream channels by vegetation.PredatorsNearly all streams currently occupied by the Booroolong Frog are also inhabited by a range of exotic fish species including Brown Trout ( Salmo trutta ), Rainbow Trout ( Oncorhynchus mykiss ), European Carp ( Cyprinus carpio ), Goldfish ( Carassius auratus ), Redfin Perch ( Perca fluviatilis ) and Mosquito Fish ( Gambusia holbrooki ) (Gillespie 1999, 2000; Hunter & Gillespie 1999). Recent experimental work has demonstrated that these fish all have the potential to prey on the tadpoles and eggs of the Booroolong Frog (Hunter 2003; Hunter et al. 2011). The impact of fish on the Booroolong Frog\'s historic decline is unknown, but may be greatest in habitat that is degraded (Hunter 2013a).Herbicide useHerbicides have the potential to impact amphibians through a range of processes, including acute toxicity and endocrine disruption (Bidwell & Gorrie 1995; Hayes et al. 2002). There have been no observations of herbicides impacting the Booroolong Frog despite extensive application in the vicinity of breeding populations (Hunter 2013a).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1844'),('1848','Litoria castanea','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Hylidae','The Yellow-spotted Bell Frog grows to 80 mm with large yellow or cream spots in the groin area and pale yellow spots and/or marbling on the lower hindlimbs.  This species has completely webbed toes (Cogger 2000).','The Yellow-spotted Bell Frog occupies similar habitat to  Litoria aurea  and  L. raniformis  which includes permanent ponds, swamps, lagoons, farm dams and the still backwaters of rivers usually with tall reeds present (Courtice & Grigg 1975; White & Ehmann 1997a, b). The species was also found in ponds or slow moving streams with overhanging grassy banks in the absence of reed beds. The Yellow-spotted Bell Frog was found to overwinter in the hollow centres of rotting logs and in the earth surrounding the roots of uprooted trees (Courtice & Grigg 1975).','NA','The cause(s) of the apparent declines observed in populations of all taxa within the  L. aurea  complex (including the Yellow-spotted Bell Frog) are unclear (Gillespie et al. 1995). Investigations of disappearances among the group have primarily focused on  L. aurea  and the Yellow-spotted Bell Frog and two major directions in research have been pursued: the role of increased ultraviolet radiation; and the impact of the introduced fish,  Gambusia  (Mahony 1999). It is also possible that disease, such as chytridiomycosis caused by the chytrid fungus or a viral infection, may have contributed to the decline of the Yellow-spotted Bell Frog (Osborne 2001 pers. comm.).Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (DEH 2006).Van de Mortel and Buttermer (1996) conducted experiments to assess the effect of increased ultraviolet radiation on the hatching success of  L. aurea  eggs. Hatchling success was higher under a UV-B blocking treatment than an unfiltered treatment in a repeat experiment involving one spawn, but there was no difference in the preliminary experiments involving three spawns. These results lack a coherent trend and are in several ways preliminary (Mahony 1999). Further research is needed to further examine the role of ultraviolet radiation in declines in the  L. aurea  complex.A number of studies reviewed by Mahony (1999) are consistent with the hypothesis that  Gambusia  contributes to the decline of frog populations. Studies have shown that  Gambusia  will attack and eat tadpoles including those of the  L. aurea  complex (Morgan & Buttermer 1996; Webb & Joss 1997). However the importance of  Gambusia  as a predator relative to other factors in causing the decline of bell frogs remains unclear (Gillespie & Hero 1999; Mahony 1999). There is a great deal that remains to be understood about the impact of  Gambusia . For example, at least for  L. aurea  and  L. raniformis , there are sites where the frog has disappeared but where the fish is absent, and there are sites where the frog can be found but the fish are present (Mahony 1999; Osborne 2001 pers. comm.). However, very high densities of fish, along with waterbody characteristics such as high ephemerality and steep pond banks, may contribute to poor breeding at some sites (Goldingay & Lewis 1999). The dates of introduction of  Gambusia  to many regions are not well documented and this lack of information has hampered research into declines (Mahony 1999).A rigorous assessment of the impacts of fish, other than  Gambusia , on the Yellow-spotted Bell Frog is lacking (Gillespie & Hero 1999).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1848'),('185','Pteropus conspicillatus','Endangered','Mammalia','Pteropodidae','The Spectacled Flying-fox has distinctive straw-coloured fur which surrounds the eyes. The species can also have varying amounts of the same pale fur on the shoulders and the head. Eye-rings of some individuals can be indistinct, making them look similar to Black Flying-foxes ( Pteropus alecto ) (Hall & Richards 2000). The head and body ranges between 220-240 mm in length. Forearm length and weight range is 160-180 mm and 580-850 g for males, and 155-175 mm and 500-650 g for females (Richards & Spencer 1998).','Roosting habitatOne study showed that the Spectacled Flying-fox roosts within 6.5 km of rainforest (Richards 1990), although a roost 16 km from rainforest has also been observed (Shilton et al. 2008).Foraging habitatThe species was long assumed assumed to feed primarily on rainforest species (Richards 1990) but individuals regularly feed on a wide variety of non-rainforest species, including eucalypts ( Eucalyptus  spp.,  Corymbia  spp.) in tall open forests adjoining rainforest communities and in tropical woodland and savanna ecosystems (Parsons et al. 2006). The  Mabi Forest (Complex Notophyll Vine Forest 5b)  is considered a key habitat for the Spectacled Flying-fox (WWF 2003).The foraging range of the species is less well understood and further research will provide a better understanding of the foraging distribution of this bat. Telemetry and resource use results from the Wet Tropics indicate that foraging individuals range widely across the Wet Tropics bioregion and extensively into drier forests, including those to the west of the Wet Tropics RegionThe Spectacled Flying-fox has been demonstrated to have the greatest tolerance to ranges of ambient temperature of any mammal. Air temperatures from freezing to up to 40 °C cause almost no change in the species\' metabolic rate. Their ability to use their wings to control heat loss is a major factor in this ability (Richards & Spencer 1998).','The Spectacled Flying-fox feeds on fruits and blossom, primarily in the canopy vegetation of a wide range of vegetation communities, including closed forest, gallery forest, eucalypt open forest and woodland,  Melaleuca  thickets, coastal swamps, mangroves, vegetation in urban settings, and commercial fruit crops. These foraging activities result in dispersal of pollen and seeds, thereby contributing to the reproductive and evolutionary processes of species and ecological communities (Qld DERM 2010).','Habitat loss Tick paralysis Ixodes holocyclus Stepera graculina The epidemic in tick paralysis coincides with a switch in diet by the Spectacled Flying-fox to Wild Tobacco ( Solanum mauritianum ) (Eggert 1994; Spencer et al. 1992) however the relationship between Wild Tobacco, paralysis ticks and flying-foxes is unclear. Wild Tobacco, often standing six feet tall, provides an ideal height for paralysis ticks to climb and wait for their next host. Spencer (cited in Van Tassel 1995) has suggested that as a flying-fox forages, ticks attach themselves to the bat, which then returns to the colony (Van Tassel 1995). Disturbance of campsDisturbance of maternity camps during the breeding season is thought to result in the death of dependent juveniles. Camps at Admiralty Island, Barron River, Edmonton, BaNAa Island and Paronella Park appear to have been abandoned altogether as a result of shooting (Garnett et al. 1999). CompetitionCompetition from the Black Flying-fox ( P. alecto ) for nectar, particularly in woodland trees, may by occurring in the southern part of the range of the Spectacled Flying-fox. The Little Red Flying-fox sometimes displaces it from camps at Whiteing Road, Tolga, Cairns Central Swamp and Daintree (Ratcliffe 1931; Richards 1980, pers. obs. cited in Garnett et al. 1999; Spencer 1992, pers. obs. cited in Garnett et al. 1999). Environmental stressHeat-related deaths in Australian Flying-foxes have been documented repeatedly since European settlement. For example, a heatwave in 2004, where the ambient temperature exceeded 45 °C, resulted in the death of 5000–7000 Grey-headed Flying-foxes, most of which were less than four months of age (94.3%) (Eby et al. 2004). Smoke from bushfires seems to disorient flying-foxes causing them to fly aimlessly around their camp. Many flying-foxes are killed when a bushfire goes through their camp site, but it is not known if deaths occur from smoke inhalation or directly from the heat of the fire (Hall & Richards 2000). High mortality may also occur when weather conditions are wet, windy and cold at the end of winter. During this period there is a lack of natural food and the available nectar is greatly diluted by rain and flying-foxes seem to be too weak to fly to areas where more food is available (Hall & Richards 2000). CyclonesCyclones occur most years within the range of the Spectacled Flying-fox and can strip fruit from trees over substantial areas. Cyclones can be particularly devastating for island populations because such a large percentage of available habitat can be affected (Pierson et al. 1996). However, observations in the Innisfail area after Cyclone Winifred crossed the coast in 1986 suggest that flying-foxes are able to both weather the storm and find food afterwards (Richards 1990), possibly by foraging beyond the impact zone (Trenarry undated, pers. comm. cited in Garnett et al. 1999). Cyclone Larry, which passed through far north Queensland in the Atherton region in March 2006, saw a mass exodus of Spectacled Flying-foxes from the area (CSIRO 2006a) and also caused extensive damage in the  Mabi Forest (Complex Notophyll Vine Forest 5b)  that is considered a key habitat for the Spectacled Flying-fox. Man-made obstaclesElectrocution on powerlines, collisions with barbed wire, and traffic deaths are all recorded causes of mortality. When a bat is electrocuted on a power line, it short-circuits electricity wires but usually does not disturb supply so the electrical authority has no record of the bats death. As a higher proportion of flying-foxes become resident in urban areas, the significance of deaths from this cause is increasing (Garnett et al. 1999). Human activitiesThere has been conflict between flying-foxes and fruit growers since European settlement in Australia (Tidemann et al. 1997). In the past, the two most common methods of controlling Spectacled Flying-foxes at fruit orchards have been shooting and electrocution (McHold & Spencer 1998). Unlike ground-dwelling mammals whose populations are isolated and restricted by geographical barriers, flying-foxes have the potential to travel large distances in search of food (Pierson & Rainey 1992). This means that animals feeding at a given orchard cannot be regarded as a separate population. While there are benefits in the movement of animals between populations (e.g., a decline in one geographic area may be offset by immigration from others), there is the danger that culling in a certain area can become a perpetual vacuum that continually draws animals from far afield. Such vacuums are capable of sustaining artificially high mortality rates that would otherwise drive a local colony to extinction. A high cull rate by one orchard, in the absence of any large colonies that could sustain a high rate of mortality (for example, > 200 000 animals) would suggest that this may be happening. Therefore, excessive culling at one orchard may have the potential to exterminate a very large proportion of the estimated number of Spectacled Flying-foxes remaining in the Wet Tropics area (McIlwee & Martin 2002). The use of electric grids to kill flying-foxes as a way of preventing them from damaging fruit crops has been prohibited in Queensland since 2001. However, grids are not required to be dismantled, and illegal electrocution of Spectacled Flying-foxes continues (Booth 2006). Inappropriate netting practicesThin, loose nylon (monofilament) netting can cause a flying-fox to become entangled. Once entangled, flying-foxes become stressed and can break bones and tear wing membranes as they attempt to get free. The monofilament line can cut into the animal causing deep wounds and possibly stopping circulation. These injuries can lead to shock and death, particularly if the individual is trapped in the net for a long period of time. Entangled flying-foxes may be mothers nursing young that are waiting at a nursery roost. These young will starve if the parent cannot return to the roost within a day (Queensland EPA 2005). Cleft palate syndromeCleft palate syndrome involves a large midline defect that extends to the throat, missing or rudimentary thumb and toe claws, general low muscle tone and a whiskery face. The young present their mothers with difficulties in feeding as well as hanging on. Most are abandoned shortly after birth and still have the cord attached and sometimes also the placenta (TBRRI 2006).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=185'),('186','Pteropus poliocephalus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Pteropodidae','The Grey-headed Flying-Fox is one of the largest bats in the world with a weight of 600–1000 g and a head-body length of 230–289 mm (Eby & Lunney 2002; Tidemann 1998). It is the only Australian flying-fox that has a collar of orange/brown fully encircling its neck (Hall 1987). Thick leg fur extends to the ankle, in contrast to other  Pteropus  species in which it only reaches the knee (Hall 1987; Tidemann 1998). As its name implies, the head is covered by light grey fur (Hall 1987). The belly fur is grey, often with flecks of white and ginger. The fur on the back shows two morphs which could be related to age, moult or sub-population (Hall & Richards 2000). One morph has dark grey fur and the other has a pronounced silver or frosted appearance (Luckoff undated pers. comm. cited in Hall 1987). Winter fur is darker than summer fur with a pronounced moult occurring in June (Luckoff undated pers. comm. cited in Hall 1987).','The Grey-headed Flying-fox requires foraging resources and roosting sites. It is a canopy-feeding frugivore and nectarivore, which utilises vegetation communities including rainforests, open forests, closed and open woodlands,  Melaleuca  swamps and  Banksia  woodlands. It also feeds on commercial fruit crops and on introduced tree species in urban areas. The primary food source is blossom from  Eucalyptus  and related genera but in some areas it also utilises a wide range of rainforest fruits (Eby 1998). None of the vegetation communities used by the Grey-headed Flying-fox produce continuous foraging resources throughout the year. As a result, the species has adopted complex migration traits in response to ephemeral and patchy food resources (Duncan et al. 1999; Eby 1996, 1998; Nelson 1965a; Parry-Jones & Augee 1992; Spencer et al. 1991).The Grey-headed Flying-fox roosts in aggregations of various sizes on exposed branches. Roost sites are typically located near water, such as lakes, rivers or the coast (van der Ree et al. 2005). Roost vegetation includes rainforest patches, stands of  Melaleuca , mangroves and riparian vegetation (Nelson 1965a; Ratcliffe 1931), but colonies also use highly modified vegetation in urban and suburban areas (Birt et al. 1998; Tidemann & Vardon 1997; van der Ree et al. 2005). The species can maintain fidelity to roost sites for extended periods (Lunney & Moon 1997), although new sites have been colonised (Tidemann & Vardon 1997).','The Grey-headed Flying-Fox has a diverse native diet, which it supplements with introduced plants (Eby 1995, 1998; Hall & Richards 2000; Parry-Jones & Augee 1991). Nectar and pollen from the flowers of eucalypts (genera  Eucalyptus ,  Corymbia  and  Angophora ), melaleucas and banksias are the primary food for the species (Duncan et al. 1999). Most eucalypts have regular seasonal flowering schedules but do not flower every year, and there are a few areas within the range of the Grey-headed Flying-fox where nectar is available continuously (House 1997; Law et al. 2000; Wilson & Bennett 1999). The species has no adaptations for withstanding food shortages, and migrates in response to changes in the amount and location of flowering (Eby 1991; Eby & Lunney 2002; Spencer et al. 1991).Like other species of Australian flying-fox, the Grey-headed Flying-fox will take cultivated fruits (Hall & Richards 2000). Flying-foxes cause crop losses by puncturing fruit with their teeth and claws, soiling fruit from the orchard and damaging trees by breaking limbs, particularly new growth carrying next season\'s fruiting buds (Ullio 2002). The Grey-headed Flying-fox is capable of causing direct losses to horticulturalists in NSW and is the main species responsible for crop losses in this State (Ullio 2002).Studies of other Pteropididae in Africa have shown that significant events such as mating (Wolten et al. 1982), lactation (Thomas & Marshall 1984) and migration (Thomas 1983) coincide with a predictable abundance of native fruit (Parry-Jones & Augee 1991).','Biological factorsBased on the longevity of captive animals (up to 23 years), their strict breeding season and single birth per year, McIlwee and Martin (2002) suggest that Australian flying-foxes have evolved in conditions where individuals experience low levels of natural mortality and long survival times in the wild, probably upwards of 15 years. However, since European settlement, flying-fox mortality has increased due to habitat destruction and culling (McIlwee & Martin 2002).Habitat loss and fragmentationPost-European settlement, clearing of native vegetation for agriculture and forestry operations has accelerated and has been particularly widespread over the range of the Grey-headed Flying-fox in eastern Australia (State of the Environment Advisory Council 1996). The loss of native habitat is assumed to have resulted in the destruction or disturbance of roosting and foraging habitats of the species.The complexity of habitat requirements of the Grey-headed Flying-fox, particularly for multiple, geographically dispersed populations of food trees, militates against its conservation within a system of forest reserves.  As a result, the species is vulnerable to land use decisions outside such reserves (Eby 1996; Parry-Jones 1993; Pressey 1994; Tidemann & Vardon 1997).Habitat loss has resulted in a decrease in the variety of flowering and fruiting tree species, particularly those that usually have a high nectar output (Birt 2000). Over 70% of  Melaleuca  forests have been cleared since European settlement. This tree species usually provides an important food source for flying-foxes. Also, extensive areas containing Forest Red Gum ( Eucalyptus tereticornis ) and Spotted Gum ( Corymbia maculata ) have been cleared, both of which are important wintering flower tree species (Birt 2000).Annually, reliable winter resources are limited in distribution to a narrow coastal strip in Queensland and northern NSW, and primarily occur on freehold land (Eby 1996; Pressey et al. 1996). These coastal areas, containing important winter flowering species, particularly Broad-leaved Paper Bark ( Melaleuca quinquenervia ), Spotted Gum  (Corymbia maculata ) ,  Swamp Mahogany ( Eucalyptus robusta ) and Forest Red Gum ( Eucalyptus tereticornis ), are targeted for intensive residential development (NSW Department of Planning 1995). For example, 70% of the Broad-leaved Paper Bark swamps, between Noosa Heads and Tweed Heads, has been lost to urban development (Hall unpub. cited in Duncan et al. 1999).Spring foraging resources are considered to be critical to the survival of the species. Reliable resources during late gestation, birth and early lactation are required to avoid rapid weight loss in adults and poor reproductive success (Eby 1999; Collins 2000; Parry-Jones & Augee 2001). Spring food shortages have been reported over large portions of the range in six of the past 20 years, and more frequently in some local areas (Parry-Jones & Augee 2001; Teagle 2002).Lack of foraging resources can also force Grey-headed Flying-foxes into commercial fruit crops, increasing conflict with growers and subsequent culling of individuals (Teagle 2002).The loss of roosting habitat has also been identified as a threat to Grey-headed Flying-foxes (Tidemann et al. 1999, NSW Scientific Committee 2001). Roost sites have often been exposed to the same historical patterns of foraging habitat clearance and degradation (Lunney & Moon 1997). Whilst the species\' specific roosting requirements is not fully known, the loss of habitat has forced the Grey-headed Flying-fox to set up daytime roosts in suburban areas. These areas often retain small tracts of bushland and mangroves for conservation value, and it is these sites that flying-foxes are attracted to (Birt 2000). Birt (2000) stresses that, before European settlement, flying-foxes frequented these areas and, therefore, are not necessarily \'new\' sites. The impact on the species from the loss of long-term sites, or the degradation of small remNAts to the point that they are no longer used, is also not known (Pallin 2000).Loss of habitat causes an increase in the animal\'s energy expenditure, as individuals need to fly greater distances between campsites and feeding areas as well as between individual campsites along migratory routes.  As a result, flying-foxes have had to resort to alternative food sources, such as fruit crops which carry a greater risk of death for individuals through shooting, electrocution or poison (Birt 2000).ExploitationThe Grey-headed Flying-fox can destroy commercial fruit grown in Queensland and NSW (Jamieson 1988, Slack 1990; Tidemann et al. 1997). Shooting flying-foxes has been the most common method to protect fruit crops (Teagle 2002). Permit systems in NSW and Victoria have regulated destruction activities whilst Queensland ceased permits for shooting in 2008. Presently, NSW is the only State issuing shooting licences, although this is to be phased out over three years from March 2011 (NSW OEH 2011). The number of flying-foxes shot illegally is unknown, but estimates as high as 100 000 annually have been made (Vardon & Tidemann 1995).  As a result, the impact of Grey-headed Flying-foxes from shooting, on population size and demographic structure, remains unquantified.  The impact is more substantial than direct deaths alone would indicate, for a large proportion of animals shot in orchards are pregNAt and lactating females (Parry-Jones 1993; Tidemann et al. 1997). Juveniles who remain in maternity camps and are dependent on lactating females are known to die of starvation when lactating females are killed (Nelson 1965b; Parry-Jones 1993; Ratcliffe 1931).Competition and hybridisationThere is no evidence that Black Flying-fox ( P. alecto ) and Grey-headed Flying-fox use agonistic behaviour to compete directly for resources (Eby pers. obs. cited in NSW DECCW 2010k; Markus pers. obs. cited in NSW DECCW 2010k). The two species share roosts and diet plants. However, following a substantial southerly shift by the Black Flying-fox, since it was first described, into coastal areas inhabited by the Grey-headed Flying-fox (Webb & Tidemann 1995), it has been suggested that indirect competition is favouring the Black Flying-fox. This observation is based on the increasing displacement of Grey-headed Flying-foxes in coastal areas, north from the Clarence Valley and in the tablelands of southeast Queensland (Birt 2000, Hall 2002a, Eby 2004).  Moreover, in Brisbane, the numbers of Grey-headed Flying-foxes, in comparison to Black Flying-foxes, declined markedly during the 1990s (Luckoff undated pers. comm. cited in Duncan et al. 1999).Grey-headed Flying-foxes and Black-headed Flying-foxes are closely related species that share many behavioural and ecological characterstics.  Both species are synchronous, seasonal breeders and their annual reproductive cycles are closely aligned at subtropical latitudes (Nelson 1965b, Webb and Tidemann 1995, Martin et al. 1996).  Hybrids between Grey-headed Flying-foxes and Black Flying-foxes have occurred in captivity (Luckoff pers. comm. cited in Duncan et al. 1999). Hall (1987) noted that a female Grey-headed Flying-fox mated with a male Black Flying-fox and produced a female offspring which possessed mainly the features of a Grey-headed Flying-fox, that is, fully encircling collar and hairy legs.Pollutants, electrocution and pathogensSome urban-dwelling Grey-headed Flying-foxes accumulate lethal levels of lead from the environment (Hariono et al. 1992).  Individuals are also prone to electrocution on powerlines, particularly in urban areas, and a disproportionately high number of lactating females are killed (Duncan et al. 1999). The effects of the pathogens, Australian bat Lyssavirus (ABL), Bat Paramyxovirus and MeNAgle Pig virus (Hoar et al. 1998), on the Grey-headed Flying-fox are unknown. However, the incidence of ABL in the species is very low whilst approximately 25% of wild flying-foxes carry antibodies to MeNAgle Pig virus (University of Sydney, 2000).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=186'),('1870','Litoria aurea','Vulnerable','Amphibia','Hylidae','The Green and Golden Bell Frog is a large dull olive to bright emerald-green frog reaching 85 mm in length (Cogger 2000). The frog has a number of distinguishable features which aid its identification; the dorsum (back) of the frog has large irregular blotches ranging from brown to rich golden-bronze and has a yellowish stripe running from behind the eye to the lower back which is bordered by a black stripe that can extend through the eye to the nostrils. The hind toes of the frog are almost fully webbed but the fingers of the front feet lack webbing. The frog also has a distinct tympanum (ear membrane) (Cogger 2000).','Green and Golden Bell Frogs have been found in differing habitat in NSW and Victoria. In NSW, the species commonly occupies disturbed habitats, and breeds largely in ephemeral ponds (Pyke & White 1996). However, in Victoria, the Green and Golden Bell Frog occupies habitats with little human disturbance and commonly breeds in permanent ponds, as well as ephemeral ponds (Pyke & White 1996). Goldingay (1996) argued that this is because most natural habitats are degraded or lost in NSW (Gillespie 1996).Green and Golden Bell Frogs need various habitats for different aspects of their life cycle including foraging, breeding, over-wintering and dispersal. They will also use different habitats or habitat components on a temporal or seasonal basis (DEWHA 2009ac).Habitat in NSWIn NSW, the Green and Golden Bell Frog has been found in a wide range of water bodies except fast flowing streams (Pyke & White 1996). It inhabits many disturbed sites, including abandoned mines and quarries (Pyke et al. 2002). Breeding habitat in NSW includes water bodies that are still, shallow, ephemeral, unpolluted (but the frog can be found in polluted habitats), unshaded, with aquatic plants and free of Mosquito Fish ( Gambusia holbrooki ) and other predatory fish, with terrestrial habitats that consisted of grassy areas and vegetation no higher than woodlands, and a range of diurnal shelter sites (Pyke & White 1996). Breeding occurred in a significantly higher proportion of sites with ephemeral (temporary) ponds, rather than sites with fluctuating or permanent ponds, and where predatory fish were absent. Mahony (1999) suggested that the study\'s results do not necessarily identify the requirements of the species prior to declines. The use of ephemeral breeding sites was not a feature associated with members of the bell frog group in earlier habitat descriptions (Mahony 1999).A bell frog study in 2002, on Kooragang Island in the Hunter River estuary, found that greater vegetation diversity on the banks of waterbodies was positively associated with the presence of Green and Golden Bell Frogs, and that the frogs were more likely to occur together with the plants  Juncus kraussii ,  Schoenoplectus litoralis  and  Sporobolus virginicus . Individuals were found sheltering in and basking on these plants (Pyke & White 2002).Habitat in VictoriaIn Victoria, the Green and Golden Bell Frog has been recorded in a range of lentic (still water) and terrestrial habitats in the coastal plains and low foothills of the hinterland including lowland forest,  Banksia  woodland, wet heath land, riparian scrub complex, riparian forest, damp forest, shrubby dry forest, limestone box woodland and cleared pastoral areas (Gillespie 1996).Breeding habitat for the Green and Golden Bell Frog in Victoria includes dams in both forested and cleared areas, swamps in farmlands, gravel pits, billabongs, marshes, coastal lagoon wetlands, wet swale herblands and isolated streamside pools. These habitats are mostly permanent but include some ephemeral water bodies. All habitats are characterised by stationary water. Virtually all isolated water bodies containing Green and Golden Bell Frogs are free of native fish species, and they typically have dense emergent vegetation (Gillespie 1996).','NA','Major threats identified for the Green and Golden Bell Frog include (DEWHA 2009ac):habitat removalhabitat degradation (which includes siltation, changes to aquatic vegetation diversity or structure reducing shelter, increased light and noise, grazing, mowing, fire)habitat fragmentationreduction in water quality and hydrological changes (for example, pollution, siltation erosion and changes to timing, duration or frequency of flood events)disease (for example, infection of the frog with chytrid fungus ( Batrachochytrium dendrobatidis ) resulting in chytridiomycosis)predation (for example, by the introduced Mosquito Fish, Cats ( Felis catus ) or Foxes ( Vulpes vulpes ))introduction or intensification of public access to Green and Golden Bell Frog habitats.Habitat removal, degradation and fragmentationThe distribution of the Green and Golden Bell Frog in the coastal lowlands of NSW, and the high development pressures associated with these areas have resulted in the large scale loss and degradation of Green and Golden Bell Frog habitat (DEWHA 2009ac). Goodrick (1970) has estimated that 60% of the wetlands in NSW had been extensively modified or reclaimed by 1969 and Goldingay (2008) believes that this extent of modification must have had an impact on populations of Green and Golden Bell Frogs, and cannot be ignored as a contributing factor in the decline of the species. Recent studies by White and Pyke (2008) indicates that habitat decline has emerged as the most significant factor in NSW population losses, with the likelihood of extinction increasing with greater habitat loss.Development projects that contribute to the significant loss and ongoing degradation of Green and Golden Bell Frog habitat include (NSW DEC 2005e):flood mitigationirrigation worksdam construction (that has changed river flow regimes, hence flooding events sustaining floodplain wetlands)pasture conversion (channelling wetlands to drain)market gardens or turf growinglandfill/waste disposal operationssewage treatment plantsindustrial developmentsgolf coursesplaying fields, parklands recreation areasresidential development including canal estates.The various types of development, particularly road projects and residential development, fragment habitat and block frog movement. Habitat fragmentation isolates populations, and over time is likely to reduce the evolutionary potential of populations through inbreeding. It also predisposes local populations to extinction (NSW DEC 2005e).In Victoria, it is assumed that key threats to the Green and Golden Bell Frog, such as habitat loss and degradation, are relatively few compared to those in NSW, largely due to the very low human population in the areas of preferred habitat and smaller scale of agriculture (Gillespie 1996).Reduction in water quality and hydrological changesGreen and Golden Bell Frog habitat may become unsuitable from factors such as water pollution. Many populations in NSW are close to housing or industry, and, as a result, are subject to potential wastes or landscape changes that may alter the water quality (Christy & Dickman 2002a; Goldingay 1996). Hamer and colleagues (2002) suggested that increased fertiliser use in the 1960s and 1970s has led to a build up of fertiliser being washed into water bodies after heavy rain, affecting tadpole development. The higher survival rates of Green and Golden Bell Frog tadpoles compared with those of Common Eastern Froglet ( Crinia signifera ) tadpoles, however, weakens any conclusions about the effects of fertiliser (Goldingay 2008).Possible threats to the Green and Golden Bell Frog include the artificial and natural opening of coastal lagoon estuaries, changes to flow/flooding regimes of streams and associated wetlands, spring tides and storm and flood events which introduce predatory fish and result in increases in salinity (NSW DEC 2005e). Christy and Dickman (2002a) recognised saltwater intrusion in coastal wetlands as a consequence of landscape changes to be a potential threat to Green and Golden Bell Frog breeding sites, however, detailed field data is required to determine the extent of this threat. It is also suspected that deteriorating run off water quality and increased soil erosion and sedimentation reduces an area\'s suitability for frogs, including the Green and Golden Bell Frog (NSW DEC 2005e).DiseaseAustralia\'s native amphibians are threatened by the pathogenic fungus,  Batrachochytrium dendrobatidis , known as amphibian chytrid fungus, which causes the infection known as chytridiomycosis (AGDEH 2006o). This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable, at the minimum, of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100% mortality in others (AGDEH 2006o). The role of chytrid fungus in the decline of the Green and Golden Bell Frog is not well documented, but the disappearance of this species from other locations where causal agents could not be implicated (Osborne et al. 1996; Mahony 1999) suggests it has had an impact on the Green and Golden Bell Frog (Goldingay 2008). The chytrid fungus has only been investigated and detected in NSW populations (Speare & Berger 2005).Mortality as a result of chytridiomycosis has been observed in NSW (Penman & Lemkert 2008; Stockwell et al. 2008). However, despite its widespread infection across amphibian populations in NSW, some Green and Golden Bell Frog populations are free from, or resistant to, chytridiomycosis. It is suggested that these populations are located in areas inhospitable to the growth of the disease (Threfall et al. 2008). Possible explanations are fluctuating salinity and elevated concentrations of trace metals (Johnson et al. 2003; Osborne et al. 2008).PredationThe predation of Green and Golden Bell Frog tadpoles by the introduced Mosquito Fish in association with the decline of the Green and Golden Bell Frog has been well documented (Daly 1996a; Goldingay 1996; Goldingay & Lewis 1999; Lewis & Goldingay 1999; Mahony 1996; Morgan & Buttemer 1996; Pyke & White 2001a; White & Pyke 1996). The conclusion to be drawn from existing studies is that Mosquito Fish does prey on Green and Golden Bell Frog tadpoles, and is likely to be influencing this species\' population size and recovery in NSW (Goldingay 2008).Despite the extensive literature about the negative effects of Mosquito Fish on Green and Golden Bell Frogs, it has also been discovered that breeding and persistence has occurred at sites with Mosquito Fish (White & Pyke 2008), and that the species has disappeared from sites where Mosquito Fish is absent (Mahony 1999; Osborne et al. 1996). It has also been suggested that certain site conditions may partially reduce the impacts of Mosquito Fish. For example, submergent vegetation may have allowed tadpoles to escape predation (Hamer et al 2002; van de Mortal & Goldingay 1996). Very high densities of fish, along with waterbody characteristics such as being ephemeral and having steep pond banks may contribute to poor breeding at some sites (Goldingay & Lewis 1999). The dates of introduction of Mosquito Fish to many regions are not well documented, and this lack of information has hampered research into declines (Mahony 1999).In addition to Mosquito Fish, it has also been suggested that Green and Golden Bell Frogs could be exposed to predation by Cats and Foxes, but Cats more so given the frogs\' occurrence in urban areas (Daly 1995; Goldingay 1996).Significant populationsLocations in NSW with more than 20 individual Green and Golden Bell Frogs include Captains Flat, Coomonderry Swamp, Homebush Bay, Port Kembla, Wanda, Kooragang Island and Broughton Island (White & Pike 1996). In NSW, breeding has been recorded at Arncliffe, Coomonderry, Eastlakes Golf Course, Greenacre, Greenwell Point, Hammondville, Homebush, Kemblawarra, Kurnell, North Ryde, Primbee, Rosebery, Shoalhaven Heads and Wanda (Hamer et al. 2002; Pyke & White 1996).The Bowen Island population is thought to be important due to its isolation from the mainland (Osborne & McElhinney 1996).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1870'),('1887','Taudactylus eungellensis','Endangered','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','The Eungella Day Frog is a small frog growing 25 to 28 mm (males) or 27.6 to 35.9 mm (females) in length, with a bluntly acuminate snout. The dorsal surface ranges from yellowish tan to dark brown, with irregular dark brown markings. A broad band crosses the head between the eyes, with two other bands anterior to this. A dark band runs from behind the eye to the base of the forearm, and there is an irregular X-shaped marking on the back. There are crossbands on the limbs and digits. The throat and abdomen are cream coloured, and the ventral surfaces of the limbs are cream with or without dark brown spots. The skin is shagreened with tubercles above, the postero-medial portion of the thighs is granular, and the ventral surface is smooth. The fingers and toes have expanded tips, and are broadly fringed but lack webbing. Males have greyish, finely spinulated, rounded nuptial pads resembling a blister on the back of the hand at the base of the second and third fingers. Males do not possess a vocal sac. The tympanum is hidden (Liem and Hosmer 1973).','The Eungella Day Frog occurs along small creeks in rainforest as well as wet sclerophyll forest (Liem & Hosmer 1973). The immediate streamside habitat is dense rainforest with ferns, vines, palms and epiphytes in the understorey (Retallick et al. 1997). The species inhabits exposed steep, rocky sections of stream within splash zones of waterfalls and cascades (McNellie & Hero 1994; Retallick et al. 1997) and may be found under rocks and crevices or on emergent rocks in the stream (Liem & Hosmer 1973; Retallick et al. 1997).Tadpoles are found in first to third order streams in large and relatively still mid-stream pools, or partially connected stream-side pools. Tadpoles have been observed in the benthic layer among rocks, litter, and detritus (Retallick & Hero 1998).Rheobatrachus vitellinus , the Eungella Gastric-brooding Frog, formerly co-occurred with the Eungella Day Frog, but it is now considered to be extinct (Hero et al. 1998).','Experiments on the tadpoles of the species suggest that the majority of their diet is made up of detritus. The tadpoles of the Eungella Day Frog are unusual in that they do not possess labial tooth rows and this implies that they feed on soft foods growing on the substrates (like algae), rather than shredding and ingesting the substrate itself (Retallick et al. 1997). The diet of the adult Eungella Day Frog remains unknown.','The cause(s) of the decline in the Eungella Day Frog populations remains unknown. McDonald (1990) found no obvious evidence that seasonal rarity, over-collecting, drought, floods, habitat destruction, heavy parasite loads or stress due to handling and data collection were responsible for the population declines. Sick and dying frogs have occasionally been encountered (Hero et al. 1998, 2002) and it may be that the fungal disease, Chytridiomycosis, has had an impact on the population (Berger et al. 1998). The chytrid fungus has been identified in individuals of the Eungella Day Frog collected in October 1995 (Speare & Berger 2000), and its potential role in the decline of the species is being investigated (NQTFRT 2001).Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (DEH 2006).A potential threat could arise from the extraction and/or the impoundment of water from the perennial streams where this species has been located, especially in state forests (NQTFRT 2001). Forest grazing and trampling of streamside vegetation by livestock have been identified as possible threats to the species, but there is no evidence to support this (Dadds 1999). Cane toads  Bufo marinus  may be able to penetrate natural habitats along roadways and utilise ponds for breeding, but there is no evidence of this occurring (Dadds 1999) nor that this may affect Eungella Day Frogs (Retallick 2001, pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1887'),('1889','Taudactylus pleione','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','The Kroombit Tinker Frog is a grey coloured frog growing to 25 mm.  It has darker grey flecks, spots and blotches, roughly in a uniform width between the eyes.  There is an X-shaped patch between the shoulders and a large patch above each groin.  There is a broad blackish streak from the snout to the forelimb, dark cross-bars on limbs and digits, yellowish hind side of thighs, barred with brown specks and rounded snout (Cogger 2000).','The Kroombit Tinker Frog is highly cryptic and is mainly associated with Piccabeen Palm ( Archontophoenix cunninghamiana ) rainforest and boulder scree gullies (Clarke et al. 1999; Czechura 1986a; Meyer et al. 2001). The species is found around rocky shelves and boulders, under rocks or in deep rock piles near temporary stream lines, seepage zones and in sheltered rocky scree (Clarke et al. 1999). Most sites have little or no surface water (Clarke 2001, pers. comm.). Unlike other species of  Taudactylus,  the Kroombit Tinker Frog has never been observed basking (Czechura 1986b).Important habitat for this species has been identified as rainforest patches over 500 m in altitude in Kroombit Tops (Kroombit Tops National Park and Kroombit Forest Reserve) (Hines & SEQTFRT 2002).','Feeding behaviors have not been reported for this species, however males have been observed moving about, possibly searching for prey, after cessation of calling (Clarke 2001, pers. comm.).','The apparent low population, isolation and extremely restricted distribution of the species make it highly susceptible to demographic instability, disturbance and extinction. Clarke et al. (1999) and Borsboom et al. (1998) list five main potential threats to the species: wildfire, domestic and feral animals, unknown agent(s) responsible for declines of other Queensland frogs, visitor pressure and timber harvesting.Timber harvesting has ceased in the catchments above all known populations (Hines et al. 1999), but may be a threat to any new populations on leasehold land. Visitor numbers are low at present, but increased visitation may disrupt breeding or impact on habitat. A high intensity wildfire in 1994 burned into many rainforest patches used by the species (Hines et al. 1999). A later flood altered stream hydrology and removed leaf litter in the area (Clarke et al. 1999). The wildfire may be partially responsible for the decline of the species at the monitoring site. Modified fire management procedures have now been put in place to reduce the risk of further high intensity fires (Hines et al. 1999).Four species of  Taudactylus  from similar habitat elsewhere in Queensland have also declined dramatically or disappeared due to unknown causes (Ingram & McDonald 1993). In May 1998, several dead  L. pearsoniana  were found at Kroombit Tops (Hines & Clarke unpubl. data). Chytrid fungus, a disease found by Berger et al. (1998) to be associated with frog deaths and declines elsewhere in Australia and Central America, was isolated from these animals (Berger unpubl. data). This, in conjunction with the apparent decline of the Kroombit Tinker Frog at the monitoring site has heightened concern for this species. Clarke et al. (1999) and Borsboom et al. (1998) list domestic cattle, horses and feral pigs as potential threats to the species. Stock pose a threat to the Kroombit Tinker Frog mainly through the destruction of habitat and fouling of water (Clarke et al. 1999). A fence has been constructed to exclude stock, but impacts at the head of Kroombit Creek continue.At Kroombit Tops, feral pigs have only recently arrived but they have caused significant damage to at least two sites known to support the Kroombit Tinker Frog. Although there may be direct predation by pigs, the greatest effect is likely to be the impact of increased silt on embryos and tadpoles. Streams in the area now carry heavy silt loads. Silt reduces the availability of food for tadpoles and reduces their fitness at metamorphosis. Soil disturbance by pigs is also likely to greatly increase the spread of riparian weeds such as mistflower and crofton weed (Hines & SEQTFRT 2002). Feral pigs are also potential vectors of chytrid fungus (Clarke 2001, pers. comm.).Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (DEH 2006).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1889'),('1890','Taudactylus rheophilus','Endangered','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','The Tinkling Frog is a small frog growing to 30 mm. The dorsal surface is smooth or finely granular, and may be grey to brown, reddish or dark brown in colour, with irregular darker markings. A narrow pale greyish streak runs from the eye to the groin, bordered below by a broad black band whose lower edge breaks up into a marbled or reticulate pattern on the flanks. There is a faint, pale transverse bar between the eyes, and a pale glandular patch runs from the angle of the jaws to the base of the forearm. The loreal region is black with some irregular grey markings. The ventral surface is smooth, brown in colour, with conspicuous, irregular, creamy-white markings. The limbs have irregular blackish cross bands, and the digits are barred with dark brown and creamy grey. The tips of the digits have small but conspicuous discs, the toes are fringed but lack webbing (Cogger 1994; Liem and Hosmer 1973).','The Tinkling Frog is a montane specialist, endemic to the Wet Tropics Bioregion (Williams & Hero 1998, 2001) occuring along rocky streams in upland rainforest (Liem & Hosmer 1973). It is usually found under rocks and logs beside fast-flowing streams and prefers seepage and trickle areas near streams (McDonald 1992). Individuals recorded in 1996 were found hidden from view in small gaps beneath or between boulders that were at least 1 m in diameter (Marshall 1998). One juvenile on Bellenden Kerr was captured from under a small rock approximately 30 cm in diameter, in the streambed (Hero pers. obs., pers. comm. 2001).','NA','The cause(s) of the decline of the Tinkling Frog population remains unknown. Richards et al. (1993) found no obvious evidence that drought, floods, habitat destruction or pollution by pesticides, inorganic ions or heavy metals were responsible for the population declines. There has been repeated speculation that UV-B light has caused declines, but there is no evidence to support this and it is now considered unlikely as a hypothesis (NQTFRT 2001).Current research is examining the possibility that disease, such as a viral infection or Chytrid fungus, may have contributed to the decline of this species (Berger et al. 1999), and there is considerable circumstantial evidence to support this hypothesis (NQTFRT 2001). The effects that having very small isolated populations may have on the recovery of the species remain largely unknown, but may include low genetic variability, increased susceptibility to disease and general demographic instability (Hero et al. 2002).Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (DEH 2006).Feral pigs are a potential cause of riparian habitat damage and adult frog mortality. The activity of feral pigs has been recorded to have increased over the period 1989 to 1992 in an area previously inhabited by the Tinkling Frog. There is very little research, however, into the impact of feral pigs on native frog populations (Richards et al. 1993).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1890'),('1915','Pseudophryne corroboree','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','The Southern Corroboree Frog is distinctive and easily recognised because of its striking dorsal colour pattern consisting of bright yellow longitudinal stripes alternating with black stripes (Cogger 2000). The ventral surface is boldly marked with black and yellow and white blotches. A large flat femoral gland is present on each hind limb, and the inner metatarsal tubercle is low and round. Adults reach a length of between 25–30 mm (Barker et al. 1995). Tadpoles are dark in colour and have a long paddle shaped tail that grows to 30 mm in total length (Anstis 2002).','The Southern Corroboree Frogs is a habitat specialist, restricted to gently sloping montane and sub-alpine habitats between 1300–1760 m above sea level. The species utilises two distinct habitat types: a breeding season habitat associated with pools and seepages in sphagnum bogs, wet tussock grasslands and wet heath usually occurring on granitic and volcanic substrates; and a terrestrial non-breeding habitat in forest, sub-alpine woodland and tall heath adjacent to the breeding area. During the summer, the adult frogs breed in shallow pools and seepages within the breeding area, before returning to the adjacent woodland and tall moist heath at the end of the breeding season (Pengilley 1966). Osborne (1988) found that, following breeding, adults are capable of dispersing over 300 m into the surrounding woodland.Vegetation at breeding sites varies considerably and consists of spreading rope-rush  Empodisma minus , peat moss  Sphagnum cristatum , and the shrubs  Baeckea gunniana  and  Epacris paludosa . Several other plant species, including sod-tussock grasses  Poa  spp., candle heath  Richea continentis , the rush  Restio australis  and the sedge  Carex gaudichaudiana commonly occur at breeding sites. The breeding pools are characteristically shallow (often ephemeral), and have relatively large surface areas, low water flow rates, and have a long duration (Osborne 1990b). This allows the water in the preferred pools to become warmer during the day, possibly enhancing tadpole development. The breeding pools are the most sensitive feature of the breeding habitat of the Southern Corroboree Frog and protection of the catchment area of the pools and seepages is essential for their long-term persistence as breeding sites.Litter, logs and dense ground cover in the understorey of snow gum woodland provides over-wintering habitat (Pengilley 1966). Plant species typical of this habitat include  Bossiaea foliosa ,  Prostanthera cuneata ,  Oxylobium  spp. and  Phebalium  spp. Very little is known about non-breeding habitats utilised by this species (Osborne 1990b).','The diet of juveniles and adults consists largely of small ants and, to a lesser extent, other invertebrates. Food intake is greatly reduced during winter, with many individuals apparently not feeding (Pengilley 1966, 1971).','The Southern Coroboree Frog is one of a number of Australian alpine amphibian species, including Alpine Tree Frog ( Litoria verreauxii alpina ), Southern Corroboree Frog ( Pseudophryne corroboree ) and Baw Baw Frog ( Philoria frosti ), which have experienced pronounced population declines for unknown reasons. It is likely that declines will continue through the 2010s (Hunter 2013). There is no single aspect of the field biology of these species which stands out as a feature in common that may help explain the declines (Osborne et al. 1999). Osborne and colleagues (1999) reviewed some of the possible factors contributing to population declines at high altitudes including long term weather patterns and pathogens such as the Chytrid fungus (Berger et al. 1999).Chytridiomycosis affects the Southern Corroboree Frog throughout its range (Hunter et al. 2010). This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (AGDEH 2006o). Chytrid fungus has been detected in some museum specimens of the species (Osborne 2001 pers. comm.). The spread of this diease is possibly facilitated by the Common Eastern Froglet ( Crinia signifera ) (Hunter et al. 2009).Climate change is predicted to decrease winter and spring precipitation for the Australian Alps (Hennessey et al. 2003) that may lower spring water tables and result in pools drying earlier (Hunter 2013). Although droughts are a common in south-east Australia, climate change may increase the severity and frequency of these events (Hunter 2013).Planting of exotic trees, such as Willows ( Salix  spp.), has been widespread in the Snowy Mountains. Although no breeding sites are directly threatened by willow invasion, in the longer-term the spread of willows by vegetative growth along seepages and streams may present a problem for the management of some sites (Osborne 1990b). Excavation by feral pigs has also been identified as a potentially threatening process (Osborne 1990b; Osborne 2001 pers. comm.).The Pig ( Sus scrofa ), the Horse ( Equus equus ), the Sambar Deer ( Cervus unicolour ) and the Fallow Deer ( Dama dama ) have been observed damaging habitat. Ultimately, trampling and grazing by these species cause wetland incision that alters drainage patterns and vegetation structure (Costin et al. 1959; Hunter 2013; McDougall 1989; Whinam & Chilcott 2002).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1915'),('1934','Philoria frosti','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','The Baw Baw Frog grows to 45 mm.  It is dark brown above with scattered black flecks and irregular lighter patches.  The upper surface is scattered with small warts on the sides and rump.  There are prominent black lobe-shaped paratoid glands on each side extending over the shoulders (Cogger 1990).','The Baw Baw Frog is a habitat specialist. During the breeding season (September to December), calling males, gravid females and egg masses have been recorded along seepage lines within or at the periphery of sub-alpine wet heathland and in gullies within montane vegetation communities (Hollis 1995; Malone 1985a). Overall, surveys from 1993 to 1996 indicate that breeding localities are restricted to topographically protected gully habitats compared with the broader breeding distribution of the species over a decade ago (Hollis 1997).The breeding microhabitat of the species is predomiNAtly natural cavities in or under vegetation, logs, peat and soil, and rock (or combinations of these), that act as catchments for water travelling down slope (Hollis 1995; Littlejohn 1963; Malone 1985a). These sites occur along seepages or rivulets that drain water from the slopes of sub-alpine wet heathland and in gullies that drain the plateau (Barker et al. 1995; Hollis 1997).','Examination of the stomach contents of 30 museum species shows that the Baw Baw Frog consumes a variety of invertebrates (eight orders of aquatic and terrestrial species) including aquatic larvae and an unusually high percentage of annelids (Hollis 2001 pers. comm.).','The lack of information available on the population dynamics and demography of the Baw Baw Frog makes it is very difficult to interpret the observed decline in the adult male population (Hollis 1997). This decline however coincides with a recent global phenomenon of declining amphibians (Barinaga 1990; Blaustein & Wake 1990; Tyler 1991), and perhaps of more concern, with the reported decline of species restricted to mountain-top and alpine environments in Australia (e.g. Osborne 1990; Richards et al. 1993) and overseas (Crump et al. 1992; La Marca & Reinthaler 1991).Numerous hypotheses have been generated to explain these declines, but few as yet have been investigated thoroughly (Hollis 1997). Those that have, or are currently being investigated, include climate (Osborne 1990; Richards et al. 1993), ultraviolet radiation (Blaustein et al. 1994), atmospheric pollution (Bradford et al. 1994) and pathogens (Blaustein et al. 1994; Trenerry et al. 1994). No thorough investigation of these hypotheses has been undertaken for the Baw Baw Frog, or for any other Australian \"mountain-top\"\" species. Recent studies of amphibian disease have identified a chytrid fungus as a cause of frog mortality and as the cause of death of frogs collected during declines (Berger et al. 1998;1999). The role of chytrid fungus in the decline of the Baw Baw Frog is not known.Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia',' namely the east coast'),('1942','Mixophyes balbus','Vulnerable','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','The Stuttering Frog is yellow-grey on its back with darker blotches. The frog grows to 80 mm. There is an irregular dark brown band (often broken into blotches) starting between the eyes and running down the back. A dark stripe on the head starts in front of the nostril and continues through the eye to the tympanum (tight membrane covering the entrance to the ear). The arms and legs have narrow dark bars and the upper part of the iris is pale blue. The belly is smooth and white or pale yellow. The skin on the back is finely granular. The toes are three-quarters webbed (Cogger 2000; Frogs Australia Network 2005c).','The Stuttering Frog is typically found in association with permanent streams through temperate and sub-tropical rainforest and wet sclerophyll forest, rarely in dry open tableland riparian vegetation (Mahony et al. 1997), and also in moist gullies in dry forest (Gillespie & Hines 1999). The ecological requirements of adults and larvae are poorly known.In north-east New South Wales, statistical modeling was used to investigate the relationship of the Stuttering Frog with 24 environmental predictors (NSW NPWS 1994 in Gillespie & Hines 1999). The species showed a preference for the interiors of large forest tracts in areas with relatively cool mean annual temperatures. These sites are typically free from any disturbance with a thick canopy and relatively simple understorey (Gillespie & Hines 1999). The species occurs along first order streams and is occasionally associated with springs. The species is not associated with ponds or ephemeral pools. Tadpoles do occur with several species of native fish (Mahony et al. 1997a).','NA','Several potentially threatening processes have operated upstream of, or at, sites where the Stuttering Frog was formerly found, but, as populations of this species have also disappeared in catchments with seemingly minimal disturbance, it is not clear how much influence these processes have had. Logging and associated forest management practices have been carried out in some catchments where the Stuttering Frog historically occurred or currently occurs. The health and stability of extant populations in these disturbed catchments is unknown. Upstream forest grazing and land clearance for pasture have also occurred in some catchments. The species is not known from any localities with disturbed riparian vegetation or significant human impacts upstream, which may indicate that the species is highly sensitive to perturbations in the environment (Mahony et al. 1997).Recent studies of amphibian disease have identified a chytrid fungus as a cause of frog mortality and as the cause of death of frogs collected during declines (Berger et al. 1998; 1999). The role of chytrid fungus in the decline of the Stuttering Frog is unknown.Chytridiomycosis, caused by the chytrid fungus, is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (AGDEH 2006o).Trampling by domestic stock is likely to have deleterious impacts on oviposition sites of the species (Knowles et al. 1998). Tadpoles have been found in sympatry with native fish, and probably have survival strategies to avoid predation from them (Gillespie & Hines 1999). However, the impact of introduced fish, such as Eastern Gambusia ( Gambusia holbrooki ), carp ( Cyprinus spp. ) and salmonids is unknown (Gillespie & Hines 1999). Mahony et al. (1997a) did not observe introduced fish at any sites where they found the Stuttering Frog. In other reports though, introduced fish (salmonids) have been recorded at sites where the species has declined (Anstis 1997). However, the Stuttering Frog has also disappeared from many streams which do not contain introduced fish species (Gillespie & Hines 1999).A study of sedimentation on  M. balbus  tadpoles showed that, whilst the species can tolerate quite high levels of sedimentation and changes to water pH from sedimentation for short periods, long term exposure, such as in waterways that sustain high levels of traversing, can be detrimental to tadpoles (Green et al. 2004).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1942'),('1944','Mixophyes iteratus','Endangered','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','The Giant Barred Frog is a large, dark-olive green to black coloured frog that grows to 115 mm. It has a pointed snout and a broad lateral band of dark spots dividing the dark dorsal surface from the white, or pale yellow, ventral surface (underside). The limbs have dark crossbars. The hind side of the thighs are black with large yellow spots. Two joints of the fourth toe are free of web (Cogger 2000). The skin is finely granular above but smooth below (QLD DERM 2005).','The Giant Barred Frog occurs in rainforests and wet sclerophyll forests in upper to lower catchment areas (Ingram & McDonald 1993).During surveys in the Cooroy to Curra area of south-east Queensland, Giant Barred Frogs were observed to prefer a closed forest canopy with a relatively light cover of vegetation at ground level (Aland & Wood 2013). Populations of the species have been found in cleared or disturbed areas, for example cattle farms with vegetated riparian strips and regenerated logged areas (Hero & Shoo n.d., cited in Hines et al. 2004; Ingram & McDonald 1993). Many sites where the Giant Barred Frog is known to occur are the lower reaches of streams which have been affected by major disturbances such as clearing, timber harvesting and urban development in their headwaters (Hines et al. 1999).','NA','Upstream clearing, changes in water flow regimes, degradation of water quality, disturbance to riparian vegetation, feral animals, domestic stock and weed invasion have been identified as potential threats to the Giant Barred Frog (Hines et al. 1999; Hines & SEQTFRT 2002).Disturbance to riparian vegetation is particularly important as many populations of the Giant Barred Frog in south-east Queensland, and some populations in north-east NSW, such as the Tweed Valley, occur along narrow remNAt riparian vegetation on private lands (H. Hines 2001, pers. comm.) which are readily exposed to such disturbances. Lemckert (1999) found that the Giant Barred Frog decreased in abundance in recently-logged areas and at sites where little undisturbed forest was available. Damage from Feral Pigs ( Sus scrofa ) increased greatly in the Conondale Range (Hines & SEQTFRT 2002) and possibly in other areas occupied by the species (H. Hines 2001, pers. comm.). While there is potential for direct predation by pigs, the greatest impact is likely to be from increased silt on embryos and tadpoles (H. Hines 2001, pers. comm.). Similarly, trampling by domestic stock is also likely to have deleterious impacts on oviposition sites of the species (Knowles et al. 1998).Chytridiomycosis is a disease caused by infection with the chytrid fungus ( Batrachochytrium dendrobatidis ) affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide and Tasmania. This highly virulent pathogen of amphibians is capable, at the minimum, of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100% mortality in other populations (AGDEH 2006o). Chytrid fungus has been identified in individuals of the Giant Barred Frog (Speare & Berger 2000). The role played by chytrid fungus in the decline of the species is addressed in the Species Recovery Plan (Hines & SEQTFRT 2002).Individuals of the Giant Barred Frog have sometimes been killed in the mistaken belief that they are the introduced Cane Toad ( Bufo marinus ) (Hines & SEQTFRT 2002).Populations of the Giant Barred Frog now exist in small, isolated patches of forest. The effect that this may have on genetic variation within populations, the general health of individuals and the species\' response to identified threats is unknown (J-M. Hero 2001, pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1944'),('1973','Heleioporus australiacus','Vulnerable','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','Adults The Giant Burrowing Frog is a rotund frog with muscular forearms and hindlimbs, growing to about 95 mm. Its back colouring is quite variable, ranging from steely blue-grey to black and dark chocolate brown (Penman et al 2004). Varying degrees of white/yellowish spots can occur on the sides in all populations (including essentially no spots at all). The species is always white below with some brown on the throat. It has a yellowish splash in the armpits, and a flap of skin at the anterior corner of the eyes. Adult males have warts capped by black spines on the back and sides (Cogger 2000). This species eyes are prominent and large (NSW DECC 2005r).','Across its range, the Giant Burrowing Frog appears to be dependent on areas with native vegetation (Penman et al. 2004) as no Giant Burrowing Frogs have been recorded from cleared lands (Daly 1996; Gillespie 1990). However, it should be noted that no targeted surveys for the species have occurred in such lands. A BIOCLIM analysis suggests that the species is not climatically suited to large river valleys, most of which have been cleared for agriculture (Penman et al. 2005).In the northern portion of its range, the Giant Burrowing Frog occurs in hanging swamps on sandstone shelves and beside perennial creeks (Daly 1996; Webb 1993). In the Watagan Mountain area, central coast of New South Wales, the species is associated with sandy soil on sandstone ridges that support heath vegetation (Mahony 1993). It occurs in semi-permanent to ephemeral sand or rock based streams, and infrequently in semi-permanent to permanent constructed dams with a sandy silt or clay base. It is also found in ephemeral to permanent artificial drainage ditches and culverts on roadsides (with a rock or sand/clay base) (Recsei 1997). Giant Burrowing Frogs are not restricted to watercourses. Most radio-tracking locations in Yambulla and Olney State Forests were on the mid and upper slopes, more than 50 m from a stream, and up to 500 m from water (Lemckert & Brassil 2003).In the southern portion of its range, the Giant Burrowing Frog has been reported to occur in a wide range of forest communities including montane sclerophyll woodland, montane riparian woodland, as well as wet and dry sclerophyll forest (Gillespie 1990; Lemckert et al. 1998; Littlejohn & Martin 1967; Penman et al. 2005).A critical examination of these data suggests that most records occur in dry sclerophyll forests and reported use of wet habitats are all associated with breeding sites (Penman et al. 2005), which the species occupy for relatively short periods each year (Penman et al. 2006c). The species appears to be associated with Devonian igneous and sedimentary rock and Ordovician metamorphic rock formations that support forest vegetation (NSW NPWS 2001b). The NSW Department of Environment and Climate Change (NSW DECC 2005r) suggests that this species is found in heath, woodland and open forest with sandy soils.','The species is considered to be a generalist terrestrial predator (Penman et al. 2004). Studies of the gut contents of voucher specimens have revealed that the frog consumes ground dwelling invertebrates including ants, beetles, spiders, scorpions, centipedes and cockroaches (Littlejohn & Martin 1967; Rose 1974; Webb 1983; Webb 1987). Occasionally the diet has included aerial invertebrates such as moths (Webb 1987).','Penman and colleagues (2004) provide a review of the current known threats to the Giant Burrowing Frog. These include timber harvesting, cattle grazing, fuel reduction burning, introduced terrestrial and aquatic predators, high nutrient flows and pH changes in waterbodies, disturbances such as headwater erosion and habitat loss resulting from urbanisation (particularly in the northern part of the range), and clearing for agriculture (particularly in the southern part of the range). Other threats include forestry activities that directly disturbs forest habitat or breeding sites (however, many southern reports are from logged areas) and inappropriate fire regimes (NSW NPWS 2001b). Road mortality has also been observed (Mahony 1993), and there have been reports of Giant Burrowing Frogs being mistaken for Cane Toads and killed (NSW NPWS 2001b). The potential impacts of these processes have not been examined.In addition, chytridiomycosis caused by the chytrid fungus, has been identified in Giant Burrowing Frogs collected from Springwood, NSW in 1998 (Speare & Berger 2000). Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations.Foxes and cats are common and widespread throughout south-eastern Australia and are potentially a major threatening process to terrestrial frog species such as the Giant Burrowing Frog. While frog bones have been reported in fox scats and stomachs (Gillespie & Hines 1999), the potential impact of foxes and cats on frog populations has not been examined.A study of sedimentation on Giant Burrowing Frog tadpoles showed that the species tolerates high levels of sedimentation for short periods (Green et al. 2004). However, long term sedimentation, such as in waterways that sustain high levels of traversing, can alter water pH levels and this, along with continual high sedimentation loads, canbe detrimental to Giant Burrowing Frog tadpoles (Green et al. 2004).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=1973'),('198','Lasiorhinus krefftii','Critically Endangered','Mammalia','Vombatidae','Wombats are heavily built animals with a broad head and short legs. They have strong claws to dig burrows where they spend much of their time. There are three wombats: the Common Wombat, the Southern Hairy-nosed Wombat and the Northern Hairy-nosed Wombat. As the largest of the three wombats, the Northern Hairy-nosed Wombat can weigh up to 40 kg and be more than 1 m long. Compared with the Common Wombat,  Vombatus ursinus , the Northern Hairy-nosed Wombat has softer fur, longer and more pointed ears and a broader muzzle fringed with fine whiskers (Horsup 1999; QPWS 2006).','The Northern Hairy-nosed Wombat occurs in semi-arid cattle grazing country (Horsup 1999).The vegetation at Epping Forest National Park is dominated by Brigalow and Gidgee ( Acacia harpophylla  and  A. cambagei ) scrub, intersected by a gully with deep sandy soils supporting a mixed eucalypt woodland. DomiNAt native grasses are  Aristida  spp. and  Enneapogon  spp. but the introduced Buffel Grass ( Cenchrus ciliaris ) is increasing in abundance (Horsup 1999).Deep sandy soils are required for burrow construction and these occur along the banks of a single wide gully in the National Park. Most of the Park\'s soils are heavy clays, unsuitable for burrows. The burrows are usually located close to trees whose roots may provide support in the soft, sandy soil and crowns provide shade (Horsup 1999).Northern Hairy-nosed Wombats mark their burrows with dung and splashes of urine. A burrow can be spotted by the mound of dug-out sand at the entrance, which can be 1 m high and more than 2 m long. Burrow tunnels can be up to 20 m long, less than half a metre wide, and three-and-a-half metres underground. Well-formed \'runways\' are dug through the mound and into the tunnel. Wombats maintain several approaches to their burrows, each in a different direction (QPWS 2006).','The diet of the Northern Hairy-nosed Wombat consists of at least 12 species of grasses and sedges, predomiNAtly three native species ( Aristida  spp.,  Enneapogon  spp. and  Fimbristylis dichotoma ) and the introduced Buffel Grass ( Cenchrus ciliaris ) which has increased in abundance since the removal of livestock from the park (Horsup 1999).They eat the leaves rather than the stems, which provide the wombat with good nutrition (QPWS 2006).The Northern Hairy-nosed Wombat only feeds at night and only when it\'s not too cold or too hot and dry (QPWS 2006). They forage primarily in the grassy areas of the gully (Johnson 1991). Even in droughts, adult Northern Hairy-nosed Wombats stay in generally good health and body condition. They conserve energy and water in the stable environment of their burrows and only venture out when conditions are optimal (QPWS 2006).They usually feed for six hours a night in winter and two hours in summer. By comparison, an Eastern Grey kangaroo of similar size feeds for about 18 hours a day (QPWS 2006).The teeth of the Northern Hairy-nosed Wombat continue to grow throughout its life. The teeth grow at the same rate that they are worn through use. This means even a very old wombat still has all its strong teeth and is capable of grinding its food very finely (QPWS 2006).','Past threatsEvidence suggests that the Northern Hairy-nosed Wombat was uncommon prior to its very rapid decline over the past 200 years (Crossman 1988; QPWS 2006). Cattle and sheep grazing of the Wombat\'s food source, in combination with drought and (possibly) predation by dingoes, appear to be the main factors that have contributed to the species\' decline (Gordon et al. 1985; Horsup 1999; QPWS 2006). Epping Forest National Park was excised from two cattle stations in 1971, although cattle grazing continued until 1981 when it was fenced to exclude cattle (Horsup 1999).Current threatsSmall populationThe current major threat to the Epping Forest population is its small size which makes it vulnerable to demographic and environmental stochasticity; inbreeding and consequent loss of genetic variation; predation; competition; disease and wildfire. In addition, the sex ratio is highly skewed towards males, with only 35 females (including perhaps only 25 breeding females) in the population of 113 wombats (Horsup 2004). Competition from other grazers, especially the Eastern Grey Kangaroo ( Macropus giganteus ), is considered to be negligible at present population densities (Woolnough & Johnson 2000).FireEpping Forest National Park receives low rainfall and is regularly subjected to periods of drought, therefore the Northern Hairy-nosed Wombat is at risk from wildfire (QPWS 2006).PredationA major threat which has just become apparent is predation by dingoes. In 2000 and 2001, despite the presence of a regular baiting program, ten adult Northern Hairy-nosed Wombats were killed by dingoes. This equated to nearly 10% of the population (Gordon et al. 1985; Horsup 1999; QPWS 2006). This has been addressed by the erection of a dingo-proof fence around all Wombat habitat in Epping Forest National Park (Horsup 2004).Introduced speciesBuffel Grass ( Cenchrus ciliaris ), a species introduced to the area by the grazing industry, has invaded the Epping Forest National Park in the last 10–15 years. It is abundant in disturbed areas, particularly around burrows and along fire control lines and is spreading into wombat feeding areas. Its solid, clumpy growth form is probably unsuitable for the wombats (Woolnough 1998, in Horsup 1999). Buffell Grass is a difficult species to control and, because of its dense, dry form, increases the fire risk (Woolnough 1998, in Horsup 1999).DiseaseOther threats to the population are diseases such as toxoplasmosis (found in cat faeces) or mange (QPWS 2006).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=198'),('214','Bettongia tropica','Endangered','Mammalia','Potoroidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=214'),('217','Potorous longipes','Endangered','Mammalia','Potoroidae','The Long-footed Potoroo is a medium-sized, hopping marsupial with grey-brown fur on the back and pale grey fur underneath. It grows to an average body length of 40 cm, with a tail length of 32 cm. Adults males can weigh up to 2.2 kg and females up to 1.7 kg (Seebeck 1998). It is silent except for a low  kiss kiss  sound made between mothers and young, or when under stress (NSW NPWS 1999).','The habitat of the Long-footed Potoroo includes temperate rainforest, riparian forest and wet sclerophyll forest (NuNA et al. 2000). It occurs at a range of elevations from around 100 m (East Gippsland) to greater than 1200 m (the Victorian Alps). The species occurs in vegetation communities with constantly moist soil. Within its range in NSW, such vegetation is restricted mainly to riparian (riverside) areas (NSW NPWS 2002b). Trees in these communities include Lilly Pilly ( Acmena smithii ), Messmate ( Eucalyptus obliqua ), Mountain Grey Gum ( Eucalyptus cypellocarpa ), Brown Barrel ( Eucalyptus fastigata ) and Blackwood ( Acacia melanoxylon ). Understorey plants include Forest Wire-grass ( Tetrarrhena   juncea ), Red-fruit Saw-sedge ( Gahnia sieberiana ), other sedges  Carex  and  Cyperus  spp., and ferns. In Victoria it always occurs in or near (usually within 250 m of) damp forest types (Jones 1998; Jones & Johnson 1997).The species needs dense cover to provide shelter and protection from predators. During the day, the Long-footed Potoroo nests beneath ferns, grass or sedge tussocks, or fallen timber (Jones & Johnson 1997; Lewis & Thulin 1995; Triggs 1998). One nest was made of bracken and coarse grass, lined with fine grass and Long-footed Potoroo hair (Jones & Johnson 1997). The species appears to prefer a sheltered aspect, a mixed species overstorey and a dense understorey for both resting and foraging (NuNA et al. 2000). One study, based on trapping records, found that Long-footed Potoroos use cool moist gullies more often during drier times of the year (spring and summer), avoiding drier ridges and slopes (Scotts & Seebeck 1989). A later study using trapping and radio-tracking in the same area found that they use both gullies and slopes, and more captures were on upper slopes, perhaps because they used more of the open vegetation after introduced predators were controlled (Green et al. 1998).The Long-footed Potoroo needs a diverse and abundant supply of hypogeal (underground-fruiting) fungi, which it eats throughout the year (Maxwell et al. 1996; Saxon et al. 1994).  The abundance of such fungi depends on soil moisture (Claridge & Cork 1997).','The Long-footed Potoroo eats hypogeal (underground-fruiting) fungi. The fruiting parts of these are called sporocarps or truffles (NuNA et al. 2000). Many of the fungi in its diet form ectomycorrhizae, which are symbiotic attachments to the roots of certain forest trees and shrubs. Most species are soft and will not survive if the soil becomes dry (Scotts & Seebeck 1989). The Long-footed Potoroo probably depends on fungi as a food source more than any other mammal in Australia (NuNA et al. 2000). In a study in East Gippsland, fungi constituted 88–91% of identifiable food remains, plant material contributed 4–5%, and invertebrates 5–7% of the scat samples. Spores were classified into 54 classes, indicating that the Long-footed Potoroo eats a wide variety of different fungi (Green et al. 1999). Previous studies found spores from 31 or more species of fungi (Hill & Triggs 1985; Scotts & Seebeck 1989). The species eaten in winter and summer are similar, but the abundance of different species in the diet varies between different seasons, years and localities (Claridge & Cork 1997; Scotts & Seebeck 1989).Pairs of long-footed Potoroos may forage together as a unit. They excavate truffles by digging many small conical pits (Green et al. 1998).','Feral predatorsDingoes, wild dogs and foxes are major predators and appear to limit populations and local distributions of Long-footed Potoroos (Lewis & Thulin 1995; Saxon & Noble 1993). Around 40% of the 150 reliable records of the species in Victoria, up to 1995, consist of remains in dog or fox scats (VDSE 2003). Within the species range, between 1% and 9% of dog and fox scats contain remains of Long-footed Potoroos (Jones & Johnson 1997). Cats may also kill Long-footed Potoroos. Predation is probably greater when understorey shelter is reduced, and roads may increase access to the potoroo\'s habitat (Broome et al. 1996a; Jones & Johnson 1997). According to Jones & Johnson (1997), Williams Log Road appears to be a thoroughfare for predators within the range of the Long-footed Potoroo in north-east Victoria, because the density of fox and dog scats on the road was very high (up to 16.7 per km), and a high proportion contained Long-footed Potoroo remains (7%–9%).Timber harvestingThe Long-footed Potoroo has specialized habitat requirements (a dense understorey in or near wet forest with permanently moist soil). It is potentially threatened by activities that reduce or degrade habitat or inhibit movement between colonies. Long-footed Potoroos that are displaced from their usual home ranges may not easily find unoccupied suitable habitat, because the species is territorial (Green et al. 1998; Scotts & Seebeck 1989). Timber harvesting can reduce species diversity and can result in a decrease in soil moisture (VDSE 2003). The longer term effects of logging are uncertain. However, in north-eastern Victoria, old-growth forest supports the densest populations of Long-footed Potoroos, and these animals also produce more offspring and spend less time foraging, suggesting that unlogged forest is prime habitat for the species (Green et al. 1998; NSW NPWS 2002b). Jones and Johnson (1997) suggested that the Long-footed Potoroo\'s preferred habitat in the Riley and Tea Tree North regions coincides with preferred timber harvesting coupes, because the best aspect (terrain) for truffle growth also favours growth of high quality Messmate ( Eucalyptus obliqua ). Logging roads in this region can increase predator access.FireWildfires and prescribed burning are likely to be detrimental to Long-footed Potoroos in the short term, because fires reduce understorey shelter (NSW NPWS 2002b; VDSE 2003). However, habitat modelling by Lewis and Thulin (1995) found little evidence of adverse effects at a landscape scale in East Gippsland. The effect of fire on the food of Long-footed Potoroos is not well known; canopy loss and other changes in vegetation structure after fires can dry the soil, but in some parts of Australia moderate fires appear to stimulate the short term production of truffles by underground fungi (NSW NPWS 2002b; VDSE 2003).Feral pigsFeral pigs eat the same species of truffles that Long-footed Potoroos eat (Broome et al. 1994), so they may compete with potoroos for food when it is limited. Pigs also damage ground cover and the forest litter layer as they excavate food and are common in Long-footed Potoroo habitat. In NSW a third of Long-footed Potoroo transects surveyed had signs of pig foraging (Broome et al. 1994; NSW NPWS 2002b).Chance eventsBecause the Long-footed Potoroo has a very restricted distribution (especially in NSW), and a small population size, it is threatened by chance breeding failure (for example, caused by the death of too many adults of a particular sex) and localised disasters such as severe fires and disease, which could exterminate colonies (NSW NPWS 2002b; VDSE 2003).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=217'),('22','Neophoca cinerea','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Otariidae','The Australian Sea-lion has a blunt snout, with small tightly rolled external ears. Males have dark blackish to chocolate brown fur with a whitish crown of the head and nape of the neck, whilst females are more silvery-grey above and yellow to cream below. Males can become very large, 185–225 cm in length and weighing 180–250 kg. Females are smaller, 130–185 cm at  in length and weighing 65–100 kg. Pups are chocolate brown in colour with a pale fawn crown until they moult at about two months of age. After moulting, a juvenile\'s coat is similar to that of an adult female (Van Dyck & Strahan 2008).','Australian Sea-lions use a wide variety of habitats (Gales et al . 1994) for breeding sites (called rookeries) and, during the non-breeding season, for haul-out sites (rest stops, which are also useful for predator avoidance, thermal regulation and social activity) (Campbell 2005). Onshore habitats used include exposed islands and reefs, rocky terrain, sandy beaches and vegetated fore dunes and swales. They also use caves and deep cliff overhangs as haul-out sites or breeding habitat (Dennis & Shaughnessy 1996, 1999).Most colonies occur on islands, however several small colonies occur on the mainland, including:Point Labatt, SA (King & Marlow 1979)Baxter Cliffs, west of Twilight Cove, WA (referred to as Thundulda by Warneke 1982)Bunda Cliffs, Great Australian Bight, SA and WA borders (nine small breeding colonies discovered at the base) (Dennis & Shaughnessy 1996).Site preferenceAustralian Sea-lions prefers the sheltered side of islands and avoids exposed rocky headlands that are preferred by the New Zealand Fur Seal ( Arctocephalus forsteri ). Islands used on the southern coast of WA and SA are comprised either of igneous or metamorphic rock, or of igneous platforms below limestone caps. An important feature of colony sites used for breeding are shallow, protected pools in which pups congregate. On the west coast of WA they breed on low-lying limestone islands which are well protected by perimeter reefs (Gales et al. 1994).Shelter, in the form of holes in rock or vegetation, is important for adult females to hide their pups. Bushes such as  Nitraria schoberi  are preferred if available (Gales et al. 1994). However, the largest colonies (Dangerous Reef and The Pages Island) occur where there is little protection available and where most pups are born on open ground.Leeuwin CurrentOver much of the Australian Sea-lion\'s range, the marine environment is characterised by shallow on-shelf waters (less than 200 m deep) of low productivity. It is primarily influenced by the Leeuwin Current which feeds warm, nutrient impoverished waters southwards along the west coast of Australia and then eastward along the south coast. This current acts as a barrier to the rich subantarctic waters and the region has been described as one of the most nutrient poor marine environments in the world (Gales et al .  1994). During winter, the prevailing winds along southern Australia are westerly and enhances the strength of the Leeuwin Current, allowing it to reach its eastern extremity. During summer, the high pressure weather systems that dominate the southern coast of Australia cause consistent south-east winds that have the effect of blocking, and in some cases reversing, the flow of the eastward moving Leeuwin Current. This blocking and reversing of flow facilitates minor upwellings of relatively nutrient rich, cool water. These influences of seasonal changes in current result in more productive waters in the eastern part of the sea-lion\'s range. The bias in population density of the sea-lion towards the east is also seen in the New Zealand Fur Seal, which has a similar overall range in Australia (Shaughnessy et al. 1994).','Australian Sea-lions feed on a wide variety of prey, including cephalopods, fish, sharks, rock lobsters and sea birds (Gales & Cheal 1992; Ling 1992). There is little quantitative information on their diet as only a few hard parts are normally found in the faeces of this species (Gales & Cheal 1992), although the species is known to \'feed\' at fishing boats on scraps or by taking fish off lines. Australian Sea-lions in western WA spend more time foraging compared to those in SA due to the less productive conditions of the Leeuwin Current (Lowther et al. 2013).Radio transmitter and time-depth recorder studies of Australian Sea-lions at Seal Bay found that nursing females were benthic feeders on the continental shelf approximately 20–30 km offshore, in depths less than 150 m (Costa et al. 1988, 1990). While at sea, females and juveniles dive almost continually through the day and night. Young sea lions (approximately 7–18 months old) have been recorded foraging in depths up to 60 m and range up to 10 km from their birth colony (Fowler & Costa 2004 cited in Campbell 2005). Less is known about males’ feeding behaviour, but they are recorded to dive deeper. The inshore breeding and foraging habitat of this species is responsible for interactions with fisheries and aquaculture (Gales 2008).','Historic hunting and sealingHistorically, the main anthropogenic threat to the Australian Sea-lion was hunting and overharvest through sealing activities (AFMA 2010). Although this activity was stopped in the 1920s, the sea lion population has not recovered to pre-exploitation levels (AFMA 2010). Early sealers left few records of the identity, distribution and abundance of sea lion colonies from which to draw comparisons with the sea lion colonies today (Ling 2002 cited in AFMA 2010).Commercial fishing impactsInteraction with bottom-set gillnet fisheriesSouth Australian populations of the Australian Sea-lion occur entirely in the Gillnet and Shark Hook Sector of the Southern and Eastern Scalefish and Shark Fishery (SESSF). Detailed ecological risk assessments have been undertaken in the SESSF to assess the risks that fishing poses on ecological sustainability of the marine environment (AFMA 2010). It was found that of the seal species in the SESSF, the Australian Sea-lion was at greatest risk due to its small population size, complex breeding and high mortality rate of populations (AFMA 2010).Evidence that supports the bycatch mortality of Australian Sea-lions in the SESSF gillnet fishery, includes (Goldsworthy et al. 2010):anecdotal reports from fishers of bycatchhigh incidence of Australian Sea-lion entanglement in gillnetting material at Seal Bayoverlap between historic and current fishing effort with modeled Australian Sea-lion foraging distributionsthe very limited ability of Australian Sea-lion subpopulations to withstand additional mortality ratesa detailed assessment of the potential risk posed by Australian Sea-lion populations from bycatch in gillnet fisheriesincreasing pup production and population recovery at Dangerous Reef that coincides with the closure of the Commonwealth gillnet fishery in southern Spencer Gulf in 2001.Goldsworthy and colleagues (2010) completed an assessment of the risks to the Australian Sea-lion from the gillnet sector of the SESSF. The study estimated that approximately 374 Australian Sea-lions are removed as bycatch each breeding cycle. Population viability analysis indicated that the capacity for the species to recover would increase if the bycatch of adult females was reduced (Goldsworthy et al. 2010). This mortality rate was modelled from an observed 12 mortalities (AFMA 2010). The majority of observed interactions within the gillnet sector (73%) occurred within a 12.5 km range of the colonies, however modelling predicted that most interactions would be within a 60 km range with some interactions occurring as far as 130 km from colonies (Goldsworth et al 2010).The Australian Fisheries Management Authority\'s (AFMA) Shark Resource Assessment Group have raised concerns regarding the modelling that underpinned the bycatch estimates that Goldsworthy and colleagues produced (AFMA 2010). There were particular concerns about observer effort occurring in low fishing effort areas, rather than the high fishing effort areas (AFMA 2010). Similarly, an AFMA observer program recorded substantially lower rates of 0.004 sea lions per kilometre net set compared to a 0.013 rate observed by Goldsworthy and colleagues (2010) (AFMA 2010).Drowning in lobster potsYoung sea-lions have been recorded to drown in Southern Rock Lobster  (Jasus edwardsii)  pots (Gales et al. 1992b) and are attracted to bait, caught lobsters and discarded bait (Goldsworthy et al. 2010). There is limited quantitative data on the level of mortality of Australian Sea-lions through entrapment (Goldsworthy et al. 2010). Published reports suggest that most incidental mortality occurs around breeding colonies, haul-out sites and breeding colonies, particularly in shallow water (Campbell 2005; Goldsworthy et al. 2010).Entanglement in fishing gearEntanglement in fishing gear (and in other man-made debris) can cause drowning. In a review of the problem in SA, Robinson and Dennis (1988) refer particularly to entanglement in monofilament netting of 150 mm mesh, which is used in the bottom-set gill-net shark fishery. Australian Sea-lions (and New Zealand Fur-seals) also interact with nets at tuna farms near Port Lincoln, where some become entangled in nets. Modifications to existing nets, including increasing tension on them, and adding bottom nets and top nets were suggested as methods to alleviate this impact (Pemberton 1996b). Page and colleagues (2004) found that industry and government attempts to reduce the problem did not succeed, and calculated that annually between 64 and 146 Australian Sea-lions died from entanglement, though this figure could be much higher due to observational methodology limitations (Page et al. 2004).Illegal shootingDue to the broad diet of Australian Sea-lions, direct competition with commercial fishers is probably limited. However, Australian Sea-lions rob lobster pots and nets set for schooling shark, and take Australian salmon and herring from nets set from shore on the south coast of WA (Shaughnessy 1999). This can lead to illegal shooting of \"trouble\"\" seals by commercial fishers (Campbell 2005).Other threatsOther threats to the Australian Sea-lion include:Tourism',' centered on nine known haul-out sites in SA and WA'),('225','Petrogale penicillata','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Macropodidae','The Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby is brown above, tending to be rufous on the rump and grey on the shoulders. The chest and belly is paler and in some individuals there is a white blaze on the chest. There is a white to buff cheek stripe and a black dorsal stripe from the forehead to the back of the head. The exterior of the ears is black, and inside the ears is buff. There is a black auxiliary patch often extending as a dark stripe to the margin of the hind-legs. There is a pale grey side-stripe sometimes present. The feet and paws are dark brown to black. The tail darkens distally with a prominent brush. The pelage is long and thick, particularly about the rump, flanks and base of the tail. Individuals from the north of the species\' range tend to be lighter and have a less prominent tail brush (Eldridge & Close 1998).','This species prefers rocky habitats, including loose boulder-piles, rocky outcrops, steep rocky slopes, cliffs, gorges and isolated rock stacks (Murray et al. 2008; Short 1982). It also utilises tree limbs (Maxwell et al. 1996; Sharman & Maynes 1983). While it appears that most Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby colonies are on north-facing slopes and cliff lines (Short 1982), colonies have been found on south-facing cliffs in Kangaroo Valley (Kutzner & Dodd 1996; Wong 1997), in the Macleay River Gorge (Bayne 1994), in the Warrumbungles and at Mt Kaputar (Soderquist undated, pers. comm., cited in NSW NPWS 2003a), although usually in lower densities.Rocky outcrops appear crucial to current habitat selection by rock-wallabies, however, vegetation structure and composition is also considered to be an important factor (Bugg 1995; Lim & Giles 1987; Pearson 1992). In many parts of their range, including at the Warrumbungles, rock-wallabies are closely associated with dense arboreal cover, especially fig trees (NSW NPWS 2003a). The vegetation on and below the cliff appear to be important to this species as a source of food and shelter and in some cases may provide some protection from predation (Wong 1993; 1997). A range of vegetation types are associated with Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby habitat, including dense rainforest, wet sclerophyll forest, vine thicket, dry sclerophyll forest, and open forest (Murray et al. 2008).In the Shoalhaven, the proximity of mesic vegetation, vegetation structure and floristics are important habitat factors for this species (Bugg 1995). Bugg (1995) found that core habitat in the Shoalhaven occurs where mesic vegetation is associated with complex cliffs, boulder piles and rock outcrops.In Curracbundi National Park, 1100 transects, each 100 m long, were walked along potential habitat and showed that Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby scat was found in 56% of transects, occupying a diverse array of habitats: rainforest gullies and dry ridges, riverbanks and outcrops far from water sources, refuges adjacent to and far from cleared pasture. In the park, the species was more abundant in larger and more complex refuges, however, they also occupied less complex habitat down to the most marginal refuges (Tuft 2009).Brush-tailed Rock-wallabies typically shelter during the day in rock crevices, caves and overhangs, yet often bask in exposed sunny spots (Sharman & Maynes 1983). Within their home range, rock-wallabies habitually use the same refuges, sunning spots, feeding areas and pathways (Joblin 1983) and these are often defended vigorously (Bayne 1994).An investigation on habitat-choice of the Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby was carried out during winter from May to September 2001, on a population of the species located on private property at Hurdle Creek, near the township of Mt Colliery, Queensland. This investigation showed that Brush-tailed Rock-wallabies selected foraging locations that tended to be more open and with more short green grasses and forbs than other locations nearby. The study showed that foraging Brush-tailed Rock-wallabies did not favour areas that were concealed by tussocks or near to the cliffs (Carter & Goldizen 2003).During the investigation, Brush-tailed Rock-wallabies were observed moving towards \'lookout\' structures (e.g. a log, stump or rock) when they were startled, and sitting on them for up to 30 mins afterwards (Carter & Goldizen 2003). These \'lookout\' structures appeared to be an important component of habitat use. When startled, the rock-wallabies also fled either to nearby areas that offered thicker vegetation than the open areas or simply out of sight over a slope, although the direction of flight was usually towards the cliff (Carter & Goldizen 2003).','The diet of the Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby is primarily grasses (35–50%), forbs (25–40%) and \"browse\"\" (shrubs',' trees and climbers) (12–30%) with ferns and sedges of very minor importance (Short 1989). It is also reported to eat  Themeda triandra  (Kangaroo Grass) more than other grass species (Jarman & Phillips 1989). Rock-wallabies forage mostly at night (NSW NPWS 2003a).\"','There are many factors that threaten the survival of this species. These include: habitat degradation; small population size; low migration rates; bioclimatic factors; drought; fire; hunting; disease and competition; and predation by other wild animals.Habitat DegradationHabitat used by the species has been affected by many changes. Perhaps the greatest change is in relation to vegetation: the structure, extent, species assemblages and species proportions. These changes have been caused by a combination of factors, including clearing, exotic plant invasions, changed fire regimes, exotic herbivore grazing and browsing behaviour, land degradation, altered nutrient status, and even altered behaviour and numbers of other native animals. It is notable that the majority of the species\' remaining populations are found in relatively undisturbed areas (DEC 2005c).Habitat modification continues due to rural, residential and tourist developments adjacent to some colonies, and there is an apparent trend to locate these developments near some escarpments and cliff lines to maximise scenic opportunities. These sites are often core Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby habitat and development increases the risk of colony fragmentation, permanent changes to potential dispersal corridors, an increase in the numbers of domestic animals and the removal of tree cover (DEC 2005c).Vegetation clearing and the introduction of new predators have led to the increased isolation of many colonies (DEC 2005c). Research currently being undertaken by Cavanagh indicates there is a positive correlation between habitat fragmentation at a landscape scale and broad patterns of extinction in Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby sites across the species\' range (in prep. cited in DEC 2005c).The invasion of grassy feeding areas by weed species such as Lantana is thought to reduce habitat quality for the species (Capararo & Beynon 1996; Wong 1997).Small population sizeAccording to Taggart and colleagues (2005), the greatest threat to the Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby, and many other endangered marsupial species, is the small size of the remaining populations and their fragmentation. Small populations are highly vulnerable to local catastrophes, predations, inbreeding and the associated loss of genetic variation. However, owing to the naturally disjunct (fragmented) nature of Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby colonies, the species may be capable of surviving genetic \'bottlenecks\' and may be capable of recovering from very low numbers (Close undated pers. comm., cited in DEC 2005c).Low migrationBrush-tailed Rock-wallabies typically exhibit low migration rates between colonies and low recolonisation rates, further impeding persistence and recovery of colonies affected by threatening processes. Recent human induced changes have almost certainly disrupted the natural process of low level gene flow (NSW NPWS 2003a).Bioclimatic factorsBugg (1995) believes that bioclimatic changes, resulting in lower rainfall and a decline in rainforest vegetation, contributed to the recently contracting distribution of  P. penicillata  throughout its range. Cavanagh (in prep., cited in DEC 2005c) looked at climatic variation across the entire range of the species and found that there are significant differences in bioclimatic factors between extant and extinct sites across the range and regionally.DroughtThe effect of drought on rock-wallabies is uncertain. Short (1982) reported that Brush-tailed Rock-wallabies along the Goulburn River maintained body condition and continued to breed during a season when rainfall was 50% below average. In contrast, Kinnear and colleagues (1988) reported a significant decline in populations of Black-footed Rock-wallabies during a period of drought, with individuals having to forage further afield for food, increasing their risk of predation.FireThere has been very little research into the effects of fire on Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby colonies. Rock-wallabies have been reported to both disappear from and remain in their habitat after wildfire. For example, at Mount Wallerwang in eastern NSW, a local landholder reported that the resident colony disappeared after a wildfire but then recolonised the site several years later (NSW NPWS 2003a). Fire may act to advantage or disadvantage rock-wallabies, probably depending on intensity and extent because fire alters the structure, composition and possibly the suitability of the vegetation (NSW NPWS 2003a).HuntingLunney and colleagues (1997) attributed the early and steep decline of the Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby population to commercially driven hunting. Bounties were paid on over half a million rock-wallabies killed in NSW between 1884 and 1914. In 1908, 92 590 rock-wallaby skins were marketed though a single Sydney wool-broking company (Eldridge & Close 1998).DiseaseLittle is known about disease in wild populations of Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby, although it is likely that this species is susceptible to diseases found in other macropods (kangaroos, rat-kangaroos, and wallabies). A study, which found massive infestations of hydatid cysts in the thoracic cavities of Brush-tailed Rock-wallabies, suggests a relationship between hydatidosis in the species and in sheep (Close 1984). Lobert (1988) also raised the possibility that Brush-tailed Rock-wallabies are susceptible to toxoplasmosis infection, carried by cats. An individual in Kangaroo Valley was reported to have died from toxoplasmosis in addition to liver fluke infestation (Eldridge undated pers. comm., cited in DEC 2005c).Lumpy jaw was apparently present in the captive colony at Jenolan Cave prior to the large scale release in 1988 (Buchan 1995). This disease is more prevalent in populations of macropods which are exposed to human contact and are fed \'soft\' (processed) foods (DEC 2005c).CatsCats ( Felis catus ) are capable of killing animals weighing up to their own body weight. Juvenile Brush-tailed Rock-wallabies are within this size range. Cats also potentially carry diseases problematic to rock-wallabies such as toxoplasmosis and hydatidosis (NSW NPWS 2003a).EaglesWedge-tailed Eagles ( Aquila audax ) may be an important predator of rock-wallabies in the Warrumbungles. Eagles are often seen flying along the cliffs where Rock-wallabies exist and are known to attack even large adult rock-wallabies (Hsu 2001). Bayne (1994) reports observing six Wedge-tailed Eagles patrol over a single large rock-wallaby colony constantly for three days during a period of drought. Bayne (1994) also reported observing a White-breasted Sea Eagle ( Haliaeetus leucogaster ) dive towards a Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby, which escaped by rapidly jumping into a cave.FoxesRed foxes ( Vulpes vulpes ) are considered to be the main predator of the Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby (Eldridge & Close 1998). Two quantitative studies of Yellow-footed Rock-wallaby populations have measured increases in population size after localised reduction of foxes (NSW NPWS 2003a).Lace MonitorsLace Monitors ( Varanus varius ) can grow to a size large enough to take rabbit-sized prey and may occasionally prey on young Brush-tailed Rock-wallabies (R. Martin undated pers. comm., cited in NSW NPWS 2003a).Wild DogsWhile they are considered to be a potential predator of the Brush-tailed Rock-wallaby, wild dogs ( Canis lupus ) may pose a lower threat to rock-wallabies than other predators because they are less agile in rocky habitat (NSW NPWS 2003a).GoatsGoats ( Capra hircus ) compete with rock-wallabies for food and for the rocky shelters that both species prefer. Monitoring of the Warrumbungles showed that the proportion of feeding and refuge plots occupied by rock-wallaby pellets declined as the proportion occupied by goat pellets increased (Moss et al. 1999).RabbitsRabbits ( Oryctolagus cuniculus ) have the potential to compete with rock-wallabies for food particularly during dry periods when food may be scarce (NSW NPWS 2003a).'),('226','Petrogale persephone','Endangered','Mammalia','Macropodidae','The overall fur colour of the Proserpine Rock-wallaby is light brown (grey in freshly moulted individuals) turning to yellow-brown on the outer limbs. Sparse white hairs often give it a grey-mauve tinge. It has a pale grey band from the corner of the mouth to the ears. The paws and feet are black, and the backs of the ears are blackish brown. It grows to 64 cm long and 60 cm tall. The last third of the very long, bushy tail is black, but the tail usually ends in a white or cream tip. The tail has a reddish base. Males can weigh up to 8.8 kg, and females up to 6.4 kg (Queensland EPA 2006a; Sharman et al. 1995).','The Proserpine Rock-wallaby is the only species of Rock-wallaby to live exclusively in rainforest (Winkel 1997a). It lives in sites with large boulder piles and perched boulders creating crevices, tunnels and overhangs (Winkel 1997b). On the mainland, it inhabits boulder outcrops in pockets of semi-deciduous, semi-evergreen or complex microphyll or notophyll vine forest (dry rainforest containing two canopy layers of trees with leaves 2.5 to 12.5 cm long, some deciduous canopy and emergent trees, large woody vines, and often with thorny or spiny shrubs in the understorey) (Harden et al. 2006; McDonald 1995; Nolan 1997). This habitat generally occurs on foothills near open woodland (Delaney 1993).In Gloucester Island National Park, the Proserpine Rock-wallaby prefers littoral (beachside) habitat. It uses rocky outcrops and rock piles covered with dry vine scrub, usually associated with beach scrub. At higher elevations, its habitat is rocky outcrops, rock piles and rocky creeks within an  Acacia  open forest (Nolan 1997; Nolan & Johnson 2000). On Hayman Island, where the wallaby has been translocated, it occurs in association with boulder piles covered with vine thicket (low dry rainforest with one canopy layer and many vines and thorny shrubs, Harden et al. 2006) or vine forest (Schaper & Nolan 2000).According to the Queensland EPA (2006b), the following species of trees are native to the habitat of the Proserpine Rock Wallaby:Large treesMilky Pine  (Alstonia scholaris)Brown Tulip Oak  (Argyrodendron polyandrum )Cluster Fig  (Ficus racemosa)White Fig  (Ficus virens)Bumpy Ash  (Flindersia schottiana)Foam Bark  (Jagera pseudorhus)Mackay Cedar  (Paraserian toona)Burdekin Plum  (Pleiogyniun timorense)Damson  (Terminalia sericocarpa)Small and medium treesMilky Pine  (Acmenosperma claviflorum)Soap Tree  (Alphitonia excelsa)Coogera  (Arytera divaricata)Hard Bolly Gum  (Beilschmiedia obtusifolia)Cordia dichotomaBrown Laurel  (Cryptocarya triplinervis)Maiden\'s Blush  (Euroschinus falcate)Cheese Tree  (Glochidion apodogynum)Macaranga  (Macaranga involucrata)Macaranga  (Macaranga tanarius)Red Kamala  (Mallotus philippensis)White Cedar  (Melia azedarach)Celery Wood  (Polyscias elegans)Peanut Tree  (Sterculia quadrifida)There is no permanent free water in most sites occupied by the Proserpine Rock-wallaby, but there are ephemeral creeks, and dew and rainwater collect on plants and in rock crevices and hollow logs. The wallaby will also drink from water sources in suburban gardens (Winkel 1997b).From a habitat model for the Proserpine Rock-wallaby, Holloway (2001) concluded that the most important characteristics are:Relatively short trees with a large girth, and a dense understorey of vines and saplings. These features are typical of low-growing vine thickets, rainforest margins and partially disturbed rainforest with gaps in the canopy. Such vegetation structure offers the densest cover, and food for herbivores is often particularly abundant in ecotone habitat (the margin between different vegetation types).A high proportion of rock cover on the ground, but relatively few pebble-sized or very large rocks. Rock-wallabies rely on boulder piles for shelter, and these are in areas containing numerous medium-sized and large rocks.A convex slope. Ridge lines and rocky outcrops with a convex slope are most likely to have boulder piles at the base of the slope, because weathered boulders have broken off from the ridge top and rolled down.Vine forest habitat near Proserpine contains two plants listed as vulnerable under the EPBC Act:  Neisosperma kilneri  (six of nine records of this tree are at Mt Dryander), and  Medicosma obovata  (the only records of this small tree are at Mt Dryander) (Nolan & Johnson 2000). This habitat also contains fifteen species of plants that are listed as rare under the Nature Conservation (Wildlife) Regulation 1992 (Queensland EPA 2006a).','The Proserpine Rock-wallaby is opportunistic in its diet. It eats at least 142 species of plants, including grass (54%), leaves (and sometimes fruit) of trees (31.5%), vines (7.5%), shrubs (7.5%), fungi and herbs (1%). The diet contains more tree leaves during the dry season than the wet season, because the wallaby eats leaf litter on the forest floor. It eats fallen fruit when available. The most important trees and shrubs in its diet are Archer Cherry ( Aidia racemosa ),  Argyrodendron  spp. (including Brown Tulip Oak),  Capparis  spp (native caper bushes and climbers), Boonah Tuckeroo ( Cupaniopsis wadsworthii ), Figs ( Ficus  spp.), Crow Ash ( Malaisia scandens ),  Neiosperma  spp. (including Milkbush), Burdekin Plum ( Pleiogynium timorense ), and Coastal Sophora ( Sophora tomentosa ). The most commonly eaten grasses are Hooked-hairy Panic Grass ( Ancistrachne uncinulata ), Button Grass ( Dactyloctenium  spp.), Bluegrasses ( Dicanthium  spp.), Clustered Lovegrass ( Eragrostris elongata ), Russell River Grass ( Paspalum paniculatum ), Guinea Grass ( Panicum maximum ), Fairy Grass or Couch ( Sporobolus  spp.), Kangaroo Grass or Oatgrass ( Themeda  spp.) and Whorled Pigeon Grass ( Setaria verticillata).  Proserpine Rock-wallabies on Gloucester Island also eat  Pandanus  sp. (Winkel 1997b). During dry periods the Proserpine Rock-wallaby sometimes visits the edge of the forest and road verges to feed on grasses, including Guinea Grass (Nolan & Johnson 2000; Schaper & Nolan 2000). It will enter gardens and consume domestic plants such as hibiscus flowers, balsam and vegetables (Winkel 1997a).','Habitat clearing   Most of the threats to the Proserpine Rock-wallaby come from development within its habitat, particularly for housing. Lowland woodland and riparian forest in the region of Airlie Beach and Proserpine are cleared for sugar cane and cattle grazing, which isolates remaining rainforest fragments on the surrounding slopes, and limits dispersal of Proserpine Rock-wallabies. Rainforest on steeper slopes in the region is cleared for both intensive housing developments (where no forest remains in the site) and acreage housing developments (where larger blocks often contain forest) (Nolan & Johnson 2000; Winkel 1997b). Between 1994 and 1997, the number of development applications in coastal areas of the Whitsunday shire increased by a third (Nolan 1997). Approximately 40% of the wallaby\'s remaining habitat occurs on freehold and leasehold land (Nolan & Johnson 2000; Queensland EPA 2006a).Vehicle collisions   Housing developments include road construction through the habitat of the Proserpine Rock-wallaby. The wallaby sometimes grazes on road verges, especially during the dry season, and this leads to road deaths (Nolan & Johnson 2000; Queensland EPA 2006a; Winkel 1997b).Predation  Feral dogs, dingoes and domestic dogs attack Proserpine Rock-wallabies, and wallaby hairs and remains have been found in dingo scats. A pack of seven dogs was observed in Proserpine Rock-wallaby habitat at Mt Julian (Winkel 1997b). Dogs can also kill wallabies by harrassing them, so they die from stress. Dogs travel along roads and tracks, and they sometimes kill wallabies by trapping them against fences. Housing developments create fences and tracks, and bring more domestic dogs into Proserpine Rock-wallaby habitat (Nolan & Johnson 2000; Winkel 1997b). Proserpine Rock-wallabies may also be preyed upon by eagles, pythons and cats (capable of killing joeys) (Queensland EPA 2006a; Reddiex & Forsyth 2004).Disease Feral and domestic cats are the definitive hosts of the damaging blood parasite  Toxoplasmosis gondii , which is spread through cat faeces and can cause death and blindness in macropods. The disease has been confirmed in a wild Proserpine Rock-wallaby at Mandalay Point, but the extent of its impact is unknown (Nolan & Johnson 2000; Schaper & Nolan 2000). Dogs are hosts for the parasitic hydatid tapeworm ( Echinococcus granulosus ). Hydatids occur in Proserpine Rock-wallabies and can be debilitating or fatal. A wild male near Proserpine was confirmed to have died from hydatid cyst damage to the lungs, but the impact of the disease on population dynamics is unknown (Johnson et al. 1998).Toxic garden plants  In the dry season, Proserpine Rock-wallabies sometimes leave the rainforest at night to feed in household gardens, where they may eat toxic plants. Potentially lethal plants include Pink Periwinkle ( Catharanthus roseus ), Mother of Millions ( Kalanchue spp. ), Oleander ( Nerium oleander ), Yellow Oleander ( Thevetia peruviana ), Rhoeo ( Rhoeo discolor ), Brazilian Nightshade ( Solanum seaforthianum ), Fruit Salad Plant ( Monstera deliciosa ), Elephant Ear ( Colocasia antiquorum ), Dumb Cane ( Dieffenbachia maculata ), Yellow Allamanda ( Allamanda cathartica ), Angel\'s Trumpet ( Datura metel ), Poinsettia ( Euphorbia pulcherrima ), Pepper Tree ( Schinus terebinthifolius ), Coral Bush ( Jatropha podagrica ), Arum Lily ( Zantedeschia aethiopica ), and Castor Oil Plant ( Ricinus communis ) (Queensland EPA 2006a). Pink Periwinkle has invaded the wallaby\'s habitat on Gloucester Island, where it may pose a considerable poisoning threat (Batianoff & Dillewaard 1994; Nolan & Johnson 2000).Fire  Although the Proserpine Rock-wallaby inhabits rainforest, wildfires could potentially burn its habitat during droughts, especially in the drier locations (Gloucester Island, and the translocated population at Hayman Island). Because the distribution of the species is very small, fire could destroy entire subpopulations (Close 2001; Schaper & Nolan 2000; Winkel 1997b).Climate change  Because of its extremely specific habitat requirements and limited distribution, the Proserpine Rock-wallaby is likely to be threatened by climate change (Clancy & Close 1997).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=226'),('229','Setonix brachyurus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Macropodidae','The Quokka is a small wallaby with thick, coarse, grey-brown fur with lighter underparts. Its snout is naked and its ears are short. Its short tail (25.8–31 cm long) tapers towards the end and is close-haired. There is evidence of sexual dimorphism (differences in size and shape between the male and female of a species), as males grow to 54 cm long and weigh up to 4.2 kg, whereas females grow to 50 cm and weigh up to 3.5 kg. The hind foot is 100–120 mm long (Cronin 1991; Strahan 1998).','VegetationThe Quokka is a habitat specialist. In the north of its range it prefers dense understorey, less than 10 years since fire, adjacent vegetation age that is greater than 25 years and the absence of feral predators (Christensen and Kimber 1975; Hayward et al. 2005, 2007). This habitat meets dietary and predator refuge requirements (Hayward 2005). In the south of its range, quokkas are strongly linked to complex vegetation structure (minimum of three layers), low densities of woody debris and habitat patchiness (between 0 and 450 m to an alternative vegetation age) (Bain et al. 2015).The Quokka also has relatively high water requirements, which necessitates close proximity to fresh water throughout the year (Hayward et al. 2005a). Hence, the species is often present in riparian and swamp habitat (Hayward et al. 2005a).The understorey structure of the habitats currently inhabited by the Quokka consist of dense, low vegetation (Hayward 2002) that provides refuge from predation by owls, the Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) and the Cat ( Felis catus ). These covered/shady microhabitats may also be important during the hotter months, particularly on Rottnest Island, where animals converge in dense thickets of  Gahnia  spp .  and  Acanthocarpus  spp .  (Kitchener 1982).The main habitat for mainland populations of the Quokka is dense riparian vegetation (Hayward et al. 2005a), but the species also uses a range of other habitat, including:heath and shrubland on the mainland coast and offshore islands (Hayward 2005)Swamp Peppermint ( Taxandria linearifolia ) dominated swamps in Jarrah ( Eucalyptus marginata ) forest (Hayward 2002).swampy shrublands (Christensen et al. 1985 in Hayward et al. 2005c)swordgrass-dominated understorey (Christensen et al. 1985 in Hayward et al. 2005c)regrowth areas of the Karri ( E. diversicolor ) forest (Christensen et al. 1985 in Hayward et al. 2005c)Bullich ( Eucalyptus megacarpa ) swamp forest (Hayward 2002)Paperbark ( Melaleuca  spp.) swamp (Hayward 2002).Swamp Peppermint swamp shrublands are tall closed shrublands dominated by Swamp Peppermint,  Gahnia decomposita  and  Astartea fascicularis  with sedge dominated understorey (Hayward 2002).Bullich or Paperbark swamp forests occur as small fragments within larger swamps in southern Jarrah ( E. marginata ) forests. In Bullich forest, the understorey includes  Acacia linearifolia ,  Boronia molloyiae  and  Hypocalymna cordifolium  (Hayward 2002). Paperbark swamp consists of small, species-rich pockets, dominated by Swamp Paperbark ( Melaleuca rhaphiophylla ), within  Agonis  swamp (Hayward 2002).Site specific vegetationIn the Stirling Range NP, the Quokka is known to inhabit woodlands and flats (e.g. Jarrah and Marri ( Corymbia calophylla ) woodland). It also occurs in the peaks where the vegetation includes montane heath and thicket, and montane mallee at higher elevations. The latter vegetation community includes a Western Australian threatened ecological community known as the \"Montane Mallee Thicket of the Stirling Range\"\". This community occurs approximately 400 m above sea level on sandy clay-loam over sandstone and metamorphosed sandstone on the mid to upper slopes of mountains and hills in the Stirling Range',' predomiNAtly east of Red Gum Pass.In the Albany-Fraser system (i.e. between Two Peoples Bay - Cheyne Beach) the Quokka occurs on coastal heath and thickets (Western Sheoak ( Allocasuarina fraseriana )','  Hakea elliptica ','  Melaleuca striata  and  Anarthria scabra ); swamps (Juniper Myrtle ( Taxandria juniperina )'),('239','Onychogalea fraenata','Endangered','Mammalia','Macropodidae','The Bridled Nail-tail Wallaby is a highly solitary, medium-sized macropod; up to 1 m tall and weighing up to 8 kg (males). The species has distinctive markings of a white \'bridle\' line running from the centre of the neck, along the shoulder to behind the forearm on each side of the body. A black stripe runs the length of the body, and white cheek stripes are present on both sides of the head. A horny \'nail\' occurs at the tip of the tail, is between 3-6mm and is partly concealed by hair (Evans 1992 cited in Lundie-Jenkins 2001). The species has a high level of sexual dimorphism and males may be up to twice as large as females (Sigg & Goldizen 2006).','Current DistributionThe Bridled Nail-tail Wallaby occurs in woodland, particularly in Brigalow ( Acacia harpophylla ) scrub, preferring areas with the most fertile soil (Lundie-Jenkins 2001). During the day (when they are resting), Bridled Nail-tail Wallabies prefer habitat that consists of young Brigalow regrowth or contains fallen logs (Evans 1996). They shelter beneath shrubs, in large grass tussocks, and inside hollow logs. Adults prefer logs where available (Fisher & Goldizen 2001) but also used grass shelters as the biomass of grass increases after a drought, enabling them to shelter closer to feeding areas. They generally choose shelter sites with the densest cover of foliage and stems at Bridled Nail-tail Wallaby height (25-50 cm), and this type of shelter is concentrated at the edges of wooded areas such as Brigalow regrowth (Fisher 2000). At night (when they are feeding), they prefer the ecotone habitat containing both pasture and young Brigalow regrowth (Evans 1996). When feeding in open pasture, they prefer to stay close to the edge of shelter habitat (Evans 1996).On the north western section of Taunton National Park (Scientific), the Bridled Nail-tail Wallaby is found in all four of the major vegetation types; open grassy eucalypt woodland dominated by Poplar Box  (Eucalyptus populnea),  dense Acacia forest dominated by Brigalow, transitional vegetation intermediate between the woodland and forest, and in areas of very dense Brigalow regrowth (Tierney 1985). After clearing, Brigalow grows back from root stock, forming dense thickets. Older Brigalow regrowth has sparse foliage in the 0-1 m height range, but has a closed canopy above this height. Younger regrowth forms patches of small dense bushes, obscuring visibility below 1 m. At Idalia National Park, reintroduced Bridled Nail-tail Wallabies use open woodland as well as Brigalow regrowth, and also use Wilga bushes (Geijera parviflora) as shelter habitat (Veldman 1998 cited in Pople et al. 2001).Bridled Nail-tail Wallabies prefer vegetation edges: in the mid 1980s, they were most likely to occur in a narrow band of vegetation at the interface between dense Acacia scrub and open grassy eucalypt woodland in the north west of the Park (Tierney 1985). In the mid 1990s when the Brigalow regrowth in the north east of the Park had reached 2-3 m in height, they preferred the area where Brigalow regrowth abuts pasture there, and the area where rosewood ( Acacia rhodoxylon ) and Eucalypt woodland borders open alluvial flats in the centre of the Park. In both areas, the feeding ranges of many wallabies are concentrated at former cattle yards, where food is plentiful due to the fertile soil (Fisher 2000).Historic DistributionThe Bridled Nail-tail Wallaby previously occupied Acacia shrubland and grassy woodland on the western slopes of the Great Dividing Range and based on the surveys of the Dingo region, Gordon & Lawrie (1980) concluded that Bridled Nail-tail Wallabies had a preference for Brigalow ( Acacia harpophylla ) woodland and the larger alluvial flats, which are the more fertile areas. In semi-arid regions of eastern Australia. Gould (1863) reported that \"It inhabits all the low mountain ranges',' the elevation of which varies from one to six hundred feet',' and which are of a sterile character - hot',' dry'),('25234','Synemon plana','Critically Endangered','Insecta','Castniidae','The Golden Sun Moth is a medium-sized, day-flying moth. The wingspan of females and males is about 3.1 cm and 3.4 cm respectively. The smaller wingspan of the female is unique within the  Synemon  genus. In the female, the upper-side of the forewing is dark grey with patterns of paler grey scales, and the hindwing is bright orange with black spots along the edges of the wings. The underside of both wings is white with small black spots along the edge of the wings. In the male, the upper-side of the forewing is dark brown with patterns of pale grey scales and the hindwing is bronze/brown with dark brown patches. The underside of both wings is pale grey with dark brown spots. Both males and females have clubbed antennae. The female has a long extensible ovipositor, which is an elongated organ extending from the posterior abdomen used to lay eggs (DEC 2007).','Suitable habitat for the Golden Sun Moth includes native temperate grassland and open grassy woodlands dominated by wallaby grass (DEC 2007). While previous studies suggested that the species prefers grasslands which have a greater than 40% coverage of wallaby grass over a given area (O\'Dwyer & Attiwill 1999), more recent studies show a broader tolerance for other species compositions, including degraded grasslands dominated by exotic Chilean Needlegrass ( Nassella neesiana ) (Braby & Dunford 2006; Gibson 2006; Gilmore et al. 2008).Density and quality of Wallaby Grass at a site may be of importance in Golden Sun Moth larval development, as a larva may need to feed on more than one Wallaby Grass tussock (Edwards 1993). The area of Wallaby Grass at a site does not need to be extensive. On sites that have low moth numbers, this is typically related to grassland quality rather than size. It is likely that two ACT populations have become extinct as a result of degradation of grassland quality rather than their small size (DEC 2007).Sites supporting Golden Sun Moth populations have generally been subject to light grazing. A number of populations occur in paddocks alongside sheep and cattle grazing. These sites have not undergone extensive pasture improvement or fertiliser usage and contain areas of primary Wallaby Grass cover. These sites can often be found in the corners of paddocks or areas along fence lines and gateways (DEC 2007).Sloping sites (at 3º or less), particularly those with a northerly aspect, are well-represented in extant populations and indicate a preferred site characteristic, although a number of populations are known from flat sites (DEC 2007).The effects of fire on the species has been largely unstudied (ACT Government 1998f). Based on observations at the Nhill Sun Moth Reserve, it appears that the moth can withstand its habitat being burnt under particular circumstances (Douglas 2004). It seems likely that the effects of fire are not catastrophic and infrequent wildfires can be withstood (Edwards pers. comm. cited in ACT Government 1998f). Controlled burning (outside the adult flight period) may help reduce the seed residue of introduced grasses (Douglas 2004).Grassland Native temperate grassland are dominated by native grasses and/or herbs, have few shrubs and no trees (less than one tree per hectare). The most common native grasses in these systems are Wallaby Grasses ( Rytidosperma  spp.), Spear Grasses ( Austrostipa  spp.), Tussock Grasses ( Poa  spp.), Weeping Grass ( Microlena  spp.), Wire-grasses ( Aristida  spp.) and Kangaroo Grass ( Themeda spp.) (Barlow 1998). Even at sites with moderate to high levels of disturbance, a high level of native species diversity may be present (ACT Government 2005a).The Golden Sun Moth has been shown to have a preference for Short Wallaby Grass ( Rytidosperma carphoides ), Bristly-Wallaby Grass ( R. setacea ), Wallaby Grass ( A. eriantha ), Lobed Wallaby Grass ( R. auriculata ) and Clustered Wallaby Grass ( R. racemosa ). Wallaby Grass-dominated grasslands are mid-high, open tussock grasslands found in well drained areas with shallow soils (ACT Government 2005a) that are low in phosphorous (O\'Dwyer & Attiwill 2000).Based on recent observations at two ACT sites, Ginninderra Creek and Reid, there is a possibility that Golden Sun Moth larvae feed on Chilean Needle Grass ( Nassella neesiana ) and Redleg Grass ( Bothriochloa macra ) (Braby & Dunford 2006). On the Ginninderra Creek floodplain, Chilean Needle Grass has displaced much of the native grasses normally used by the Golden Sun Moth. It is possible that the species has been able to supplement or even switch its larval diet to a related but non-indigenous plant (Braby & Dunford 2006). Braby and Dunford (2006) stress that such a switch in diet does not necessarily imply that the Golden Sun Moth is dependent on Chilean Needle Grass, nor has it adapted to a range of other introduced grasses that are weeds in the Australian landscape.Grassy woodland Trees in grassy woodland are generally widely spaced with canopies that do not overlap. They are dominated by Red Gum ( Eucalyptus blakelyi ), swamp gum, Manna Gum ( E. viminalis ), Grey Box ( E. microcarpa ), Yellow Box ( E. melliodora ), Yellow Gum ( E. leucoxylon ), Black Box ( E. largiflorens ), Silver Banksia ( Banksia marginata ), Buloke ( Allocasuarina luehmannii ) or native pines. Typically, only one or two species of tree are present. Shrubs may be present, but they will be sparsely distributed over a grassy ground layer (Barlow 1998).Ecological CommunitiesThe Golden Sun Moth has been recorded from the following ecological communities:White Box - Yellow Box - Blakely\'s Red Gum Grassy Woodlands and Derived Native Grasslands (Critically Endangered under the EPBC Act)Natural Temperate Grassland of the Southern Tablelands (ACT/NSW) (Endangered under the EPBC Act)Natural Grasslands of the Murray Valley Plains (Critically Endangered under the EPBC Act)Natural Temperate Grassland of the Victorian Volcanic Plain (Critically Endangered under the EPBC Act).','The view that the Golden Sun Moth larvae feed on Wallaby Grass is based on the presence of cast pupa shells and tunnels leading up to nearby Wallaby Grass tussocks (O\'Dwyer & Attiwill 2000). Cast pupa shells ahve also been found proturuding from introduced Chilean Needlegrass tussoks, suggesting that the species may also feed on this plant (Braby & Dranford 2006; A. Richter 2006, cited in DEWHA 2009p).','The key threats to the Golden Sun Moth are:the  loss  and  degradation  of Wallaby Grass-dominated native temperate grasslands within the species historical rangethe  loss  and  degradation  of open grassy woodlands where the ground layer is dominated by Wallaby Grasssoil disturbance at extant Golden Sun Moth sites.Other factors work in unison with key threats to further threaten the species, these include:the species\'  limited dispersal abilitypredation (Clarke & O\'Dwyer 2000).Habitat Loss   Native temperate grasslands are the most threatened of all vegetation types in Australia, having been cleared for urban development and agriculture, predomiNAtly free range grazing and broad-acre cropping (Kilpatrick 1995 cited in Clarke & O\'Dwyer 1999). Less than one per cent of the approximately 2 million hectares existing prior to European settlement still remains, much of which is heavily degraded by weed invasion and grazing by stock and rabbits (Clarke & O\'Dwyer 2000).Habitat Degradation   European land uses on native temperate grasslands have destroyed or greatly reduced the integrity of remaining grasslands. Such land uses involve:grazingtraffic and tramplingthe introduction of exotic species (including pasture species)inappropriate revegetation practicesintensive mowing and slashingpasture improvementuse of glyphosate-herbicidetree plantingurban development and infrastructure.Lack of Grazing   In the absence of biomass removal either by grazing/mowing or fire, tall perennial grasses, in particular Kangaroo Grass ( Themeda triandra ) and the introduced Chilean Needle Grass ( Nassella neesiana ) tend to dominate the vegetation resulting in a reduction of species diversity (Lunt & Morgan 1998 cited in Van Praagh 2004). Ungrazed areas become more dense and closed as a result of increased growth of domiNAt Kangaroo Grass ( Themeda triandra ). The low growing Wallaby Grass can become shaded and eventually choked out by taller native grasses and exotics (Van Praagh 2004).  Intensive Grazing   Continual grazing encourages weed invasion and degrades the native generation of a grassland (Barlow 1998).  Traffic and Trampling   Traffic and trampling on a grassland results in bare, compacted ground that is vulnerable to weed invasion, increased run-off and erosion. Vehicular traffic also assists in the seed dispersal of weeds (ACT Government 2005a).  Introduction of Exotic Species   Wallaby Grasses are readily out-competed by exotic plants, such as Phalaris and Paspalum or weeds like Serrated Tussock ( Nassella trichotoma ), thereby reducing habitat for the Golden Sun Moth (O\'Dwyer & Attiwill 1999). In the ACT, the following perennial and highly invasive weed species are of particular concern and are all the subject of weed control activities by land management agencies: African Lovegrass ( Eragrostis curvula ), Serrated Tussock ( Nassella trichotoma ), Chilean Needlegrass ( Nassella neesiana ) and St Johns Wort ( Hypericum perforatum ).  Inappropriate Revegetation Practices   With the growing interest in the collection and propagation of native seeds, concern has been raised about the genetic effects of the introduction of plants or seeds of the same species from another area (Eddy 2002 cited in ACT Government 2005a).  Mowing and Slashing   Mowing and slashing can be a threat to a native grassland if it prevents flowering and seed production by being undertaken too frequently or at the wrong time of the year. Mowing and slashing equipment can also transfer weed seeds and this is thought to be one of the means by which African Lovegrass and Chilean Needlegrass have been spread (Eddy 2002 cited in ACT Government 2005a). A major concern with mowing is that grass cuttings left on a site act as mulch and may inhibit inter-tussock forb growth (ACT Government2005a).  Pasture Improvement   The use of fertilisers, ploughing, changes to soil moisture and the use of herbicides may be detrimental to native temperate grassland.Wallaby Grasses are adapted to the relatively poor Australian soils and the application of phosphorous fertilisers has been shown to inhibit their growth while promoting the growth of weeds. Large increases in soil fertility can be toxic and increase soil acidity and this may have a detrimental effect on Wallaby Grasses and Golden Sun Moth larvae in the soil.Ploughing effectively destroys the root zone of the plant. Altered soil moisture conditions, including modified drainage can also result in a gradual reduction of grassland quality (Barlow 1998; DEC 2007; O\'Dwyer & Attiwill 1999 ).Use of Glyphosate-Herbicide   Glyphosate is not recommended for sites dominated by Wallaby Grass as it has been shown to have a detrimental effect on newly sown and established Wallaby Grass grassland (DPI 2000; Lodge & McMillan 1994b). Glyphosate is commonly used as a non-selective knockdown herbicide which means that, if the concentrate is strong enough, it can kill all plants on contact (Phillips 2000). Spray drift of glysophate has the potential to affect native species such as Wallaby Grasses depending on the amount and concentration used and application method (Eddy 2002 cited in ACT Government 2005a). Generally, established Wallaby Grass patches are tolerant of other mixtures, such as those containing paraquat/diaquat, diclopfop-methyl, simazine, fenozaprop-ethyl and diuron (DPI 2000; Lodge & McMillan 1994; Lodge et al. 1994).Tree Planting   Although tree planting is generally encouraged in areas of high salinity, it may be a threatening process for native temperate grasslands. Planting trees as an overstorey alters the ecological function and structure of the grassland because of the increased shading of native grasses. This may cause a reduction in cover of the native grasses, particularly Wallaby Grasses (O\'Dwyer et al. 2004).Soil Disturbance   Any physical disturbance to soil is particularly destructive for the Golden Sun Moth. Soil disturbance occurs through activities such as cultivation, ripping rabbit burrows, laying pipes and cables (ACT Government 2005a). Soil disturbance destroys the subterranean Golden Sun Moth larvae in addition to killing the native perennial grasses that are their host plants (Douglas 2004).Limited Dispersal Ability   As adult Golden Sun Moths do not fly more than 100 m away from suitable habitat, sites that have become extinct are unlikely to be recolonised. Fragmentation between reduces gene flow between populations, which may be a threat to particular sites (ACT Government 1998f; Clarke & Whyte 2003).Predation   A significant contributor to adult mortality may be the predation of adult moths by birds and predatory insects. At a NSW site (Rye Park), 11 adult males were taken by predation. Predatory birds include: Willie Wagtail ( Rhipidura leucophyrs ), Starling ( Sturnus vulgaris ), Welcome Swallow ( Hirundo neoxena ) and Magpie Lark ( Grallina cyanoleuca ). Predatory insects include the Robber Fly ( Asilidae  family) (Clarke & O\'Dwyer 2000).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25234'),('25289','Thaumatoperla alpina','Endangered','Insecta','Eustheniidae','The largest of the Australian stoneflies, the Alpine Stonefly\'s final instar (growth stage) nymphs reach 49 mm in length, excluding antennae and cerci (the paired appendage on the rear-most segment). Early stages of the nymphs have greenish gills and a green abdomen. Larger specimens are green-brown in colour, with a red tinge on the pronotum (the upper surface of the first thoracic segment). There can be some patterning on the pronotum (dorsal sclerite (hard part) of the prothorax), and the abdominal gills are creased (Hynes 1978 cited in TSSC 2011am). Adults are similar in size to the final instar nymphs, with light green to yellow-grey abdomens and blue-black wings. The pronotum and leg sockets around the thorax are orange to orange-red. There is a large black spot in the centre of the pronotum. Although they have wings, the adults are largely flightless (Brittain 1990 cited in TSSC 2011am).','The Alpine Stonefly inhabits high altitude areas at least 760 m above sea level, including areas above the treeline. The nymphs are most commonly found in steep, stony, cool streams, often below a cascade of water underneath cobblestones or detritus (Vic. DSE 2003at). Narrower streams of less than 1–2.5 m width are favoured and typically 1 m wide and around 15 cm deep (McKay et al. 2005). Nymphs are often found under bigger boulders or stones at these sites. When the nymphs have reached adulthood, they leave the water and inhabit the rocks and vegetation beside the streams (Crowther et al. 2008). They are often found on the Silky Daisy ( Celmisia sericophylla ), a plant that is endemic to the Bogong High Plains (Vic. DSE 2003at).Important habitat indicators for the Alpine Stonefly include streams with slower flows, narrower width (<1–2.5 m) and high oxygen content in the water, a vegetation structure of open eucalypt or alpine treeless heath (but not alpine grassland) and the presence of mayflies ( Mirawara  spp. and  Archeophylax  spp.) (Bryce 2001 cited in Crowther et al. 2008). First order streams within the Kiewa River catchment, higher than 760 m above sea level have been identified as important habitat for the the species (TSSC 2011am).','Omnivorous, the Alpine Stonefly ingests both animal and plant material, including nymphs and larvae of other insect species, plant detritus, lichen, diatoms and algae (Sephton & Hynes 1983; Vic. DSE 2003at). Nymphs are omnivores, eating both plant and animal material. In the absence of introduced Rainbow Trout ( Oncorhynchus mykiss ) and Brown Trout ( Salmo trutta ) the nymph is considered to be the top in-stream predator (Bryce 2001 cited in TSSC 2011al).','Fish predationRainbow Trout ( Oncorhynchus mykiss ) and Brown Trout ( Salmo trutta ) have been recorded in the east and west branches of the Kiewa River at altitudes in which the Alpine Stonefly occurs. It is likely that predation and competition with Rainbow Trout and Brown Trout is a threat to Alpine Stonefly nymphs at some sites (Crowther 2010 pers. comm. cited in TSSC 2010am). It is likely that the species\' distribution has been restricted as a result of past trout presence in previously suitable habitat. However, due to a lack of specific studies, there are no quantitative data to determine the past or future impact of trout predation on the species (TSSC 2010am).Degradation or destruction of habitatSki resort expansion has been identified as a major potential threat to the species. Discharge or drainage of water from ski resort developments and roads has the potential to cause species mortality through contamination of alpine streams. Snow making occurs extensively within the Falls Creek resort area where four populations of Alpine Stonefly are known to occur. Disturbance to in-stream habitat through changes in the chemical composition of the water from snow making is currently a potential threat to these populations (Brittain 1997).Timber harvesting is a potential threat to the four populations located within state forest. Currently, timber harvesting occurs within 10 km of these four populations. Timber harvesting could affect the species as a result of increased sedimentation in streams, increased water temperature and possibly the removal of riparian habitat (TSSC 2010am).FireIncreased fire intervals or intensity may result in increased stream sediment from ground runoff and a decline in water quality, the loss of streamside vegetation (and associated increase in water temperature) and an increase in the adult stonefly\'s risk of exposure to low night time temperatures and predation (Bryce 2001 cited in TSSC 2010am; Crowther et al. 2008). The species has been found at previously surveyed sites post two major fire events in 2003 and 2006, suggesting the extended nymph phase may protect many individuals from fire impacts (Crowther et al. 2008).Adult Alpine Stoneflies lives for two months following maturation and the species is susceptible to fire during this period. Fires that impact habitat as the adult emerges from their final nymph stage (in April) can deplete the breeding population and lead to its decline (McKay et al. 2005).Climate changeThe restricted habitat range of the Alpine Stonefly, and its limited dispersal ability, may reduce the species ability to withstand increases in water temperature or decreases in stream flow associated with climate change. Climate change is also predicted to reduce snow fall by 10–40% and this may see the loss of refuge habitats for the species (CSIRO 2006 cited in TSSC 2011am).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25289'),('254','Petauroides volans','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Petauridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=254'),('25545','Pluvialis fulva','','Aves','Charadriidae','The Pacific Golden Plover is a medium-sized (length 23–26 cm; weight: 120–175 g) plover with long legs and an upright stance. Sexes are generally inseparable, but juveniles are separable from adults in the field.','In non-breeding grounds in Australia this species usually inhabits coastal habitats, though it occasionally occurs around inland wetlands. Pacific Golden Plovers usually occur on beaches, mudflats and sandflats (sometimes in vegetation such as mangroves, low saltmarsh such as  Sarcocornia,  or beds of seagrass) in sheltered areas including harbours, estuaries and lagoons, and also in evaporation ponds in saltworks. The species is also sometimes recorded on islands, sand and coral cays and exposed reefs and rocks. They are less often recorded in terrestrial habitats, usually wetlands such as fresh, brackish or saline lakes, billabongs, pools, swamps and wet claypans, especially those with muddy margins and often with submerged vegetation or short emergent grass. Other terrestrial habitats inhabited include short (or, occasionally, long) grass in paddocks, crops or airstrips, or ploughed or recently burnt areas, and they are very occasionally recorded well away from water (Marchant & Higgins 1993). On its breeding grounds it occurs in tundra (Dement\'ev & Gladkov 1951).Feeding habitatThis species usually forages on sandy or muddy shores (including mudflats and sandflats) or margins of sheltered areas such as estuaries and lagoons, though it also feeds on rocky shores, islands or reefs. In addition, Pacific Golden Plovers occasionally forage among vegetation, such as saltmarsh, mangroves or in pasture or crops (Bransbury 1985; Evans 1975; Ewart 1973; Pegler 1983; Smith 1966; Thomas 1968).Roosting habitatThey usually roost near foraging areas, on sandy beaches and spits or rocky points, islets or exposed reefs, occasionally among or beneath vegetation including mangroves or low saltmarsh, or among beachcast seaweed. They sometimes also roost on levee banks and islands in evaporation ponds in saltworks (Bransbury 1985; Ewart 1973; Smith 1966; Thomas 1968; Patterson 1982; Pegler 1983; Prendergast et al. 1985).Breeding habitatBreeding occurs in dry areas of tundra away from the coast, including upland and montane tundra, usually on slopes of low hills, knolls or foothills vegetated with lichen and moss, or in bare, stony areas. Some sites are near vegetated areas with shrubs, and although usually above the treeline, they very occasionally breed in forest tundra (Cramp & Simmons 1983; Dement\'ev & Gladkov 1951; Wiersma 1996). After the young hatch, they move to moister habitats, such as  Sphagnum  swamps (Cramp & Simmons 1983).The species does not rely on a listed threatened ecological community.','During the non-breeding season, Pacific Golden Plovers mainly eat molluscs, polychaete worms, insects and insect larvae, spiders and crustaceans (Domm & Recher 1973; Evans 1975; Frith & Calaby 1974; Vestjens 1977c). They are also said to very occasionally eat seeds, leaves, lizards, birds\' eggs and small fish (Marchant & Higgins 1993). During the breeding season in the tundra of the Northern Hemisphere, berries are also an important source of food (Bent 1962; Wiersma 1996).This species forages both diurnally and nocturnally, gleaning and probing moist mud or sand for invertebrate prey on mudflats, saltmarsh, in wave-wash, among tide-wrack on beaches and in pasture (Marchant & Higgins 1993). They usually forage by running, then pausing briefly, then pecking the substrate (Evans 1975). They forage singly or in flocks of up to 100 or more (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','Though there are no threats that apply specifically to Pacific Golden Plovers, there are a number of threats that will affect all migratory waders.Australia  Pollution, including industrial and discharge nutrient hyperenrichment, with subsequent eutrophication, adversely affects the number of micro-organisms which occur in the benthos of the littoral zone, which, in turn, affects the efficiency of feeding by species such as the Pacific Golden Plover (Harding et al. 2007; Straw 1992a). It may also affect the Plovers directly through the accumulation of heavy metals, insecticides, herbicides and similar pollutants in their tissues. Conversely, efforts to increase the efficiency of treating effluent before it is released into the greater environment may result in lower levels of bacteria and invertebrates and their larvae which constitute a major proportion of the diet of the Pacific Golden Plover.With increasing tourist visitation along the coasts of NSW, Queensland and around Broome, Western Australia, and subsequent development, increasing levels of disturbance from human recreation are likely. Residential or other development of saltworks or land adjacent to mudflats near the outskirts of built-up areas (for example in areas along the western shores of Port Phillip Bay, or Botany Bay) results in a reduction of suitable habitat for the species and increased levels of disturbance (Straw 1992a).The spread of introduced plants, such as cord grass  Spartinia , can invade intertidal mudflats and reduce the amount of suitable areas to forage, as it has in other countries (Goss-Custard & Moser 1988).Elsewhere   There are a number of threats that affect migratory waders in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat facing waders is habitat loss, both direct and indirect (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for future development (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007). In many suitable staging areas along the East Asian-Australasian Flyway many intertidal areas have been reclaimed, and the process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c; Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows, which compound the problem (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998; Melville 1997).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Wei et al. 2006).Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).The biological characteristic of the species which poses a key threat to its survival is that it regularly flies for thousands of kilometres over densely populated areas of the world. The huge human population in East Asia places enormous pressure on natural resources, and manifests itself in activities such as the reclamation of mudflats, which has seriously detrimental effects on populations of migratory waders (Barter 2002, 2005c).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25545'),('25570','Ctenotus zastictus','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Scincidae','A blackish reptile growing to 6 cm with dark-brown head and tail, broad black vertebral stripe narrowly edged with white, narrow white back-sides stripe from eye to tail bordered by a broad black upper zone containing pale spots/blotches, narrow side stripe from ear to groin and separated from a pale lower side stripe by a black zone, brown limbs striped with paler brown and whitish underbelly (Cogger 2000).','Restricted to an isolated belt of mallee vegetation, consisting of a  Eucalyptus  overstorey with an understorey of hummock grassland ( Triodia  sp.), on red sandplains (Storr 1984; L. Smith in Cogger  et al . 1993). The area of occupied habitat is no more than 150 km², being isolated from other suitable habitat by the surrounding  Acacia  shrubland (Storr 1984; G. Shea in Cogger  et al . 1993).','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25570'),('25906','Zyzomys maini','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Muridae','The Arnhem Rock-rat is a large (100–150 g) grey rat distinguishable from most other Northern Territory rodents by its large whiskers, typically swollen tail (especially at the base), and the characteristic Roman nose. The tail is up to 15 cm long, and the tip is covered in long hairs. These features are similar to those of the  much smaller (30–70 g) Common Rock-rat ( Z. argurus ), but the species can be can be distinguished by size, colour (the Arnhem Rock-rat is typically more grey than brown), and the higher density of long hairs on the tail (Fleming 1995; Woinarski 2006).','The Arnhem Rock-rat occurs in rugged sandstone environments, typically where there are many caves, crevices or boulders. The species occurs in association with monsoon rainforest, typically in areas which are floristically-rich and provide the fleshy fruits and seeds that form its principal food items (Begg 1981; Begg et al. 1981; Begg & Dunlop 1985; Kerle & Burgman 1984; Woinarski 2000, 2004c; Woinarski et al. 1992). The Arnhem Rock-rat has only been recorded on sandstone, and preferentially in steeply sloping areas where there are large boulders, or cliff faces with cracks, caves and crevices (Begg 1981; Calaby 1973; Woinarski et. al. 1992; Woinarski 2004). This environment offers some topographic protection from fire, and because of this often supports a fire-sensitive rainforest community (Russell-Smith et al. 1993). Arnhem Rock-rats are particularly associated with this community (Begg 1981). DomiNAt plant species in this community can be very diverse (Bowman et al. 1990; Dunlop & Begg 1981; Russell-Smith et al. 1993), with the most extensive domiNAt tree in the plateau of western Arnhem Land being the myrtaceous evergreen  Allosyncarpia ternata  (Russell-Smith et al. 1993).The total area of monsoon rainforest patches dominated by  Allosyncarpia ternata  in the sandstone plateau of western Arnhem Land covers about 1140 km² (Russell-Smith et al. 1993). Other monsoon rainforest types on the plateau are far less extensive and probably add to less than 100 km² (J. Woinarski 2004, pers. comm.).Arnhem Rock-rats may also use other habitats adjoining rainforest, including sandstone heathlands and hummock grasslands (Begg 1981; Woinarski et al. 1992). The intricate mix of these environments, as a consequence of the complex topography of western Arnhem Land, may be an important factor in defining habitat suitability and persistence of Arnhem Rock-rats. A range of locally available environments may help maintain access to resources across the year (Begg 1981; Freeland et al. 1988). Arnhem Rock-rats do not occur in rainforests outside of rocky areas (Menkhorst & Woinarski 1992), possibly because these offer less shelter to the entirely terrestrial rock-rats.The Arnhem Rock-rat often co-occurs with the smaller Common Rock-rat ( Z. argurus ), but this latter species has a far broader ecological range and geographic distribution (Begg 1981; Calaby 1973; Kerle & Burgman 1984; Woinarski et al. 1992). The Arnhem Rock-rat may be especially vulnerable to fire, and may use scree slopes as refugia during and after fire. For example, a study that examined the species\' response to an experimental fire found that the Arnhem Rock-rat was most common in rainforest habitats prior to fire. A single experimental fire was then allowed to burn. The fire had a major impact on plants in this environment, but a less severe impact in adjacent scree slopes. In the 12 months after the fire, this species declined dramatically in the burnt rainforest, but increased in the less severely burnt scree slope (Begg 1981).More broadly, the Arnhem Rock-rat\'s entire current range can be considered refuge habitat, as it is associated with rainforest pockets that are largely remNAts of a wetter climatic period, but are now almost entirely restricted to sites offering unusual moisture availability and/or protection from frequent fire (Bowman & Woinarski 1994; Russell-Smith et al. 1993).  The Arnhem Rock-rat is not part of any currently listed threatened ecological community. However, it is associated (co-occurring and in similar habitat) with the following EPBC Act listed threatened species:Flora  -  Boronia quadrilata, B. viridiflora, Sauropus filicinus .Fauna  - Masked Owl (northern) ( Tyto novaehollandiae kimberli) , Gouldian Finch ( Erythrura gouldiae)  and Golden-backed Tree-rat ( Mesembriomys macrurus) .The Arnhem Rock-rat is also known to occur in association with the following species listed as threatened under Northern Territory legislation:Flora  -  Cephalomanes obscurum, Hibiscus brenNAi .Fauna  -  Egernia obiri Morelia oenpelliensis) Dromaius novaehollandiae Erythrotriorchis radiatus) Amytornis woodwardi) Dasyurus hallucatus) Phascogale tapoatafa pirata) Hipposideros inornata Conilurus penicillatus','The diet of the Arnhem Rock-rat comprises fruits and seeds collected on the ground. Seeds from at least 11 plant species have been reported in the diet, mostly from plants occurring in rainforests. Seed availability was lowest in the wet season (Begg & Dunlop 1980).  The Arnham Rock-rat may collect and eat seeds in a secure location, but is not known to stockpile (Begg 1981; Begg & Dunlop 1980, 1985). Fires may greatly reduce the store of seeds on the ground, and delay or reduce subsequent fruiting and seeding (Begg et al. 1981).','There are a number of threatening processes operating in monsoon rainforest in the sandstone plateau area. The condition of this area was assessed by Russell-Smith and Bowman (1992). These authors noted that 67% of the sandstone monsoon forests within reserved areas were \"severely disturbed\"\" by fire',' 47% \"\"severely disturbed\"\" by feral buffalo and/or cattle'),('25907','Zyzomys palatalis','Endangered','Mammalia','Muridae','The Carpentarian Rock-rat is a small rodent with grey-brown fur. Growing to an average body length of 19.7 cm and weighing up to 136 g, the Carpentarian Rock-rat has a carrot shaped relatively hairy tail in which fat deposits are stored. The tail grows to approximately 15 cm long and has longer hairs at the tip (Puckey et al. 2004, Strahan 1998). As with other Rock-rats, the Carpentarian Rock-rat is known to lose its tail, fur and skin very easily (Puckey et al. 2004) and the species is often captured with a broken off tail forming a stump (Puckey & Woinarksi 2006).','Boulder-fields and thicketsThe Carpentarian Rock-rat is a nocturnal rodent, sheltering during the day in cracks between boulders, caves and crevices (Begg and Dunlop 1980; 1985, cited in Puckey et al. 2003). The main habitat requirements of the Carpentarian Rock-rat appear to be large, rugged, sandstone gorges with scree and rock slopes covered with dry monsoon vine thicket and woodland (Lee 1995; Trainor et al. 2000).Spring waterPopulations are often within 100 m of permanent spring water. Vine thicket species including  Ficus virens, F. platypoda, Gyrocarpus americanus, Owenia vernicosa, Terminalia carpentariae, Pouteria sericea, Celtis philippinensis  and  BuchaNAia obovata  with an understorey of vines  Caesalpinea bonduc, Opilia amentacea, Pisonia aculeata  and  Sarcostemma australe . The surrounding vegetation is predominently  Eucalyptus papuana/E. miniata  woodland with  Plectrachne pungens  understorey (Lee 1995).','The species has been recorded eating seeds of  Terminalia carpentariae ,  Pandanus aquaticus ,  Livistona inermis  and  Owenia vernicosa  (Churchill 1996). Faecal analysis indicates that 84% of the Carpentarian Rock-rat\'s diet consists of fruits and dicotyledon seeds (seeds containing two embryonic leaves) (Puckey et al. 2004). Its large incisors allow it to chew through the woody nuts of many of these species to access the kernel, and distinctively chewed nuts are a characteristic sign of its presence. This diet is common to all the rock-rats, and information from the more intensively-studied Arnhem Land Rock-rat is probably generally applicable to the Carpentarian Rock-rat (Puckey et al. 2003).','Land TenureAs all locations are on a single pastoral lease and no known populations exist inside reserves, the security of the species is considered poor (Woinarski 2000). The species is likely to disperse along creeklines in known habitat, and may colonize surrounding gorges, therefore the protection of these areas is essential to maintain or recover the species (Bowman et al. 2006).Whilst population numbers have been reported to have increased in the past 50 years (Bowman et al. 2006), the habitat patches that the Carpentarian Rock-rat occurs in are still limited. As these habitat patches provide rich resources for the Carpentarian rock-rat, it can occur in high densities in the known patches.Frequent firesAnnual and more frequent fires are considered a threat to the monsoonal rainforest habitat and many individuals (Churchill 1996, Puckey et al. 2004). Population viability analysis by Brook and colleagues (2002) predicted the species\' sensitivity to frequent, hot, late dry-season fires, with the progressive habitat degradation likely to substantially reduce the overall population size and lead to the probable extinction of the species within 100 years, though data from Bowman and colleagues (2006) suggests habitat loss has not been so severe.Exotic speciesOther threats to this species include grazing by feral animals and stock and weed intrusion (Puckey et al. 2004), and it is reported the habitat is also under threat from feral pigs (Churchill 1996).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25907'),('25909','Arctocephalus tropicalis','Endangered','Mammalia','Otariidae','The subantarctic fur seal is a small, carnivorous marine mammal. This species is sexually dimorphic, with adult males being up to 2 m long and weighing 70-165 kg. Adult females are 1-1.5 m long and weigh 25-67 kg with a mean of around 50 kg. Newborns weigh 4-6 kg (Goldsworthy & Shaughnessy 1995a; Laws 1993 cited in DEH 2003g).','The subantarctic fur seal utilises rocky coastal habitat containing rock platforms and beaches with exposed boulders (Bester 1982; Goldsworthy and Shaughnessy 1995a cited in DEH 2003g).  At Macquarie Island, breeding seals occur on rocky shores, and non-breeding seals also utilise tussock slopes above the colonies (Shaughnessy et al. 1988a). Where the subantarctic fur seal and the Antarctic fur seal are sympatric on breeding beaches at Macquarie Island, females of the former species prefer rocky shores and Antarctic fur sealfemales prefer cobble beaches (Goldsworthy et al. 1999). Suitable terrestrial habitat on Macquarie Island can be found at Secluded Beach and Goat Bay on North Head Peninsula (Shaughnessy 1999). There is potential for animals to utilise other rocky beaches elsewhere on the island (Robinson et al. 2002).  Important feeding habitat for the species includes the waters immediately surrounding Macquarie Island (Copson et al. 1994 cited in DEH 2003g), where females occasionally feed while nursing. Two important feeding areas for lactating cows have been identified at 30 and 100 km north of Macquarie Island (Robinson et al 2002 cited in DEH 2003g). These waters adjacent to breeding colonies are also used for access to land, for respite and refuge,  and these waters may have importance for pups learning to swim and feed in the shallows (DEH 2003g).','Subantarctic fur seals are opportunistic and pelagic foragers. They feed on myctophid and notothenid fish, cephalopods, and small numbers of crustaceans at the Prince Edwards Islands (Klages & Bester 1998 cited in Hofmyer & Kovacs 2008) and Macquarie Island (Robinson et al. 2002 cited in DEH 2003g). The subantarctic fur-seal forages mainly at night on surface, mid-water and bottom-dwelling fish, squid and octopus. The diet varies seasonally and according to location.  This species is known to forage at oceanographic frontal zones where food is expected to be most abundant. At Macquarie Island, lactating cows concentrated their foraging trips in two areas; 30km and 100 km north of the Island (Robinson 2002 cited in DEH 2003g; Robinson et al. 2002 cited in DEH 2003g). Shorter, overnight trips are usually within 10 km of the island. Lactating cows are estimated to have nutritional needs 1.5-1.8 times those of non-lactating females (Costa 1991 cited in DEH 2003g).','Historical threats On Macquarie Island, between 1810 and 1820, approximately 193 300 fur seals were harvested. By 1850, Fur Seals were overharvested almost to extinction on the Island (Gerber & Hilborn 2001).Potential ThreatsFishing PracticesThere are two fisheries operating in the Australian Subantarctic, both of which are managed by the Australian Fisheries Management Authority (AFMA). They are the Heard Island and McDonald Islands Fisheries (HIMI), and the Macquarie Island Fishery. Both are directed at Patagonian Toothfish ( Dissostichus eleginoides ), however Mackerel Icefish ( Champsocephalus gunnari ) are also targeted in the HIMI. Two vessels operate in the HIMI and one operates in the Macquarie Island Fishery. Fishery observers are present, and information on these fisheries is collated by the AFMA (2001). Few seals have been caught by these fishing vessels. In four years of fishing, the HIMI has caught two seal skeletons, one dead Antarctic Fur Seal and a live specimen that was released.According to the 2004 recovery plan for this species there is low potential for sub-Antarctic fur seals to interact with fisheries. Operational interactions between seals and fisheries are well informed in sub-Antarctic fisheries but biological interactions are not well understood. As seal populations recover, the likelihood of interaction with mainland fisheries will increase (DEH 2003g).Oil SpillsSeveral ships visit Macquarie Island each summer to re-supply the Australian Antarctic Division base. The large quantities of fuel pumped ashore near the main seal colony (at Secluded Beach), just north of the base, presents a possible hazard. Tour ships also visit these Islands and are another potential source of oil spills (Shaughnessy 1999). There is potential for increases visitation to the reserve, but the management and timing of visits currently affords protection to the seals (DEH 2003g). Climate change Fur seals are highly sensitive to changes in sea surface temperature. A 1% increase in sea surface temperature can result in a greater than 10% reduction in fecundity (Goldsworthy et al. 2002b cited in DEH 2003g). Global warming may be a threat to seals if it drives fur seal prey to greater depths or locations far from breeding colobies (Trillmich and Ono 1991 cited in DEH 2003g).Genetic Swamping Hybrids between the Antarctic, New Zealand and sub-Antarctic fur seal has occurred at a number of sites (including Macquarie Island) and may threaten the integrity of the species (Shaughnessy 1999).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25909'),('25911','Pseudocheirus occidentalis','Critically Endangered','Mammalia','Petauridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25911'),('25931','Delma mitella','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Pygopodidae','A reddish-brown lizard growing to 8 cm with pale yellow/white underbody, darker top of head with four narrow pale cream cross-bands edged with black; lower lips, throat and belly without darker markings and scales in 16 rows at mid-body (Cogger 2000).','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25931'),('25934','Anomalopus mackayi','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Five-clawed Worm-skink,  Anomalopus mackayi , is a medium sized species of the Scincidae family. It is a burrowing skink which is characterised by three fingers and two toes and grows up to 27 cm long. It has smooth scales with an overall greyish-brown upper body with longitudinal rows of dark spots. The ventral surface is yellow-green with dark flecking. In the southern region of its range the Five-clawed Worm-skink is unpatterned, while in the north of its range, it has longitudinal rows of dark spots over the dorsal and lateral surfaces (Cogger 2000; Queensland EPA 2007b).','The Five-clawed Worm-skink is known to occur in both remNAt and non-remNAt woodlands and grasslands. In areas modified by agriculture and other human activities, the species has been found sheltering under artificial materials lying flat on the ground, such as discarded railway sleepers, sheet metal and hay bales (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Richardson 2006).New South WalesHabitat on the floodplainsOn the floodplains within its range in north-eastern New South Wales, the Five-clawed Worm-skink occurs in grasslands and grassy, open woodlands on heavy black and grey, alluvial cracking clay soils from 135–200 m above sea level (NSW DECCW 2005ab; Sadlier & Pressey 1994; Spark 2010).During dry periods, the species is likely to shelter where moisture is available. For example, they may take refuge in deep cracks within alluvial clay soils. Sufficient rainfall following extended dry conditions is likely to bring the skink to the surface (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).The species has been recorded in (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010):grasslands dominated by Mitchell Grass ( Astrebla  spp.)River Red Gum ( Eucalyptus camaldulensis ) - Coolibah ( E. coolabah  subsp . coolabah ) - Bimble/Poplar Box ( E. populnea  subsp.  bimbil ) - Weeping Myall ( Acacia pendula ) grassy woodlands to open forests with grasses typically of the genera  Austrodanthonia ,  Austrostipa ,  Bothriochloa ,  Chloris ,  Enteropogon  and  Themeda .Floodplain surveys have shown, however, that the species has no preference for particular vegetation types on alluvial cracking clays. Cracking clay soils on the Namoi and Gwydir floodplains support a wide variety of vegetation communities which can be considered suitable habitat for the Five-clawed Worm-skink (Spark 2010).Habitat on the lower western slopes of the Great Dividing RangeOn the lower north-western slopes of the Great Dividing Range in New South Wales, the species occurs in White Box ( Eucalyptus albens ) and sometimes ironbark-mixed, grassy woodland on self mulching, friable, basalt derived, red-black to black clay-loam soils.  The species has been found occurring in burrows in open paddocks with few trees, cropped grass and moist black soil (Sadlier & Pressey 1994; Spark 2010; Swan 1990). Shea and colleagues (1987) found five specimens under logs in open paddocks surrounded by open eucalypt woodland, and one specimen under a log in a largely cleared woodland in the vicinity of granite outcrops.MicrohabitatThe species shelters at the soil surface where moisture is sufficiently retained under decaying leaf litter, coarse woody debris or artificial debris. The species also lives in cavities in rotting tree bases, logs and in tussock bases. It is known to dig permanent tunnel-like burrows in loose, friable, humic soils in woodlands on slight basalt rises (NSW DECCW 2005ab; Sadlier & Pressey 1994).QueenslandOn the Darling Downs, the species occurs in Bluegrass ( Dichanthium sericeum ) and/or Mitchell Grass  dominated grasslands or mixed grasslands dominated by other grass species, but still categorised as Queensland Regional Ecosystem (RE) 11.3.21 (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010). In south-east Queensland, the species may occur in River Red Gum–Queensland Blue Gum–Coolibah–Bimble/Poplar Box grassy woodland/open forests (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).Whilst a single specimen was found under a railway sleeper on sandy soil north of Oakey (Cogger et al. 1993), the species is not likely to be found in soils in which deep cracks do not form, such as hard-setting brown clays or sandy soils types (Spark 2010).For more information on Queensland Regional Ecosystems, please visit the Queensland Department of Environment and Resource Management website at  http://www.derm.qld.gov.au/wildlife-ecosystems/biodiversity/regional_ecosystems/ .The Five-clawed Worm-skink occurs in (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010):Bluegrass and/or Mitchell Grass dominated grassland (RE 11.3.21), which may correspond to the EPBC Act listed Critically Endangered Natural Grasslands on Basalt and Fine-textured Alluvial Plains of Northern New South Wales and Southern Queensland ecological community, depending on the listing criteria.Coolibah - Bimble/Poplar Box and Weeping Myall grassy woodlands which may correspond to the EPBC Act listed Coolibah - Black Box Woodlands of the Darling Riverine Plains and the Brigalow Belt South Bioregions.White Box Grassy Woodland which may correspond to the EPBC Act listed Critically Endangered White Box-Yellow Box-Blakely\'s Red Gum Grassy Woodland and Derived Native Grassland ecological community, depending on the listing criteria.Myall Woodland which corresponds to the EPBC Act listed Weeping Myall Woodlands ecological community, depending on the listing criteria.Brigalow ( Acacia harpophylla  domiNAt and co-domiNAt) EPBC Act listed ecological community.','No information is available about the species\' feeding behaviour in the wild; however, it is believed to feed on arthropods, such as white ants. Captive specimens have been recorded eating mealworms (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; NSW DECCW 2005ab).','The Five-clawed Worm-skink has undergone decline in the past few decades. A number of factors that may contribute to this decline have been identified as (Cogger et al. 1993; NSW DECCW 2005ab; TSN 2008b):Land clearingLand clearing for agriculture has been particularly severe within the species\' range (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).OvergrazingOvergrazing is known to compact soil, making it difficult for the species to find suitable shelter (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).Removal of ground debrisThe removal of ground litter, fallen timber and logs reduces soil humidity. This means the soils are drier, making it harder for the species to access suitable habitat. Removing logs and timber also reduces the amount of shelter available for the species (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).Use of agricultural chemicalsAgricultural chemicals may poison and pollute the soil which may adversely affect the species (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010).Feral speciesPredation by feral species, such as cats and foxes, is a threat facing much of Australia\'s native wildlife including the Five-clawed Worm-skink (NSW NPWS 1999av).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25934'),('25959','Litoria spenceri','Endangered','Amphibia','Hylidae','NA','Most populations of the Spotted Tree Frog occurred in dissected, mountainous country, generally in areas with limited access and disturbance (Gillespie & Hollis 1996). It is found almost exclusively in association with rock habitats along streams (Gillespie & Hollis 1996).The Spotted Tree Frog is associated with a range of vegetation communities from montane forest at high altitudes to wet and dry forest at moderate to low altitudes respectively. The extent of riparian (river-associated) forest at known localities ranges from virtually non-existent, with scattered riparian tree or shrub species, to a dense canopy of tea trees,  Leptospermum  spp., shading the stream. It occurs along sections of streams with steep banks, invariably in steeply dissected country or gorges with numerous rapids and waterfalls. The Spotted Tree Frog is restricted to riffle and cascade stream sections with exposed rock banks, resulting in a highly patchy distribution along most streams (Gillespie & Hollis 1996). Adults and juveniles are most likely remain in the vicinity of the stream, rarely venturing far from the riparian zone. Tadpoles occur predomiNAtly in slow-flowing sections of streams, usually associated with the shallow margins of water courses (Gillespie 1997). Tadpoles have rarely been found in isolated streamside pools (Gillespie 1997; Hero et al. 1995).','Adult Spotted Tree Frogs appear to be generalist insectivores, feeding on a variety of flying insects (Ehmann et al. 1992). Tadpoles are benthic browsers, and appear to graze on filamentous algae, scraping periphyton from rocks, and eating benthic detritus (Gillespie 2002).','Spotted Tree Frog numbers declined in the 1970s and early 1980s (Watson et al. 1991). Gillespie & Hollis (1996) suggest that, based upon the known demography of the Spotted Tree Frog, this species probably suffered population declines over a wider area earlier in the 20th century, and possibly late in the 19th century.Disease is a distinct possibility as a cause of decline of the Spotted Tree Frog (NSW NPWS 2001). During the 1995-1996 breeding season, several dead and sick frogs were collected in Bogong Creek, and found to be infected with chytrid fungus. Furthermore, of 90 toe samples collected at the site over the period 1993-1996 from apparently healthy frogs, two were found to be infected with chytrid fungus, and both were collected shortly before the population crash in March 1996 (Gillespie & Marantelli 2000). Sick and dead frogs have been located from a further three populations and identified as being infected with the chytrid fungus (Berger et al. 1998; Gillespie & Hines 1999).Chytridiomycosis, caused by chytrid fungus, is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (AGDEH 2006o).Two exotic fish species, Rainbow Trout  Oncorhynchus mykiss  and Brown Trout  Salmo trutta  occur throughout the distribution of the Spotted Tree Frog and eat many larvae (tadpoles) (Gillespie 2001b). Trout are believed to be a major cause of population declines of this species (Gillespie & Hero 1999; Gillespie 2001b).Disturbances to streams, such as gold dredging, forestry, forest roads and recreational pressures are correlated with the general pattern of decline of the Spotted Tree Frog (Gillespie & Hollis 1996). Specifically, activities in water catchments that increase the amount of sediment in streams may have contributed to the decline of the Spotted Tree Frog (Gillespie 2002). Gillespie (2002) found that raising tadpoles in water containing more sediment reduced their growth rate and development. His experiments indicated that too much sediment in the water reduces food quality for tadpoles.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25959'),('25960','Mixophyes fleayi','Endangered','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','Fleay\'s Frog is a large fossorial frog growing to 90 mm (snout-vent length 63 to 89 mm) with a steeply sloped, blunt snout. The dorsal surface is light to dark brown with indistinct darker marbling. A dark brown Y-shaped vertebral band with irregular edges starts between the eyes and extends to the vent, sometimes breaking up into a series of blotches along the mid-line. The sides are grey-brown, fading to yellow posteriorly and overlaid by a series of black spots. There is an irregular dark band running from the nostrils through the eye to a point behind the tympanum. There is a dark purple patch beneath the eye. The upper lip is usually mottled brown. The ventral surfaces of the body and limbs are typically yellow, the throat and underside of the thighs may be speckled with brown. The vocal sac is present in males. The soles and palms are black. The thighs are grey-brown, with 7 to 8 narrow, black cross-bands (Barker et al. 1995, Cogger 1996, 2000; Corben and Ingram 1987, Meyer et al. 2001)','Fleay\'s Frog is associated with montane rainforest (Corben & Ingram 1987) and open forest communities adjoining rainforest (Hines 2001, pers. comm.). The species occurs along stream habitats from first to third order streams (i.e. small streams close to their origin through to permanent streams with grades of 1 in 50) and is not found in ponds or ephemeral pools. Adults may be found in leaf litter and along watercourses in rainforest and adjoining wet sclerophyll forests (Hines & SEQTFRT 2002). At some locations where the species has been recorded, riparian vegetation has been disturbed and replaced by weeds, however this is considered marginal habitat (Mahony et al. 1997). Tadpoles do occur with several species of native fish, however no introduced fish species have been observed in sympatry with this species (Hines unpubl. data, pers. comm. 2001; Mahony et al. 1997).In Queensland, important habitat has been defined as: \'permanent and semi-permanent freshwater streams, between 100-1000 m in altitude, in rainforest and other forest communities of the McPherson, Main and Conondale Ranges, Mt Tamborine, and the Mistake and Bunya Mountains\' (Hines & SEQTFRT 2002).','NA','The reason(s) for the decline or disappearance of Fleay\'s Frog populations are not known. Large areas of the species\' habitat have been and continue to be degraded by feral animals (e.g. pigs in the Conondale Range), domestic stock (Main Range) and invasion of weeds (i.e. Mistflower  Ageratina riparia  and crofton weed  A. adenophora ) (Hines et al. 1999). Upstream clearing, timber harvesting and urban development (e.g. Mt Tamborine) are all likely to have affected flow regimes and water quality (Hines et al. 1999). A chytrid fungal infection has been identified as the cause of illness and death of Fleay\'s Frog on Main Range and Lamington Plateau (Berger et al. 1998; Speare & Berger 2000), and investigation of the role of chytrid fungus in the decline of the species is a focus of its recovery program (Hines & SEQTFRT 2002).Chytridiomycosis, caused by the chytrid fungus, is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (DEH 2006).Damage from feral pigs has increased greatly in recent years (Hines & SEQTFRT 2002). While there is potential for direct predation by pigs, the greatest impact is likely to be from increased silt on embryos and tadpoles (Hines & SEQTFRT 2002). Trampling by domestic stock is likely to have deleterious impacts on oviposition sites of the species (Knowles et al. 1998).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25960'),('25977','Ceyx azureus diemenensis','Endangered','Aves','Alcedinidae','The Tasmanian Azure Kingfisher is a small kingfisher approximately 16–19 cm in length, weighing about 40 g and with a wingspan of 25–29 cm. The subspecies has a long slender black bill and a short tail, red legs and feet, and only two forward toes, with one rear toe. The head, neck, upper parts and breast sides are deep royal blue to azure blue with a violet sheen. The neck has a distinctive orange stripe on each side and there is a small orange spot before each eye. The throat is pale orange-white, grading to orange-reddish on the belly and undertail. The flanks and sides of the breast are washed purple to violet. The lores (the region between the eye and bill on the side of the head) are white and inconspicuous except in front view, where they stand out as two large eye-like white spots. The eyes are dark brown. Sexes are similar, and young birds can be distinguished by their darker cap and generally duller colouring (Higgins 1999; Hollands 1999; Morcombe 2003; Schodde & Mason 1997; Shields 1994).','The Azure Kingfisher occurs mainly along the forested margins of major river systems of the west and north-west coast of Tasmania, in areas that provide foraging and breeding habitat. A wide range of forest types are utilised, but mainly wet sclerophyll eucalypt forest with broad-leaved and rainforest shrub understorey (Green 1995; Harris & Kitchener 2005). Birds are often found in shady areas, and often amongst overhanging, vegetation of riverine forests dominated by wet sclerophyll and mixed forests supporting mainly eucalypt species (Green 1995). Sightings on atypical habitat have occurred on salt-sprayed offshore rocks (Bass Pyramid) and bare intertidal mudflat (Wapstra et al. 2010).','The Tasmanian Azure Kingfisher habitually is seen to use favoured sites and perches for fishing, for periods of a few days or weeks at an ephemeral pool and up to five years on a permanent stream (Hollands 1999). The subspecies mostly catches prey by shallow plunging from perches 1–10 m high that overhang rivers and streams (Higgins 1999; Hollands 1999; Shields 1994).The Tasmanian Azure Kingfisher feeds on small fish, freshwater crayfish, aquatic insects and occasionally amphibians. It occasionally forages on the ground, taking beetles and other terrestrial insects (Higgins 1999; Hollands 1999; Shields 1994). Whitebait (e.g.  Galaxias  spp.) and trout fingerlings are suggested as important food resources for the subspecies at many Tasmanian sites, with anecdotal evidence from ferry operators on the Arthur River that the subspecies is more prevalent in the lower reaches of the river during the time of the whitebait run. Individual birds have also been seen feeding on small fish backed up in in-stream obstructions, such as weirs or willow infested sites along the Mersey River and Deep Creek (Wapstra et al. 2010).','The following table outlines threats to the Tasmanian Azure Kingfisher:ThreatRiskDetailsHabitat clearingPotentialClearing along stream banks (including logging), which could affect stream health, may have contributed to a decline in the subspecies, including localised extinctions (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Tas. DPIPWE 2009). Legislation now entails buffer zones along river and stream banks (Michaelis 1984).Acid mine drainagePotentialHiggins (1999) states that \"acidic runoff from tailings dams in Tasmania may adversely affect local populations.\"\" Some of the worst affected river systems within its current range are not known to be inhabited by the subspecies',' suggesting that acid mine drainage may make some portions of river systems unsuitable for the subspecies (Tas. DPIPWE 2009). Quantifying the past'),('25978','Cereopsis novaehollandiae grisea','Vulnerable','Aves','Anatidae','The Cape Barren Goose (south-western) is a large bird that, when fully grown, measures 72–85 cm in length. In captivity, males reach 6.0–7.8 kg in weight, and females 4.9–5.7 kg (Johnstone & Storr 1998). The adults are grey with a cream-white patch on the top of the head, dark grey to black spots across the back and shoulders, black ends to the primary and secondary feathers, and a black tail. They also have brown irides (or irises), pink legs, grey-black to black feet, and a black bill that has a large patch of greenish-yellow (Johnstone & Storr 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1990). Adult males and adult females are alike, but adult females are slightly smaller than adult males and can be distinguished by their calls (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Immature birds appear similar to the adults, but have a whitish-grey patch on the head, grey-brown spots on the shoulders, paler lime-green colouring on the bill, and paler purplish-grey colouring on the legs (Johnstone & Storr 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1990). The Cape Barren Goose (south-western) occurs singly, in pairs, and in small flocks (at least some of which are family groups) (Halse et al. 1995; Johnstone & Storr 1998; Shaughnessy & Haberley 1994; Storr 1991).','There is little published information available on the habitat of the Cape Barren Goose (south-western). It occurs on offshore islands and rocks, and at adjacent sites on the mainland. It inhabits grasslands and low fields of succulent herbs (comprised of  Carpobrotus  sp.), and occasionally occurs in open areas in taller and denser vegetation (although islands that are covered by woodlands or thickets support few birds) (Halse et al. 1995; Johnstone & Storr 1998). The bird has also been recorded on beaches (Halse et al. 1995), and near lakes and freshwater \'soaks\', on the mainland (Halse et al. 1995; Jaensch et al. 1988; Shaughnessy & Haberley 1994).The Cape Barren Goose (south-western) does not occur in any of the threatened ecological communities listed under the EPBC Act 1999. It is not known to associate with any other threatened species listed under the EPBC Act 1999.','The Cape Barren Goose (south-western) forages on the ground and takes food items from herbage (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The diet of the subspecies consists of leaves (including those of  Rhagodia baccata ) and seeds (including those of  Myoporum insulare ) (Boden 1980; Johnstone & Storr 1998) and, based on studies of the eastern subspecies ( C .  n .  novaehollandiae ), probably also includes green material from grasses and other plants (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The main threat to the Cape Barren Goose (south-western) appears to be extreme weather (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Halse et al. 1995). The population size declined considerably in 1991 when a large number of birds died (of starvation or heat stress) during a period of extremely hot and dry weather that caused the widespread death of vegetation in the Archipelago of the Recherche (Garnett 1993; Halse et al. 1995). The survival of the Cape Barren Goose (south-western) in the Archipelago of the Recherche may be compromised if the climate in south-western Australia becomes hotter and drier in the future (Garnett & Crowley 2000). The Cape Barren Goose (south-western) could potentially be affected by changes to its habitat, or by increased mortality rates associated with hunting by humans (Halse et al. 1995). Hunting was major threat to the Cape Barren Goose (south-western) in the past, when large numbers were killed for food. However, hunting has been prohibited since 1938 (Garnett 1993; Serventy & Whittell 1976). In addition, because the entire Archipelago of the Recherche is designated as a conservation reserve and access to the islands is limited, it is therefore unlikely that any substantial hunting or habitat change will occur (Halse et al. 1995).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25978'),('25982','Calyptorhynchus banksii graptogyne','Endangered','Aves','Cacatuidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25982'),('25986','Casuarius casuarius johnsonii','Endangered','Aves','Casuariidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25986'),('25994','Strepera graculina crissalis','Vulnerable','Aves','Artamidae','The Pied Currawong (Lord Howe Island) is a large bird about 46 cm in length (Hutton 1991). It is mostly glossy black, but has bright orange irides, a small patch of white on each wing (at the base of the primary feathers), a large patch of white around the undertail coverts, a small patch of white at the base of the tail, and a white tip to the tail (Carlile 2007, pers. comm.; Higgins et al. 2006a; Hutton 1991). The sexes are alike, but females are slightly smaller than males (Higgins et al. 2006a; Schodde & Mason 1999). Juvenile and immature birds are similar to the adults, but they have a duller and (especially in juveniles) browner plumage, and juvenile birds also exhibit pale markings on the head, neck, upperbody, breast and wings, and have a yellow gape and, for the first eight months, a yellow tip on the bill (Carlile 2007, pers. comm.; Higgins et al. 2006a).','The Pied Currawong (Lord Howe Island) occurs in lowland, hill and mountain regions, including the summit of Mount Gower (866 m above sea level). It mainly inhabits tall rainforests and palm forests, especially beside creeks or in gullies, but it also occurs in settled areas, and forages amongst colonies of seabirds on offshore islets. The forests inhabited by the Pied Currawong (Lord Howe Island) are usually undisturbed, but tracts of forest adjacent to pasture land, and patches of remNAt forest in settled areas, are also occupied (Disney & Smithers 1972; Etheridge 1889; Hutton 1991; Knight 1987; McFarland 1994; McFarland undated, pers. comm.; Mills undated; Sharland 1929). The Pied Currawong occurs in areas inhabited by the Lord Howe Woodhen  Gallirallus sylvestris  (McFarland 1994), which is listed under the  EPBC Act 1999 . The chicks of the Lord Howe Woodhen provide a source of food for the Pied Currawong (Lord Howe Island) (Garnett & Crowley 2000), but they probably represent only a small proportion of the diet (McFarland 1994).','The Pied Currawong (Lord Howe Island) is omnivorous. It takes a variety of food items including fruits and seeds from  Coprosma putida ,  Cryptocarya triplinervis ,  Drypetes australasica ,  Dysoxylum pachyphyllum  and  Lepidorrhachis mooreana ; insects including the Lord Howe Island Cicada  Psaltoda insularis  and beetle larvae; and small vertebrates including rats  Rattus , chickens  Gallus gallus , domestic ducklings and chicks of island birds including the Providence Petrel  Pterodroma solandri , Red-tailed Tropicbird  Phaethon rubricauda , Lord Howe Woodhen, Sooty Tern  Sterna fuscata , White Tern  Gygis   alba , Emerald Dove  Chalcophaps indica , Golden Whistler  Pachycephala pectoralis  and Song Thrush  Turdus philomelos  (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hindwood 1940; Hutton 1991).  Little published information is available on the feeding behaviour of the Pied Currawong (Lord Howe Island). It picks insects from the bark of trees, and uses its large and robust bill to break apart rotten logs in search of larvae (Hutton 1991). It consumes snails by clasping the shell in the bill, smashing the shell against a rock, and then removing the soft parts (Carlile 2007, pers. comm.). It collects fruits from within the canopy and from the ground (Carlile 2007, pers. comm.). It pursues and captures rats (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hutton 1991), and attacks and kills chickens, ducklings and the chicks of some endemic birds (Garnett & Crowley 2000). Large vertebrate prey is dismembered, and some food may be cached, before it is fed to nestlings (Carlile 2007, pers. comm.).','The small size of the Pied Currawong (Lord Howe Island) population makes it highly vulnerable to threatening processes. Two potential threats have been formally identified: the introduction of an exotic predator, and the persecution of the Pied Currawong (Lord Howe Island) by humans in retaliation to attacks on domestic and endemic birds (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hutton 1991). The incidence of shooting has declined since the 1970s, when the conservation effort on Lord Howe Island intensified (Hutton 1991), but occasional shooting deaths still occur (Carlile 2007, pers. comm.). The Pied Currawong (Lord Howe Island) has persisted in reasonable numbers on Lord Howe Island despite the introduction of the Black Rat  Rattus rattus  in 1918 (Fullagar & Disney 1975; McAllan et al. 2004), although it may have benefited from a rat eradication program that is currently being implemented (Carlile 2007, pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=25994'),('26','Mirounga leonina','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Phocidae','The Southern Elephant Seal is a large marine mammal and the largest of all seals. Adult males weigh between 1500 and 3700 kg and grow to between 450 and 580 cm long. Adult females are much smaller, weighing between 350 and 600 kg and growing to between 200 and 300 cm long (Bryden 1995; Campagna 2008; Tas. DPIPWE 2014). Southern Elephant Seals are coloured rusty grey-brown and are covered with thick blubber. Mature males have a large \'trunk\', or proboscis (nose) which is used to amplify their vocalisations and, together with their bulk, gives rise to their name \'elephant\' seal (Tas. DPIPWE 2014). This species can be distinguished from other true seals in the region, as other species are paler or have spots or streaks which elephant seals lack (DEH 2003g).','To breed and moult the Southern Elephant Seal prefers sand or cobble stone beaches where it can easily come ashore. It often settles among  Poa  spp. tussocks, but at more southerly locations lies on ice and snow. At Maquarie Island, moulting individuals lie in deep mud wallows (Ling & Bryden 1981 cited in DEH 2003g).','Southern Elephant Seals feed mainly on cephalopods (marine molluscs, including squid and octopus) and fish (Green & Burton 1993; Slip 1995). Their major foraging areas are located in cold Antarctic waters, along the Antarctic Polar Front and in warmer Sub-antarctic waters (Slip et al. 1994a).They are an important part of the Southern Ocean marine ecosystem, with most adults foraging on or near the continental shelf of Antarctica (Hindell et al. 1991; Slip et al. 1994a). With such a large biomass, they must consume large amounts of prey annually from these regions (Shaughnessy 1999).A comparison of stomach contents of animals at Macquarie and Heard Island showed that cephalopod beaks and fish eye lenses were the major items (Green & Burton 1993), with more fish remains in the stomachs of seals from Heard Island, and more benthic fish at Heard Island than at Macquarie Island. A study of stomach contents of Southern Elephant Seals at Heard Island in 1992-93 indicated that 86% of stomachs contained squid and 66% contained fish (Slip 1995). The stomach contents of adults differed from those of juveniles, with the latter containing smaller squid. Cephalopods eaten by Southern Elephant Seals were similar to those of other Southern Ocean predators, particularly beaked whales (Shaughnessy 1999).','Past threats to the Southern Elephant Seal include:HarvestingThe Southern Elephant Seal was heavily harvested during the 19th century, primarily for oil. This included populations at Macquarie and Heard Island, and at King Island in Bass Strait where the species was locally extinct by about 1805. Harvesting continued until the mid-1960s at South Georgia and Kerguelen. Southern Elephant Seals are now protected by the Convention for the Conservation of Antarctic Seals south of 60° S and are protected under Australian legislation (Shaughnessy 1999).Current and potential threats to the Southern Elephant Seal include:Population declineThere have been a number of hypotheses forwarded and tested in the last 50 years to explain the population decline seen at several sub-Antarctic islands including Macquarie and Heard Islands. Hypotheses have been based on both intrinsic and extrinsic causes for decline and include: paucity-of-males; an \'overshoot\' in the populations followed by a decline as part of an equilibrium process; disease; predation; competition with fisheries; interspecific competition (competition between Southern Elephant Seals and other animals in the Southern Ocean); environmental change and human disturbance (McMahon et al. 2005).Low juvenile survival (Hindell et al. 1991) and food availability (McMahon et al. 2003 cited in McMahon et al. 2005), are thought to be the most likely cause for the decline through reduced recruitment into the breeding population and lower survival of weaned pups (McMahon et al. 2003). While the factors influencing juvenile survival are not fully understood, it has been demonstrated that Southern Elephant Seals in their first year of life exhibit different diving behaviour (Hindell et al. 1999 cited in McMahon 2005; Irvine et al. 2000 cited in McMahon et al. 2005), use different foraging areas (Hindell et al. 1999 cited in McMahon 2005; McConnell et al. 2002 cited in McMahon 2005) and there is a clear relationship between juvenile survival and the mass of individuals at weaning (an extra five kilograms may sustain a fasting pup for 10 days at sea (McMahon et al. 2000)).  The weaning mass and survival of pups is, in turn, dictated by the size and experience of the mother (Fedak, Arnbom & Boyd 1996 cited in McMahon 2005; Arnbom, Fedak & Boyd 1997 cited in McMahon 2005) and, potentially more significantly, the mother\'s foraging strategy (Authier et al. 2012). A recent study of the Iles Kerguelen population found that mothers foraging at high or low latitudes had a greater probability of weaning a large pup than a mother foraging in the interfrontal zone (Authier et al. 2012). Therefore maternal foraging success is likely to be an important factor in the decline in juvenile survival (Fedak et al. 1996 cited in McMahon et al. 2005; Arnbom et al. 1997 cited in McMahon et al. 2005). Climatic change and oceanographic changeLoss of climatic habitat, including an increase in sea surface temperature, is considered a potential threat. Glacial retreat and temperature increases of 1ºC have been recorded on Macquarie and Heard Islands. These changes are likely to cause shifts in the locations, behaviour, species composition and abundance of prey of the Southern Elephant Seal, and hence affect the population. Management of this threat requires both domestic and international action (DEH 2003g).A study by McMahon and Burton in 2005 investigated the links between climatic variations and first year survival of Southern Elephant Seal pups. They quantified the relative importance of pre-breeding foraging conditions and the post-breeding foraging conditions that offspring are exposed to, to survival in the first year of life. This research showed that the conditions to which a pregNAt female Southern Elephant Seal was exposed and typically enumerated as weaning mass were more important to survival in the first year than the conditions to which pups were directly exposed during their first foraging trips (McMahon & Burton 2005). This is because weaning masses (maternal foraging conditions) are a true reflection of environmental conditions rather than a reflection of age/experience or foraging zone in which the females feed (Fedak et al 1996 cited in McMahon et al 2005; Arnborn et al 1997 cited in McMahon et al 2005; Crocker et al 2001 cited in McMahon et al 2005). The findings in this study were key in describing a functional response of an apex predator in Antarctica to environmental conditions that can be used to predictively model population responses to climate change (McMahon & Burton 2005).The long-term and continuous decline in the Macquarie Island population over the past 50 years is most likely related to the changes in the seals\' foraging habitat and subsequent food availablility (Australian Antarctic Division 2014; van der Hoff et al. 2014). The long-term decrease in seal numbers has coincidently occurred at a time when winter sea ice duration, extent and concentration south of Macquarie Island has been increasing, resulting in broad-and local-scale physical changes in their  foraging habitats.  Adult female elephant seals tend to avoid sea ice but they need access to high quality foraging grounds over the Antarctic continental shelf. This access diminishes as winter approaches and sea ice extends northwards. As the animals are faithful to their individual feeding areas, any variability or persistent change in foraging area quality could affect their future survival and breeding success (van der Hoff cited in Australian Antarctic Division 2014).FisheriesThere are few threats and conflicts today, as Southern Elephant Seals live far from human populations and have minimal interactions with commercial fisheries. That said, intensive fishing could potentially deplete important prey stocks (Campagna 2008).The fishery at Heard, McDonald and Macquarie Island, and its likely effects on high level predators was the topic of a workshop held at the Australian Antarctic Division in late April and early May, 1997. A conclusion was that \"existing information is not sufficient to identify whether fishing is likely to have any substantial impacts on seals and penguins\"\". Nevertheless',' the workshop recommended that \"\"conservation objectives for high level predators should be included among the objectives of the long-term management plans for these fisheries\"\" (Australian Antarctic Division 1997).The potential for interaction between commercial fishing for Patagonian Toothfish ( Dissostichus eleginoides ) and Mackerel Icefish ( Champsocephalus gunnari ) within the Australian Fishing Zone in Subantarctic waters should be monitored carefully'),('26000','Anous tenuirostris melanops','Vulnerable','Aves','Laridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26000'),('26004','Malurus leucopterus leucopterus','Vulnerable','Aves','Maluridae','The White-winged Fairy-wren (Dirk Hartog Island) has a length of 11 to 12 cm and a mass of 5.2 to 8.3 g (Carter 1917; Johnstone & Storr 2004; Rathburn & Montgomerie 2003). The adult female is greyish-brown above, and white below, with a dull greyish-blue tail, brown irides, a light-brown to pinkish-brown or reddish-horn bill, and brown legs and feet.','The White-winged Fairy-wren (Dirk Hartog Island) inhabits low, dense shrublands and heathlands, and open flats dominated by shrubs (such as  Acacia ,  Atriplex ,  Dryandra ,  Hakea ,  Halosarcia ,  Melaleuca ,  Rhagodia ,  Scaevola ,  Sida  and  Thryptomene ), and that, in some locations, also support some spinifex (Johnstone & Storr 2004; Rathburn & Montgomerie 2003; Wells & Wells 1974; Whitlock 1919, 1921). The White-winged Fairy-wren (Dirk Hartog Island) occurs from near sea level to the summit of Herald Heights, which at approximately 180 m above sea level, is the highest point on Dirk Hartog Island (Whitlock 1921).','The White-winged Fairy-wren (Dirk Hartog Island) feeds on insects and some seeds (Carter 1917; Johnstone & Storr 2004). Based on studies of the mainland subspecies  M .  l .  leuconotus , it might also take other invertebrates (such as spiders or slaters) and some fruit (Jackson 1919; Lea & Gray 1935; Tidemann 1983). There is little published information on the foraging behaviour of the White-winged Fairy-wren (Dirk Hartog Island). It is said to sally for flying insects (Carter 1917) and, based on studies of the mainland subspecies  M .  l .  leuconotus  and the Barrow Island subspecies  M .  l .  edouardi , it probably also forages on the ground and in shrubs and trees, by hopping and plucking (or gleaning) food items (Rowley & Russell 1997; Tidemann 1983; Wooller & Calver 1981).','The potential threats to the White-winged Fairy-wren (Dirk Hartog Island) are habitat loss and degradation, and predation by introduced mammals. The White-winged Fairy-wren (Dirk Hartog Island) has persisted on Dirk Hartog Island despite the introduction of sheep, goats, house mice and cats; occasional extensive fires; and intensive grazing by sheep at the southern end of the island. This indicates that although these threats may have had some impact on the White-winged Fairy-wren (Dirk Hartog Island) population, their impact has not been sufficient to cause the extinction of the subspecies. However, Dirk Hartog Island is currently free of rats, which are known to have caused the extinction of other island-dwelling birds. Rats, should they be introduced to Dirk Hartog Island in the future, could potentially have a devastating effect on the White-winged Fairy-wren (Dirk Hartog Island) population (Garnett & Crowley 2000). The White-winged Fairy-wren (Dirk Hartog Island) is also vulnerable to catastrophic events. This is because the entire population occurs over a small area (about 200 km²) on a narrow island with uniform habitat (Garnett & Crowley 2000). The likelihood and potential impact of a catastrophic event is difficult to predict. However, it is unlikely that a single extensive fire, which is perhaps the most probable catastrophic event, could affect the entire island (Garnett 1993).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26004'),('26005','Stipiturus malachurus intermedius','Endangered','Aves','Maluridae','The Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) has an overall length of approximately 16-18 cm, including the exceptionally long tail of about 10-11 cm. Body mass is generally 7-8 g (Mount Lofty Ranges Southern Emu-wren Recovery Team 1998). It is sexually dimorphic, i.e. males and females differ in appearance. In the male, the upper-parts are grey-brown (grey tone most prominent around the neck) with thick dark brown to black streaks, extending from the crown to the rump, and a rufous-brown forehead. The eye-brow, throat and upper breast are a pale, light blue (and unlike some other sexually dimorphic Australian wrens, the blue plumage is retained throughout the year). The underparts are light brown or tawny-brown except for the belly, which is white. The female is similar to the male in appearance, but has: (1) a light grey-brown to olive-grey forehead (reddish-brown or rufous-brown in the male); (2) yellow-brown on the eye-brow, throat and upper-breast (pale blue in the male); and (3) more prominent streaking on the upperparts, particularly on the crown and forehead (Higgins et al. 2001; Mount Lofty Ranges Southern Emu-wren Recovery Team 1998). These differences are apparent from the time the young leave the nest, with juvenile males able to be distinguished by the pale grey-blue colouring to the eye-brow, throat and upper-breast (Mount Lofty Range Southern Emu-wren Recovery Team 1998).','The Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) mainly occurs in two broad habitat types: freshwater swamp (e.g. wet heathland, sedgeland, reedland) and dry heathland (Littlely & Cutten 1994; Pickett 2000; Wilson & Paton 2004). Such habitats are commonly characterised by dense vegetation up to 1 m tall (Littlely & Cutten 1994; Wilson & Paton 2004).The habitats of the Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) are commonly characterised by dense vegetation up to 1 m tall (Littlely & Cutten 1994; Pickett, in prep.; Wilson & Paton 2004). Some habitats have an additional shrub layer and/or emergent shrubs; any tree canopies present are usually low (less than 10 m in height) (Pickett, in prep.).The swamp habitats of the Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) are located along low-lying creeks and flats, in gullies, or on hillsides. They often occur above a layer of peat, or above a combined layer of peat and silt (Littlely & Cutten 1994). The swamps are densely vegetated, and are dominated by species such as Prickly Tea-tree  Leptospermum continentale , Silky Tea-tree  L .  lanigerum , Red-fruit Saw-sedge  Gahnia sieberiana , Cutting Grass  Gahnia trifida , Golden Spray  Viminaria juncea , Common Reed  Phragmites australis , Climbing Scale-rush  Empodisma minus , Bulrush  Typha domingensis , other rushes (e.g.  Juncus ,  Baumea ), sedges (e.g.  Carex ,  Lepidosperma ), and ferns (e.g. Coral Fern  Gleichenia microphylla , Soft Water-fern  Blechnium minus ) (Littlely & Cutten 1994; Mount Lofty Ranges Southern Emu-wren Recovery Team 1998; Pickett 2000; Wilson & Paton 2004).The dry heathland habitats of the Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) can take two forms:1. basic heathland, dominated by species including Slaty Sheoak  Allocasuarina muelleriana , Small Bulloak  A .  striata , Beaked Hakea  Hakea rostrata , Mount Lofty Bush-pea  Pultenaea involucrata , Thyme-leaved Spyridium  Spryridium thymifolium  and Yacca  Xanthorrhoea semiplana ; and2. low open forest with a heath understorey (comprised of species such as Heathy Phyllota  Phyllota pleurandroides , bush-peas, hakeas, Holly Flat-pea  Platylobium obtusangulum , guinea-flowers  Hibbertia , Heath Tea-tree  Leptospermum myrsinoides  and Yacca) and a ground layer of sedges (e.g.  Lepidosperma , Curled Saw-sedge  G .  ancistrophylla , Tassel Rope-rush  Hypolaena fastigiata ), and a canopy that is dominated by species such as Messmate Stringybark  Eucalyptus obliqua  and Brown Stringybark  E .  baxteri  (Mount Lofty Ranges Southern Emu-wren Recovery Team 1998; Pickett 2000; M. Pickett December 2005, pers. comm.).Other species that commonly occur in dry heathland habitats include Wiry Spear-grass  Austrostipa muelleri , Silver Banksia  Banksia marginata , Orange Bell-climber  Billardiera bignoniacea , Slender Dodder-laurel  Cassytha glabella , Common Heath  Epacris impressa  and Horny Cone-bush  Isopogon ceratophyllus  (Wilson & Paton 2004).The Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) is occasionally recorded on open floodplains with samphire, Lignum  Muehlenbeckia florulenta  and Cutting Grass (e.g. at Finniss) (Littlely & Cutten 1994; Mount Lofty Ranges Southern Emu-wren Recovery Team 1998). The Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) may make use of aberrant habitats in the event of fire, e.g. emu-wrens utilised degraded grassy sedgeland/pasture as a post-fire refuge at Mount Compass in 2003 (M. Pickett December 2005, pers. comm.).  Most local populations of the Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) occur in swamps on the Fleurieu Peninsula. These swamps, which are crucial to the survival of the emu-wren (see above), are listed as a Critically Endangered Ecological Community under the  EPBC Act 1999 .The Southern Emu-wren is not known to associate with any other listed threatened species.','The Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) feeds almost entirely, if not solely, upon insects. Insects recorded in the diet include seed or chinch bugs (Hemiptera: Lyagaeidae, including  Nysius ), psyllids (Hemiptera: Psyllidae), katydids (Orthoptera: Tettigoniidae) and beetles (Coleoptera), including weevils (Coleoptera: Curculionidae). Other items recorded in the diet include eggs of katydids (and possibly of other insects or spiders), and cocoons of wasps (Hymenoptera) (Lea & Gray 1935).At the species level, the Southern Emu-wren has also been recorded feeding on flies (Diptera), ants (Hymenoptera: Formicidae), caterpillars (Lepidoptera larvae), mantids (Mantodea) and spiders, and also some vegetable matter, including seeds (Barker & Vestjens, undated; Cleland et al. 1918; Fletcher 1915; Lea & Gray 1935; McKeown 1944; Rose 1999). No information is available on the foraging behaviour of the Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula).At the species level, Southern Emu-wrens forage on or close to ground amongst dense vegetation. They forage actively, hopping through the vegetation and taking food from reeds and from foliage, twigs and other surfaces of shrubs. They also capture insects in flight, and split open reed stems to obtain insects. When foraging in shrubs, they usually work their way up and around the shrub from bottom to top, before dropping down to the base of the next shrub and beginning again. They are said to spend more time foraging in shrubs than on ground (Fletcher 1913, 1915; Rowley & Russell 1997; Schodde 1982).','The decline of the Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) has mainly been due to the clearance, degradation and fragmentation of both swamp and dry heathland habitat (Littlely & Cutten 1994; Mount Lofty Ranges Southern Emu-wren Recovery Team 1998; M. Pickett December 2005, pers. comm.). Large areas of native habitat on the Fleurieu Peninsula and in the southern Mount Lofty Ranges have been cleared for primary production (e.g. grazing, dairying, forestry, horticulture), and many natural drainage systems have been modified via the construction of dams for water storage or the installment of drains to divert water away from potentially productive sites. The degradation of remaining habitat by slashing, burning, draining and heavy grazing has further reduced the amount of suitable habitat available (Mount Lofty Ranges Southern Emu-wren Recovery Team 1998). Results of a detailed habitat survey indicate that, by 1993, the area of swampland on the Fleurieu Peninsula had been reduced from approximately 2094 ha to 1567 ha (75% of the original area). Of the swampland that remained in 1993, 545 ha (26% of the original area) was considered to be in good condition, and the remaining 1022 ha (49% of the original area) was considered to be degraded. Furthermore, although the size of the surviving swamps varied, most (75%) were less than 5 ha (Littlely & Cutten 1994).Ongoing threats to the Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) include:Habitat alteration : The Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) is threatened, or potentially threatened, by a variety of land use or land management processes that could have deleterious effects on the emu-wren\'s habitat. These processes include clearance of native vegetation, inappropriate burning regimes, grazing of livestock, diversion or extraction of water, drainage of swamps, mining (e.g. sand mining could affect occupied swamps by reducing the supply of groundwater or water quality), plantation forestry (e.g. plantations in the vicinity of occupied swamps could reduce the supply of ground water or cause pollution of the swamps), residential development, and the invasion of habitats by introduced weeds (e.g. blackberry, gorse) (Mount Lofty Ranges Southern Emu-wren Recovery Team 1998; M. Pickett December 2005, pers. comm.). The potential impacts of these processes varies: the grazing of livestock in swamps is considered to be the most serious, given that it is a common practice and has direct effects on habitat quality, but other threats that effect the quantity of water in swamps (e.g. diversion of water for agriculture or storage, drainage of swamps, mining, plantation forestry) could also have major impacts on the emu-wren\'s habitat (M. Pickett 2005, pers. comm.). In addition to the processes listed above, the emu-wren may also be threatened by other processes that effect its habitat, including the natural succession of native vegetation (e.g. habitats with old-growth vegetation are unsuitable for the emu-wren), the dieback of vegetation due to fungal infection by  Phytophthora , and the leaching of herbicides and pesticides (or run-off from fertilizers or livestock effluent) into swamp systems (Mount Lofty Ranges Southern Emu-wren Recovery Team 1998; M. Pickett 2005, pers. comm.).   Wildfire : Wildfire has been responsible for local extinctions in the past (at Cox Scrub Conservation Park in 1983, and at Toadspring Swamp, near Mount Compass, in 1997), and is a major threat to the Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) today, as all populations and habitats are potentially at risk. This includes the largest remaining population of the emu-wren, at Deep Creek Conservation Park, which occurs in an environment that is highly susceptible to wildfire, and which could potentially be wiped out by a single unchecked fire event. Furthermore, isolated fragments of suitable habitat are unlikely to be recolonised if existing emu-wren populations are wiped out by wildfire (Mount Lofty Ranges Southern Emu-wren Recovery Team 1998; M. Pickett December 2005, pers. comm.).   Other natural, catastrophic events : The Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) is also threatened by other natural, catastrophic events such as drought, flood or storm (Mount Lofty Ranges Southern Emu-wren Recovery Team 1998; M. Pickett December 2005, pers. comm.). Floods and storms are believed to be minor threats to the emu-wren, but drought may be a major threat to populations in swamps, particularly if the effects of drought are exacerbated by climate change (M. Pickett December 2005, pers. comm.).   Population size and fragmentation : The Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula) is mainly found in small local populations, and these mostly inhabit small and isolated fragments of habitat. The small and isolated nature of these populations increases the risk of extinction due to catastrophic events (e.g. wildfire) and inbreeding depression. It also means that random variation in the population demographics (e.g. survival rates, reproductive success) or in the genetic structure of a small population (due to genetic drift) could have a significant impact on the survival of that population (Mount Lofty Ranges Southern Emu-wren Recovery Team 1998; Pickett 2000; M. Pickett December 2005, pers. comm.).    Predators and parasites : Introduced predators (e.g. cats, foxes, rats), native predators (e.g. snakes, raptors) and native parasites (e.g. cuckoos) are considered to be minor threats to the Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula). However, the impact of these species upon the emu-wren is largely unknown, and may potentially be greater (at least in some small populations) than what is currently assumed (Mount Lofty Ranges Southern Emu-wren Recovery Team 1998; M. Pickett December 2005, pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26005'),('26006','Stipiturus malachurus parimeda','Vulnerable','Aves','Maluridae','The Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) is a small bird that has an overall length of 17–19 cm and a mass of up to 9 g (Higgins et al. 2001; Pickett 2002a). The tail is long (over 10 cm in length and can exceed 13 cm in males), stick-like and comprised of only six emu-like feathers (Higgins et al. 2001; Pickett 2002a; SA DEH n.d.; Schodde & Mason 1999; Schodde & Weatherly 1981).','The Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) occurs in three types of habitat: shrubland or heathland, mallee and sedgeland (Pickett 2002a). These habitats are characterised by one or two layers of dense vegetation up to 3 m in height (Morgan 1982; Pickett 2002a).Shrubland or heathlandThe shrubland or heathland habitats of the Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) include wet and dry heathlands, and low or tall shrublands that can be closed or, in the case of tall shrublands, open. These habitats are typically dominated by one or two major plant species (Pickett 2002a). The most common domiNAt species include Myrtle spp. ( Melaleuca ) such as Mallee Honey-myrtle ( M. brevifolia  and, less frequently, Totem Poles ( M. decussata ) and Rottnest Teatree ( M. lanceolata ). Other prominent species are Samphire ( Gahnia  spp.), Coast Beard-heath ( Leucopogon parviflorus ), Dysentery Bush ( Alyxia buxifolia ) and  Lasiopetalum discolor . Shrubland and heathland habitats can also contain a variety of other shrubs and trees such as Umbrella Bush ( Acacia ligulata ), Casuarina spp. ( Allocasuarina ),  Eucalyptus  spp.,  Pultenaea acerosa  and Tate\'s Grasstree ( Xanthorrhoea semiplana ). The understorey vegetation in these habitats is comprised mainly of low sedges and rushes, and can include species such as Samphire and Rushes ( Juncus  spp.) (Pickett 2002a, 2004a; Possingham 1993).MalleeThe mallee habitats of the Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) can be open or closed, and can include low mallee. They are typically dominated by  Eucalyptus diversifolia  and Ridge-fruited Mallee ( E. incrassata ) in association with a variety of shrubs including Myrtle spp. and Coast Beard Heath ( Leucopogon parviflorus ), and a lower layer (often dense) of heathy shrubs and sedges. In a few locations, mallee habitats include areas of more typical inland mallee that are dominated by Ridge-fruited Mallee and that have a dense understory of heathy shrubs such as  Banksia  spp., Green Tea-tree ( Leptospermum coriaceum ) and  Triodia   spp. (Pickett 2002a, 2004a). Southern Emu-wrens (Eyre Peninsula) have also been recorded in regenerating mallee (i.e. regenerating after fire), consisting of   Eucalyptus diversifolia  and Narrow-leaved Red Mallee ( Eucalyptus foecunda ) (up to 3 m in height) above a layer of shrubs including species of Myrtle, Grasstrees and Wattle spp. ( Acacia ), and a patchy ground cover of smaller shrubs (e.g.  Astroloma ) and grasses. The subspecies is also known in roadside mallee habitat, consisting of Ridge-fruited Mallee (up to 5 m in height) and clumps of Desert Banksia ( Banksia ornata ) and  Leptospermum  spp., with an understorey comprised of species including Casuarina spp., Native cherry ( Exocarpos cupressiformis ) and Wattle, and an extensive ground cover of grasses and small shrubs (Morgan 1982).SedgelandThe sedgeland habitats of the Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) can be open or closed. They are dominated by Coast Saw-sedge ( Gahnia trifida ) and usually have a dense understorey of Bare Twigrush ( Baumea juncea ) or other sedges and rushes. These habitats are located around seasonal swamps in coastal regions of the Southern Emu-wren\'s (Eyre Peninsula) range (Pickett 2002a, 2004a).','No information is available on the diet of the Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula), but it is likely to be similar to that recorded for other subspecies of the Southern Emu-wren (Pickett 2006b).At the species level, Southern Emu-wrens feed almost entirely upon insects, including beetles, flies, bugs, ants, caterpillars, grasshoppers, mantids and lacewings. They also take spiders, and some vegetable material, including seeds (Higgins et al. 2001).At the species level, Southern Emu-wrens forage on, or close to, the ground amongst dense vegetation. They forage actively, hopping through vegetation and taking food from reeds, foliage, twigs and other surfaces of shrubs. They also capture insects in flight, and split open reed stems to obtain insects. They are thought to spend more time foraging in shrubs than they do foraging on the ground (Higgins et al. 2001).','The major threats to the Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) are further loss or degradation of habitat, wildfire, habitat fragmentation/isolation (Pickett 2002a, 2004b, 2006b) and climate change (Pickett 2006b). Additional potential threats include,  Phytophthora , roadworks, (Pickett 2002a, 2004b; M. Pickett 2006, pers. comm.), predators (Pickett 2006b) and Tramp Ants (DEH 2006p).Major threatsLoss or degradation of habitatThe loss or degradation of habitat is a major threat to the long-term recovery, especially in terms of persistence, of the Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) population (Pickett 2004b, 2006b). The loss or degradation of habitat is mainly due to grazing by livestock and the extraction or salinisation of freshwater wetlands. For example, many areas of potential habitat are located in agricultural areas and are being degraded by the grazing of livestock, and changes in the availability or salinity of water have occurred, or are occurring, at both occupied and potential sites (Pickett 2002a, 2004b).WildfireWildfire is considered a major potential threat at most sites occupied by the Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) (Pickett 2002a, 2004b, 2006b). It can cause catastrophic loss of habitat and death of trapped individuals. It can result in long-term loss of the Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) from specific areas (Pickett 2006b). There have been several incidences of wildfire in the subspecies\' habitat with the most serious of these, in terms of its impact on the subspecies, in 2005 when an isolated subpopulation at Charlton Gully was apparently destroyed (Pickett 2005a). Wildfires also occurred at, or near, occupied sites in the Tulka-Sleaford Mere area in early 2001, and at Kellidie Bay in November 2002, but these appeared to have little impact on the populations as some areas of suitable habitat at the sites remained unburnt. However, if these fires had been more extensive, and had burnt out much or all of the suitable habitat, the impact on the subspecies would have been much more severe, especially at Kellidie Bay which is thought to contain a relatively large and dense population of Southern Emu-wrens (Eyre Peninsula) (Pickett 2002a).Habitat fragmentation/isolationThe subspecies\' habitats are fragmented and/or isolated due to past habitat loss, current land use and naturally occurring barriers. Because of the Southern Emu-wren\'s (Eyre Peninsula) restricted dispersal capabilities, habitat fragmentation and isolation are major threats to long-term persistence and recovery, especially in terms of population viability (e.g. reoccupation of local extinction sites and genetic exchange) and potential for population growth (Pickett 2006b).Climate changeClimate change is potentially a major threat to the Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula). Climate change is expected to lead to increased risks, frequencies and intensities of extreme weather events, and could increase the risk of abrupt and non-linear changes in numerous ecosystems, which would affect their function, biodiversity and productivity (IPCC 2001, cited in Pickett 2006b). For the Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) climate change may potentially exacerbate the impact of catastrophes such as wildfire, land-use threats such as stock grazing and site drainage, and affect area and quality of swampy habitat through increased temperature and reduced rainfall (Pickett 2006b).Additional threatsPhytophthoraThe habitat of the Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) is also at risk from other potential threats. Root fungus ( Phytophthora cinnamomi ), which degrades the quality of habitat and (potentially) prevents native vegetation from regenerating, is a potential threat at some sites in the higher rainfall areas of the range (e.g. the Koppio Hills area, Charlton Gully) (Pickett 2002a, 2004b; M. Pickett 2006, pers. comm.).RoadworksRoadworks, or more specifically potential future roadworks such as road widening, could pose a threat to Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) populations that occur in roadside vegetation (Pickett 2002a). One occupied site, at D\'Anville Bay, is located within the boundaries of a wind farm (Pickett 2003).Predators/parasitismSouthern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) nests are vulnerable to terrestrial predators and Cuckoos (known brood-parasites), but the impacts of predation/parasitism are poorly known. At some sites, Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) reproductive performance has been reasonable despite the presence of feral Cats ( Felis catus ) and European Foxes ( Vulpes vulpes ) (Pickett 2000a), and it appears that these relatively large, introduced predators may have difficulty in accessing nests in relatively pristine habitats where dense vegetation layers are intact. Thinning and division of habitat due to grazing or dieback may make the subspecies more conspicuous and vulnerable to predators. Native predators such as snakes (and possibly Cuckoos) probably have a greater influence on mortality/reproduction than Cats and Foxes (Pickett 2006b).Tramp antsThe Southern Emu-wren (Eyre Peninsula) is considered to be potentially, adversely affected by the Red Imported Fire Ant ( Solenopsis invicta ) or the Yellow Crazy Ant ( Anoplolepis gracilipes ) (DEH 2006p).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26006'),('26011','Lichenostomus melanops cassidix','Critically Endangered','Aves','Meliphagidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26011'),('26013','Falcunculus frontatus whitei','Vulnerable','Aves','Pachycephalidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26013'),('26021','Phaethon lepturus fulvus','Endangered','Aves','Phaethontidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26021'),('26027','Neochmia ruficauda ruficauda','Endangered','Aves','Ploceidae','The Star Finch (eastern) is a small and compact finch that measures approximately 11 to 12 cm in length and weighs about 10 or 11 g.','The Star Finch (eastern) occurs mainly in grasslands and grassy woodlands that are located close to bodies of fresh water (Garnett 1993; Gould 1865; Holmes 1996). It also occurs in cleared or suburban areas such as along roadsides and in towns (Baldwin 1975; Cayley 1932; Holmes 1996, 1998; Marshall 1932).The Star Finch (eastern) was observed on the Namoi River in New South Wales, on sloping river banks covered with grass and herbs, and amongst beds of rushes growing along the side of the river (Gould 1865).Studies at nine former sites of the Star Finch (eastern) found that the habitat consisted mainly of woodland. These habitats are dominated by trees that are typically associated with permanent water or areas that are regularly inundated; the most common species are  Eucalyptus coolabah, E. tereticornis, E. tessellaris, Melaleuca leucadendra, E. camaldulensis  and  Casuarina cunninghamii  (Holmes 1996).Sites from which recent records have been obtained have been dominated by grasses or have been in areas where the native vegetation has been partially cleared. For example, at Wowan, the Star Finch (eastern) was recorded near a road running through grassland (formally eucalypt woodland interspersed with vine forest) with some scattered shrub regrowth, and at Aramac, it was recorded in the grounds of a hotel (Holmes 1996, 1998). These latter records support earlier reports from Blackall in Queensland, where the Star Finch (eastern) was said to have foraged in the streets and yards of the township (Cayley 1932; Marshall 1932), and at Inverell in New South Wales, where 20 were observed feeding in fig trees near a house (Baldwin 1975).','The Star Finch (eastern) feeds on the seeds of grasses and other annual plants (Gould 1865), and on insects (Baldwin 1975). No other food items have been recorded, but the diet is probably similar to that recorded for the Star Finch at the species level.At the species level, the Star Finch feeds predomiNAtly on ripe or half-ripe seeds. These are mainly taken from a range of grasses (including species of  Arundinella ,  Brachyachne ,  Chloris ,  Chrysopogon ,  Digitaria ,  Echinochloa ,   Heterachne ,  Iseilema ,  Oryza ,  Panicum ,  Setaria ,  Sorghum ,  Themeda  and  Urochloa ), but also from other plants such as species of  Casuarina ,  Fimbristylis  and  Tridax  (Higgins et al. 2006; Holmes 1998; Immelmann 1962). The Star Finch also feeds on insects (including flies, ants, termites and moths) and on spiders (Immelmann 1962, 1982).Seeds are the main food of the Star Finch throughout the year (i.e. in both the wet and dry seasons). There is no increase in the invertebrate component of the diet during the wet season, when the Star Finch normally breeds (Higgins et al. 2006; Todd et al. 2003). This is in contrast to an earlier suggestion that the invertebrate component of the diet increased during the breeding season (Immelmann 1982).The foraging ecology of the Star Finch (eastern) is virtually unknown. It has been observed capturing insects in fig trees (Baldwin 1975). It is said to forage in the shade of  Eucalyptus  trees, which provide shelter from the sun (Cayley 1932), and to have fed in streets and yards around Blackall, Queensland (Cayley 1932; Marshall 1932). The foraging ecology is otherwise unknown, although it is likely to be similar to that described for the Star Finch at the species level.At the species level, the Star Finch forages on the ground, where it picks up fallen seed, and in vegetation (including grasses and shrubs), where it takes seeds from seed-heads and  Casuarina  cones and insects from grasses and other foliage (Hall 1974; Higgins et al. 2006; Immelmann 1962, 1982). It also captures insects in flight (Immelmann 1962, 1982).','The Star Finch (eastern) disappeared from most of its range before the decline in range and population size could be linked to any threatening process or processes (Garnett & Crowley 2000). However, the main cause of the decline is likely to have been the degradation of the finch\'s habitat (Garnett 1993; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Holmes 1998). The major source of habitat degradation has almost certainly been the over-grazing and trampling of habitat by livestock (Garnett 1993; Garnett & Crowley 2000).The invasion of habitat by weeds, and the contamination of habitat by mining operations, are other potential sources of habitat degradation (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Holmes 1998).The only other threat that has been identified is collection for the bird trade (Garnett & Crowley 2000). Thousands of Star Finches (eastern) were trapped and collected during the early part of the 20th century, although this process probably had only temporary effects on local populations (Holmes 1998). Trapping ceased in the 1960s (Holmes 1998), but the apparent absence of the Star Finch (eastern) from captivity (Holmes 1996, 1998) may make it a target for collectors (Garnett 1993; Garnett & Crowley 2000). Prolonged drought is likely to have been a major factor in the decline of the Star Finch (eastern). This is because the Star Finch (eastern) usually occurs in long grass close to bodies of water and, during drought conditions, the ongoing presence of stock around these waterbodies is likely to have severely degraded the grassland habitat (Holmes 1998; M. Todd 2006, pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26027'),('26033','Pterodroma leucoptera leucoptera','Endangered','Aves','Procellariidae','Gould\'s Petrel is a small, slightly-built petrel with a distinct \'M\'-shaped marking on its upperwings. Gould\'s Petrels measure about 70 cm, and weigh about 200 g. The head is characterised by a white forehead with dark freckles that merge into a black hood over the crown and nape; the mantle is blue-grey or dark grey, and the rump darker grey; the short, rounded tail is grey with a brown wash, grading darker at the end; and the underparts are white. The upperwing is dark brownish grey with a prominent blackish \'M\'-shaped mark which extends across the lower back. The underwings are white with a blackish trailing edge and a blackish leading edge which extends towards the middle of the wing at the carpal joint, forming a distinct diagonal carpal bar. The bill is black; the eyes are dark brown; and the legs and feet are off-white with the toes, joints, webs and claws dull black (Marchant & Higgins 1990; Roberson & Bailey 1991; Surman et al. 1997). Gould\'s Petrel is usually seen at sea singly or in twos, occasionally in groups of about 12, and infrequently in groups as large as 60 (Hindwood & Serventy 1941; Surman et al. 1997).','Gould\'s Petrel is a pelagic marine species, spending much of its time foraging at sea and coming ashore only to breed. The Australian subspecies breeds and roosts on two islands off NSW, Cabbage Tree and Boondelbah Islands, and the at-sea distribution is poorly known (NSW 2006a; D\'Ombrain 1970; Fullagar 1976; Hindwood & Serventy 1941; Hull 1911b; Priddel & Carlile 1995b, 1997; Priddel et al. 1995). The breeding colonies on Cabbage Tree Island and Boondelbah Island are in the transitional zone between the subtropical (with maximum summer rainfall) and temperate climatic zones (with maximum winter rainfall) (NPWS 2003). On Cabbage Tree Island, Gould\'s Petrels mostly breed among rocky scree and beneath coarse woody debris in gullies dominated by dense rainforest, heavily vegetated with Cabbage Tree Palms ( Livistonia australis ), figs ( Ficus ) and Native Plums ( Planchonella australis ) (NSW 2006b; D\'Ombrain 1970; Fullagar 1976; Hindwood & Serventy 1941; Hull 1911b; Priddel & Carlile 1995b, 1997; Priddel et al. 1995), but also occasionally among tussocks of mat-rush ( Lomandra longifolia ) (D\'Ombrain 1970). Nests occur from just above sea level to elevations of 120 m (Fullagar 1976).Boondelbah Island is relatively treeless, except for a few wind-sheared trees, and is dominated by low vegetation. Here Gould\'s Petrels breed in artificial nest boxes, in piles of rocks and in the cavities between rocks (Priddel & Carlile 1995, 1997a).The at-sea habitat preferences of Gould\'s Petrel are poorly understood. It often occurs in the warm waters of the East Australian Current, where the sea-surface temperature ranges from 9.7–23.0 °C (Barton 1980; Blaber 1986; Hindwood & Serventy 1941; Reid et al. 2002); and off south-western Western Australia, where cold subantarctic waters intrude into warmer waters with a sea-surface temperature of about 15 °C (Surman et al. 1997). Of the 965 records of Gould\'s Petrels from south-eastern Australia, 58% were over the continental slope, 39% over open ocean and 3% over the continental shelf (Reid et al. 2002). The species also occasionally occurs over seamounts, where upwelling probably occurs, but these observations may refer to other subspecies (Barton 1980; Blaber 1986; Reid et al. 2002).','The diet of Gould\'s Petrel is poorly known (Marchant & Higgins 1990), but the diet of the species as a whole includes cephalopods (squid) and fish, such as Lanternfish ( Electrona rissoi ) (Bull 1943; Hindwood & Serventy 1941; Imber 1996). The foraging behaviour of the Gould\'s Petrel probably consists of seizing prey from the surface of the sea (Roberson & Bailey 1991). The species has been recorded feeding in association with other seabirds as well as tuna and dolphins (Au & Pitman 1986; Roberson & Bailey 1991), but these observations may not have been of the Australian subspecies (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','There have been a number of threats identified as impacting on the breeding colony of Gould\'s Petrels on Cabbage Tree Island. A major cause of mortality in both adult breeding birds and young, is becoming entangled in the sticky fruit or seeds of the Bird-lime Tree ( Pisonia umbellifera ), which incapacitates the birds and, rendering them unable to fly, leads to their eventual death by starvation (NSW 2006a; D\'Ombrain 1943, 1952, 1964; Fullagar 1976; Hindwood & Serventy 1941, 1943; Morse 1918; Priddel & Carlile 1995b, 1997, 2004).Predation by Pied Currawongs ( Strepera graculina ), and possibly also by Australian Ravens ( Corvus coronoides ) at the Cabbage Tree Island breeding colony is another major source of mortality of Gould\'s Petrels. An increase in the population of these avian predators due to the effects of human activities on the adjacent mainland has resulted in their regular occurrence on the offshore island. The level of mortality of the Gould\'s Petrel due to the effects of increased predation may have been exacerbated by the effects of grazing by rabbits which reduced the amount of cover. Predation by these birds previously exceeded recruitment to the population, and was thus the major cause of population decline (Priddel 1996; Priddel & Carlile 1995b, 1997; Priddel et al. 1995).Other threats include disturbance from the noise of aircraft from a nearby airforce base: when disturbed, Gould\'s Petrels emit a distress call which has the potential to reveal their presence to predators (NSW 2006a).Potential threats include the accidental introduction of mammalian predators, fire and human disturbance (NSW 2006a; Hindwood & Serventy 1941). At sea, oil spills pose a potential risk (NSW 2006a).The Gould\'s Petrel could be subject to some unforseen forms of oceanic perturbation which would adversely affect the population through the unavailability of sufficient prey to sustain a healthy body condition, such as a mass die-off of fish (Priddel & Carlile 1997). The breeding habitat of Gould\'s Petrel on Cabbage Tree Island has the potential to be affected by fire (NSW 2006a). Heavy summer rainfall also has the potential to cause flooding of nest-sites, reducing breeding success (Fullagar 1976; Priddel et al. 1995).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26033'),('26048','Tyto novaehollandiae kimberli','Vulnerable','Aves','Tytonidae','The Masked Owl (northern) is a large (males 600 g, females 1 kg) owl with prominent heart-shaped facial disc, with plumage highly patterned by speckling, and generally darker on the back and paler below (Woinarski 2004).','In northern Australia, the Masked Owl has been recorded from riparian forest, rainforest, open forest,  Melaleuca  swamps and the edges of mangroves, as well as along the margins of sugar cane fields (Higgins 1999; Nielsen 1996; Storr 1977, 1980).','The Masked Owl (northern) feeds in open woodland on small to medium-sized terrestrial mammals (Garnett & Crowley 2000).','The reason for the low population density of the Masked Owl (northern) is unknown (Garnett & Crowley 2000). The subspecies has undoubtedly been affected by broad-scale changes to the environment of northern Australia caused by altered fire regimes, grazing by livestock and feral animals, and the invasion of native woodlands by exotic plants, particularly introduced pasture grasses (Woinarski 2004). There is some evidence of a broad-scale decline in the numbers of small and medium-sized endemic mammals across northern Australia over the last century (Braithwaite & Griffiths 1994; Pardon et al. 2003; Sattler & Creighton 2002; Winter & Allison 1980; Woinarski et al. 2001, 2011) that may have reduced the availability of food for the Masked Owl (northern) (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Woinarski 2004).  It has been suggested that competition with other large owls (Schodde & Mason 1980) or a limited availability of large trees with hollows suitable for nesting could be limiting population size. The latter seems unlikely given the broad extent of tree cover across northern Australia (Garnett & Crowley 2000). A study conducted in tall eucalypt forest and woodland near Darwin however reported that resident populations of the Common Brushtail Possum ( Trichosurus vulpecula ) and Black-footed Tree-rat ( Mesembriomys gouldii ) were approaching carrying capacity because of the availability of hollow-bearing trees (Pittman 2003). Furthermore, there has been a trend towards fires of increased frequency, intensity and scale in northern Australia in the past 50 years which, magnified by the invasion of native vegetation communities by exotic pasture grasses, has probably resulted in a decline in the number of large eucalypt trees, and especially of those with extensive hollows (Williams et al. 1999b, 2003). The use of the rodenticide Klerat, which has now been banned, has been identified as a possible but unproven cause of the decline of the Masked Owl (northern) in the wet tropics of Queensland (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Nielsen 1996; Young & De Lai 1997).  The increasing spread and pace of development in the Darwin and Daly River areas of the NT could also be reducing the extent of suitable habitat for the subspecies (Woinarski 2004). At present, the limited management resources available in almost all parts of northern Australia are considered insufficient to halt the ongoing broad-scale degradation of native environments by the processes described above (Woinarski 2004).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26048'),('26049','Tyto novaehollandiae melvillensis','Endangered','Aves','Tytonidae','The Masked Owl (Tiwi Islands) is a large owl of more than 30 cm in length and 400 g in weight. It has a white to buff facial mask, which is framed by a black ruff that merges into a pair of thick furrowed brows; buff and blackish-brown or black-and-white upperparts; and white to buff underparts with coarse dark spots or, in some individuals, chevrons. The female is much bigger and bulkier than the male, and has larger feet (Higgins 1999).','The Masked Owl (Tiwi Islands) occurs mostly in tall open eucalypt forest and woodland (Mason & Schodde 1997; Woinarski et al. 2003b), especially where Darwin Woollybutt ( Eucalyptus miniata ), Darwin Stringybark ( E. tetrodonta ) and Melville Island Bloodwood ( E. nesophila ) are domiNAt (Woinarski et al. 2003b). This subspecies often roosts in monsoon rainforest, and forages in more open habitats such as grassland and treeless shrubland dominated by Fern-leaved Silky Oak ( Grevillea pteridifolia ),  Melaleuca  spp.,  Acacia  spp. and Tropical Banksia ( Banksia dentata ) (Woinarski et al. 2003b). It is also reported to roost in mangroves and plantations of Mangium ( Acacia mangium ), but it is unlikely to nest in either of these habitats because of the relative scarcity or absence of suitable hollow-bearing trees (J. Woinarski 2007a, pers. comm.). It is occasionally observed in  Pinus elliotti  plantations (Mason & Schodde 1997).The Masked Owl (Tiwi Islands) does not occur in any ecological communities listed under the EPBC Act. It does, however, co-occur with a large number of species listed under the EPBC Act, including Butler\'s Dunnart ( Sminthopsis butleri , Vulnerable), the Water Mouse ( Xeromys myoides , Vulnerable), Red Goshawk ( Erythrotriorchis radiatus , Vulnerable), Partridge Pigeon (eastern) ( Geophaps smithii smithii , Vulnerable), Hooded Robin (Tiwi Islands) ( Melanodryas cucullata melvillensis , Endangered) and the plants  Burmannia  sp. Bathurst Island (R.Fensham 1021) (Endangered),  Hoya australis  subsp.  oramicola  (Vulnerable),  Mitrella tiwiensis  (Vulnerable),  Typhonium jonesii  (Endangered),  T. mirabile  (Endangered) and  Xylopia monosperma  (J. Woinarski 2007a, pers. comm.).','The Masked Owl (Tiwi Islands) is presumed, on the basis of studies on other subspecies of the Masked Owl (Debus & Rose 1994; Green 1982a; Green & Rainbird 1985; Kavanagh 1996; Mooney 1992a; Peake et al. 1993), to feed on a combination of insects, birds and small to medium-sized mammals, with mammals likely to represent the major source of food.The foraging behaviour of the Masked Owl (Tiwi Islands) has not been described. However, it is likely to be similar to that of the Masked Owl (southern Australia) ( Tyto novaehollandiae novaehollandiae ), which is an opportunistic predator that hunts from perches and occasionally on the wing for terrestrial, scansorial (climbing) and arboreal prey (Debus 1993; Debus & Rose 1994; Kavanagh & Murray 1996).','The primary threat to the Masked Owl (Tiwi Islands) is the conversion of large areas of optimal habitat (tall open eucalypt forest) to short-rotation plantations (Garnett & Crowley 2000). Of particular concern is the loss of large hollow-bearing trees that may be used for nesting (Garnett & Crowley 2000). 26 000 ha of land has been converted between 2002–07 (J. Woinarski 2007a, pers. comm.).The Masked Owl (Tiwi Islands) may also have been adversely affected by changes to the structure of the native vegetation on the Tiwi Islands caused by invasive weeds and a shift in fire regime away from traditional burning practices (Fensham & Cowie 1998; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Northern Territory Parks & Wildlife Commission 2006a).It is possible that habitat change associated with the development of plantations, invasive weeds and altered fire regimes may have reduced the abundance of native mammals (Firth et al. 2006; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Woinarski 2004), which are presumed, on the basis of studies on other subspecies of the Masked Owl (Debus & Rose 1994; Green 1982a; Green & Rainbird 1985; Kavanagh 1996; Mooney 1992a; Peake et al. 1993), to be a source of food for the Masked Owl (Tiwi Islands).Cyclones are a common occurrence in the Tiwi Islands and may periodically substantially reduce the extent of suitable habitat and, in particular, the availability of large hollow-bearing trees (J. Woinarski 2007a, pers. comm.).The small size and restricted distribution of the Masked Owl (Tiwi Islands) population suggests that it may have low genetic diversity (J. Woinarski 2007a, pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26049'),('26167','Galaxias fontanus','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Galaxiidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26167'),('26168','Galaxias fuscus','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Galaxiidae','The barred galaxias is a reddish brown fish growing to 15 cm long, but commonly reaches 7-9 cm long. It has dark oval blotches on its side with at least one to four usually very distinct. It has clear to reddish brown fins (Allen 1989). Mid-lateral bars vary geographically, and are very occasionally absent, though this is extremely rare. Bars on fish from around Lake Mountain are the largest. Putative hybridisation with  Galaxias olidus  can cause difficulties in the identification of some individuals (Raadik 2014).','Barred galaxias occurs in small to medium-sized (0.7-11 m wide), moderately to fast flowing, steep gradient, shallow (0.1-0.4 m deep) water (Raadik 2014) with some pools (to 3 m) (Stoessel et al. 2015), creeks and rivers, all typically cool to cold (Raadik 2014) to above the winter snow line (Allen 1989). The usual sequence of instream habitat consists of pools interconnected by rapids, small and large cascades, and some small waterfalls. In larger streams the steep gradient sections containing cascades, pools and waterfalls are interspersed with relatively long, low gradient sections containing pools and runs (Raadik 1995).Stream substrate consists of bedrock, boulder, cobble, with smaller amounts of pebble, gravel and sand, and streams are usually well shaded by dense overhanging riparian vegetation. Instream habitat usually consists of an accumulation of large and small timber debris, rocks and tree roots in undercut banks (Raadik 2014). Single logs, log jams, and large branch piles are common instream, as are piles of leaves and smaller twigs. In disturbed habitats, quantities of silt are present, and the riparian vegetation is either completely or partially lost, significantly reducing shading. The stream banks in disturbed habitats are densely covered with exotic vegetation. All sites lack aquatic vegetation, with most of the instream cover being provided by timber debris, rocks, boulders and some low-lying overhanging vegetation (Raadik 1995).Barred galaxias is a cold-adapted fish, usually found in very heavily shaded streams that rarely exceed 15 °C during summer and usually reach 1-3 °C during winter. This species is considered to have previously occupied larger, deeper and more moderate gradient river systems at lower altitudes (down to about 300 m elevation), with a coarser substrate and larger accumulation of timber debris (Raadik 2014).','Barred galaxias feeds in the upstream end of pools, where the incoming water from the riffle or cascade zone may bring drifting prey items. It feeds on both drifting and benthic invertebrates. Nocturnal feeding has been noted (Shirley 1991; Raadik 1995). No work has been conducted on diet though terrestrial insects may be an important component (Raadik et al. 1996).','PredationBarred galaxias is at serious risk from predation by and competition with rainbow trout ( Oncorhynchus mykiss ) and brown trout ( Salmo trutta ) (Jackson et al. 2004; Raadik et al. 2010). Trout has been implicated in the extinction of subpopulations at Godfreys Creek, Lower Rubicon River and Quartz Creek, and possibly at Whitehouse Creek and Mountain Creek (Raadik 1995). Removal of trout from streams and the installation of barriers has been undertaken to reduce the impact of trout (Raadik 2000). Trout removal and barrier construction may help to allow the recolonisation of downstream areas by barred galaxias in the long term, and may enable any recently isolated subpopulations of the species to rejoin (Koehn & Raadik 1998; Raadik 2000).Siltation/sedimentationStream substrates at sites where barred galaxias occurs are usually composed of a heterogeneous mix of cobbles and pebbles, with some boulder, gravel and sand. Much of this habitat has been lost due to anthropogenic degradation of riverine habitat, primarily through siltation (Stoessel et al. 2015). With increased sedimentation, such as from catchment disturbance, the substrate is smothered and deeper holes are filled. Smothering of substrate reduces the availability of refugia, reduces food availability and reduces resting habitat (Raadik et al. 2010). In remNAt barred galaxias, siltation and sedimentation is a particular risk following bushfire (Raadik et al. 2010).DroughtRemNAt subpopulations of barred galaxias are all geographically isolated in small headwater streams in the very upper portion of steep catchments. As such, dewatering of streams during drought may lead to localised extinction. This risk is exacerbated in silt/sand smothered streams, which, prior to siltation, would have had a heterogeonous substrate that allowed individuals to take refuge in rocks and cobbles (Raadik et al. 2010). As a result of trout predation, subpopulations have been extirpated from lower reaches of streams/rivers, and these subpopulations may have acted as refugia populations during periods of drought.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26168'),('26169','Galaxias pedderensis','Extinct in the wild','Actinopterygii','Galaxiidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26169'),('26170','Maccullochella ikei','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Percichthyidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26170'),('26171','Maccullochella macquariensis','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Percichthyidae','The Trout Cod is a large, elongated fish, bluish grey in colour or sometimes dark to light brown. It has been known to grow to 85 cm and 16 kg but mostly grows to between 40 to 50 cm and less than 5 kg. It has small dark irregular spots or bars extending onto lower sides and the base of the dorsal and caudal fins, few or absent markings on the head and dusky grey to brownish fins with white or creamy margins (sometimes tinged with orange or yellow) (Allen 1989a; McDowall 1996).','Recent research in the Murray and Murrumbidgee Rivers show that Trout Cod occupy stream positions characterised by a high abundance of large woody debris (or \'snags\') in water that is comparatively deep and close to riverbanks. However, midstream snags are also an important habitat component (NSW Fisheries 2001). In the Murray River below Yarrawonga Weir, Trout Cod inhabit a large (60—100 m wide), deep (>3 m) flowing river section with a sand, silt and clay substrate that contains abundant snags and woody debris. Trout Cod are often angled from within, under or adjacent to snags, branch piles, and steep clay banks, usually in areas of relatively fast current (Douglas et al. 1994). In a study by Brown and colleagues (1998), Trout Cod were only found in snag piles that were typically opposite sandy beaches or on outside bends. There is a degree of overlap with the habitat requirements of Murray Cod and therefore competition between these two species is likely (Brown et al. 1998). As a large proportion of the streams that the Trout Cod originally inhabited are now degraded, it is difficult to accurately determine the habitat requirements of the species (Reed 1995). Several authors (Cadwallader & Backhouse 1983; Lake 1971; Llewellyn & MacDonald 1980) believe Trout Cod to be more common in the cooler waters of the upper reaches of streams. Seven Creeks (Victoria) is a relatively narrow stream (5—7 m wide) with shallow (<2 m) pools interspersed by rapids and cascades (up to 4 m in height) (Douglas et al. 1994). Here, the species occurs in fast-flowing water over bedrock, boulder and sand-gravel substrates. Larger fish occur in deep holes between falls and rapids while the smaller fish shelter beneath and amongst boulders. Juveniles have been found in pools in a steep rocky section of the Seven Creeks system (Cadwallader & Backhouse 1983). In Seven Creeks, partitioning of habitat use was evident with adults utilising pools and smaller juveniles utilising the riffle complexes (areas of a stream or river characterised by a rocky substrate and turbulent, fast-moving, shallow water) (NSW DPI 2006). A Trout Cod radio tracking study has been conducted in a 40 km reach of the Murray River, downstream of Lake Mulwala (Koehn & Nicol 2014). This river in this region is a \"large',' lowland river situated on low-gradient riverine plains',' with low energy',' and is characterised by meandering bends. The species was strongly associated with structural woody habitat (>68% cover)'),('26172','Geocrinia vitellina','Vulnerable','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','The Orange-bellied Frog is similar to  Geocrinia alba, G. lutea and G. rosea . The Orange-bellied Frog grows to 25 mm and has a distinguishing egg-yolk yellow belly (Cogger 2000).','The Orange-bellied Frog occurs in permanently moist sites in relatively dry and seasonal climatic zones of lateritic uplands and narrow valleys (Wardell-Johnson & Roberts 1993). The species occupies six unconnected and undisturbed areas of riparian vegetation at an elevation of 120 m in broad U-shaped valleys (up to 100 m wide) where there is marked topographic relief (Tyler 1997). The species is abundant at seepages but rare on the valley floor (Tyler et al. 1994). The restricted occurrence of the Orange-bellied Frog appears to reflect very localised suitable habitat conditions (Wardell-Johnson 1995).DomiNAt plant species that occur at Orange-bellied Frog sites include:  Homalospermum firmum ,  Pseudoloxocarya grossa, Loxocarya  sp. nov ., Boronia molloyae, Acacia uliginosa, Agonis linearifolia  and  Astartea fascicularis  (Wardell-Johnson 1995).','NA','None of the known Orange-bellied Frog populations are thought to have become extinct. However, populations burnt in 1997 are currently the subject of monitoring to assess their status. All six known populations occur in State Forest or areas proposed as conservation reserves and are under no immediate threat from clearing or logging activity (Wardell-Johnson 1995).However, potential threats to the Orange-bellied Frog include inappropriate fire management and feral pigs (Roberts et al. 1999). Chytridiomycosis, a disease implicated in frog declines, has been detected in the Orange-bellied Frog (Speare & Berger 2000).Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (DEH 2006).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26172'),('26175','Galaxias parvus','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Galaxiidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26175'),('26176','Galaxias tanycephalus','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Galaxiidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26176'),('26177','Nannoperca obscura','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Percichthyidae','The Yarra Pygmy Perch is a dusky, pale, brownish-grey, sometimes greenish fish with a pale belly, spots along the midline, and clear, faint yellow to black fins. It has been known to grown up to 7.5 cm but more commonly grows to about 6.5 cm (McDowall 1996). Unlike other members of the genus, the Yarra Pygmy Perch has a pre-orbital bone that is not completely covered by skin, exposing its serrated lower edge (Kuiter & Allen 1986).','The Yarra Pygmy Perch typically occurs in lakes, ponds and slow-flowing rivers (Saddlier & Hammer 2010), but prefers small-medium sized, relatively shallow (1-2 m) freshwater streams with moderate to high flow (Saddlier et al. 2013). It is a demersal species that completes its life cycle in freshwater. It is usually associated with large amounts of aquatic vegetation (particularly emergent vegetation) and log snags in clear, fresh to slightly brackish water (Llewellyn 1980; Woodward & Malone 2002; Bice & Ye 2006 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013)The distributional range of the Yarra Pygmy Perch coincides with Victoria\'s ancient volcanic region; most streams in this area are notably alkaline and have a high mineral content (Briggs 1999). The species occurs in Deep Creek which is a clear, slow to steady flowing creek with a silt or solid rock substrate. In winter, the average depth is around 0.5-1.5 m. Summer water levels are greatly reduced, with little if any water flow. Typical winter water temperatures are 7-9 °C and summer water temperature averages 17-19 °C. Water chemistry is pH 7.6-7.8. In artificial ponds this species has survived minimum and maximum water temperatures of 5 °C and 35 °C, respectively (Briggs 1999).','Diet of the Yarra Pygmy Perch includes insects, insect larvae and planktonic crustaceans (Allen 1989a).','Major threats to the Yarra Pygmy Perch include wetland drainage, habitat damage through grazing and lack of regeneration, altered hydrology and introduced fish (Saddlier et al. 2013). The majority of known populations occur at sites that have little or no formal protection from many of the threats, and those that do have protection are exposed to broader threats affecting freshwater habitats and catchments (e.g. use of groundwater) (Saddlier et al. 2013). Distribution of populations is now generally disjunct and patchy, due to the fragmented nature of the remaining lowland shallow freshwater wetland habitat (Saddlier & Hammer 2010).Loss of habitatThe nature of the lowland, shallow freshwater habitat of Yarra Pygmy Perch means it is especially susceptible to a range of practices that result in its degradation and loss, especially where this habitat occurs on private land (Saddlier & Hammer 2010). Apart from the direct loss of habitat, lateral connectivity between wetlands and to more permanent waterbodies is also reduced. This connectivity is important for maintaining the life cycles of macroinvertebrates and aquatic plants, and consequently for species such as the Yarra Pygmy Perch that rely on these associations (Saddlier & Hammer 2010).Altered hydrologyAlteration of natural flood and drying cycles, particularly in shallow creeks, through activities such as catchment clearing, establishing extensive plantations or construction of dams, pose threats to Yarra Pygmy Perch habitat. These activities may alter natural seasonal water levels at critical times of the year or may result in complete loss or permanent alteration of more shallow habitats. Populations occurring in smaller creeks on land where grazing is practiced (constituting the majority of known sites) are particularly susceptible to water abstraction for stock watering (Saddlier & Hammer 2010).The extraction of groundwater, particularly in the south-east of South Australia is a clear threat to the ecological sustainability of the significant habitats and species of coastal springs in these areas (Hammer 2002 cited in Saddlier & Hammer 2010), as well as in Victoria. In the 1990s, the depth of the the greater Mt Gambier unconfined aquifer fell significantly, reducing the hydraulic pressure of the system (Saddlier & Hammer 2010).Extensive plantations of eucalypts and pines in south-east South Australia and south-west Victoria pose a major threat to habitat through lowering ground water levels and decreasing runoff into waterways. More wide-scale clearing of catchment vegetation may lead to elevated agricultural runoff that may directly affect water quality (through increased input of sediment, pesticides/herbicides etc) or increase the risk of algal blooms through increased water nutrient levels and sedimentation. Catchment clearing and subsequent tree plantation establishment are also likely to cause altered hydrological regimes (Vertessy et al. 2000 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013) resulting in reduced catchment water yield and direct aquatic habitat loss (Saddlier & Hammer 2010).Predation, competition and habitat alteration by fish speciesPredation by Redfin Perch ( Perca fluviatilis ), Brown Trout ( Salmo trutta ) and Rainbow Trout ( Oncorhynchus mykiss ) may be causing decline of Yarra Pygmy Perch (Wager & Jackson 1993). Other pygmy perch species have been detected in the stomach contents of Redfin Perch, suggesting that the Yarra Pygmy Perch may also be targeted (Saddlier & Hammer 2010). Damage to aquatic vegetation by Common Carp ( Cyprinus carpio ) may also impact on habitat critical to the survival of this species while competition/aggressive behaviour (particularly from Eastern Gambusia  Gambusia holbrooki ) are also implicated in the decline of this species (Wager & Jackson 1993).In-stream and riparian habitat degradationLand clearing and unrestricted stock access to riparian zones is widespread and leads to a reduction in aquatic and riparian vegetation levels (Belsky et al. 1999 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013), increased nutrient run-off, a reduction in bank stability and increased erosion and sedimentation (Belsky et al. 1999 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013; Clary & Kruse 2004 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013), increased summer water temperatures (Arthington & Pusey 2003 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013) and the risk of algal blooms.Sedimentation has direct effects on fish including asphyxiation, the smothering of eggs, a reduced ability to find food and the smothering of stream beds which leads to a reduction in habitat and flows (Gray et al. 2012 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013; Newcombe & Jensen 1996 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013). Additionally, sedimentation reduces the level and diversity of aquatic macroinvertebrates and plants (DSE 2007b cited in Saddlier & Hammer 2010), factors considered critical components of Yarra Pygmy Perch habitat. Decreased overhanging vegetation increases summer water temperatures which in turn may lead (particularly when combined with increased nutrient input) to algal blooms. Further physical disturbance of smaller waters may also occur through practices such as drainage and ploughing after water levels are reduced (Saddlier & Hammer 2010). Large inputs of sediment following fires can have devastating impacts on stream fish populations (Lyon & O’Connor 2008 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013). Further disturbance to wetlands occurs through practices such as ploughing when wetlands are dry. In some rivers, the development of \'sand-slugs\' (i.e. discrete slugs of travelling sand particles) subsequently alters habitat structure with links to declines in regional fish diversity (Howson et al. 2010). Sediment deposition alters habitat structure by decreasing channel depth and changing substrate composition and burying woody debris (Howson et al. 2009).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26177'),('26178','Nannoperca variegata','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Percichthyidae','The Variegated Pygmy Perch is a fish growing to six centimetres. Its colouring is highly variable, ranging from bright green or olive above, to tan or light brown on the sides grading to a whitish or orange belly. The upper part of the head, back and pectoral region are mostly golden. There is a dark spot on the base of the caudal fin, and a series of mid-lateral, dark blotches (Allen 1989a; McDowall 1996).','The Variegated Pygmy Perch inhabits relatively shallow freshwater streams with moderate to high water flow and high levels of aquatic vegetation (Saddlier 1992). Although Variegated Pygmy Perch is strongly associated with high cover of submerged and emergent aquatic vegetation and occasional woody habitat, it prefers clear water (Kuiter et al. 1996; Hammer et al. 2000 cited in Saddleir et al. 2013). At Ewen\'s Ponds (Saddlier 1992), it is most common in creeks between ponds (Allen 1989a). It can be found in fresh and slightly brackish (salty) waters, mostly over substrates of gravel, cobble or boulders in the absence of silt, although at Ewen\'s Ponds it is associated with large amounts of detritus (Kuiter et al. 1996).In the wild, the Variegated Pygmy Perch can tolerate a temperature range of 14-26°C and a pH range of 6.8-7.5, although captive specimens survive best in water temperatures of 18-27°C and a pH of 7.2 (Armstrong 1998). Captive specimens also reportedly need well oxygenated water (Kuiter et al. 1996).Analysis of the critical habitat requirements of sites, supporting existing populations, is needed to better understand the ecology of the species (Saddlier 1992).','In captivity, the Variegated Pygmy Perch has taken  Tubifex  worms, brine shrimp and mosquito larvae (Leggett & Merrick 1987). Its diet has been described as consisting primarily of insects, insect larvae and microcrustaceans (Cadwallader & Backhouse 1983 cited in Saddlier et el. 2013).','Major threats to the Variegated Pygmy Perch include wetland drainage, habitat damage through grazing and lack of regeneration, altered hydrology and introduced fish (Saddlier et al. 2013). Only one existing population occurs in some form of reserve (Saddlier & Hammer 2010a). The majority of known populations occur at sites that have little or no formal protection from many of the threats, and those that do have protection are exposed to broader threats affecting freshwater habitats and catchments (e.g. use of groundwater) (Saddlier et al. 2013).Loss of habitatThe nature of the lowland, shallow freshwater habitat of Variegated Pygmy Perch means it is especially susceptible to a range of practices that result in its degradation and loss, especially where this habitat occurs on private land (Saddlier & Hammer 2010a). Apart from the direct loss of habitat, lateral connectivity between wetlands and to more permanent waterbodies is also reduced. This connectivity is important for maintaining the life cycles of macroinvertebrates and aquatic plants, and consequently for species such as the Variegated Pygmy Perch that relies on these associations (Saddlier & Hammer 2010a).Altered hydrologyThe extraction of groundwater, particularly in the south-east of South Australia is a clear threat to the ecological sustainability of the significant habitats and species of coastal springs in these areas (Hammer 2002), as well as in Victoria. In the 1990s, the depth of the the greater Mt Gambier unconfined aquifer fell significantly, reducing the hydraulic pressure of the system (Saddlier & Hammer 2010a). Spring discharge reductions of 20-30% have been noted in core habitats of Variegated Pygmy Perch in South Australia associated with groundwater extraction (Stadter & Yan 2000 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013). Water is also drawn directly from the Ewen\'s Pond system (Eight Mile Creek) for irrigation and is partly returned via a complex network of drains from the adjacent farmland (Carmody 2006).Alteration of natural flood and drying cycles, particularly in shallow creeks, through activities such as catchment clearing, establishing extensive plantations or construction of dams, pose threats to Variegated Pygmy Perch habitat. These activities may alter natural seasonal water levels at critical times of the year or may result in complete loss or permanent alteration of more shallow habitats. Populations occurring in smaller creeks on land where grazing is practiced (constituting the majority of known sites) are particularly susceptible to water abstraction for stock watering (Saddlier & Hammer 2010a).Extensive plantations of eucalypts and pines in south-eastern South Australia and south-western Victoria pose a major threat to habitat through lowering ground water levels and decreasing runoff into waterways. More wide-scale clearing of catchment vegetation may lead to elevated agricultural runoff that may directly affect water quality (through increased input of sediment, pesticides/herbicides etc) or increase the risk of algal blooms through increased water nutrient levels and sedimentation. Catchment clearing and subsequent tree plantation establishment are also likely to cause altered hydrological regimes (Vertessy et al. 2000 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013) resulting in reduced catchment water yield and direct aquatic habitat loss (Saddlier & Hammer 2010a). Blue-green algae infestation at Ewen\'s Ponds has been observed, out-competing native, aquatic plants, such as Water Ribbon ( Triglochin procerum ), leading to extensive dieback of aquatic plants throughout the system (Carmody 2006).Predation, competition and habitat alteration by fish speciesPredation by Redfin Perch ( Perca fluviatilis ), Brown Trout ( Salmo trutta ) and Rainbow Trout ( Oncorhynchus mykiss ) may be causing decline of Variegated Pygmy Perch (Wager & Jackson 1993). Other pygmy perch\'s have been detected in the stomach contents of Redfin Perch, suggesting that the Variegated Pygmy Perch may also be targeted (Saddlier & Hammer 2010a). Damage to aquatic vegetation by Common Carp ( Cyprinus carpio ) may also impact on habitat critical to the survival of this species while competition/aggressive behaviour (particularly from Eastern Gambusia  Gambusia holbrooki ) are also implicated in the decline of this species (Wager & Jackson 1993).In-stream and riparian habitat degradationLand clearing and unrestricted stock access to riparian zones is widespread and leads to a reduction in aquatic and riparian vegetation levels (Belsky et al. 1999 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013), increased nutrient run-off, a reduction in bank stability and increased erosion and sedimentation (Belsky et al. 1999 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013; Clary & Kruse 2004 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013), increased summer water temperatures (Arthington & Pusey 2003 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013) and the risk of algal blooms.Sedimentation has direct effects on fish including asphyxiation, the smothering of eggs, a reduced ability to find food and the smothering of stream beds which leads to a reduction in habitat and flows (Gray et al. 2012 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013; Newcombe & Jensen 1996 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013). Additionally, sedimentation reduces the level and diversity of aquatic macroinvertebrates and plants (DSE 2007b cited in Saddlier & Hammer 2010a), factors considered critical components of Yarra Pygmy Perch habitat. Decreased overhanging vegetation increases summer water temperatures which in turn may lead (particularly when combined with increased nutrient input) to algal blooms. Further physical disturbance of smaller waters may also occur through practices such as drainage and ploughing after water levels are reduced (Saddlier & Hammer 2010a). Large inputs of sediment following fires can have devastating impacts on stream fish populations (Lyon & O’Connor 2008 cited in Saddlier et al. 2013). Further disturbance to wetlands occurs through practices such as ploughing when wetlands are dry. In some rivers, the development of \'sand-slugs\' (i.e. discrete slugs of travelling sand particles) subsequently alters habitat structure with links to declines in regional fish diversity (Howson et al. 2010). Sediment deposition alters habitat structure by decreasing channel depth and changing substrate composition and burying woody debris (Howson et al. 2009).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26178'),('26179','Prototroctes maraena','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Retropinnidae','The Australian Grayling is a slender fish varying in colour from silvery with an olive-grey back and whitish belly, to olive green or brownish in the back with a darker mid-lateral streak and greyish fins. The species has large eyes, which are usually bright yellow, a rounded snout and a small head (Barnham 1998; DPI 2006). The Australian Grayling generally grows between 17–19 cm, but can reach 30–33 cm. The lower jaw is shorter than the upper jaw. It has a fleshy, fatty fin located between the dorsal and tail fins. The mouth reaches to below the eye. There are no scales on the head, nor is there a lateral line. This species has a strong cucumber smell when caught and first taken from the water (Barnham 1998; DPI 2006).','The Australian Grayling is diadromous, spending part of its lifecycle in freshwater and at least part of the larval and/or juvenile stages in coastal seas (Miles et al. 2013). Adults (including pre spawning and spawning adults) inhabit cool, clear, freshwater streams with gravel substrate and areas alternating between pools and riffle zones (DEWHA 2008zzn) such as the Tambo River, which is also known to have granite outcrops (Berra 1982). The species has also been associated with clear, gravel-bottomed habitats in the Mitchell and WonNAgatta Rivers (Victoria) and in a muddy-bottomed, heavily silted habitat in the Tarwin River (Victoria) (Jackson 1980). The species has been found over 100 km upstream from the sea (Jackson & Koehn 1988).During January–November 1979 in the Tambo River, Victoria, water temperatures ranged from 5–26 °C and the pH was approximately 8 (Berra 1982). Hall and Harrington (1989) located a population of adult Australian Grayling in consecutive years in an urban area of the lower reaches of the highly turbid Barwon River, with a salinity of approximately 1.5 parts per thousand (ppt).','Australian Grayling are omnivorous, feeding on a variety of small aquatic organisms, including crustaceans (such as cladocerans), insects and their larvae and algae. Non-aquatic insects have also been taken from the water surface by this species (Backhouse et al. 2008a).The stomach contents of specimens from the Mitchell River in eastern Victoria were examined with aquatic insect larvae dominating the stomach contents, but small amounts of plant material, including macrophytes and filamentous algae, were also present (Jackson 1976).The diet of the Tambo River (Victoria) population consists of immature aquatic insects, gastropods and, most commonly, plant material (diatom/organic matrix) (Berra et al. 1987). There was little dietary overlap between summer and the other seasons in all size classes examined, but there was significant dietary overlap between the size groups for all seasons except summer (Berra et al. 1987). Green algae ( Stigeoclonium  sp.) occurred only in the stomachs of the largest size group in summer where it made up 25% of the volume (Berra et al. 1987). The teeth of Australian Grayling are well adapted for combing filamentous algae with specimens observed to nibble on filamentous algae growing on the downstream side of rocks (Berra 1982).','Habitat disruption and degradation The decline in the Australian Grayling\'s abundance appears to have been very rapid after the European settlement of Australia. Reasons for its decline are unknown, but are most likely related to habitat disruption caused by deforestation, the advent of barriers to fish movement, inappropriate river management, poor water quality and siltation, the introduction of exotic fish species and overfishing. The  National Recovery Plan for Australian Grayling  (DEWHA 2008zzn) contains a full summary of known and potential threats to the Australian Grayling. Data on the habitat preferences and physical tolerances (e.g. salinity, oxygen, temperature or turbidity) of Australian Grayling are lacking and as such information may be vital to management, further work in this area should be encouraged (Jackson & Koehn 1988). All rivers known to contain Australian Grayling are at risk of habitat degradation in the future (Jackson & Koehn 1988). Introduced species Trout (Rainbow Trout,  Onchorhynchus mykiss  and Brown Trout,  Salmo trutta ) are known to prey on juvenile Australian Grayling and compete for habitat with adults (T. Raadik DSE-ARI pers. comm.). Juveniles are thought to be particularly vulnerable to predation during their migration from the marine environment to upstream freshwater habitat. Barriers and areas of low flow may also exacerbate this issue, if they cause aggregations of young fish at blockages. Although there is not extensive first-hand evidence of the impacts of Trout, Trout were implicated in the extinction of the New Zealand Grayling (McDowall 1976) and they are likely to have a similar effect on the Australian species. Oriental Weatherloach ( Misgurnus anguillicaudatus ) are also thought to have an impact on the Australian Grayling, as they are likely to prey on grayling eggs. Complex lifecycle and high fecundity Apparent declines and abundances in Grayling populations may also reflect its complex life cycle and high fecundity (Berra 1982). Successive low river flow years (typical of Australia) could result in high mortality for Australian Grayling populations, but populations repond quickly to good conditions (Berra 1982). The species is particularly impacted by impoundments and the associated changes in flow regime, temperature and chemical compositions of the water, as they spawn in freshwater and rely on flows to help transport larvae to marine environments (Harris 1984 cited in Miles et al. 2013). Disease In 1869/70 an epidemic in the Tasmanian population killed thousands of Australian Graylings. The fish were described as being almost entirely covered with a cottony fungoid growth. The epidemic was so virulent that the Australian Grayling was almost removed completely from many of the southern rivers. It is believed that the epidemic was caused by the fungus  Saprolegnia  which was until then unknown in Tasmania. The fungus appeared in the Tasmanian river systems with the introduction of species from the  Salmonidae  Family (Salmon, Trout) (Saville-Kent 1888 cited in Cadwallader 1996; Cadwallader 1996).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26179'),('26180','Pseudomugil mellis','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Pseudomugilidae','The Honey Blue-eye male fish is honey to copper-coloured, growing to 3.8 cm, with a dusky head, a single dark midlateral line along the side of the body, blue eyes, and iridescent blue cheeks (McDowall 1996). The female is plain amber with clear fins (Allen 1989a).','The Honey Blue-eye inhabits slightly acidic (pH 4.4–6.8), clear and tannin-stained lakes, streams and wetlands (Arthington & Marshall 1993) with sandy or muddy bottoms in coastal heath (wallum) ecosystems (Allen 1989a; Wagner & Jackson 1993; EPA 2005b). The species usually occurs where there is little or no flow, and the fish can find shelter in dense, aquatic vegetation, such as emergent and submerged sedges, along the margins (Allen & Ivantsoff 1982; Arthington & Marshall 1993; EPA 2005b). The annual rainfall of the species\' habitat is approximately 1016–1778 mm per annum (Allen & Ivantsoff 1982). This species can tolerate wide fluctuations in stream temperature, from 14° C in winter to 38° C in summer (Semple 1991).','The Honey Blue-eye forms schools of up to 30 individuals and moves amongst emergent vegetation in search of food. The species is a generalist feeder, feeding on flies, insect larvae and small crustaceans, and also eats large quantities of desmids and diatoms (microscopic algae) (Arthington & Marshall 1993; EPA 2005b).','The main threats to Honey Blue-eye include: habitat clearing and/or degradation for residential, forestry and agricultural developments; recreational activities at some Fraser Island sites; collection for aquariums; and competition from introduced Mosquito Fish ( Gambusia holbrooki ) (Allen 1989a; Arthington & Marshall 1993; Wagner and Jackson 1993; EPA 2005b).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26180'),('26181','Geocrinia alba','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','The White-bellied Frog is similar to  Geocrinia lutea ,  Geocrinia rosea  and  Geocrinia vitellina . The White-bellied Frog grows to 25 mm and has a distinguishing white belly (Cogger 2000).','The White-bellied Frog occurs in permanently moist sites in relatively dry and seasonal climatic zones.  The White-bellied Frog inhabits broad U-shaped drainage depressions with swampy floors within undulating to hilly country on Leeuwin Block granite and narrow V-shaped valleys on laterized Perth Basin sediments (Wardell-Johnson & Roberts 1991).The area of suitable habitat of the White-bellied Frog was estimated, in 1986, to be 193.2 ha or approximately three percent of the species extent of occurrence (Wardell-Johnson & Roberts 1991). However this may be an overestimate, as not all potential sites support populations of the White-bellied Frog (Wardell-Johnson et al. 1995).','NA','This species is of major concern as populations are disappearing at an alarming rate. The likely causes of decline are isolation of populations due to land clearing and associated small population sizes exacerbated by low natural dispersal (Roberts et al. 1999).Land clearing and habitat loss are the main threats to the White-bellied Frog. The species is presumed to have been more extensive prior to land clearing, the geographic range of the species is extremely small and is now severely fragmented (Roberts et al. 1999). Wardell-Johnson & Roberts (1993) estimate that 70% of creek systems suitable for breeding have been cleared since European settlement. Clearing of riparian habitat has led to the loss of White-bellied Frog populations. However this species can persist if the riparian vegetation remains intact following the loss of the adjacent upland vegetation (Wardell-Johnson et al. 1995). Approximately 18% of the species geographic range is on public land (Tyler 1997) with the remaining majority occurring on privately owned land (Roberts et al. 1999). However, much of the private land in this species range has been cleared for agriculture. Of the six sites where this species is known to occur, five are private property. Although these private properties have retained some native riparian vegetation, all of these sites have been degraded (Wardell & Johnson et al. 1995).Of the 75 sub-populations known from 1983-1996, 23 (nearly 31%) have become extinct. In most cases the cause of decline was not obvious and extinctions were equally common on private and public lands. Extinctions were more common at sites with adjacent cleared land which may be associated with changed hydrology, fertiliser run-off and stock grazing (Roberts et al. 1999).A dramatic reduction in population size at one location has been associated with a low intensity, fuel reduction burn (Roberts et al. 1999). The observed population decline of 60% less than pre-fire estimates is consistent with average effects reported by Driscoll & Roberts (1997) for the related species  G. lutea . Fuel-reduction burning in spring has been associated with a significant decline in the number of calling males of  G. lutea . Populations had not recovered two years after fire and the short-term impact of spring fuel-reduction burns may pose a serious threat of extinction for very small populations. From the information available on recruitment and age at maturity for the White-bellied Frog, it is expected that populations may not begin to stabilise until four years after the fire, and recovery may take substantially longer (Driscoll & Roberts 1997).As there are large genetic differences between populations, many populations will need to be conserved in order to maintain genetic variation in the long term. Maintaining many small populations is an effective way of preventing loss of genetic variation from the species as a whole, it is likely to be more effective than conserving a smaller number of large populations provided that small populations do not become extinct, which would result in loss of unique genetic variants. The likely biogeographic history of the White-bellied Frog suggests that contractions and expansions of geographic range may be a natural phenomenon, and that they play an important role in the evolution of the species (Driscoll 1998). Therefore, if evolutionary processes are to be maintained, range changes need to be accommodated in the long term (Driscoll 1998).Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (DEH 2006).  It is unlikely though, that declines in the White-bellied Frog populations, at sites that are considered to be at high risk for the accidental introduction of disease such as major monitoring sites, can be solely attributed to the introduction of novel disease.Feral pigs occur throughout south-west Western Australia and are capable of causing severe localised soil disturbance. Pigs pose the greatest threat to  Geocrinia  habitat during summer when they concentrate their activity within riparian zones (Wardell-Johnson et al. 1995).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26181'),('26184','Galaxias johnstoni','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Galaxiidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26184'),('26185','Melanotaenia eachamensis','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Melanotaeniidae','The Lake Eacham Rainbowfish is a small, laterally-compressed fish rarely exceeding 6.5 cm in length. It is generally silvery or bluish in colour with a dark, mid-lateral stripe and two fainter ventral bands and red fins (Pusey et al. 2004). Margins of dorsal and anal fins are almost black in breeding males. There is some sexual dimorphism: fins are longer, more pointed and more brightly coloured in breeding males (Pusey et al. 2004).','The Lake Eacham Rainbowfish is a schooling species (Brooks 2012) that prefers shallow waters with slow to moderate flow (Zhu et al. 1998). It is usually occurs among, or directly adjacent to, aquatic vegetation, submerged terrestrial vegetation and root masses (Brooks 2012) in areas with streamside riparian vegetation or grasses (including the invasive Para Grass ( Brachiara mutica )) (Pusey et al. 2004).It is usually close to the riverbed in specific locations with rock and cobble substrates (Pusey et al. 2004). The species occurs in small streams, especially smaller tributaries, and lakes, including crater lakes (Euramoo and Bromfield Swamp) and artifical lakes (Lake Tinaroo and Koombooloomba Dam) (Brooks 2012).In Lake Eacham, the species was found in clear, shallow water along the shoreline. It was particularly abundant around docks, submerged logs and branches, and among aquatic vegetation. The water temperature of the lake ranges from 23-27 °C and the pH was 7.0 (Allen & Cross 1982). In aquaria, this species tolerates water temperatures of 22-27°C and a pH of 6.8-7.0 (Leggett & Merrick 1987). Tappin (1991) notes that a pH of 8.0 is still suitable for this species.','The Lake Eacham Rainbowfish is omnivorous, but more than 50% of the diet is composed of aquatic invertebrates (Brooks 2012).','Current threatsThe main identified threat to the Lake Eacham Rainbowfish, and the presumed cause of its extinction in Lake Eacham, is predation by illegally translocated native fish (TSSC 2012c). It is unknown if introduced or translocated fishes are impacting the species in the creeks and lakes where it is currently known to occur (Gleeson et al. 2000). Pure Lake Eacham Rainbowfish populations are predator-naive and are extremely susceptible to translocated predatory fish (Brown 2003; Brown & Warburton 1997) and it is unknown what level of predator resistance current populations have. Unauthorised translocations of native fish have likely been occurring in the Wet Tropics region since at least the 1950s (Burrows 2002).Potential threats to the Lake Eacham Rainbowfish include hybridisation with other rainbowfish (Brooks 2012; further illegal translocations of native fish in the stream habitats where it persists (Burrows 2002; Pusey et al. 2004); habitat degradation (siltation from grazing and sugar cane farming; changes to channel morphology by removal of riparian vegetation; and invasive weeds) (Brooks 2012; Pusey et al. 2004); smothering of riparian zones by Para Grass ( Brachiara mutica ) (Pusey et al. 2004).Extinction in Lake EachamIn the 1980s, the Mouth Almighty ( Glossamia aprion ), the Banded Grunter ( Amniataba perciodes ), the Archer Fish ( Toxotes chatareus ) and the Bony Bream ( Nematalosa erebi ), were illegally translocated into Lake Eacham. The timing of the introductions is unknown, although the Mouth Almighty was first observed in the lake in 1983, the Archer Fish and the Bony Bream in 1984, and the Banded Grunter in 1987. During surveys, the presence of juveniles and adults and the large number of fishes observed indicated that all four species had formed breeding populations. The decline of the Lake Eacham Rainbowfish and the establishment of the translocated species aforementioned occurred simultaneously (Barlow et al. 1987).The dietary habits of the translocated species suggest that they contributed to the decline of the Lake Eacham Rainbowfish (Barlow et al. 1987). The Mouth Almighty is a carnivore, eating insects, macrocrustaceans and fishes, while the Archer Fish, although an insectivore, occasionally eats other aquatic fauna including fishes. The Banded Grunter is an omnivore consuming small amounts of fish (Bishop et al. 2001). The Bony Bream is unlikely to be implicated as it is a microphagic omnivore (Barlow et al. 1987; Bishop et al. 2001; Ruello 1976).It is possible that the translocated species induced other impacts on the rainbowfish population. For instance, Archer Fish, which are active hunters, may have preyed on rainbowfish larvae or fry; or diseases and parasites may have been introduced with the translocated species (Barlow et al. 1987).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26185'),('26188','Ninox novaeseelandiae undulata','Endangered','Aves','Strigidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26188'),('26194','Malurus leucopterus edouardi','Vulnerable','Aves','Maluridae','The White-winged Fairy-wren (Barrow Island) measures 10-13 cm in length, and has a mass of 7-8 g (Higgins et al. 2001; Johnstone & Storr 2004; Pruett-Jones & Tarvin 2001; Rowley & Russell 1997; Serventy & Marshall 1964). The sexes differ in appearance during the breeding season but these differences are slight, or non-existant, during the non-breeding period.','The White-winged Fairy-wren (Barrow Island) occurs in grasslands and low shrublands. These habitats consist of a dense ground cover comprised of species of  Triodia  (such as  T .  wiseana  and  T .  angusta ), usually more than 400 mm in height, with patches of bare ground, and often with scattered clumps of shrubs (especially  Acacia   bivenosa ,  A .  coriacea  and  Melaleuca cardiophylla ) that are used for shelter and for foraging, nesting and roosting (Bamford & Bamford 2005, Bamford & Wilcox 2005; Pruett-Jones & Tarvin 2001; Sedgwick 1978; Storr 1984b; Whitlock 1918; Wooller & Calver 1981).The White-winged Fairy-wren (Barrow Island) is most common in  Triodia -dominated habitats on shallow soil on limestone ridges and rises, but it also occurs on sand dunes in coastal and inland areas (including on sand-loam soils in valleys and on plains), and occasionally on clay pans (Ambrose & Murphy 1994; Bamford & Bamford 2005; Pruett-Jones & Tarvin 2001; Sedgwick 1978; Whitlock 1918). The White-winged Fairy-wren (Barrow Island) does not occur in any of the threatened ecological communities listed under the  EPBC Act 1999 . It is not known to associate with any other listed threatened species.','The diet of the White-winged Fairy-wren (Barrow Island) consists of beetles, flies, hymenopteran insects, and other invertebrate prey (Wooller & Calver 1981). Studies on the mainland subspecies  M .  l .  leuconotus  indicate that birds on Barrow Island may also feed on other insects (such as bugs, moths, caterpillars and crickets), spiders, seeds and fruit (Barker & Vestjens, undated(a); Lea & Gray 1935; Tidemann 1983). There is little published information on the foraging behaviour of the White-winged Fairy-wren (Barrow Island). It forages on the ground and in shrubs (Sedgwick 1978; Wooller & Calver 1981), and searches for food by hopping and plucking (or gleaning) insects (Wooller & Calver 1981). The mainland subspecies  M .  l .  leuconotus  and Dirk Hartog Island subspecies  M .  l .  leucopterus  of the White-winged Fairy-wren are known to pursue flying insects (Carter 1917; Favaloro 1941; Tidemann 1983) and, although there are no published records for Barrow Island, this behaviour seems likely to occur there.','There are no clear immediate threats to the White-winged Fairy-wren (Barrow Island) (Garnett & Crowley 2000). The subspecies was considered to be vulnerable by Garnett and Crowley (2000) on the basis that some of the natural features of Barrow Island, namely the narrow shape of the island and the uniformity of its habitat, make the resident population of fairy-wrens vulnerable to catastrophic events such as a severe cyclone or an extensive wildfire (Brooker 2006, pers. comm.).There is a chance that the White-winged Fairy-wren (Barrow Island) will become exposed to introduced predators or diseases, or to outbreaks of fire. However, the island has strict quarantine measures and effective fire control implemented as part of the management of listed threatened marsupials (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Maxwell et al. 1996).The development of industrial facilities on Barrow Island may pose some threat to the White-winged Fairy-wren (Barrow Island) due to the associated clearance of habitat, but the information that is available on existing developments suggest that there is, thus far, little associated risk to the long-term survival of the subspecies. The establishment of the oil-field development on Barrow Island that commenced operation in 1964 and that continues to operate to this day, appears to have had little or no long-term effect on the size of the White-winged Fairy-wren (Barrow Island) population (Pruett-Jones & O\'Donnell 2004), with little change in the size of the population as estimated by surveys conducted  between 1976  and 2004 (Bamford & Wilcox 2005; Pruett-Jones & O\'Donnell 2004; Sedgwick 1978).There is a proposal to construct a gas processing facility on the east coast of Barrow Island that, if built, will result in the loss of some of the White-winged Fairy-wren (Barrow Island) habitat. This, based on surveys, is estimated to support 315 birds, or approximately 3-4% of the present total White-winged Fairy-wren (Barrow Island) population (Bamford & Wilcox 2005). It has been suggested that the loss of this habitat, and of the small resident population of fairy-wrens, is unlikely to affect the overall population status of the White-winged Fairy-wren (Barrow Island) (Bamford & Bamford 2005). There is very small chance that almost all of the habitat on Barrow Island could be destroyed by a very severe cyclone or an extensive wildfire (Brooker 2006, pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26194'),('26327','Oreixenica ptunarra','Endangered','Insecta','Nymphalidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26327'),('26335','Paralucia spinifera','Vulnerable','Insecta','Lycaenidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26335'),('267','Burramys parvus','Endangered','Mammalia','Burramyidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=267'),('26775','Petaurus gracilis','Endangered','Mammalia','Petauridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=26775'),('273','Gymnobelideus leadbeateri','Critically Endangered','Mammalia','Petauridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=273'),('28','Dugong dugon','','Mammalia','Dugongidae','The dugong is a large herbivorous marine mammal with paddle-like forelimbs and no hind limbs or dorsal fin. Its tail is broad, triangular in shape, and horizontally flattened, which it moves up and down to swim. Adult dugongs have a head and body length of up to 3.3 m, and weigh up to 570 kg (Jefferson et al. 2008). Adults are grey-brown in colour, and older animals may have white scars on their backs. Its ears are small bilateral openings. The dugong has nostrils near the top of its snout and surfaces only to breathe. The tusks of mature males, and some old females, erupt on either side of the upper jaw, but do not extend beyond the end of the premaxilla. The dugong has two mammary glands, each opening via a single teat situated in the \'armpit\' or axilla.','Dugongs are seagrass community specialists and the range of the dugong is broadly coincident with the distribution of seagrasses in the tropical and sub-tropical waters in their Australian range. Seagrasses are anchored in the sediment by their roots and rhizomes. The below-ground biomass (roots and rhizomes) is typically greater than the above-ground biomass (leaves) in the seagrass species eaten by dugongs (de Iongh et al. 1995, 2007; Lanyon and Marsh 1995; Aragones and Marsh 2000; Masini et al. 2001) and evidence of dugong feeding has been detected in areas with little or no above-ground seagrass.Seagrass habitats in tropical and sub-tropical Australia are characterised by low nutrient concentrations and high disturbance, and are spatially and temporally dynamic (ephemeral (short-lived); Carruthers et al. 2002). There are around 20 species of seagrasses in tropical and sub-tropical Australia, and they occur in four major habitat types: tidal reaches of rivers, coastal, reef and deepwater (Carruthers et al. 2002). Estuarine and coastal seagrass habitats occur in the intertidal and sub tidal waters of sheltered coastlines and soft-bottomed waters (including sand and mud substrates). Where substrate allow, seagrass habitats can reach into mangrove forest. Seagrasses also grow in sandy lagoon areas between reefs and on reef tops and may be intertidal or subtidal depending on the depth range. The maximum depth at which seagrasses occur along the coast is variable (controlled by turbidity and light availability), but they can occur down to depths of 50–60 m. However, the majority of seagrasses are found in shallow inshore and intertidal zone areas to water depths of around 25 m.Dugong feeding aggregations tend to occur in large seagrass meadows within wide, shallow protected bays (e.g. Hervey and Moreton Bays); wide, shallow mangrove channels (e.g. Hinchinbrook Channel); and in the lee of large inshore islands (Marsh et al. 2011a). Dugongs also feed in offshore seagrass habitats in areas where the continental shelf is wide, shallow and protected. In the Torres Strait, which supports the largest seagrass bed in Australia (Carter et al. 2014), between Australia and Papua New Guinea, significant numbers of dugongs are seen more than 10 km from land (Grech et al. 2011). Dugongs also use estuarine creeks and streams and have been tracked travelling within creeks upstream for several kilometres (Marsh and Rathbun 1990).Not all seagrass meadows are accessible to dugongs. Dugong feeding trails have been observed at depths of up to 33 m off northeast Queensland (Lee Long et al. 1997), however some seagrass meadows occur at depths beyond the dugong’s known diving range ( < ~35 m) (Coles et al. 2009) and may be permanently inaccessible. Other seagrass meadows are inaccessible on a seasonal or daily basis. At the high latitude limits of the dugong’s range (such as Shark Bay in Western Australia), some seagrass meadows are avoided in winter, presumably as a form of behavioural thermoregulation (see Marsh et al. 2011a). Tides restrict dugong foraging on intertidal seagrass meadows on a daily basis (Anderson and Birtles 1978; Nietschmann and Nietschmann 1981; Sheppard et al. 2009). In areas where the tidal range is large, such as tropical Australia, the area of intertidal seagrass meadows to which dugongs have limited access is vast. In turbid areas where most seagrass is intertidal, temporary or permanent destruction of intertidal seagrass may mean that dugong cannot feed on enough seagrass in the time available for feeding to maintain their body weight.There is some evidence that dugongs use specialised habitats for various activities. Dugongs may avoid predators (e.g. sharks) by resting on the edges of sandbanks in Moreton Bay (Hodgson 2004) and deeper waters in Shark Bay (Wirsing et al. 2007). There is also evidence that dugongs avoid predators by utilising shallow waters when calving (Marsh et al. 2011a), such as tidal sandbanks (Marsh et al. 1984) and estuaries. Mating herds of dugong have been observed in Moreton Bay, shark Bay and the northern Great Barrier Reef region (Preen 1989; Holley 2006; Marsh et al. 2011a). Observations at South Cove, Shark Bay suggest a lek mating system (gathering of males for mating display) may occur, but the conditions are poorly understood (Anderson 1997, 2002; Holley 2006; Marsh et al. 2011a).','Dugongs employ two different feeding modes: excavating (feeding on both the aboveground and belowground parts of plants by disturbing the sediment, which leaves distinctive serpentine tracks in the sediment) and cropping (feeding on the above ground parts only which leaves much less evidence). Dugongs mostly use excavating when feeding on seagrasses with accessible rhizomes; cropping when feeding on other plants. Although several researchers have concluded that dugongs preferentially feed on pioneer genera such as  Halophila  and  Halodule , Marsh and colleagues\' (2011a) meta-analysis indicates that within their relatively specialised habitats of intertidal and subtidal tropical and subtropical seagrass meadows, dugongs are capable of exploiting a relatively wide diet including most species of seagrass, macro-invertebrates (Anderson 1989; Preen 1995) and algae (Marsh et al. 1982). Sheppard and colleagues (2010) also found a weak association between dugongs and seagrass species, and a preference of dugongs for high-energy (nitrogen rich) foods.','The   Action Plan for Australian Mammals 2012  (Woinarski et al. 2014) identified the following threats to dugongs in Australian waters.Threat factorConsequence ratingExtent over which threat may operateEvidence baseHabitat degradation including coastal development, port expansion and aquaculturemoderate-severemoderateseagrass loss leads to reduced food resources and condition, delayed reproduction or starvation, or temporary immigration from affected regions (Marsh et al. 2002, 2011a; Haynes et al. 2005)Pollutionmoderate-severeminor-moderatesome contamination with heavy metals and other pollutants (Marsh et al. 2011a)Entanglement and incidental bycatch in fisheries gearmoderateminor-moderateincidental net entanglement and deaths are a major cause of regional population decline, evident in the severe decline along the urban coast of Queensland (Marsh et al. 2005)Entanglement in shark nettingmoderateminorincidental net entanglement and deaths are a major cause of regional population decline, evident in the severe decline along the urban coast of Queensland (Marsh et al. 2005)Indigenous huntingminor- moderateminor–moderate (most hunting is within 30 km of communities)population modelling indicated Indigenous hunting was not sustainable in Cape York and Torres Strait (Marsh et al. 2004; Heinsohn et al. 2004); however, this evaluation was based on flawed estimates of absolute abundance. The time series of aerial surveys has not detected a decline, probably because of the high proportion of high-density dugong habitat that is not accessible to hunters (Grayson 2011; Marsh et al. 2011b).Vessel strikemoderateminor (but potentially increasing to moderate)increased vessel movements and vessel strike can cause disturbance, stress, or disrupt behaviour (Marsh et al. 2002; Haynes et al. 2005)Anthropogenic noise and acoustic disturbancemoderateminor (but potentially increasing to moderate)increasing anthropogenic noise can cause disturbance, stress, or disrupt behaviour (Marsh et al. 2002; Haynes et al. 2005)Climate variability and changeminor to moderateminor to moderatealtered coastal environmental conditions and projected increases in severe cyclones and flood events could affect both Dugongs and their essential seagrass habitats (Marsh et al. 2011a)','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=28'),('282','Macrotis lagotis','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Thylacomyidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=282'),('291','Sminthopsis psammophila','Endangered','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=291'),('294','Myrmecobius fasciatus','Endangered','Mammalia','Myrmecobiidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=294'),('299','Sarcophilus harrisii','Endangered','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','The world\'s largest extant marsupial carnivore, the Tasmanian Devil typically weighs 7.7–13.0 kg (males) or 4.5–9 kg (females) (Jones 2001; Jones et al. 2007), having a black coat with variable patches of white on the chest, shoulder and rump, and a stocky frame with fore legs longer than hind legs. Adult size is reached at two years of age. This nocturnal hunter and scavenger is solitary but non-territorial, so that several Tasmanian Devils may feed non-cooperatively at a single carcass (Pemberton & Renouf 1993).','Tasmanian Devils are found throughout Tasmania, in all native habitats, as well as in forestry plantations and pasture, from sea level to all but the highest peaks of Tasmania (Jones & Barmuta 2000; Jones & Rose 1996). Densities are lowest in the buttongrass plains of the south-west and highest in the dry and mixed sclerophyll forests and coastal heath of Tasmania\'s eastern half and north-west coast.Open forests and woodlands are preferred, while tall or dense wet forests are avoided (Jones & Barmuta 2000; Jones & Rose 1996). The highest population densities are found in mixed patches of grazing land and forest or woodland. Relative trapping success and spool-and-line tracking indicates that Tasmanian Devils travel through lowlands, saddles and along creeks, avoiding steep slopes and rocky areas, and favouring predictably rich sources of food such as carcasses, rubbish dumps, and roads (Jones & Barmuta 2000).Dens are typically underground burrows (such as old wombat burrows), dense riparian vegetation, thick grass tussocks and caves. Adults are thought to remain faithful to their dens for life so den disturbance is destabilising to populations (Owen & Pemberton 2005). The Tasmanian Devil is not part of, nor does it rely on any listed threatened ecological community. The species is directly associated with an invertebrate,  Dasyurotaenia robusta,  which is currently listed as Rare under the  Tasmanian Threatened Species Protection Act 1995 . This invertebrate is a tapeworm found only in Tasmanian Devils.','The Tasmanian Devil is considered to be an opportunistic predator and specialised scavenger. It will eat the carcasses of a range of vertebrates, but mostly possums and macropods (Guiler 1970a; Jones 2003; Jones & Barmuta 2000; Owen & Pemberton 2005). Tasmanian Devils hunt by a combination of ambush and short pursuits. The Tasmanian Devil tends to hunt down slow prey such as wombats or sick wallabies or lambs, however, they have the capacity for high speed pursuits (Jones 2003; Owen & Pemberton 2005). These features enable the Tasmanian Devil to actively hunt the possums, macropods and wombats so frequently found in its scats (Jones & Barmuta 2000).Tasmanian Devils are primarily solitary hunters (Owen & Pemberton 2005). Carcasses are taken opportunistically, and areas where lambing, calving or wallaby shooting are in progress will be favoured during these activities.  Their scavenging diet makes Tasmanian Devils vulnerable in several ways:As a source of carcasses, roads attract Tasmanian Devils and put the Tasmanian Devils at risk of becoming roadkill themselves.Rubbish bins attract Tasmanian Devils and those with steep sides can trap Tasmanian Devils (M. Jones, pers. comm. 2006).In the past, long-acting poisons (most commonly, strychnine) would endure to poison the Tasmanian Devils eating the carcasses.Cannibalism is considered fairly common in Tasmanian Devils and renders the species particularly vulnerable to disease transmission (M. Jones 2006, pers. comm.; Pfennig et al. 1998). However, the modes of transmission of DFTD are not yet known.Prey (common brushtail possum ( Trichosurus vulpecula )) may be responding to DFTD by relaxing risk sensitivities. The common brushtail possum spend more time on the ground and discover food patches faster (Hollings et al. 2015).','DFTDCurrent evidence suggests that Devil Facial Tumour Disease (DFTD) is an infectious, spreading cancer, so that any attempt to delineate boundaries between affected and unaffected locations is likely to be outdated swiftly.DFTD is a widespread disease, associated with local population declines of up to 80% since first reported (Hawkins et al. 2006). These population declines are indicated by long term spotlighting data, as well as widespread trapping and laboratory results. Declines were most marked in areas where the disease had been reported earliest, in north-eastern and central eastern Tasmania.Mean spotlighting sightings of Tasmanian Devils per 10 km route, obtained from across the core Tasmanian Devil range (eastern and north-western Tasmania), have declined by 41% since the first report of DFTD-like symptoms in 1996 (Hawkins et al. 2006).The most immediately threatened location is thought to be the region where DFTD was reported prior to 2003: across 15 000 km² of eastern Tasmania. By 2005, the Devil Disease Project Team had confirmed DFTD in individuals found across 36 000 km² of eastern and central Tasmania (Hawkins et al. 2006).DFTD has been confirmed across 51% of Tasmania, and there is evidence for continued geographical spread of the disease (Hawkins et al. 2006). The currently affected region covers the majority of the high density eastern management unit, involving perhaps around 65% of the total population.RoadkillA recent three year study of roadkill frequency on the main roads of Tasmania estimated 1700 Tasmanian Devils are killed on roads annually (Hobday & Minstrell 2006, pers. comm.). This suggests that 2–4% of the total Tasmanian Devil population are killed on roads (based on an estimated population of 20 000–50 000 mature individuals). The roaded parts of Tasmania closely match the core distribution area for Tasmanian Devils.Roadkill was attributed as the cause of up to 50% of Tasmanian Devil death during a recording period of 17 months at Cradle Mountain and Freycinet National Parks (Jones 2000; M. Jones 2006, pers. comm.).Future impact is likely to remain at the same level.FoxesThere have been spasmodic, small scale introductions of the red fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) into Tasmania since early European colonisation. Early incursions were sometimes efforts at acclimatisation and others for short-term hunting. More recently, there has been at least one accidental incursion (from a roll-on, roll-off ship in 1998). Hard evidence (confirmed scats, carcasses) of foxes has been found in the north-west and northern and southern  midlands. Credible sighting reports have come from most of the eastern half of the State including the central highlands and the far north-west (Saunders et al. 2006), mostly areas where Tasmanian Devil populations are suppressed by DFTD.A commonly held view has been that the abundance of Tasmanian Devils has prevented fox establishment through competition for prey and predation on denned juveniles. Red foxes and Tasmanian Devils share preferences for den sites and habitat, and are of a similar size. Tasmanian Devils abundance is likely to slow, if not prevent, fox establishment.The current impacts of the red fox have been quantified, and it is unlikely that fox numbers are currently at a level to impose a measurable impact.A decline in Tasmanian Devil numbers may create a short to medium-term surplus of food, for example carrion, ideal for fox establishment. Beyond a direct effect on Tasmanian Devils and the ability of their populations to recover from DFTD, fox establishment may cause ecosystem disruptions through changes in other species - a feature of foxes on mainland Australia (eg Saunders et al. 1995) and something that might then also indirectly affect Tasmanian Devils.PersecutionIn the past, persecution of the Tasmanian Devil has been very high throughout settled parts of Tasmania, and is thought to have brought about very low numbers at times. In the 1990s, control permits were occasionally issued to individuals who were able to argue that Tasmanian Devils were pests (for example, killing chickens). Current persecution is much reduced, but can still be locally intense (N. Mooney 2006, pers. comm.).The Tasmanian Devil has been protected under the Tasmanian  Threatened Species Protection Act 1995  since 2002, and is now listed as a Vulnerable species under the Australian Government  Environment Protection and Biodiversity Conservation Act 1999 . While the small amount of current persecution is likely to persist it is unlikely to constitute a major threat unless the Tasmanian Devil population becomes extremely small and fragmented.Low genetic diversity Jones and colleagues (2004) found the genetic diversity of Tasmanian Devils to be low relative to many Australian marsupials as well as placental carnivores. This was consistent with an island founder effect, but previous marked reductions in population size may also have played a role. Low genetic diversity can reduce population viability (Eldridge et al. 1999) and resistance to disease (Acevedo-Whitehouse et al. 2005). Low genetic diversity is also thought to be a contirbuting factor to the spread of DFTD (Woods et al. 2007).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=299'),('300','Sminthopsis aitkeni','Endangered','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=300'),('302','Sminthopsis butleri','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=302'),('305','Sminthopsis douglasi','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','The Julia Creek Dunnart is a small carnivorous nocturnal marsupial. It is the largest of the 19 species of  Sminthopsis  found in Australia. The species has a body that is 13.5 cm long, a tail 12–13 cm long and weighs up to 70 g (Strahan 1998). The species can store food in its tail as fat, and individuals will have a swollen base to their tail when food is abundant (QPWS 2005).','The Julia Creek Dunnart occurs in the Mitchell Grasslands, which are characterised by heavy clay soils (cracking clay) of two types (ashy and stony) dominated by grass (Mitchell Grass ( Astrebla  spp.) and Flinders Grass ( Iseilema  spp.)). Following rain, which generally occurs in summer, the clay soil swells and there is flush of vegetative growth. As the soil dries, it contracts and forms deep cracks (Qld DERM 2009d). The species utilises cracks in the ground as habitat when the soil is dry and ground cover is sparse. They use vegetation cover when the cracks and holes close up after rain (Mifsud 1999).Habitat selection appears to be based on edaphic (substrate) features such as soil crack/hole density as this is a more reliable and predictable source of shelter than vegetation cover (Mifsud 1999). Although the Julia Creek Dunnart has been recorded on both ashy and stony soil types, in areas of sparse and dense ground cover, and where no soil cracks or holes remained, the species has been located more frequently in habitats on ashy soils exhibiting high crack and hole densities, and in areas of dense vegetation cover (Mifsud 1999). Habitat modelling suggests that highly suitable potential habitat is largely restricted to stock routes, road reserves and protected areas (Smith et al. 2006). However, there are many records outside of such areas (BAAM 2011).','The Julia Creek Dunnart feeds on insects (silverfish, cockroaches, crickets and slaters), spiders, centipedes, scorpions, skinks and Long-tailed Planigales ( Planigale ingrami ) (Mifsud 2001; QPWS 2005).','The Julia Creek Dunnart has a low abundance and sparse distribution. It is threatened by the Cat ( Felis catus ) predation, invasion of habitat by Prickly Acacia ( Vachellia nilotica ) and heavy grazing (Qld DERM 2009d). Potential threats include inappropriate fire regimes, climatic factors and small population size (Qld DERM 2009d).PredationThe Cat is a significant predator of the Julia Creek Dunnart (Qld DERM 2009d), with the species found in the stomach contents of feral Cats. Cat predation may have been responsible for the disappearance of species from Lyrian station (Woolley 1998). The Barn Owl ( Tyto alba ) (Lundie-Jenkins & Payne 2000) and the Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) (Qld DERM 2009d) may also predate the Julia Creek Dunnart.WeedsPrickly Acacia is out-competing understorey plants and changing the structure of the habitat required by the Julia Creek Dunnart (QPWS 2005). Prickly Acacia was introduced to Queensland from Pakistan in the late 1890s to provide shade and fodder for livestock. It was declared a noxious weed in 1957 under the  Rural Lands Protection Act   1985  and more than seven million hectares of the Mitchell Grasslands are now infested (Qld DERM 2009d). The increased tree density of Prickly Acacia outcompetes much of the understorey vegetation for water and light. There is also a gradual change in the botanical composition of the pastures as perennial grasses are replaced by short-lived, less stable annual plants (Milson 1995).Heavy GrazingThe Mitchell Grasslands are resilient to moderate grazing pressure, however excessive grazing places stress on plants and can lead to the loss of large tracts of grassland. The loss of vegetation cover and associated trampling can also lead to soil erosion, or compaction that does not allow the natural process of cracking and drying. Loss of topsoil, associated with devegetation due to grazing pressures, can also alter floristic diversity (McAlpine & Howes 2006).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=305'),('313','Parantechinus apicalis','Endangered','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','The Dibbler is a carnivorous marsupial which is brownish-grey above, freckled with white, and greyish-white tinged with yellow below. Dibblers are readily distinguished by the white rings around their eyes, a tapering, hairy tail, and the freckled appearance of its fur (Strahan 2004).','Dibblers have been recorded over an extensive area and it is likely that they can occupy adiverse range of habitats. Dibblers seem to prefer vegetation with a dense canopy greater than 1 m high which has been unburnt for at least 10 years or more (Baczocha & Start 1996). In some locations, the presence of Proteaceous and Myrtaceous flowering shrubs may also be important (Maxwell et al. 1996). Boullanger, Whitlock and Escape Islands have a Mediterranean climate characterised by hot, dry summers and cool, wet winters (Moro 2003; Wolfe et al. 2004). The Islands differ substantially in habitat types yet all support populations of Dibbler. Boullanger Island is almost entirely composed of sand, with the exception of a limestone headland. The vegetation is predominately low heath with a 50–100% cover, occurring in three vegetation types: open scrubland dominated by  Acacia cyclops ,  Atriplex isatidea  and  Myoporum insulare ; open heath habitat composed primarily of  M. insulare,   Olearia axillaris ,  Scaevola crassifolia ,  Rhaghodia baccata  and  A. cyclops ; and low closed heath dominated by  S. crassifolia ,  O. axillaris  and  M. insulare  (Bencini et al. 2001). In contrast, Whitlock Island is a low limestone plateau covered with  Atriplex cinerea  dominated low closed heath (Bencini et al. 2001). Escape Island has extensive areas of limestone with areas of deep calcareous sands and a structurally-dense and diverse vegetation community dominated by  S. crassifolia, R. baccata, Acacia  rostellifera, O. axillaris  and  Acanthocarpus preisii  (Moro 2003).Trapping surveys found that the Dibbler uses all habitats on Boullanger Island yet, on Whitlock Island, significantly greater trapping success rates were recorded in the dunal scrubland dominated by  Nitraria billardierei  and foredune heath than in succulent heath (Bencini et al. 2001).Mainland habitat is characterised by the presence of long-unburnt heathland, typified by sandy substrates and occasionally lateritic soils (Baczocha & Start 1996; Barrett 1998). This generalisation applies to records from Cheyne Beach, Torndirrup National Park and most records from Fitzgerald River National Park (Friend 2004).The Dibbler\'s need for long-unburnt vegetation may be related to high invertebrate density in thick leaf litter accumulations or to the cover afforded by dense vegetation which protects against predators, including birds of prey and, at mainland sites, the introduced fox and feral cat (Friend 2004). In the absence of foxes, the Dibbler may occupy vegetation at an earlier stage of recovery after fire (Friend 2004). Dibblers on Boullanger and Whitlock Islands often enter seabird burrows, although it is unclear whether this is for refuge, foraging or rest (Friend 2004).','Analysis of Dibbler scats from Boullanger and Whitlock Islands showed that the diet is dominated by arthropods (65%) with some vegetable (25%) matter (Bencini et al. 2001). Scat analysis has identified beetles, cockroaches, grasshoppers, termites, ants and spiders in the diet of the Dibbler, as well as the remains of feathers and lizard scales (Bencini et al. 2001; Fuller & Burbidge 1987). Dibblers are also reported to feed on house mice ( Mus musculus ), which are abundant on Boullanger and Whitlock Islands, as well as vegetable material (Dickman 1986). Plant matter was identified from approximately 25% of scats from Boullanger and Whitlock Islands, and it has been suggested that the proportion of plant matter eaten may vary seasonally or be dependent on the availability of other prey. Plant matter may also represent a source of water for the Dibbler as there are no free water sources on the islands (Bencini et al. 2001).','There are a number of threatening processes operating in the range of the Dibbler, many of which are likely to be affecting its survival. These include predation, fire, habitat degradation and destruction, diseases affecting food plants, competition with introduced mice and activities that might cause seabirds to abandon islands (Friend 2004; Wolfe et al. 2004).Feral PredatorsIntroduced predators, such as foxes, prey on Dibblers. For instance, a radio-tracking study found the remains of a radio-collared Dibbler in fox scat in the Fitzgerald River National Park in 2001 (Friend 2004). The arrival of foxes in NSW in the 1920s coincides with the decline of Dibblers over much of their historical range. Likewise, cats are known to take Dibblers and are present throughout their mainland range (Woolley 1977). While feral cats and foxes are absent on the islands inhabited by the Dibbler, the possibility of their introduction poses a serious potential threat to the Dibbler (Friend 2004).FireThe majority of Dibblers have been found in areas free from fire for 10 years or longer. The Boullanger and Whitlock Islands, for example, have not been burnt in recent times (Friend 2004). It is possible that the presence of long-unburnt habitat becomes even more important to the Dibbler when predators, such as raptors, foxes and cats, are present, as such vegetation can provide dense cover and protection from predators. High intensity wildfires in heathland habitats remove all vegetation and restoration of dense cover following a wildfire can take decades in drought affected areas. Frequent or extensive fire in the range of the Dibbler must therefore be considered a threat (Friend 2004).Habitat ModificationThe distribution of the Dibbler declined dramatically following European settlement, with population numbers falling so low that it was considered extinct by 1904 (Bencini et al. 2001). Much of the distributional decline was probably due to extensive land clearing and modification of heathland habitat for farming and grazing.Phytophthora  DiebackDisease in native plants caused by  Phytophthora cinnamomi  can extensively alter the structure and floristic composition of heath and mallee-heath communities (Friend 2004). The mainland habitats inhabited by Dibblers, particularly on the south coast, contain very susceptible plant species. The alteration of Dibbler heathland habitat by plant diseases must be considered a potential threat. On the islands, however, the highly calcareous soils and different plant communities make the introduction of  P. cinnamomi  less likely. Regardless, the transport of  P. cinnamomi  to islands should be minimised through rigorous application of simple hygiene measures (Friend 2004).House MiceMice ( Mus musculus ) are abundant on Boullanger and Whitlock Islands and have probably co-existed with Dibblers for many years. Mice were first recorded on Boullanger Island in 1959–1961 and on Whitlock in 1985 (Ford 1963; Fuller & Burbidge 1987). While Dibblers are known to occasionally eat mice (Dickman 1986) the interactions between the two are unknown. Mice may compete for resources (food and space) with Dibblers and increase the risk of disease transmission and, as such, must be considered a potential threat to the long-term viability of the Dibbler (Friend 2004).SeabirdsThe importance of seabirds and seabird burrows to the Dibbler is currently being investigated. It appears that a complex set of interactions between seabirds and Dibblers affect the reproductive success of the Dibbler and influences the rate of facultative male die-off  by increasing the level of resources available to Dibblers (Wolfe et al. 2004). Seabirds can significantly increase the availability of resources by increasing the concentration of nutrients in the soil, ultimately leading to an increase in the abundance of primary (plants) and secondary (plant eaters) consumers (Wolfe et al. 2004).OtherBoullanger and Whitlock Islands are both easily accessible by humans and subject to frequent visitation, making them susceptible to associated risks such as the introduction of pathogens, feral animals (especially rats), weeds and other pests (Burbidge 2004b; Friend 2004).Given the very small size of Boullanger and Whitlock Islands (25 ha and 5.2 ha respectively) it is possible that a particularly severe storm, cyclone or drought could wipe out Dibbler populations on one or both of the islands (Friend 2004).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=313'),('316','Phascogale calura','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','The Red-tailed Phascogale is a small, arboreal, carnivorous marsupial with ash-grey fur above and cream fur below. Its distinctive tail grows up to 14.5 cm long, is reddish-brown on the base and ends in a brush of long black hair. This marsupial also has large, thin, reddish ears. This species is highly sexually dimorphic (Foster et al. 2006) with males growing to 12.2 cm long and weighing up to 68 grams, and females growing to 10.5 cm and weighing 48 grams (Bradley 1998; Cronin 1991).','The Red-tailed Phascogale\'s preferred habitats are  Allocasuarina  woodlands with hollow-containing eucalypts (e.g.  Eucalyptus wandoo ) and  Gastrolobium spp . (Kitchener 1981; Maxwell et al. 1996).Population numbers appear to be greatest in habitat that has been unburnt for 20 years or more (Kitchener 1981). A large proportion of nest sites are in highly flammable locations, such as, stands of dead  Allocasuarina  spp. and the skirts and stumps of live and dead grass trees ( Xanthorrhoea  spp.). No precise habitat information is available for the arid zone, or the southern and eastern semi-arid zone (Maxwell et al. 1996).Red-tailed Phascogales have also been recovered from a variety of habitats in the Katanning District, including woodland of Swamp Oak ( Casuarina obesa ) over Samphires, Mallee-Scrub and low forest of Moort ( Eucalyptus platypus ) (DEC 2007).The Red-tailed Phascogale prefers vegetation that is unburnt for a long  time, which provides continuous canopy cover to assist their arboreal habits. Trees need to be of a sufficient age to provide hollows for nesting in limbs or logs, and grass trees need to have ample skirts to provide cover (DEC 2007). RemNAt Red-tailed Phascogale populations have predomiNAtly survived in areas dominated by dense Rock Sheoak ( Allocasuarina huegeliana ) woodland associated with Wandoo ( Eucalyptus wandoo ). Fire causes high mortality amongst resident Red-tailed Phascogales (Friend & Friend 1993) and populations do not recover for years after fire events (DEC 2007).During bush fires, Red-tailed Phascogales use tree hollows above the height of flames for protection (DEC 2007).','The Red-tailed Phascogale is an opportunistic predator. They generally move to the ground to feed on a wide range of insects and spiders, with a preference for those less than 10 mm in length (Bradley 1998). They also consume small birds and mammals. Stomach contents taken from 26 animals included at least nine arthropod Orders; the hair of mice ( Mus musculus ); rabbit kittens; and one feather (Kitchener 1981). Kitchener (1981) states that they do not need to drink even during periods of extreme drought.The remNAt populations of Red-tailed Phascogales have a strong association with  Gastrolobium  species bearing sodium monofluoroacetate (1080) (Kitchener 1981). This is a naturally occurring toxin to which introduced animals, such as sheep and cows, have no tolerance. The presence of this toxin in plants within reserves, has potentially protected the Red-tailed Phascogale from competition from grazing and browsing by introduced animals (DEC 2007).Although Red-tailed Phascogales are arboreal, observations of their diet noted in Kitchener (1981) suggests that they forage extensively on the ground, and as such would be susceptible to ground dwelling predators.','In the past, the main threat to Red-tailed Phascogales has been the clearing of their habitat for agriculture and associated development, combined with the introduction of the fox in the 1930s. Changed fire regimes, cats and foxes are the major current threats to this species (Bradley 1998; Foster et al. 2006; Maxwell et al. 1996). There is evidence that Red-tailed Phascogale populations have responded positively to fox control (Friend & Scanlon 1999).CatsCats are a considerable threat to the Red-tailed Phascogale. They are able to hunt this species both on the ground and in the trees, and can have a significant impact on a population (DEC 2007; Foster et al. 2006; Friend et al. 1994).FoxesFoxes are a threat to the Red-tailed Phascogale when they are on the ground but, as they are primarily arboreal, they can escape provided they are near trees. Thus, they are most at risk from foxes if they have to move to the ground, for example to disperse across cleared farmland, or post-fire when the canopy is destroyed (DEC 2007).FireSince European settlement, fire regimes have changed, in particular fire frequency. This has changed the vegetation composition which has, in turn, affected the available habitat for the Red-tailed Phascogale (DEC 2007; Foster et al. 2006). Red-tailed Phascogales prefer unburnt vegetation that provides continuous canopy to assist their arboreal habits, trees of sufficient age to provide hollows for nesting in limbs or logs, and grass trees with ample skirts (DEC 2007). RemNAt Red-tailed Phascogale populations have predomiNAtly survived in areas dominated by dense Sheoak woodland associated with Wandoo. Fire causes high mortality amongst resident Red-tailed Phascogales (Friend & Friend 1993) and renders the landscape unsuitable as habitat for years after a fire.Habitat DegradationHabitat loss and fragmentation associated with clearing for development and agriculture as well as changed fire regimes are the main factor in limiting the possibility of recolonisation from adjacent areas (DEC 2007; Foster et al. 2006).OtherPredicted climate change will probably result in elevated threat potential (Brereton et al. 1995).Between 1975 and 1996, Western Australian Water Corporation gauging has shown that rainfall decreased by 14% and runoff into Perth dams decreased by 48%. Since 1997, rainfall had declined by 21% and the runoff has decreased by 64%. Between 2001 and 2005, rainfall was 36% less and runoff 88% less (McFarlane 2005). These declines in rainfall and runoff are likely to have a detrimental impact on the Red-tailed Phascogale as fire frequencies may increase due to increasing aridity, affecting both habitat and food supply (DEC 2007).Road kills have a localised impact where populations occur in close proximity to roads (DEC 2007).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=316'),('329','Dasyuroides byrnei','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','The Kowari is a rat-size carnivorous marsupial. It is light grey-brown in colour and has a distinctive brush of black hair on the end of its tail (Strahan 1998). The limbs and the top half of the tail are white and they have a distinct white ring around each eye (DEHP 2012e). It has large eyes, a pointed head and thin, sparsely-haired ears (Strahan 1998). Its ears and tip of the nose have a pink hue (DEHP 2012e). This species grows up to 18 cm in length, with a tail length of up to 14 cm (Cronin 1991; Strahan 1998).','The Kowari is a terrestrial, burrowing animal that occurs in extensive stony (gibber) deserts. Within these systems it may be mostly associated with patches of softer soils (sand dunes and river channels) and/or ephemeral swamps (Lim 1992, 2008; Canty 2012). Preliminary habitat modelling suggests that plant species richness and the number of habitat patches are predictors of Kowari presence during drought within the known range (Lim 1992).','The Kowari is a nocturnal feeder and its diet consists of invertebrates and small vertebrates (Jones 1923, Lim 2008). Potential prey include ground-dwelling birds, rodents, reptiles, frogs and arthropods (Lim 1992). Scat samples contained mainly vertebrates (rodents and lizards, predomiNAtly Agamidae) and ants (Queale et al. 2000).','Abundance of the Kowari fluctuates, and declining abundance occurs in relation to reductions in prey (European rabbits, locusts and long-haired rats) as conditions dry. At this time predation pressure on the Kowari may increase. Many subpopulations are small and susceptible to extirpation. The following table lists known threats to the Kowari (adapted from Woinarski et al. 2012):ThreatConsequenceExtent of rangeCommentsPredation (and competition for prey) by feral cats, European red foxes and wild dogs/dingosModerateEntireThere are complex interactions between rainfall, prey and predator abundance (Canty 2012), however, predation on the Kowari has not been demonstrated (Canty pers. comm. cited in Woinarski et al. 2012). European red foxes are less common on gibber than cats (Dickman pers. comm. cited in Woinarski et al. 2012). The kowari is also predated by barn owls (Valente 1981).Habitat degradation and resource depletion due to livestock and feral herbivores (e.g. rabbits and goats)SevereModerateThere is strong correlative evidence of this threat causing a reduction in shelter and prey availability (Canty 2012); disappearance from Sandringham station after the late 1960s may have been associated with high stocking rates of cattle (Woolley pers. comm. cited in Woinarski et al. 2012).Proliferation of artificial watering pointsModerateModerateThis threat operates through increased livestock impacts, but also possibly through increased predation pressure (Woinarski et al. 2012).Poisoning by insecticides and baits laid for the control of introduced predatorsModerateModerateNot demonstrated, but plausible (Canty 2012), disappearance from Sandringham station after the late 1960s may have been associated with dingo baiting (Woolley pers. comm. cited in Woinarski et al. 2012).Loss of habitat (road construction material) and mortality associated with road trafficModerateMinorSubstrate in the gibber plains are used for roadbase and extracting this material is likely to destroy habitat (Lim 1992).Climate changeModerateEntireModelling indicates a potential severe range contraction of the species associated with climate change (McKnight et al. 2008).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=329'),('330','Dasyurus geoffroii','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=330'),('331','Dasyurus hallucatus','Endangered','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','The Northern Quoll is the smallest of the four Australian quoll species. It has a pointy snout and reddish brown fur, with a cream underside. It has white spots on its back and rump and a long, sparsely-furred, unspotted tail (Oakwood 2008). The tail length ranges between 202 and 345 mm. The hindfeet have striated pads and five toes (Oakwood 2008). Northern Quolls can weigh up to 1.2 kg, with the males (usually between 400 to 900 g) (Braithwaite & Begg 1995) being larger than the females (usually 300 to 500 g) (Braithwaite & Begg 1995, TSSC 2005). It is the most arboreal and aggressive of the four quoll species, and its faeces and body smell strongly (Braithwaite & Begg 1995).','The Northern Quoll occupies a diversity of habitats across its range which includes rocky areas, eucalypt forest and woodlands, rainforests, sandy lowlands and beaches, shrubland, grasslands and desert (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2005aq). Northern Quoll are also known to occupy non rocky lowland habitats such as beachscrub communities in central Queensland. Northern Quoll habitat generally encompasses some form of rocky area for denning purposes with surrounding vegetated habitats used for foraging and dispersal. Rocky habitats are usually of high relief, often rugged and dissected but can also include tor fields or caves in low lying areas such as in Western Australia. Eucalypt forest or woodland habitats usually have a high structural diversity containing large diameter trees, termite mounds or hollow logs for denning purposes. Dens are made in rock crevices, tree holes or occasionally termite mounds (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2005aq). Northern Quolls sometimes occur around human dwellings and campgrounds. Northern Quolls appear to be most abundant in habitats within 150 km of the coast (Braithwaite & Begg 1995).Recent surveys throughout Queensland have suggested Northern Quolls are more likely to be present in high relief areas that have shallower soils, greater cover of boulders, less fire impact and were closer to permanent water (Woinarski et al. 2008).Habitat in the Top End and Kimberley comprises rocky areas and tall open coastal eucalypt forests. Prime habitat in these northern regions is sandstone escarpment (Braithwaite & Griffiths 1994). Northern Quoll habitat in Kakadu National Park includes open forest and woodlands on plains dominated by  Eucalyptus tetrodonta ,  E. minata  and  E.tectifita , open woodland on low rocky hills dominated by  E. setosa  and  E.bleeseri  and riparian areas with flowing water dominated by  Melaleuca virdiflora  and  Pandanus spiralis  (Oakwood 2000).Rocky habitats support higher densities and/or longer lived individuals within the species range, due to more protection from predators, better nutrition and less exposure to agricultural practices (Burnett 1997; Oakwood 2000). Rocky habitats also supported a higher density of Northern Quoll dens (Oakwood 1997 in Oakwood 2000). Breeding success is higher in animals that have a den near a creek line (Braithwaite & Begg 1995).On the Mitchell plateau of the Kimberley in Western Australia, Northern Quolls have been recorded in a variety of habitats including low open eucalypt woodland and hummock grass ( Plechtrachne spp .) on sandstone, deciduous vine thicket and open eucalypt woodland over dense grasses, a rocky creek containing large boulders and deciduous vine thicket of dense low forest between a beach and volcanic cliff (Schmitt et al. 1989). Sharply defined areas of low closed mangrove forest that were flooded tidally were not occupied by Northern Quolls (Schmitt et al. 1989).In the Pilbara region, the species tends to prefer the Rocklea, Macroy and Robe land systems (Biota Environmental Services 2008). These land systems comprise of basalt hills, mesas (and buttes of limonites), high and low plateaux, lower slopes, occasional tor fields and stony plains supporting either hard or soft spinifex grasslands (van Vreeswyk et al. 2004). The Northern Quoll has also been recorded in other land systems which comprise sandstone and dolomite hills and ridges, shrublands, sandy plains, clay plans and tussock grasslands and coastal fringes including dunes islands and beaches (Biota Environmental Services 2008).','Northern Quolls are opportunistic omnivores, consuming a wide range of prey including beetles, grasshoppers, spiders, scorpions and centipedes. They also eat fruit, nectar, and are known to feed on carrion and human refuse. In savannah, their diet usually includes invertebrates, particularly beetles, grasshoppers, spiders and centipedes, but they also eat fruits of at least nine species of plants, particularly favouring the wild grape  Ampelloccissus acetose  (Oakwood 2008). Vertebrates eaten include 11 species of mammal (e.g. bandicoots, sugar gliders, brush-tail possums and rats), eight species of birds (e.g. Brown Quail), reptiles (skinks and snakes) and seven species of frog. They also eat bird eggs and nectar of eucalypt and grevillea flowers (Oakwood 2008). Northern Quolls will also scavenge from road kills and garbage bins (Oakwood 2008).Frogs are eaten regularly in the wet season with at least seven species taken, including large native frogs such as the Green Tree Frog ( Litoria caerulea ) and the Giant Frog ( Cyclorana australis ). As Cane Toads have moved into the Northern Quoll\'s range, they have also been added to the diet of the Northern Quoll (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2005aq).','The Northern Quoll\'s distribution has declined gradually over the last fifty years with the species\' range contracting considerably in some areas and Northern Quolls disappearing from southern Queensland, the east Kimberley, the Gulf region and the drier southern extreme of their range in the Northern Territory (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2005x). Populations of Northern Quoll have been lost from most of the north eastern Top End of the Northern Territory, Cape York Peninsula and the Einasleigh Uplands of northern Queensland (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2005x).The Northern Quoll is likely to continue to decline over most of its mainland range and some of its island range. This reduction has been estimated at about 95% of the range between 1980 to 2010 - even allowing for the persistence of isolated pockets in Queensland and in some offshore islands. This is projected from population crashes during the 1990s in Cape York Peninsula and more recently Kakadu National Park, and projecting a similar decline as the Cane Toad advances across the remainder of the Quoll\'s range (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2005aq).The population has almost entirely been lost from the north east Top End, Northern Territory, the Cape York Peninsula and the Einasleigh Uplands of northern Queensland. These areas have been estimated to constitute approximately 30–40% of the Northern Quoll\'s pre-toad distribution. The viability of these remNAt populations is unknown (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2005aq). The rest of the mainland Top End population and much of the Kimberley mainland population is expected to also disappear. These areas are estimated to constitute a further 30% of the species\' pre-toad distribution. Cane Toads are expected to colonise almost all of the Northern Quoll\'s non-island range (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2005aq).Northern Quolls are still present in a number of areas in Queensland in which Cane Toads have been present for many years, but do not appear to recolonise their former locations and there is little evidence that any substantive recovery has occurred following Cane Toad invasion. More recent evidence from the Northern Territory supports anecdotal reports from Queensland that Northern Quoll populations are severely affected by the presence of Cane Toads (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2005aq).A number of threats either directly or in combination with each other are thought be contributing to the species\' decline. These threats include lethal toxic ingestion caused by Cane Toads, removal, degradation and fragmentation of habitat as a result of development actions and agricultural activities, inappropriate fire regimes, weeds and predation by feral animals.Lethal toxic ingestion caused by Cane ToadsLethal toxic ingestion caused by Cane Toads is a key threatening process listed under the EPBC Act. The Northern Quoll is particularly vulnerable to this process as they eat several species of native frogs including the Green Tree Frog ( Litoria caerulea ), the Giant Frog ( Cyclorana australis ) and the Cane Toad (Oakwood 1997). Cane Toads release poison from their parotoid glands which is ingested by Northern Quolls and results in death. Symptoms of death from Cane Toad toxin can include bright red lips and or gums and can also include a red roof of the mouth or bright red nose and nose bleeds, red ears, bleeding from the ears, a red eye, red skin pouch, bright purple teats and faeces around the anus (Oakwood 2003).Relating the Northern Quoll\'s decline directly to Cane Toads is complicated by the species having been in the process of decline prior to the arrival of the Toad and the likelihood that other factors are also contributing to the decline. It is possible that the impact of the Cane Toad has accelerated a gradual decline, into a more sudden and catastrophic one (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2005z).The Cane Toad was introduced to north-eastern Australia in 1935 and has now spread extensively along the eastern coastline, as well as penetrating into the arid interior of the continent (Kearney et al. 2008). Established Cane Toad populations occur far south along the east coast, with occasional records as far south as Sydney. The Cane Toad is continuing to spread at an increasing rate across far northern Australia and at 2007 has reached a longitude of approximately 128 ºE (Phillips et al. 2007). The only part of the Northern Quoll\'s distribution not predicted to be occupied by Cane Toads is the Pilbara population.It is known that Cane Toads colonised Cape York between the mid 1980s to the mid 1990s with subsequent crashes in Northern Quoll populations. During 1994–95, the disappearance of Northern Quolls was reported at two monitored sites in northern Cape York Peninsula within three months of the arrival of Cane Toads, with no subsequent population return observed (Burnett 1997). Northern Quolls had previously been common at both these sites.It is suggested that between 1900 and 1990 the Northern Quoll has undergone a 75% reduction in its range (Braithwaite & Griffiths 1994). The pre-toad mainland distribution of the Northern Quoll in the Northern Territory is estimated to be 249 207 km². The species also occurs on offshore island, notably on the two main islands of Groote and Marchinbar, which contribute a further distribution of 2487 km² (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2005aq). By 1990 the species was considered to occupy approximately 87% of its former range (216 854 km²). Following invasion of the Cane Toad the Northern Territory mainland distribution is estimated to have declined to 20% of the species\' 1990 distribution by 2004 (i.e. 47 812 km²) (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2005z).In northern Queensland populations of Northern Quoll are known to have survived for over fifty years in areas invaded by Cane Toads. Northern Quolls are still present in localised pockets, such as Cape Cleveland/Mt Elliott and Mareeba, in which Cane Toads have occurred for many years and it has been observed that such populations occur in small, high altitude areas associated with extremely rocky habitats. Northern Quolls are also thought to co-exist with reasonably high local densities of Cane Toads in several coastal sites in north Queensland. There is limited quantitative data on the extent and density of the remaining populations or the precise factors that have led to the survival of these remNAt populations following Cane Toad invasion.While Northern Quolls are still present in a number of localised areas in Queensland in which Cane Toads have been present for many years, and other factors may have contributed to the species decline in Queensland, including loss of habitat and predation following fire, they do not appear, to date, to be recolonising their former locations. There is no evidence that a recovery is occurring in these populations, or is likely to occur, following Cane Toad invasion, nor is their any information on the viability of these remNAt populations. In particular, Northern Quoll appear not to have recovered in savannah areas, west of the eastern escarpment and in Cape York Peninsula.Recent broad scale surveys of Northern Quoll in Queensland has suggested that those populations that do persist despite Cane Toads are most likely to persist because of either behavioural avoidance of Toads and/or because the sites where they exist allow high reproductive output and high densities of Quolls (giving them capacity to lose individuals to Toads without catastrophic loss to the total local Quoll population) (Woinarski et al. 2008). Cane Toad presence should not be used as evidence of Northern Quoll presence or absence with trapping in Queensland revealing the greatest Quoll abundance was at a site that had one of the highest Cane Toad counts (M. Oakwood 2009, pers. comm.). Although Northern Quolls are persisting at some sites with Cane Toads, they do not appear to be recolonising areas of their former distribution (Burnett 1997).At the time of European settlement there was probably a single Northern Quoll population in Queensland, equivalent in size to the Top End / Kimberley population. The three regional populations now recognised in Queensland are the result of declines in range since the spread of Cane Toads. With no biological solution for Cane Toads hopeful in the near future, the real threats regarding the cane toad are the continued decimation of Quoll populations as the Cane Toad moves westwards through the Kimberley. Potential also exists for offshore islands to be colonised. This risk is likely to be higher with recent offshore petroleum and gas processing interests in the Northern Territory and Western Australia (Northern Quoll Workshop 2010).Removal, degradation and fragmentation of habitatThe removal, degradation and fragmentation of Northern Quoll habitat is usually the consequence of development actions such as mining, transport infrastructure, offshore petroleum or gas processing facilities or through agricultural activities such as land clearing, pasture improvement or grazing.The clearing of Northern Quoll habitat is ultimately reducing a distribution which has already contracted significantly as a result of other threats such as Cane Toads. Habitat clearing also displaces animals, jeopardises reproduction and can result in direct mortality or extinction of local populations.Habitat clearing results in the fragmentation of habitat which in turn isolates Quoll populations and can reduce the genetic diversity of local populations. Habitat preference modelling of Northern Quolls on the outskirts of Darwin which were exposed to various degrees of fragmentation and habitat loss, showed a strong negative response to fragmentation (Hill & Ward 2009). No Quolls were recorded from fragments with less than 65% woodland within a 4 km radius of the trapping site. Further modelling predicted that Northern Quolls would disappear from landscapes with less than approx 70% woodland within a four km radius (Rankmore & Price 2004). Development actions and agricultural activities facilitate the introduction of invasive species which can result in the degradation of Northern Quoll habitat (including but not limited to the Cane Toad, Gamba Grass and Feral Cats).Degradation of habitat can also refer to invasive species outcompeting native species and therefore changing habitat heterogeneity, erosion, soil compaction, loss of vegetation structure through grazing or the loss or reduction of foraging resources to name a few. For example, the introduction of exotic pasture grasses in the Northern Territory disadvantages Quolls by inhibiting movement and hunting ability through high density stands of exotic pastures and also fosters more intense fire regimes (Hill & Ward 2009). Increased pastoral use is also considered a conservation concern for the Northern Quoll in Western Australia (How et al. 2009).Inappropriate fire regimesIt is suggested that Northern Quolls may be vulnerable to extensive frequent fires now characteristic of much of northern Australia. One cause postulated for the decline of Northern Quolls is predation of the species following the removal of ground cover by fire which increases the species vulnerability to predators such as Dingos, Cats and raptors (Hill & Ward 2009). In a detailed radio-tracking study undertaken before the arrival of Cane Toads, it was reported that the main cause of Northern Quoll mortality at Kapalga, Kakadu National Park, was predation in the period following extensive fire (Oakwood 2000). In the Mitchell River region of the Kimberley, Northern Quolls appeared to prefer more recently burnt open areas (< 1 year) and it was suggested that they do not maintain viable populations in intensively burnt areas (Radford & Fairman 2008).Woinarski and colleagues (2004) found that Northern Quolls were more abundant in annually burnt sites compared with sites that had not been burnt for 23 years. Furthermore, Woinarski and colleagues (2004) found that the annually burnt sites were in good condition compared with similar open forest elsewhere in this region and may represent an ideal early dry season burning regime. However too frequent burning can reduce the availability and abundance of prey items and intense fires can also result in the destruction or degradation of important habitat resources such as hollow trees or logs and termite mounds for denning. The season, frequency, extent and severity of fires are all likely to be key factors influencing Quoll populations (Hill & Ward 2009).WeedsThe invasion of northern Australia by Gamba Grass ( Andropogon gayanus ) and other introduced grasses is a key threatening process listed under the EPBC Act (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2009bn). Gamba Grass is a high biomass pasture grass that out-competes native grasses and increases fuel loads which promote intense, late, dry season fires (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2009bn). Gamba Grass has fuel loads up to seven times higher than native grasses (Rossiter et al. 2003). This produces fires that are eight times more intense than those produced by native grasses (Rossiter-Rachor et al. 2008). These fires can be detrimental to the Northern Quoll by causing direct mortality either from fire or predation after fire and reducing the availability of shelter and habitat heterogeneity (Hill & Ward 2009).Feral predatorsPredation by the Feral Cat ( Felis catus ) and European Red Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) are key threatening processes listed under the EPBC Act (EA 1999b; DEWHAzzq). These feral predators, in particular Feral Cats, may be having an impact on Northern Quoll populations either through competition for food or direct predation, and these impacts may be exacerbated after fire (Oakwood 2004). The impact of these feral predators on Northern Quolls has not been directly addressed however attempts should be made to protect quolls from these species considering their implications in the decline of other Quoll species such as the Western Quoll and Spot-tailed Quoll (Hill & Ward 2009) The Northern Quolls are also considered more vulnerable to predation by Cats and Foxes than other quoll species due to their smaller size (Hill & Ward 2009).ParasitismAlthough Oakwood and Spratt (2000) found that parasitism was common in the Northern Quoll, they concluded that few individuals harboured large burdens and hence parasitism could not be viewed as a major factor contributing to the population decline of Northern Quoll in the Northern Territory. Parasitism is therefore only viewed as a potential threat.Between 1993 and 1995, brain, lung, heart, liver, muscle and skeletal muscle tissue samples were taken from 28 road killed Northern Quolls in Kakadu National Park, Northern Territory, and tested for toxoplasmosis cysts and antibodies (Oakwood & Pritchard 1999). This study concluded that there is no compelling evidence that toxoplasmosis is involved in the decline of Northern Quolls in this region.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=331'),('333','Dasyurus viverrinus','Endangered','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=333'),('34','Balaenoptera borealis','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Balaenopteridae','Sei whales are dark grey or blue-grey on their back and sides. The undersides and sides may appear mottled with light coloured circular scars caused by various types of parasites, including scars from the bite of the \'cookie-cutter\' shark ( Isistius brasiliensis ) (Aguilar 2002).','The Australian Antarctic waters are important feeding grounds for sei whales, as are temperate, cool waters (Horwood 1987). Sightings of sei whales feeding in the Bonney Upwelling area indicate that this area is potentially also an important feeding ground (Morrice et al. 2004, Gill et al. 2015). Breeding occurs in tropical and subtropical waters.','Sei whales feed intensively between the Antarctic and subtropical convergences and mature animals may also feed in higher latitudes. This species has been sighted (n=12) between November-May (upwelling season) during aerial surveys conducted between 2002-2013 in South Australia (Gill et al. 2015). Sei whale feeding was observed during these aerial surveys, which is one of the first documented records of sei whale feeding in Australian waters, suggesting that the region may be used for opportunistic feeing (Gill et al. 2015).Sei whales feed on planktonic crustacea, in particular copepods and amphipods. Below the Antarctic convergence sei whales feed exclusively upon krill ( Euphausia superba ) though, as a proportion of their diet, krill makes up a much smaller component than the other great rorquals (Kawamura 1974; Nemoto 1970). There has been speculation that the existence of copepod and amphipods in their diet is a means of avoiding interspecific competition with other whales (Horwood 1987). However, there is no direct information on how such interactions may or may not affect the status of the sei whale and other whale species (Clapham & Brownell 1996).The diving and feeding behaviour of sei whales is somewhat different to that of other rorqual whales. Sei whales feed by swimming horizontally near the surface skimming pelagic crustaceans and will feed on concentrations of food that are thought inadequate for other rorquals. Side lunge feeding has been observed in Antarctica (IWC 2003). Sei whales sink rather than dive and tend to be shallow swimmers with their heads seldom emerging and with no positive arching when diving (Horwood 1987).','The   Action Plan for Australian Mammals 2012  (Woinarski et al. 2014) has identified a number of threats:Threat factorConsequence ratingExtent over which threat may operateClimate and oceanographic variability and changeminor to moderatelarge, potentially operating and increasing throughout the rangeAnthropogenic noise and acoustic disturbanceminormoderate-largeHabitat degradation including pollution (increasing port expansion and coastal development)minorlikely to be localised for sei whales due to their mainly offshore habitat use in Australian watersPollution (persistent toxic pollutants)minorlocalisedVessel strikeminorlocalised, but potentially increasing in future as sei whale populations increase and shipping and fisheries increasePrey depletion due to fisheries (potential threat)potentially minor depending upon the scale of future over-harvestinglocalised to minorResumption of commercial whaling (potential threat)minor to severe depending upon the scale of whaling impactspotentially throughout large part of range depending upon the scale of commercial whaling if it were to resume','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=34'),('344','Antechinus bellus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=344'),('35','Balaenoptera edeni','','Mammalia','Balaenopteridae','Bryde\'s Whales are the second smallest of the balaenopterids (baleen whales) (Cummings 1985). Bryde\'s Whales closely resemble Sei Whales, but have a number of distinctive characteristics. The body colour of Bryde\'s Whales is principally dark smoky grey above and white below, with the dark area extending down to include the throat grooves and flippers (Kato 2002). The boundary between the dark and light pigmentation is diffuse. As in other balaenopterids, the rostrum is V-shaped but has three parallel ridges running longitudinally between the blowhole and rostral tip (Kato 2002). The three lateral ridges are the most characteristic feature of Bryde\'s Whales (Leatherwood & Reeves 1983).','Bryde\'s Whales are found year-round in waters between 40° S and 40° N, primarily in temperatures exceeding 16.3 °C (Kato 2002). The coastal from of Bryde\'s Whale appears to be limited to the 200 m depth isobar, moving along the coast in response to availability of suitable prey (Best et al. 1984). The offshore form is found in deeper water (500 m to 1000 m). Dive times are relatively short, averaging 1.27 minutes but potentially lasting 9 minutes (Best et al. 1984). This suggests that Bryde\'s Whales use the upper layers of the ocean, and can therefore be considered pelagic.Insufficient information exists as to how Australian Bryde\'s Whales use their habitat, as no specific feeding or breeding grounds have been discovered off Australia. The inshore form appears to be resident in waters containing suitable prey stocks of pelagic shoaling fishes, while the offshore form appears to undergo extensive migrations between subtropical and tropical waters during the winter months (Best 1977).','Bryde\'s Whale is considered to be a fairly opportunistic feeder, readily consuming whatever shoaling prey is available (Kato 2002; Martin 1990). It appears that the coastal and offshore forms may be distinguished by their prey preferences (Best 1977), with the smaller coastal Bryde\'s Whales feeding on schooling fishes, such as pilchard, anchovy, sardine, mackerel, herring and others. In contrast, the larger offshore form appears to feed on small crustaceans such as euphausids, copepods and pelagic red crabs (Pleuroncodes), plus cephalopods (Best 1960, 1977; Kawamura 1980b; Nemoto & Kawamura 1977; Ohsumi 1977b). There are no differences in the number of baleen plates or the thickness of the bristles between inshore and offshore Bryde\'s Whales. Thus, the lack of euphausiids (plankton, krill) in the diet of inshore animals is thought to reflect food preferences rather than an inability to collect plankton, especially as large swarms of euphausiids are abundant in their habitat (Best 1977).Bryde\'s Whales frequently exploit the activities of other predators, swimming through and engulfing \'boils\' of fish herded by other species. They are therefore often found with flocks of sea birds, as well as with other cetaceans, seals and sharks in areas of high fish abundance (Martin 1990). Feeding behaviour may involve \'gulping\' or following shoaling fish in a zigzag pattern while turning on one side. Feeding is a year round activity in Bryde\'s Whales, which follow the local movements of their prey. They have been described as \"voracious feeders\"\" when compared to other baleen whale species (Best 1967',' 1977)',' apparently feeding several times a day to consume the estimated requirement of 4% of body weight daily'),('36','Balaenoptera musculus','Endangered','Mammalia','Balaenopteridae','Both the Antarctic blue whale and pygmy blue whale have common phenotypic traits such as grey skin with mottled patterns, which enables identification of individuals. When submerged, the blue whale appears to be a luminous pale blue or aqua. They have a pronounced \'splashguard\' in front of their blowholes, with a single pronounced longitudinal ridge leading forward on the rostrum. Their blow is tall and powerful (approximately 10 m). They have a long, smooth back with a small, variably-shaped dorsal fin set towards the tail (Jefferson et al. 1993). Differences between the two subspecies were first determined by whaling catches in the austral summer feeding season (Attard et al. 2010).','Blue whale habitat is variable between the two subspecies found in Australian waters. The Antarctic blue whale tends to remain at higher latitudes and migrate to lower latitudes for feeding, breeding and calving during the Australian summer, whilst some remain within the Antarctic waters year-round (Branch 2007, Širovic et al. 2009). In comparison, the pygmy blue whale habitat is more diverse, expanding throughout the Indian Ocean, with individuals moving between Australia and the warmer waters of Indonesia (Branch et al. 2007, Double et al. 2014).Key habitat areas within Australian waters include:The Bonney UpwellingThe pygmy blue whale aggregate between Cape Otway, Victoria, and Robe, South Australia, in relatively shallow shelf waters enriched by seasonal cold water upwelling driven by south-east winds. Aggregation in the Bonney Upwelling between the Great Australian Bight and Bass Strait occurs November–May (Gill et al. 2011). There is considerable interannual and seasonal variability in climatic and oceanographic factors that influence upwelling dynamics. Seasonal variability is linked to the timing of south-east winds along this coast (Lewis 1981; Schahinger 1987). Because of the surface swarming habit of the whales\' prey, feeding often occurs at or near the surface (Gill & Morrice 2003).To the west of Portland, where the upwelling surfaces, the whales often aggregate in a relatively narrow band around a mean depth of 86 m, along or near surface temperature fronts (where temperature may vary by up to 5 °C). This aggregation point has elevated levels of chlorophyll a, which is downstream from upwelling centres and attracts swarms of the krill  Nyctiphanes australis . To the east of Portland where there is no surface upwelling, krill and whales are more widely dispersed across the shelf, with Blue Whales occurring at a mean depth of 75 m (Gill 2004).In December 2003, numbers of Blue Whales were found feeding on abundant krill surface swarms along the 200 m shelf break to the west and south of Kangaroo Island (Morrice et al. 2004). This area is considered to be part of the same large-scale upwelling system (tentatively known as the Great Australian Bight upwelling system) of which the Bonney Upwelling is the most obvious expression (Kampf et al. 2004; McLatchie et al. 2006). Pygmy Blue whales occupy the western area of the Bonney Upwelling system in the Eastern Great Australian Bight and next to Kangaroo Island canyons from November to December (Department of the Environment 2015).The Perth CanyonThe pygmy blue whale aggregates on the northern side of the Perth Canyon. Aggregations at the canyon occurs November–May, where the southward flow of the Leeuwin Current causes eddies, downwelling and compensating upwelling as it passes over the steep-sided canyon. The dynamics of this process are also affected by seasonal variability in winds, a process which is poorly understood. This is deepwater habitat and the krill  Euphausia recurva  occur in balls in colder water below the warm Leeuwin Current in which whales dive to depths of 200–200 m to feed (McCauley et al. 2004). The distribution of the blue whale mirrors that of zooplankton patches detected by hydroacoustic surveys. Most zooplankton patches are found to the north of the head of the Canyon (McCauley et al. 2004).Geographe BayThe blue whale is observed primarily in the southern section of the shallow bay adjacent to Cape Naturaliste, which is a resting point during the slow transit west through the bay. Observations frequently occur October–December in southern Geographe Bay where maximum water depth is 35–50 m. The whales are regularly sighted in depths of 10–30 m and as close as 200 m from the Cape. Seasonal oceanographic conditions include injections of warmer water into the Bay from the south flowing Leeuwin Current, while from November to December, stronger southerly winds force a north-flowing, cold water, wind-driven \'Capes Current\' which begins outside of the Bay. Little specific habitat data is available for this area (Burton 2003). In addition, the blue whale sometimes aggregate in Geographe Bay, north of Cape Leeuwin, possibly at a migratory bottleneck (Burton & Jenner 2005).Antarctic watersThe blue whale is not uniformly distributed and preferred habitat in this region is not well defined. Sightings are still very rare, however, observations seem to be linked with patchy productive regions near the decaying sea ice edge (the marginal sea ice zone), a zone of krill abundance and high plankton production (Laws 1985; Thiele 2005). In historical times, the blue whale was often seen within areas of open sea ice (Ross 2000).Wintering areasWhile breeding areas have not yet been identified, it is likely that they occur in tropical areas of high localised biological production, as, unlike the humpback whale ( Megaptera novaeangliae ) and southern right whale ( Eubalaena australis ), the blue whale has a thin blubber layer, which implies that they cannot fast during the winter season. This is supported by the occurrence of the blue whale in tropical upwelling areas in the eastern tropical Pacific Ocean, such as the Costa Rica Dome (Reilly & Thayer 1990) and the waters west of the Galapagos Islands (Palacios 1999). Wintering areas, where some blue whale sightings have been reported, include the Indonesian archipelago and the waters adjacent to the Solomon Islands and other island groups of the south-west Pacific (Paton & Gibbs 2003). Satellite tagging has confirmed that the pygmy blue whale feeds off the Perth Canyon and head north in March/April to potential breeding grounds in Indonesian waters by June (Double et al. 2014).Associated speciesIn the Bonney Upwelling area, the blue whale is sometimes seen in the vicinity of the EPBC Act listed fin whale ( Balaenoptera physalus ) and sei whale ( Balaenoptera borealis ), though these may be competitors, rather than associates. These species are listed as Vulnerable and Migratory (under the Bonn Convention).','In Antarctic waters, the blue whale feeds on krill  Euphausia superba  and  E. crystallorophias , but are also known to feed on fish and squid (Kawamura 1980). While peak biomass of krill is in summer, the blue whale is present throughout the year, as is the minke whale ( Balaenoptera acutorostrata ) (Thiele & Gill 1999). The blue whale is thought to migrate to Antarctic waters in early summer and to leave in autumn (Mackintosh 1965). However, acoustic surveys have shown that some are present during winter, indicating that not all whales migrate annually (Samaran et al 2010).In Australian waters, the Perth Canyon, Western Australia and the Bonney Upwelling (South Australia and Victoria) are two known feeding areas where presumably the pygmy blue whale aggregates (Rennie et al. 2009, Attard et al. 2010, Gill et al. 2011). From November to December, the pygmy blue whale occupy the western area of the Bonney Upwelling system in the Eastern Great Australian Bight and next to Kangaroo Island canyons (Department of the Environment 2015). Genetic research has revealed that both feeding aggregations support the same breeding stock of pygmy blue whale (Attard et al. 2010).In the Bonney Upwelling, the major prey of blue whale is the krill  Nyctiphanes australis  (Gill & Morrice 2003). This krill species occurs around south-east Australia from Kangaroo Island to Sydney via Tasmania (Blackburn 1980), indicating that the potential feeding range may be greater than is currently known. Relative abundance of  N. australis  appears to be linked to the timing of the Bonney Upwelling, which is active between November and May (Gill 2004). Other crustacean species have been identified in plankton samples and it may be that the blue Whale feeds opportunistically on more than one species in this region. The species almost certainly consume quantities of copepods (crustacean) and possibly salps (free-swimming organisms) as bycatch when feeding on other target species (Morrice 2004).In the Perth Canyon, the main prey is  Euphausia recurva , the domiNAt euphausiid of Western Australian slope waters between latitudes 25° S and 35° S (between Shark Bay and Albany). This species of krill is found during daylight hours at depths of 200–500 m, vertically migrating to surface waters at night (McCauley et al. 2004).Feeding behaviourIn the Bonney Upwelling, the blue whale frequently lunge feed at or near the surface; but at other times, they may also dive to varying depths to feed (Gill 2004; Gill & Morrice 2003). In the Perth Canyon, the blue whale regularly dives to 200–500 m to feed (McCauley et al. 2004). Surface feeding could make the whales vulnerable to entanglement in craypot lines, which are abundant in these waters. The species shows a strong startle response when making contact with a potline (Gales et al. 2005).A strong focus on surface feeding could make the blue whale vulnerable to ship strike, as a shipping route runs through the Bonney Upwelling. Feeding individuals often appear oblivious to nearby vessels (Thiele 2005).In recent years, seismic surveys have occurred in areas of krill abundance, where the blue whale feed. Acoustic pollution (from activities such as commercial and recreational vessel noise, and seismic survey activity) has been identified as an activity which has the potential to degrade habitat important to the survival of the blue whale. Habitat degradation may result in reduced occupancy and/or exclusion of individual whales from suitable habitat, compromised reproductive success and mortality.In feeding grounds, the blue whale typically occur as individuals or in groups of two. Such groups may minimise potential for competition for small scattered prey patches. Larger numbers of whales may feed together where food is abundant, such as in the Southern Ocean. For example, 30 individuals were sighted in one locality in Antarctic waters in February 1996, where a large subsurface krill swarm had been detected (Thiele et al. 2000).','Several anthropogenic threats have been identified in the  Conservation Management Plan for the Blue Whale  that may inhibit the recovery of blue whale populations in Australian waters (Commonwealth of Australia 2015). The relevance of these threats to the two subspecies varies depending on the habitats they occupy, timing of habitat occupancy and their population abundance and trend. The highest rated threats are identified below.ThreatCommentsWhalingThe impacts of commercial hunting on blue whales are well documented. While currently banned under the IWC moratorium on commercial whaling due to the classification of all blue whale populations as Protected Stocks, the potential for commercial whaling on large baleen whale species to recommence exists and pressure to take blue whales may well increase as the population recovers.Climate variability and changeClimate variability and change may cause distribution and migratory timing changes and decreased health of individuals in a population. Climate change can lead to ocean temperature increases, changes in ocean heat transfer resulting in changes to circulation patterns (e.g. upwellings), ocean acidification and melting of Antarctic sea ice. This may impact krill availability, the major food source for blue whales.Noise interferenceBlue whales rely on sound to find prey and mates. Man-made noise can potentially result in injury or death, masking of vocalisations, displacement from essential resources (e.g. prey, breeding habitat), and behavioural responses. Potential sources of man-made underwater noise interference in Australian waters include seismic surveys for oil, gas and geophysical exploration, industrial development activities (such as drilling, pile driving, blasting and dredging), gas processing and shipping.Vessel disturbanceVessel disturbance can occur in the form of collisions or by disrupting the behaviour of animals. Vessel collision can lead to mortality or significant injury, and could impede recovery of blue whale populations. Vessel disturbance or collisions can result from industrial, recreational or commercial activities including whale watching.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=36'),('37','Balaenoptera physalus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Balaenopteridae','Fin whales are dark grey to brownish black dorsally, grading to pale or white along the abdomen. The undersides of the flippers and flukes are also white. The head is asymmetrical in colour and is mostly dark but the right lower jaw is white. Baleen plates are black on the left jaw and white on the right jaw. The body is free of mottling or extensive scarring (Leatherwood & Reeves 1983).','The Australian Antarctic waters are important feeding grounds for fin whales. Sightings of fin whales feeding in the Bonney Upwelling area indicate that this area is also a potentially important feeding ground (Morrice et al. 2004).There are no known mating or calving areas in Australian waters. The sighting of a cow and calf in the Bonney Upwelling in April 2000 and the stranding of two fin whale calves in South Australia suggest that this area may be important to the species\' reproduction, perhaps as a provisioning area for mothers with calves (Morrice et al. 2004).Fin whales are widely distributed in both hemispheres between latitudes 20–75° S (Mackintosh 1966). This species is common in temperate waters, the Arctic Ocean and Southern Ocean. In the Southern Ocean/Subantarctic this species is often found in areas of complex and steep bathymetry, such as deep ravines, where fish and other prey are known to concentrate (Thiele 2004, pers. comm.).Fin whales in the Bonney Upwelling are sometimes seen in the vicinity of the endangered blue whale and vulnerable Sei whale ( Balaenoptera borealis ), both of which are listed under the  Environment Protection and Biodiversity Conservation Act 1999 . It is uncertain whether these threatened species are competitors or associates of the fin whale.','Fin whales feed intensively in high latitudes and may also feed to some extent, depending upon prey availability and locality, in lower latitudes. Fin whales feed on planktonic crustacea, some fish and cephalopods (crustaceans). In the Antarctic, they primarily feed on krill ( Euphausia superba ) (Nemoto 1970). There has been speculation that interspecific competition for food resources between both whale and non-whale predators may be critical to the biology of fin whales in the Southern Hemisphere (Kawamura 1994). However, there is no direct information on how such interactions may or may not affect the status of fin and other whales (Clapham & Brownell 1996).Fin whales frequently lunge or skim feed at or near the surface and they are known to dive to 230 m to feed. Surface feeding could make the whales vulnerable to entanglement in craypot lines and various nets. Fin whales are killed by ship strike more than any other whale which may be due to surface feeding (Thiele 2004, pers. comm.).In recent years, seismic surveys have occurred in areas of krill abundance, where fin whales have been seen feeding on occasion. Acoustic pollution (from activities such as commercial and recreational vessel noise, and seismic survey activity) has been identified as having the potential to degrade habitat important to the survival of fin whales. Habitat degradation may result in reduced occupancy and/or the exclusion of individual whales from suitable habitat, compromised reproductive success and mortality. It is possible that impacts on a sufficient number of individual whales could lead to broader impacts at the population level (DEH 2005a).Fin whale hotspots in the Antarctic have been positively related to sea surface temperature, eddy kinetic energy and krill biomass (Santora et al. 2014). Fin whale feeding hotspots may serve as environmental reference points for species management and conservation in the Southern Ocean (Santora et al. 2014).','The   Action Plan for Australian Mammals 2012  (Woinarski et al. 2014) identifies a number of threats:Threat factorConsequence ratingExtent over which threat may operateClimate and oceanographic variability and changeminor-severelarge, potentially operating and increasing throughout the rangeAnthropogenic noise and acoustic disturbanceminormoderate-largeHabitat degradation including coastal development, port expansion and aquacultureminormoderate-largePollutionminormoderate-largeFisheries catch, entanglement and bycatchminorlocalisedVessel strikeminorlocalised, but potentially increasing in future as fin whale populations increase and shipping increasesResource depletion due to fisheries (potential threat)potentially minor to moderate, depending upon the scale of future over-harvestinglocalised to minorResumption of commercial whaling (potential threat)minor to severe depending upon the scale of whaling impactspotentially throughout large part of range depending upon the scale of commercial whaling if it were to resume','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=37'),('38','Megaptera novaeangliae','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Balaenopteridae','The humpback whale is a moderately large baleen whale. The maximum recorded length is 17.4 m, and females are generally 1.0–1.5 m longer than males (Chittleborough 1965). Southern Hemisphere humpback whales generally have a greater degree of white colouration on their ventral surface compared to darker Northern Hemisphere whales but there is no genetic evidence to support the need for subspecies status (Baker et al. 1990). The humpback whale has distinctive markings on the ventral side and trailing edge of their flukes as well as on their dorsal fins and flanks that are used for individual identification (Katona et al. 1979; Kniest et al. 2010). Their dorsal fin is distinctive from other balaenopterid whales as they have a hump on the leading edge of their dorsal fin.','Migration and RestingWest Coast PopulationThe migration pathway for the western Australian population is generally within 200 km from shore (Double et al. 2010). Important resting areas have been identified during the southern migration and include:Augusta;Geographe Bay;Shark Bay, Exmouth Gulf; andthe southern Kimberley region.There are additional areas of potential importance as resting areas around Houtman Abrolhos, Montebello and Barrow islands, although this is still to be determined conclusively (Jenner et al. 2001).During the northern migration, the whales tend to remain further off-shore (Jenner at al. 2001). Data collected from satellite tagged whales found that median distances from shore were less than 25 km and thus in shallow water (<40 m water depth). In the region around Camden Sound however, the median distance from shore was 50 km (<300 m water depth) with the maximum distance recorded over 200 km. Areas such as Shark Bay may also provide resting areas during the northern migration (Jenner at al. 2001).East Coast PopulationThe eastern Australian humpback whales also migrate in close proximity to the coast of Australia on their way to and from their winter breeding areas (Cato 1991; Paterson et al. 1994; Noad & Cato 2001; Noad 2002). As with the western Australian population, the eastern Australian population also tend to migrate further offshore during their northward migration (Paterson et al. 1994; Noad & Cato 2001). Three major aggregation areas have been previously identified for the eastern Australian population in Queensland around the southern end of the Great Barrier Reef, Hervey Bay and in the Gold Coast region (DEH 2005b). The southern end of the Great Barrier Reef is a suspected calving area (Chaloupka et al. 1999; Smith et al. 2012) while Hervey Bay is considered to be an important resting area (Chaloupka et al. 1999; Paterson et al. 2001; Franklin et al. 2010). On the southward migration, as many as 30% of the eastern Australian population may use Hervey Bay as a resting area (Paterson et al. 2001; Franklin et al. 2010).BreedingWest Coast PopulationMajor breeding areas have been identified for the western Australian population in the Kimberley region and particularly between Lacepede Islands (16.8° S) and Camden Sound (15.38° S) (Jenner et al. 2001). Camden sound appears to be the northern most limit for the majority of west coast whales and is considered to be an important breeding area (Jenner et al. 2001). Double and colleagues (2010) found that satellite tagged whales in the area of Camden sound tended to move in an inconsistent direction, which suggests this area is used for breeding.East Coast PopulationThe breeding area for the eastern population of the humpback whale is presumed to be off the coast between central and northern Queensland (Chittleborough 1965; Dawbin 1966; Smith et al. 2012). Although the exact location is still unknown, recent research using a predictive habitat model developed from incidental sightings data, has isolated two core areas for humpback whale distribution in the southern Great Barrier Reef region: east of Mackay; and further south in the Capricorn and Bunker island groups off Gladstone (Smith et al. 2012). The model identified key habitat parameters of a water depth of 30 to 58 m and sea surface temperatures of 21 to 23 °C. Data collected from satellite tagged whales supported these areas as key areas for the humpback whale in the region. The area east of Mackay (19.5° S to 21.5° S) is thought to be an important breeding area whereas the area further south in the Capricorn and Bunker island groups may be used as an important migratory area (Smith et al. 2012). Although further research is required to conclusively identify critical breeding habitats for the humpback whale, the research by Smith and colleagues (2012) has identified key areas on which to focus future surveys.FeedingAntarcticaHumpback whale feeding primarily occurs in summer in Antarctic waters south of about 55° S with krill (in particular  Euphausia superba ) forming the major part of their diet (Chittleborough 1965). In general, most feeding occurs between 70° E and 130° E for the west coast population, and 130° E and 170° W for the east coast population (Bannister & Hedley 2001; Paterson et al. 2001). The Balleny Islands in Antarctica has been identified as an important and productive feeding ground for the east coast humpback whales (Constantine et al. 2014).Feeding appears to be related to euphausiid density rather than particular bathymetric features (Murase et al. 2002). Euphausiid density is higher where topographic and physical features interact to entrap or entrain swarms. Where these features occur near an ice edge environment, euphausiid densities are likely to be even higher (Thiele et al. 2004). Feeding appears to be connected to the position of the southern boundary of the Antarctic Circumpolar Current relative to other major physical and biological events (i.e. seasonal ice extent) (Thiele et al. 2000). Research has shown the peak feeding season is mid-January to February with dispersal as the season progresses (Kasamatsu et al. 1996). However, there is a great deal of temporal variability in the maximum seasonal abundance of the humpback whale in feeding grounds which is directly related to circumpolar, regional and local scale processes (Sirovic et al. 2004; Thiele et al. 2004).Australian Coastal WatersSome feeding has been observed in Australia\'s coastal waters but this is thought to primarily be opportunistic and forms only a small portion of their nutritional requirements (Thiele et al. 2004).Feeding has been observed close to shore off Eden, NSW, from late September until late November. Feeding behaviour has also been reported off Fraser Island, Queensland (Vang 2002). Feeding may also occur in northern waters of the Great Barrier Reef, as well as Victoria, as sightings of humpback whales have been reported in these areas in summer months (Chaloupka & Osmond 1999; Warnecke 1995).Faecal matter (indicating whales had been feeding) has been collected off Cape Byron in NSW and at Hervey Bay in Queensland (Paton 2006, pers. comm.). The humpback whale has been observed feeding on zooplankton, including neritic euphausiids ( Nyctiphanes australis ) off Tasmania\'s east coast (December 1995), in the Derwent River near Hobart (October 1996) and near Cape Bougainville (November 1996) (Gill et al. 1998).Feeding behaviour has been observed off Augusta, Western Australia during the northward migration. Chittleborough (1965) reported evidence of recent feeding in gut samples from a small portion of the harvested whales off Point Cloates, Western Australia (22.5° S).','Humpback whale feeding primarily occurs in summer in Antarctic waters south of about 55° S with krill (in particular  Euphausia superba ) forming the major part of their diet (Chittleborough 1965). In general, most feeding occurs between 70° E and 130° E for the west coast population, and 130° E and 170° W for the east coast population (Bannister & Hedley 2001; Paterson et al. 2001). The Balleny Islands in Antarctica has been identified as an important and productive feeding ground for the east coast humpback whales (Constantine et al. 2014).Feeding appears to be related to euphausiid density rather than particular bathymetric features (Murase et al. 2002). Euphausiid density is higher where topographic and physical features interact to entrap or entrain swarms. Where these features occur near an ice edge environment, euphausiid densities are likely to be even higher (Thiele et al. 2004). Feeding appears to be connected to the position of the southern boundary of the Antarctic Circumpolar Current relative to other major physical and biological events (i.e. seasonal ice extent) (Thiele et al. 2000). Research has shown the peak feeding season is mid-January to February with dispersal as the season progresses (Kasamatsu et al. 1996). However, there is a great deal of temporal variability in the maximum seasonal abundance of the humpback whale in feeding grounds which is directly related to circumpolar, regional and local scale processes (Sirovic et al. 2004; Thiele et al. 2004).Australian Coastal WatersSome feeding has been observed in Australia\'s coastal waters but this is thought to primarily be opportunistic and forms only a small portion of their nutritional requirements (Thiele et al. 2004).Feeding has been observed close to shore off Eden, NSW, from late September until late November. Feeding behaviour has also been reported off Fraser Island, Queensland (Vang 2002). Feeding may also occur in northern waters of the Great Barrier Reef, as well as Victoria, as sightings of humpback whales have been reported in these areas in summer months (Chaloupka & Osmond 1999; Warnecke 1995).Faecal matter (indicating whales had been feeding) has been collected off Cape Byron in NSW and at Hervey Bay in Queensland (Paton 2006, pers. comm.). The humpback whale has been observed feeding on zooplankton, including neritic euphausiids ( Nyctiphanes australis ) off Tasmania\'s east coast (December 1995), in the Derwent River near Hobart (October 1996) and near Cape Bougainville (November 1996) (Gill et al. 1998).Feeding behaviour has been observed off Augusta, Western Australia during the northward migration. Chittleborough (1965) reported evidence of recent feeding in gut samples from a small portion of the harvested whales off Point Cloates, Western Australia (22.5° S).Life CycleTopSexual maturity is reached at four to eight years (average five years). Life expectancy is recorded as at least 48 years but is likely to be significantly longer as shown in other balaenopterids. Rates of natural mortality are unknown but humpback whale calves are particularly vulnerable to predation by the killer whale ( Orcinus orca ) and may individuals may also die from natural parasitic or disease events (Corkeron & Connor 1999; Naessig & Lanyon 2004).For the humpback whale, breeding peaks in the winter and the gestation period is 11 to 12 months. Lactation extends over 10 to 12 months although calves have been seen independently feeding at six months of age (Clapham 2000). The mean calving interval is 2.4 years (Barlow & Clapham 1997) although it ranges from one year to more than five years.There is a temporal separation of individuals on their migration route related to sex and reproductive status (Brown et al. 1995; Chittleborough 1965; Dawbin 1966, 1997; Vang 2002). On the northern migration, lactating females accompanied by weaning yearlings are first to migrate, followed by immature males and females, followed by mature males together with resting females and then pregNAt females. On the southern migration, mixed females (including those in early pregNAcy) and immature males and females are first to migrate, followed by mature males and then females with calves in early lactation (Paton 2006, pers. comm.).','The Conservation Advice for the humpback whale (TSSC 2015) identifies the following threats for this species:A. WhalingThe impacts from commercial whaling on the Australian humpback whale populations have been well documented with commercial whaling targeting humpback whales ceasing in 1963. Illegal unreported and unregulated hunting may have continued through to the early 1970s. There is currently a suspension of commercial whaling under the IWC although, as populations recover, there may be increased pressure to resume whaling.Whaling for the purposes of scientific research is currently allowed under Article VIII of the International Convention for the Regulation of Whaling. That provision allows member states to issue special permits to kill, take and treat whales for purposes of scientific research. Since 1986 special permits have been issued for minke ( Balaenoptera acutorostrata ), fin ( B. physalus ), sei ( B. borealis ), sperm ( Physeter macrocephalus ), Bryde’s ( B. edeni ) and humpback whale species as part of scientific whaling research programs undertaken by IWC members, including Iceland, Japan, Norway and the Republic of Korea. To date, the humpback whale has not been caught under Special Permit whaling.B. Climate and Oceanographic Variability and ChangePotential impacts of climate change include increasing sea surface temperatures, decreasing sea ice cover, rising sea levels, changes to ocean circulations, ocean acidification and changes in salinity (Learmonth et al. 2006). Climate change may lead to changes in species abundance, migration timing and range, species distribution, changes to prey/predator relationships, prey availability and reproductive timing and success, which could impact on the health and survival of species (IWC 2006).Ocean acidification is of concern for marine species with the increased levels of atmospheric carbon dioxide leading to increased absorption of carbon dioxide into the ocean and a subsequent decrease in the pH of sea water (Levitus et al. 2000). Research has shown that ocean acidification can be detrimental to Antarctic krill ( Euphausia superba ) reproduction (Kawaguchi et al. 2011).C. Overharvesting of PreyDepletion of Antarctic krill through over-harvesting may be a potential future threat. The abundance of krill is affected by many key factors including: fisheries, predator-prey nutrient cycling, and climate change. Antarctic krill is the primary Southern Hemisphere species of krill harvested by the krill fishery. The Commission established under the Convention of the Conservation of Antarctic Marine Living Resources manages the krill fishery catch limits using a precautionary, ecosystem-level sustainable approach that aims to prevent or minimise negative impacts of the krill fishery on natural krill predators.D. Noise InterferenceThe impacts of anthropogenic noise sources on marine mammals is an area of increasing concern. Anthropogenic noise sources identified as potential problems include seismic exploration, industrial noise (pile driving, some forms of dredging, use of explosives, blasting and drilling), shipping noise, and sonar systems. The potential impacts of increasing anthropogenic ocean noise can include hearing impairment, organ damage or mortality, masking of vocalisations, change in call frequency or amplitude and behavioural disturbance (Nowacek et al. 2007; Southall et al. 2007). Underwater noise can act as a stressor to marine mammals, which may impact on individual health, and population viability (Wright et al. 2007). The extent to which behaviour is impacted may depend on a number of factors such as distance from the source, prior exposure (habituation), behavioural state, health, gender and age (Nowacek et al. 2007).Australian humpback whale populations are facing a projected increase in coastal development and shipping traffic (Bureau of Resources and Energy Economics 2012; Clifton et al. 2007); particularly due to increasing oil and gas exploration and new port developments. These activities will undoubtedly increase the levels of noise in the marine environment and may have adverse effects on the seasonal use, displacement from these areas, or the alteration of behaviour by humpback whales.E. Habitat Degradation including Coastal Development and Port ExpansionHabitat degradation and modification in areas of importance to the humpback whale may result in reduced occupancy, compromised reproductive success and even mortality. If there are enough habitats impacted there may be wider reaching implications for the health and growth of populations. This would be more likely to arise where activities that cause habitat degradation occurred cumulatively or intensively. At this time, both of the humpback whale populations using Australian waters are increasing at, or close to, the maximum biological rate (Salgado et al. 2012; Hedley et al. 2011a; Noad et al. 2011b). This suggests that to date habitat degradation has not had a negative impact on population or species recovery. Nevertheless, as the population grows and competition for habitat increases this may become a greater issue, and ongoing monitoring and management are required.F. EntanglementAn entanglement occurs when a whale is caught in fishing equipment, shark nets, or marine debris and is unable to free itself. Entanglements can cause serious injury and distress to whales, and in some cases lead to the death of the animal. The increased reports of entanglements in Australian waters coincide with an increase in humpback whale populations. Currently eastern and western Australian populations are increasing strongly and therefore the impacts from these factors may be minor in terms of overall species recovery. Nonetheless, as humpback whale populations and coastal development increases, and fisheries activities continue around Australia, there will be an increased chance for negative impacts on individuals.Commercial Fisheries or Aquaculture EquipmentMany of the commercial fisheries (pot / trap) and aquaculture farming sites around Australia are a potential threat to large whales as the nets, cages and lines used for fishing provide opportunities for entanglements. There have been an increased number of entanglements reported in rock lobster pot lines, and the Commonwealth, state agencies and industry are working to reduce whale entanglements through changes to fishing gear and practices.Shark Safety EquipmentA number of state jurisdictions use shark safety equipment at popular swimming beaches to reduce the number of large sharks present in the area. This equipment can consist of both drumlines and/or nets depending on local tidal and marine conditions. There have been a number of whales, including humpback whales, entangled in shark nets over the past few years.Marine DebrisMarine debris is of human origin and includes plastic garbage such as bags, bottles, ropes etc., derelict fishing gear and non-biodegradable floating materials lost or disposed of at sea. The interaction between marine species and marine debris is listed as a key threatening process under the EPBC Act. Marine debris has the potential to cause negative impacts through entanglement or ingestion. There have been 104 records of cetaceans in Australian waters impacted by plastic debris through entanglement or ingestion since 1998. The vast majority (92.2%) of cetacean incidents relate to entanglement (Ceccarelli 2009), and the humpback whale dominated the available records, with around 48 entanglement incidents recorded.G. Vessel Disturbance and StrikeCollisions with vessels are one of the main (known) causes of mortality to baleen whales (Vanderlaan & Taggart 2007). There has been a significant increase in the number of commercial, industrial and recreational vessels in coastal waters. Thus, the threat of ship strikes to whales may also increase. Laist and colleagues (2001) showed that high speed vessels, travelling faster than 14 knots, were involved in 15% of the 40 accounts of ship strikes reported worldwide. The humpback whale is one of the most frequently reported whale species involved in vessel strikes worldwide (Laist et al. 2001; Jensen & Silber 2003). The increase in vessel numbers (Silber & Bettridge 2012) is not only a threat to the species in relation to causing injury or death but also in terms of disturbance and displacement from key habitats.Whale watching in general is beneficial for the conservation of species through education and observation of animals in their natural habitat, however, there is increasing concern about the number of whale watch operators and recreational vessels interacting with whales within certain times and areas, and the potential for cumulative impacts on individuals as the whales migrate. In addition the emergence of swim-with operations may result in greater disturbance to this species.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=38'),('39','Caperea marginata','','Mammalia','Neobalaenidae','The Pygmy Right Whale is the smallest and least conspicuous baleen whale (Kemper 2002a), resulting in it being one of the least known species. However, current research by Australian scientists is expanding the understanding of this species (Dawbin & Cato 1986; Kemper 2002b; Kemper & Leppard 1999).','Pygmy Right Whales have primarily been recorded in areas associated with upwellings and with high zooplankton abundance, particularly copepods and small euphausiids which constitute their main prey (Kemper 2002a; Sekiguchi et al. 1992). There is some evidence to indicate that the area south of 41° S is important for weaned Pygmy Right Whales, possibly because of the higher prey abundance in these waters (Kemper 2002a).  A paucity of sightings of live Pygmy Right Whales has led to a limited understanding of the species\' non-biological habitat. They appear to have a circumpolar distribution, preferring water temperatures of between 5 °C and 20 °C (Baker 1985) and staying north of the Antarctic Convergence (Ross et al. 1975). Pygmy Right Whales do not appear to be deep divers, as recorded dive times are short (Matsuoka et al. 1996; Ross et al. 1975), implying that they primarily inhabit the pelagic zone of oceanic waters.Pygmy Right Whales have been seen in sheltered shallow bays, but it appears that these are predomiNAtly juveniles and sub-adults. This appears to be normal behaviour and is not thought to represent animals that are sick or preparing to strand (Ross et al. 1975). Strandings and sightings of live animals have often been linked to areas of either coastal upwelling or areas of increased plankton production, such as the Subtropical Convergence (Kemper 2002a).','Calanoid copepods and small euphausiids feature predomiNAtly in all Pygmy Right Whale stomachs examined, whether they are from oceanic specimens (Budylenko et al. 1973; Ivashin et al. 1972) or stranded animals (Guiler 1978; Kemper 2002a; Sekiguchi et al. 1992).  Sekiguchi and colleagues (1992) suggest that this species uses a surface skimming feeding behaviour, based on found feathers and a small plastic bag in the stomachs of Pygmy Right Whales examined in South Africa. Arnold (1987 as cited in Kemper 2002a) observed a juvenile Pygmy Right Whale apparently feeding on calanoid copepods and euphausiid larvae in Portland Harbour, western Victoria.','Pygmy Right Whales have never been the object of a directed fishery, as were other baleen whales, but were probably taken opportunistically (Bannister et al. 1996). Historical anthropogenic mortalities include a small number of Pygmy Right Whales that were taken for scientific study, plus some incidental captures in nets in South Africa and South Australia (Bannister et al. 1996).Pygmy Right Whales are considered to be unlikely to be seriously affected by toxic contamiNAts (Kemper et al. 1994) because of their apparent offshore distribution near the Subtropical Convergence, and diet based primarily on copepods and small euphausiids (Kemper 2002a).A potential threat to Pygmy Right Whales is entanglement in drift-nets set outside Australian Territorial Waters and in lost or discarded netting (Bannister et al. 1996), particularly considering the increasing fishing in pelagic waters.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=39'),('40','Eubalaena australis','Endangered','Mammalia','Balaenidae','The southern right whale is a large baleen whale with a less streamlined shape than balaenopterids like the humpback whale ( Megaptera novaeangliae ). They grow to a maximum length of 17.5 m and weight of 80 t, with mature females often slightly larger than males (Bannister et al. 1996). The mean length of sexually mature females off the South African coast was calculated as 13.85 m (Best & Ruther 1992) and off Argentina as 13.66 m (Whitehead & Payne 1981). Mature females in Soviet catches from the Southern Ocean averaged 14.34 m (Tormosov et al. 1998). Southern Right Whales are about 5.5 m long and 1000-1500 kg at birth and physical maturity is reached at a length of 16 m (Bannister et al. 1996). Age at physical maturity is unknown (Bannister et al. 1996).','Feeding HabitatThe feeding habitat of the southern right whale is very poorly known and there have been no dedicated studies in feeding areas. Based on sightings information, most feeding areas are thought to be in deeper offshore waters ranging from sub-Antarctic areas to locations south of 60° S (Bannister et al. 1997, 1999; Goodall & Galeazzi 1986; Ohsumi & Kasamatsu 1986; Tormosov et al. 1998) in areas probably associated with climatic and environmental conditions generating high productivity. A single coastal feeding area has been identified off the west coast of Africa where upwelling and thermocline development is apparent, and oceanographic conditions are thought to provide suitable feeding conditions (Best et al. 2002).Breeding HabitatDifferential use of habitat by calving and non-calving whales has been noted off Australia (Burnell & Bryden 1997), South Africa (Best 1981) and Argentina (Payne 1986), perhaps implying habitat selection within calving grounds.The southern right whale prefers near-shore, shallow water depths and being in close proximity to other individuals whilst on calving grounds in Australian waters (Pirzl 2008). In breeding areas, non-calving whales are highly social whilst calving whales remain apart from robust socialising groups (Pirzl 2008). Habitat selection and habitat use on Australian calving grounds is influenced by breeding status and/or the type of calving ground, in addition to other environmental factors such as swell height (Pirzl 2008).The southern right whale is constrained in their ability to colonise unused areas of potentially suitable habitat due to a high degree of site fidelity (individuals returning to the same breeding site each year). This combined with previous exploitation history suggesting extirpation of migratory traditions to these sites (Carroll et al. 2015; Pirzl 2008).Migratory HabitatMigratory habitat parameters are unknown.','Knowledge of southern right whale prey items has been gained primarily from stomach contents data collected from the until recently unreported Soviet whaling in the Southern Ocean during the 1950s-1970s (Tormosov et al. 1998). The southern right whale was found to feed on both euphausids and copepods, with a latitudinal variation in diet (Matthews 1938b; Tormosov et al. 1998). The predomiNAt prey item north of 40° S was copepods, but these were replaced by krill south of 50° S (Tormosov et al. 1998). South of Australia, observations of suspected feeding behaviour suggested that the species also feeds on amphipod crustaceans (Bannister et al. 1997). The northern right whale is known to consume the larval  Munida gregaria  (Cummings 1985a), larval cirripedes (barnacles) (Mayo & Marx 1990) and copepods of the genus  Calanaus  and  Pseduocalanaus  (Murison & Gaskin 1989).Data from sightings and a satellite telemetry study show that feeding grounds of the southern right whale probably lies between about 32° S and 65° S (Bannister et al. 1997; Best et al. 2002; Goodall & Galeazzi 1986; Ohsumi & Kasamatsu 1986; Tormosov et al. 1998). They are generally thought to be in offshore waters, however a coastal feeding area on the west African coast has recently been identified using satellite telemetry (Best et al. 2002).Feeding is thought to occur principally during the austral summer, but most likely extends into spring and autumn. This information is based on a direct observation of southern right whale feeding (Bannister et al. 1997) and the seasonality of stomach contents sampled from Soviet whaling ships (Tormosov et al. 1998). As might be expected from the prey distribution, foraging is not generally observed on winter breeding grounds, although opportunistic feeding has been reported at Peninsula Valdes, Argentina (Thomas 1987). Whether feeding occurs elsewhere in winter is unknown.Most observations of the southern right whale feeding have been made in the northern hemisphere. When skim feeding, the northern right whale swims at the surface of the water with its mouth open, capturing prey items against the baleen (Mayo & Marx 1990). Foraging dives are relatively shallow in comparison to some other cetacean species and have been reported from tag data as an average of 7.9 m to a maximum of 85.3 m (Winn et al. 1995), with a more recent study showing consistent dives to a depth of 80-175 m (Baumgartner & Mate 2003). The depth of foraging dives are associated with the distribution and concentration of zooplankton and stratification of the water column (Baumgartner & Mate 2003; Baumgartner et al. 2003b; Winn et al. 1995).Feeding areas for the northern right whale coincide with oceanographic fronts along which prey concentrate (Baumgartner et al. 2003a; Murison & Gaskin 1989). There is evidence from aerial surveys that Northern Right Whales preferentially select areas of highest prey concentration and will alter swim direction to remain within those areas (Watkins & Schevill 1979). It is possible that they target slower moving copepods in preference to faster moving euphausids (Murison & Gaskin 1989).It seems likely that the general form of foraging behaviour of the southern right whale would be similar to the northern right whale, although strategies may vary where different prey items are targeted or where the oceanographic conditions influencing prey aggregation are different.','The  Conservation Management Plan for the Southern Right Whale - 2011-2021  (DSEWPaC 2012) (a recovery plan under the EPBC Act) has identified a number of threats facing the southern right whale within Australian waters.Known threats affecting the southern right whale in Australian waters are:A. Entanglement  - Entanglement can harm or kill individual whales, and can reduce the fitness of an individual by restricting mobility and impairing breathing, swimming or feeding ability. Entanglement causes physical damage, e.g. nets and lines cutting through the skin and blubber thus exposing the animal to infection and amputation or death. Entanglements in Australian waters primarily come from commercial fishery equipment and marine debris.B. Vessel Disturbance  - Vessel disturbance can occur in the form of collisions or by disrupting the behaviour of animals. The southern right whale appears to be the primary whale species involved in vessel collisions in the southern hemisphere. They accounted for 50 % of whale mortalities resulting from vessel collisions in a rapid assessment of data on vessel collisions with cetaceans in the southern hemisphere. Vessel collision can lead to mortality or significant injury. Chronic disturbance leading to increased energetic costs or disruption of critical social behaviours as individual animals try to avoid vessels may result from activities such as boat-based whale watching, particularly from recreational boats.Threats potentially affecting the Australian population of the southern right whale are:C. Whaling  - The impacts of commercial hunting on the species have been well documented. While currently banned under the IWC moratorium on commercial whaling and due to classification by the IWC of all southern right whale populations as Protected Stocks, the potential for other countries to recommence commercial whaling exists and pressure may well increase as the population recovers.D. Climate Variability and Change  - There is evidence that climate variability affects reproductive output in the species. Much is unknown about the impact of climate change on the food webs on which the southern right whale relies. However, research to date suggests detrimental impacts on reproductive output from warming events are possible. Changes to climate and oceanographic processes may also lead to decreased productivity and different patterns of prey distribution and availability.E. Noise Interference  - Loud noises or long exposure may lead to avoidance of important habitat areas, interruption to communication and, in some situations, physical damage, including permanent or temporary hearing loss. Potential forms of harmful noise interference in Australian waters include seismic surveys, other industrial activities such as drilling, pile driving, blasting and dredging, defence activities, vessel noise, and aircraft operating at low altitude.F. Habitat Modification  - Habitat modification through the development of infrastructure such as ports, marinas, aquaculture facilities, and ocean/marine energy production facilities could lead to the physical displacement of the southern right whale from their preferred habitats or disruption to normal behaviour. Animals may also encounter chemical pollution in the form of sewage and industrial discharges, run off from onshore activities, and accidental spills. In their feeding grounds they are most at risk from bioaccumulation of human-made chemicals such as organochlorines.G. Overharvesting of Prey  - Depletion of prey through over-harvesting may be a potential future threat. Changes to climate and oceanographic processes may also lead to decreased productivity and different patterns of prey distribution and availability.Risk Assessment of ThreatsDue to the smaller size of the south-east subpopulation of the southern right whale the risk posed by these threats can be greater than for the south-west subpopulation. Table 1 below outlines the level of risk associated with each threat for the two subpopulations (taken from the  Conservation Management Plan for the Southern Right Whale  (a recovery plan under the EPBC Act) (DSEWPaC 2012). These ratings were determined assuming existing mitigation measures are implemented.Table 1 - Level of risk posed by threats to the south-east and south-west southern right whale subpopulations.ThreatRisk to south-east Australian subpopulationRisk to south-west Australian subpopulationClimate variability and changeVery HighVery HighSeismic surveysVery HighVery HighWhalingHighHighCommercial fisheries or aquaculture equipmentHighModerateChronic industrial noiseHighModerateInfrastructure/coastal developmentHighModerateVessel collisionsHighModerateAcute industrial noiseHighModerateWhale watchingModerateModerateShipping noiseModerateModerateMarine debrisModerateModerateAircraft noiseModerateModerateOverharvesting of preyModerateModerateChronic chemical pollutionLowLowAcute chemical dischargeLowLow','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=40'),('413','Erythrura gouldiae','Endangered','Aves','Estrildidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=413'),('418','Pardalotus quadragintus','Endangered','Aves','Pardalotidae','The Forty-spotted Pardalote has a length of about 10 cm, a wingspan of about 18 cm, and a weight of about 9 to 13 g (Bulman 1981; Higgins & Peter 2002; Woinarski & Bulman 1985). It is mostly olive-green above, and greyish-white below, with a brighter greenish-yellow face and undertail, a grey-black bill, brown irides, black wings with prominent white spots, a black uppertail, and pinkish-brown legs and feet. Juvenile birds are duller than the adults and have a cream face, a blackish stripe behind each eye, an olive-grey cap on the head and neck, a brown patch over the upper back and shoulders, and a white or flesh-coloured gape (Higgins & Peter 2002).','The key component of habitat used by the Forty-spotted Pardalote is the presence of White Gum,  Eucalyptus viminalis , which provides a major source of food (invertebrates, manna and psyllid insects/lerp) for the species (Woinarski & Bulman 1985). Although some authors have described the preferred habitat of the Forty-spotted Pardalote as dry, grassy White Gum forests and woodlands (Brereton et al. 1997; Department of Primary Industries and Water, Tasmania 2006 l), within its core range the species can occur in any habitat that supports White Gum. For example, there are stands of wet vegetation on Maria and Bruny Islands (and particularly south Bruny Island) that are comprised of as little as 5% White Gum but nonetheless support significant numbers of the Forty-spotted Pardalote (M. Holdsworth 2007, pers. comm.).The Forty-spotted Pardalote inhabits sclerophyll forests and open woodlands where White Gum is present in the tree canopy layer at a projected cover of 5% or more. These communities typically also support other species of  Eucalyptus  such as  E .  amygdalina ,  E .  globulus ,  E .  obliqua ,  E .  ovata ,  E .  pulchella  and  E .  tenuiramis , with a low to moderate layer of shrubs and a dense, species-rich ground layer of grasses and herbs that is sometimes interspersed with patches of cleared or open ground (Brereton et al. 1997; Bryant 1991; Bulman 1981; Bulman et al. 1986; Department of Primary Industries and Water, Tasmania 2006 l; Dorr 1999; M. Holdsworth 2007, pers. comm.; Woinarski & Bulman 1985; Woinarski & Rounsevell 1983). In eastern Tasmania, these communities occur at low altitude and usually within 5 km of the coastline, on shallow but fertile soils in areas of low annual rainfall and (comparatively) high annual mean temperature (Brereton et al. 1997). Within these communities, the Forty-spotted Pardalote is most common in areas that contain mature, hollow-bearing trees (Woinarski & Rounsevell 1983).The Forty-spotted Pardalote does not occur in any of the ecological communities that are listed as threatened under the EPBC Act. It is not known to associate with any other species that is listed as being threatened under the EPBC Act.','The Forty-spotted Pardalote feeds on invertebrates, manna from  Eucalyptus  trees (including  E .  dalrympleana  and White Gum) and lerps (sugary secretions produced by psyllid insects). Its invertebrate prey consists mainly of insects such as beetles, flies, bugs, wasps and caterpillars, although it is also known to feed on millipedes and spiders (Brown 1986; Bulman et al. 1986; Gould 1865; Higgins & Peter 2002; Woinarski & Bulman 1985). In the warmer months of the year, coinciding with the breeding season, manna may be the major source of food (Department of Primary Industries and Water, Tasmania 2006 l).The Forty-spotted Pardalote is mostly arboreal. It mainly forages in the upper strata of  Eucalyptus  trees (especially White Gum), although it will occasionally pick food items from shrubs or pluck invertebrates from the air or, very rarely, pick food items from the ground (Bulman 1981; Dorr 1999; Woinarski & Bulman 1985; Woinarski & Rounsevell 1983).','Of the 102 previously recorded colonies surveyed by Bryant (2010) in 2009–2010, only 54 colonies were confimed with Forty-spotted Pardalote. Bryant (2010) suggests that this is either because a large number of colonies are now extinct or that bird numbers have declined to such low levels that detection is difficult and increased survey effort is required.While loss, degradation and fragmentation of its preferred habitat has been identified as the primary reason for the species\' historical decline, Bryant (2010) suggests that the more recent documented decline may also be due to a number of complex and interrelated factors and notes that even relatively small changes in land use, such as seen on Bruny Island, Howden and Tinderbox Peninsula, may have contributed to population fragmentation and the subsequent population decline documented in 2009–2010 surveys. In particular, Bryant (2010) concludes that human activity, noise and other habitat disturbances are likely to be contributing to the decline of this sensitive bird.Loss of suitable habitat for the Forty-spotted Pardalote has been identified as the key threat to this species, with the grassy White Gum forest in the south-west bioregion of Tasmania reduced to less than 50% of its former extent through agriculture, forestry and residential development (Bryant 1991, 1992; Department of Primary Industries and Water, Tasmania 2006 l; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Rounsevell & Woinarski 1983). The historical reduction in suitable habitat has now been compounded by loss in quality of habitat through drought, tree decline and probably a range of other factors including displacement by other competitive species of birds (Bryant 2010).Severe fragmentation of the Pardalote population in some areas, most notably on Bruny Island, is likely to continue as the quality of suitable habitat is reduced.  Bryant\'s habitat assesment during the 2009–2010 surveys (Bryant 2010) showed that 68% of all habitat plots contained inadequate levels of recruitment of White Gum and 49% of plots had canopy projections indicative of a declining tree health. White Gum is particularly sensitive and intolerant to drought in Tasmania (Neyland 1996) and its deterioration has subsequently reduced its capacity to provide key resources for the Forty-spotted Pardalote (Bryant 2010). On Bruny Island 29 colonies were noted as `being in decline\' including six of those colonies no longer containing any living White Gum. The fragmentation of the population is of concern because it may limit the potential for the species to disperse between areas of suitable habitat (Brown 1986; Department of Primary Industries and Water, Tasmania 2006 l; Woinarski & Bulman 1985).Although approximately 60% of the Forty-spotted Pardalote population is now protected within formal or informal reserves (Department of Primary Industries and Water, Tasmania 2006 l; TSU 1998), suitable habitat continues to be lost or degraded on privately owned land (Bryant 1991; Department of Primary Industries and Water, Tasmania 2006 l). Prescriptions to conserve Forty-spotted Pardalote habitat have been integrated into urban planning and forestry management procedures. However, the incorrect application of these prescriptions, combined with the failure of these prescriptions to provide adequate protection of hollow-bearing trees, has in some areas resulted in the retention of stands of young non-hollow bearing White Gum and the removal of adjacent stands of hollow-bearing trees used for nesting, an outcome that has rendered such areas unsuitable for the Forty-spotted Pardalote. The impact of habitat loss may have been mitigated to some degree by the planting of substantial numbers of White Gum seedlings as part of revegetation programs, especially on Bruny Island. However, at the present time, most of these plants are young and therefore incapable of replacing the mature trees that have been and continue to be lost (M. Holdsworth 2007, pers. comm.).The decline of the Forty-spotted Pardalote may also be due in part to competition for food resources and/or breeding sites with other native birds including the Striated Pardalote ( Pardalotus striatus ), Noisy Miner ( Manorina melanocephala ) and Black-headed Honeyeater ( Melithreptus affinis ) (Brown 1986; Bryant 1991; Department of Primary Industries and Water, Tasmania 2006 l; Woinarski & Bulman 1985; Woinarski & Rounsevell 1983). The Noisy Miner in particular is an aggressive and opportunistic species that has the potential to displace the Forty-spotted Pardalote when habitats are degraded. The Noisy Miner has expanded its distribution in Tasmania in the wake of clearing and other disturbances which have opened up otherwise unsuitable forest and woodland habitats and it now occupies much of the former range of the Forty-spotted Pardalote. The Noisy Miner is absent from all sites currently known or thought to be occupied by the Forty-spotted Pardalote and all recent local extinctions of the Forty-spotted Pardalote have been associated with incursions by the Noisy Miner. This evidence strongly implicates the Noisy Miner in the decline of the Forty-spotted Pardalote (Bryant 1991; Department of Primary Industries and Water, Tasmania 2006 l). Bryant (2010) notes that in times of environmental stress caused by habitat disturbance, the Striated Pardalote has the advantage over the Forty-spotted Pardalote, due to its relative insensitivity to disturbance.Extensive bushfires on Flinders Island in 2002–2003 could have had severe impact on the local population of the Forty-spotted Pardalote. Surveys conducted in 2004 at known, previously occupied sites on Flinders Island failed to locate any birds. However, at the time of the surveys, most of these sites did not support sufficient foraging habitat to be considered suitable for the species. A comprehensive survey will be undertaken during 2010 to determine the status of the species on Flinders Island (Bryant 2010).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=418'),('43','Lagenorhynchus obscurus','','Mammalia','Delphinidae','Dusky Dolphins are a small, moderately robust species with a short rostrum (snout) clearly demarcated from the melon (forehead). The conspicuous dorsal fin is moderately falcate (sickle-shaped) and pointed. Flippers are moderately curved on the leading edge, with a blunt tip (Jefferson et al. 1993; Leatherwood & Reeves 1983). Dusky Dolphins can live for more than 21 years and reach a maximum length of 2.11 m for males, and 1.93 m for females (Perrin & Reilly 1984).','Dusky Dolphins occur mostly in temperate and sub-Antarctic waters. They are considered to primarily inhabit inshore waters but may also be pelagic at times (Ross 2006).  All sightings of Dusky Dolphins in Australian waters have been correlated with abnormally warm sea surface temperatures (more than 0.5 °C above normal temperature) (Gill et al. 2000). It is postulated that such oceanographic changes may promote conditions suitable for aggregation of Dusky Dolphin prey species, thereby increasing abundance of the dolphins (Gill et al. 2000).Dusky Dolphins are resident inshore for much of year but are known to seek out colder water (<18 C) as inshore temperatures rise in summer. Off Australia, the seasonal reports of Dusky Dolphin sightings suggest a causal link with changes in one or more oceanographic features in this region. The position of the Subtropical Convergence, a feature that results in cold surface waters, appears to coincide with the northern limit of distribution for Dusky Dolphins off eastern New Zealand (with numbers declining north and south of this feature) (Gaskin 1968; Wursig et al. 1997). Seasonal distribution of Dusky Dolphins may also coincide with El Niño Southern Oscillation (ENSO) events, which expand the extent of cold waters (Gill et al. 2000).  Dusky Dolphins may associate with Southern Right Whales, listed as threatened under the EPBC Act.','Dusky Dolphins eat a wide diversity of prey, including schooling fish, especially Southern Anchovy, and midwater and benthic prey such as squid and laternfishes. Examination of stomach contents suggests that Dusky Dolphins off southern Africa feed on deep water species at night and come inshore during the day (Sekiguchi et al. 1992). While a similar diurnal movement by Dusky Dolphins was also observed in Argentina, (and associated with inshore resting behaviour), it has been suggested that the timing of foraging may be seasonal, and be correlated with the movements of their prey (Bannister et al. 1996; Wursig & Bastida 1986; Wursig et al. 1997).Dusky Dolphins are generally considered to be surface feeders, often found feeding in aggregations with sea birds. Dusky Dolphin feeding behaviours have primarily been described for Argentinean individuals (Wursig et al. 1997). After slow movements and short submergence times at night, foraging is initiated at dawn. This pattern holds for spring and summer, but is reversed in winter. However, nocturnal feeding has been recorded throughout their range.Dusky Dolphins may dive to depths of 150 m off New Zealand. Leaps with splashing and headfirst re-entries are typical when Dusky Dolphin are chasing fish. During actual feeding noisy \"body slams\"\" appear to be used to prey and alert nearby groups to the presence of prey.  Cooperative feeding is common.Cetaceans such as Dusky Dolphins are thought to be particularly vulnerable to broad-scale changes in the marine environment because of their high positions in marine food chains (Bannister et al. 1996).\"','Past and current threats to Dusky Dolphins include incidental capture in pelagic drift-net fisheries operating in the Tasman Sea and outside Australian Territorial Waters. In one New Zealand port, incidental mortality of Dusky Dolphins was estimated to be 100 to 200 animals per year (Jefferson et al. 1993), but had dropped to within the range of 50 to 150 animals during the mid-1980s (Würsig et al. 1997).Entanglement in lost or discarded netting are also threatening this species (Bannister et al. 1996). Entanglement in an unregulated gillnet fishery and specific targeting for food off Peru, and illegal fishing for Dusky Dolphin off Chile, are considered threats to the global population of this species (Reeves et al. 2003; Van Waerebeek & Reyes 1994; Van Waerebeek et al. 1997).In addition, pollution, including increasing amounts of plastic debris at sea, oil spills and dumping of industrial wastes into waterways and the sea, are leading to bio-accumulation of toxic substances in body tissues of many marine species. These threats have the potential to cause population declines for Dusky Dolphins (Bannister et al. 1996; Ross 2006).In particular, the low reproductive rate of Dusky Dolphins (one offspring every two to three years) suggests that population recovery may be a slow process.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=43'),('449','Manorina melanotis','Endangered','Aves','Meliphagidae','The Black-eared Miner has a roughly uniform grey colouring from crown to rump. There is a black mask, starting at the bill and extending under and over the eye, and uniformly over the ear-coverts. There is often also a obscure grey \'moustache-streak\'. The absence of a pale rump separates the Black-eared Miner from the Yellow-throated Miner, while the absence of pale tail-tips help separate it from both Yellow-throated and Noisy Miners (Pizzey & Knight 1999).','Black-eared Miners are restricted to mature mallee eucalypt woodland, in areas that have not been burnt for at least 50 years and have not been cleared (McLaughlin 1990; Muir et al. 1999; Starks 1987).    Specific habitat requirements:Black-eared Miners inhabit shallow sand mallee and chenopod mallee in the Sunset Country of Victoria and the Bookmark Biosphere Reserve in South Australia (McLaughlin 1992; Muir et al. 1999). The vegetation is dominated by multi-stemmed mallee eucalypts, including  Eucalyptus dumosa ,  E. gracilis ,  E. oleosa  and  E. socialis , usually in association with a ground layer dominated by either Spinifex  Triodia scariosa , or shrubs of the families Chenopodiacae and Zygophyllaceae (McLaughlin 1992; Muir et al. 1999; Starks 1987).Black-eared Miners occur mainly in old-growth habitats that have not been burnt for at least 50 years (Higgins et al. 2001; Starks 1987). In the Bookmark Biosphere Reserve and the Tarawi Nature Reserve in NSW, more than 80% of mallee vegetation is older than 50 years, and hence suitable for the species. In Victoria, there is much less old-growth mallee. Within large areas of contiguous mallee in Bookmark Biosphere Reserve, sites with the highest quality colonies are more than 5 km from dams and man-made clearings (Clarke & Clarke 1999a, Muir et al. 1999). In contrast, all known Yellow-throated Miner colonies in the Bookmark region have been located within 2 km of permanent water and man-made clearings. In Victoria, colonies known to have contained Black-eared Miners were in blocks of contiguous mallee vegetation larger than 12 000 ha (McLaughlin 1994). In South Australia and NSW, all but one known colony occurs in areas of contiguous mallee larger than 100 000 ha. Black-eared Miners were once known to occur in small remNAt patches of mallee (McGilp 1943; McGilp & Parsons 1937; Rix 1937), but this was prior to the expansion into and subsequent habitation of these areas by Yellow-throated Miners (Starks 1987). Even larger isolated blocks of suitable mallee such as the reserves at Bronzewing (20 000 ha) and Annuello (35 000 ha) have proved unable to retain viable populations.Breeding habitat:Black-eared Miners nest in upright forks of mallee eucalypts or dense epicormic shoots (McLaughlin 1990). Many nests have been observed in  Eucalyptus dumosa ,  E. oleosa  and  E. socialis , as well as in Dodder  Cassytha  spp. (usually on eucalypts). Two have been seen in the shrub  Myoporum platycarpum  and single nests have been found in the tree  Santalum murrayanum , the shrubs Moonah,  Melaleuca lanceolata  and Pinbush,  Acacia colletioides  (Higgins et al. 2001). There are also records of nesting in Cyprus Pine,  Callitris  (McLaughlin 1990, 1992). They appear to prefer long unburnt (more than 55 years ago) mallee, possibly because of greater availability of high nesting sites. 50-66% of known colonies are in areas that show coppice regrowth (suggesting high levels of water stress), that are furthest from cleared areas, and in areas considered marginal for grazing of stock (Baker-Gabb 2001a; Muir et al. 1999). They build in denser foliage in tall mallees (often those in dune swale rather than on dune crest), in vertical forks of larger branches and often in epicormic shoots or among small twigs (Higgins et al. 2001; Muir et al. 1998). Within a colony, nests may be as little as 25 m apart (Backhouse et al. 1997; Baker-Gabb 2001a).','The Black-eared Miner eats mainly invertebrates and lerps (the sugary exudate produced by psyllids). Prey is obtained mainly from gleaning and probing decorticating bark, limbs and twigs of eucalypts and gleaning from foliage, although birds will also forage on the ground and hawk for flying insects (McLaughlin 1990). Nectar from  Eucalyptus  spp.,  Eromophila spp . and  Grevillea huegelii  is also taken. In captivity Black-eared Miners are successfully maintained on a diet of commercial honeyeater and lorikeet mix and invertebrates (Clarke & Clarke 1999a).','The fundamental reason for decline of the Black-eared Miner is that most of its preferred habitat has been cleared. This has allowed the closely related Yellow-throated Miner to colonise habitat remNAts and interbreed with Black-eared Miners. Genetic swamping is now the greatest threat. The other major threat is fire (Garnett & Crowley 2000).  Four major causes of decline of the Black-eared Miner are likely to be:  Clearing and habitat fragmentation  Loss of suitable habitat (Favaloro 1966; Joseph 1986; McLaughlin 1990, 1992; Schodde 1981, 1990; Starks 1987) has occurred throughout the range of the Black-eared Miner. In Victoria, mallee habitat on the most fertile soils (preferred by Black-eared Miners) has been selectively cleared for agriculture (Blakers & MacMillan 1988; LCC 1987). This clearance and modification of vegetation has also favoured a range expansion of the Yellow-throated Miner, which threatens the Black-eared Miner through hybridisation.      Habitat degradation  Grazing by domestic stock and feral and native herbivores is sufficiently high on most reserves and pastoral properties that it limits the regeneration of many mallee plants (Forward & Robinson 1996). Dams and their associated clearings and degradation attract Yellow-throated Miners. Black-eared Miners do not need permanent water (Clarke & Clarke 1999a).      Hybridisation  A major cause of decline is introgressive hybridisation by the Yellow-throated Miner (McLaughlin 1990; Schodde 1981; Starks 1987). Black-eared and Yellow-throated Miners were clearly separable on phenotypic characters before extensive clearing occurred after 1950 (Clarke et al. 2001). McLaughlin (1992) demonstrated that habitat occupied by breeding Black-eared Miners is significantly structurally dissimilar from Yellow-throated Miner habitat, and that the two species are predomiNAtly allopatric (overlapping in space). However, colonies of distinctly intermediate-plumaged miners were found to occupy a range of habitat types that in structure overlapped both Black-eared and Yellow-throated Miner habitat. This suggests that although Yellow-throated and Black-eared Miners would not normally come into contact (as would have been the case when Black-eared Miners were occupying remNAt habitat), the flow of genetic material between the two species is maintained by the presence of hybrid miner colonies (these colonies would not have been present prior to extensive land clearing). Uncontrolled genetic introgression will eventually result in the loss of the biological and genetic diversity contributed by the Black-eared Miner (e.g. Cade 1983).      Fire  The species prefers mallee vegetation that has not been burnt for at least 50 years (McLaughlin 1990, 1992; Starks 1987). Habitats of this age are now uncommon throughout the distribution of the Black-eared Miner (LCC 1987), except in the Bookmark Biosphere Reserve. Large wildfires remain one of the most serious threats to the Black-eared Miner, and the potential scale of wildfire in mallee habitats suggests that even the largest reserves may be consumed by fire (Benshemesh 1990; Clarke & Clarke 1999a).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=449'),('46','Orcinus orca','','Mammalia','Delphinidae','Killer Whales are the largest member of the dolphin family and are recognisable by their distinctive black, white and grey coloration. The head is rounded, with no distinct beak. A white eye patch, or spot, is located just above and behind the eye. Just behind the dorsal fin is a grey saddle patch. The Killer Whale\'s belly, lower jaw and the underside of the tail flukes are white. The rest of the body is black. The wide, tall dorsal fin is curved backwards in females and is more upright and triangular-shaped in males. The pectoral flippers are paddle-shaped. In addition to sexual size dimorphism, male Killer Whale appendages are disproportionately larger than in females (Dahlheim & Heyning 1999).','The preferred habitat of Killer Whales includes oceanic, pelagic and neritic (relatively shallow waters over the continental shelf) regions, in both warm and cold waters. They may be more common in cold, deep waters, but off Australia, Killer Whales are most often seen along the continental slope and on the shelf, particularly near seal colonies. Killer Whales have regularly been observed within the Australian territorial waters along the ice edge in summer (Thiele & Gill 1999). The habitat of Killer Whales is difficult to categorise due to the cosmopolitan nature of the species and its ability to inhabit all oceans. Although Killer Whales tend to be found at the ice edge during the Antarctic summer (Gill & Thiele 1997; Thiele et al. 2000), family groups (including calves) have been seen within the ice during winter (Thiele & Gill 1999). Subantarctic observations indicate that Killer Whales return to subantarctic Islands, such as Macquarie Island, during the summer. In the north-eastern Pacific, use of different habitats has been linked to behavioural requirements, and the movements of prey (Similae et al. 2002). This may lead to individuals/groups experiencing, and utilising, a large variety of habitats.Two types of Killer Whales are distinguished in the eastern-north Pacific, from Washington State to Alaska. The two types, referred to as \'residents\' and \'transients\', each have different ecological preferences (Baird & Dill 1996). Some studies in other parts of the world suggest that this pattern may be universal (Jefferson et al. 1993).Killer Whales are not part of, nor do they rely on, a listed ecological community. However, they do prey on other listed threatened species, such as Southern Elephant Seals in the subantarctic, plus other cetaceans.','Killer Whales are top-level carnivores. Their diet varies seasonally and regionally. In the north-eastern Pacific, the two identified groups of Killer Whales feed on different prey. The \'resident\' whales eat mostly fish, while the \'transient\' whales feed on birds and mammals (Saulitis et al. 2000). The specific diet of Australian Killer Whales is not known, but there are reports of attacks on dolphins, young Humpback Whales, Blue Whales, Sperm Whales, Dugongs and Australian Sea Lions (Bannister et al. 1996).Smaller prey are also important. In a large sample (362) of Killer Whale stomachs from Antarctica, 60% contained fish, 31% Minke Whale, 9% pinnipeds and 100% squid (Bannister et al. 1996). In most geographical regions, Killer Whale movements may be related to the movements of their prey, potentially travelling 125–200 km/day while foraging (Dahlheim & Heyning 1999; Guerrero Ruiz et al. 1998).The varied diet and cultural complexity of Killer Whales have resulted in great plasticity and specialisation in foraging behaviour (Ford et al. 1998). Limited observations have been made on Killer Whale foraging behaviour in Australian waters, particularly when hunting other cetaceans. A confirmed report from South Australia described about 13 Killer Whales attacking a pod of Sperm Whales grouped in the protective \'daisy\' formation (Bannister et al. 1996). Pitman and colleagues (2001) described a similar, successful, attack by some 35 Killer Whales on nine Sperm Whales. A well-documented case records Killer Whales herding Bottlenose and Common Dolphins (Ross 2006). Ship-based observations in the Antarctic report similar pack-hunting strategies when attacking both Humpback and Minke Whales (Peddemors 2006, pers. obs.). Repeated attacks on a pair of Humpback Whales included individuals surging forward onto the backs of the Humpback Whales while the other Killer Whales surrounded the prey. During observations of an attack on an Antarctic Minke Whale, it was noted that the pack of Killer Whales were silent, with shrieks and calls only being exchanged after the Minke Whale had been captured (Peddemors 2006, pers. obs.). Antarctic Killer Whales have also been observed creating waves to wash hauled out seals off ice floes (Visser et al. 2008).Three different \'ecotypes\' of Killer Whale have been described in the Antarctic (Pitman & Ensor 2003). Type A occurs mainly offshore and preys on Minke Whales. Type B inhabits inshore waters, pack ice and the Antarctic Peninsula Area. Seals appear to be the most important prey for Type B. Type C Antarctic Killer Whale inhabits inshore waters of East Antarctica and has been recorded feeding only on Antarctic Toothfish (Pitman & Ensor 2003).Killer Whales frequently scavenged from the carcasses produced by whalers. This practice was prominent with large-scale mechanical whaling in the 20th century, which created temporally and spatially clustered floating carcasses. The carcasses were often the large whale species, preferred by Killer Whales, which normally sink (after natural death) beyond their diving range. During the mid 20th century, floating whaled carcasses were more abundant than those resulting from natural mortality, and scavenging Killer Whales multiplied through shifts in diet and reprodction. During the 1970s availability of carcasses fell dramatically with the cessation of most whaling operations. Scavenging Killer Whales shifted to alternate source of nutrition and may have turned to attacking pinnipeds, living large whales, small cetaceans and sea otters more frequently (Whitehead & Reeves 2005).Killer Whale depredation of fish off longlines has been recorded throughout their range, including Tasmanian and subantarctic waters. Although there are no records of deaths as a result of this interaction, fishers have been known to shoot at the Killer Whales, potentially injuring or killing them. Killer Whales have also bent and straightened the long-line hooks, suggesting some injury to the whale may occur (Dalla Rosa & Secchi 2007)','Threats to Killer Whales include pollution, targeted hunting and illegal killing, and interactions with fisheries, including the potential for incidental capture.High levels of pollutants have been reported in Killer Whales (Ross et al. 2000), although their effects are unknown (Kemper et al. 1994). There are many factors that impede the assessment of the effects in Killer Whales including ethical, logistical, and legal constraints, as well as many natural factors (age, sex, condition, disease/health) (Hickie et al. 2007; Ross 2006). Species such as Killer Whales near the top of aquatic food chains typically have high concentrations of persistent organic pollutants (POP), of which Polychlorinated biphenyl (PCB) frequently dominates (Hickie et al. 2007). Killer whales are among the most PCB-contaminated marine mammals in the world (Ross et al. 2000). PCB may affect immune systems, development, and reproduction (Hickie et al. 2007). A neonate Killer Whale that stranded in Victoria had moderate levels (28.4 ppm) of total DDT.Historically, Killer Whales have been hunted in the Antarctic by whalers whose catches, between 1969 and 1980, numbered up to about 1000 per season. Killer Whales have also been seen as a competitor to fishing and sealing industries and may have been killed by fishers for that reason. Current illegal killing is of concern in some areas (e.g. Tasmania). Incidental deaths in fishing nets have not been reported in Australian waters.Other threats include reduction of food resources by fishing of prey species, entanglement in driftnets set outside the Australian EEZ, and in lost or discarded netting in international waters (Bannister et al. 1996).Potential threats may include competition from expanding commercial fisheries in higher latitudes, such as those for Orange Roughy, Patagonian Toothfish and cephalopods (squids), and from increasing pollution leading to accumulation of toxic substances in body tissues, although these latter are likely to be low (Bannister et al. 1996; Ross 2006a).Killer Whales that are dependent on sea ice for foraging in Antarctica, may be especially vulnerable to changes in sea ice coverage due to climate change (Andrews et al. 2008). Little is known about reproduction in Australian Killer Whales, however, it is likely that they have a low reproductive rate, producing one offspring every several years (Ross 2006). This may indicate that population recovery is a slow process.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=46'),('470','Grantiella picta','Vulnerable','Aves','Meliphagidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=470'),('50','Sousa chinensis','','Mammalia','Delphinidae','The Australian humpback dolphin can be visually differentiated from the other species of the genus by the following combination of morphological characters: (1) the body is typically more dark grey in colour, (2) a diagonal cape line running from just above the eye and neck down to the urogenital area separates the dark back and lighter belly, (3) dorsal fin is lower in size, triangular in shape and has a wide base without a visible dorsal hump and (4) white scarring and dark flecking on the head, back, dorsal fin and tail stock are common in adult animals (Jefferson and Rosenbaum, 2014).','Within their geographical range, Australian humpback dolphins are found primarily in coastal waters (Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). Opportunistic data collected during aerial surveys designed to estimate the distribution and abundance of dugongs ( Dugong dugon ) in the Great Barrier Reef indicated that Australian humpback dolphins were sighted on average 6.4 km (SE=1.26, range 0–55.6 km) from the nearest point of land and 2.7 km (SE=0.27, range=0–8.1 km) to the nearest shallow area (either point of land or charted reef, less than 2 m deep at low tide) (Corkeron et al., 1997, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). In Queensland and in the Northern Territory, Australian humpback dolphins have been recorded mostly within 10 km of the coast (Palmer et al., 2014b; Parra et al., 2004, 2006b, all cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). Accordingly in Keppel Bay, Central Queensland, where up to 10 km offshore waters still remain below 10 m in depth, Australian humpback dolphins were recorded on average 2.8 km (SD=4.21, range=0–24 km) off the coast (Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). In Western Australia, sightings obtained from recent exploratory surveys and ongoing studies seem to confirm a similar pattern, with the majority of the sightings obtained within 5 km off the coast (A. Brown and T. Hunt, personal communication, 19 February 2015, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). In Papua New Guinea, sightings of Australian humpback dolphins were recorded close to the coastline and in waters 1.6–11.4 m deep (Beasley et al., 2016, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016).While coastal waters are arguably the primary habitat of Australian humpback dolphins, most survey work has been conducted close to the coast; thus, the extent to which humpback dolphins use offshore waters is not yet fully understood. Observations of Australian humpback dolphins at least up to 55.6 km from land indicate that this species may venture further offshore especially in sheltered and protected waters such as in the Great Barrier Reef where sand flats occur almost continuously from the mainland to the outer reefs (Corkeron et al., 1997, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016).Along the Australian coast, humpback dolphins are more likely to be found in relatively shallow and protected coastal habitats such as inlets, estuaries, major tidal rivers, shallow bays, inshore reefs and coastal archipelagos, rather than in open stretches of coastline (Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). In Queensland and Northern Territory, Australian humpback dolphins are mainly found in water less than 20 km from the nearest river mouth, and in water less than 15–20 m deep (Parra et al., 2004, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). Few animals have been observed in waters up to 30–50 m deep, but these remained in close proximity (within 5 km) to the coast (Parra et al., 2004, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). In both Queensland and Northern Territory, Australian humpback dolphins have been also recorded as far as 20–50 km upstream in large rivers such as the East Alligator River, Northern Territory, and in the Fitzroy and Brisbane rivers in Queensland (Cagnazzi, 2011; Palmer et al., 2014b; Parra et al., 2004, all cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). No studies on habitat use have been conducted in Western Australia. Preliminary surveys and ongoing studies in a few locations indicate that Australian humpback dolphins appear to utilise a wide range of near-shore habitats. For example around the North West Cape, dolphins have been sighted in clear waters over Ningaloo Reef, and in turbid waters in Exmouth Gulf and in depths ranging from 1 to 40 m deep (T. Hunt, personal communication, 19 February 2015, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016).Among populations, there appear to be some differences in habitat selection suggesting high adaptability of this species to local environment characteristics (Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). For example, in Cleveland Bay, Australian humpback dolphins showed preferences for waters close to the coast and 2–5 m deep, followed by waters 1–2 m deep (Parra, 2006, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). In Keppel Bay (630 km south), Australian humpback dolphins showed preference for water 2–5 and 5–10 m deep, while in Port Curtis (700 km further south) they showed preference for water 5–10 and 10–15 m deep (Cagnazzi, 2011, 2013, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). Within these regions, Australian humpback dolphins showed selection for various types of habitats including dredged channels, reefs, seagrass flats and mangroves (Parra & Cagnazzi 2016).','Across Australia, humpback dolphins have been observed feeding in a wide range of inshore-estuarine coastal habitats including rivers and creeks, exposed banks, shallow flats, rock and coral reefs as well as over submerged reefs in waters at least up to 40 m deep (Allen et al., 2012; Cagnazzi, 2011; Parra, 2006; Parra et al., 2006b, all cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). The analysis of stomach contents of six Australian humpback dolphins stranded in Queensland suggested they are opportunistic-generalist feeders, preying on a wide variety of fishes including both bottom-dwelling species (e.g. grunts, tooth ponyfishes, croakers, flatheads and whitings) as well as pelagic species (e.g. cardinal fishes, gizzard shads, anchovies, false trevally and barracudas) (Parra and Jedensjö, 2014, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). Among these, Grunt fish ( Pomadasys  sp.) was the most numerically important prey, accounting for more than half (52.9%) of all prey items, followed by the cardinal fish ( Apogon  sp., 10.4%) and smelt-whiting ( Sillago  sp., 9.7%) (Parra and Jedensjö, 2014, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). Cephalopods and crustaceans do not appear to be major prey items, with remains only found in one stomach and in very small quantities (Parra and Jedensjö, 2014, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). However, this result may have been biased by the small sample size and seasonal variation in prey availability. The preferences for fish over cephalopods, crustaceans and other invertebrates is in accordance with the analysis of stomach contents of Indo-Pacific humpback dolphins stranded in Hong Kong (Barros et al., 2004, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016).Analysis of photographs from Queensland and Western Australia indicates also that larger species such as barramundi ( Lates calcarifer ), threadfin salmon ( Eleutheronema tetradactylum ) and queenfish ( Scomberoides commersonnianus ) are occasional prey (D. Cagnazzi and A. Brown, personal observations, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). In the Northern Territory, Australian humpback dolphins have been recorded via photographs preying on pony fish ( Equulites  sp.), forked-tailed catfish (Ariidae), barramundi ( L. calcarifer ), sicklefish ( Depane punctate ), brown sweetlip ( Plectorhinchus gibbosus ) and banded grunter ( Terapon theraps ) (C. Palmer, personal communication, 26 May 2015, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016).As in Queensland, foraging behaviour has been observed mainly in nearshore habitats over intertidal rocky reefs and over shallow sub-tidal reef habitats in Western Australia and the Northern Territory (A. Brown and T. Hunt, personal communication, 19 February 2015; C. Palmer, personal communication, 26 May 2015, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). As opportunistic-generalist feeders substantial variation in the prey spectrum of this species is expected across their range. Australian humpback dolphins have been observed to feed alone or in groups of up to 30 individuals along the east coast of Queensland (Cagnazzi, 2011; Parra et al., 2011, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). Solitary feeding generally involves long deep dives and bottom feeding whereas large groups usually feed close to the surface (D. Cagnazzi and G.J. Parra, personal observations, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). In several locations in Queensland (Moreton Bay, Port Curtis, Keppel Bay and Cleveland Bay), Australian humpback dolphins feed behind trawlers (Cagnazzi, 2011; Corkeron, 1990; Parra, 2006, all cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). Several reports indicate also that Australian humpback dolphins feed in proximity of fish farms and on baited drumlines (S.J. Allen, A.M. Brown and D. Cagnazzi, personal observations, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016). Strandfeeding behaviour has been observed in Queensland, Northern Territory and Western Australia (D. Cagnazzi and G.J. Parra, personal observations; Whiting, 2011, cited in Parra & Cagnazzi 2016).','The Australian Humpback Dolphin is threatened by (Parra & Cagnazzi 2016):habitat loss and degradationbeing caught as by-catchwater pollutionunderwater noisefloodsvessel trafficoverfishing of prey resourceswildlife tourism.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=50'),('515','Dasyornis longirostris','Endangered','Aves','Pardalotidae','The Western Bristlebird is a medium-sized brown, ground-dwelling songbird with short wings and a long tail. It is 17 cm long and weighs 26–39 g. The crown and hindneck are dark brown with light-brown mottling. The sides of the neck are light brownish-grey with faint scalloping which merge into light-brown ear-coverts. The eyebrow is pale grey while the chin and throat are off-white with fine dark-brown scalloping. The upperbody is all dark brown, with the mantle, scapulars and upper back mottled pale grey, and the lower back and rump having a rufous tinge. The uppertail is olive brown with rufous edges. The breast is light brownish-grey with dark-brown scalloping and the belly is off-white, grading to brown on the flanks, with fine dark-brown scalloping. The undertail is brownish grey. The wings are rufous brown above and brownish grey below. The bill is dark grey with a pale base to the lower mandible, the eyes are red-brown and the legs and feet are greyish. The sexes are alike. Juveniles are similar to adults, but lack mottling and scalloping on their plumage (Higgins & Peter 2002).','The Western Bristlebird is restricted to floristically diverse low dense coastal heathland (McNee 1986; Smith 1987). Western Bristlebirds occur in heathland that is 0.5–1.5 m tall, comprising a diverse variety of shrubs such as banksias including Baxter\'s Banksia  (Banksia baxteri) , Dryandra-leaved Banksia  ( B. dryandroides) , Candlestick Banksia ( B. attenuata)  or Scarlet Banksia ( B. coccinea )), paperbarks (such as  Melaleuca striata  or  M. thymoides ), hakeas (such as Hood Leaved Hakea ( Hakea cucullata ), or Two-leaf Hakea ( H. trifurcata  )),  Lambertia  spp.,  Dryandra  spp.,  AdeNAthos  spp.,  Leptospermum  spp.,  Daviesia reversifolia  and Dwarf Sheoak  (Allocasuarina humilis).  Their habitat usually has abundant sedges and, sometimes, thickets of stunted eucalypts, especially Mallee eucalypts. Jarrah ( Eucalyptus marginata)  and Marri ( E. calophylla)  may also be present (Gilfillan et al. 2007; McNee 1986; Smith 1987; Smith & Moore 1977). They also occur on Grass Tree ( Xanthorrhoea  spp.) flats with dense heathland that is about 1 m tall, and abundant Sword-sedges ( Anarthria  spp.) (Whittell 1936). Shrubs comprised 40–80% of foliage cover at sites where Western Bristlebirds were recorded in 1985 (McNee 1986).The frequency of burning these habitats determines the structure of the component vegetation. The Western Bristlebird has been recorded in areas:Last burnt 3–5 years previously at Two Peoples Bay (although nesting does not occur in these areas until later years (Garnett & Crowley 2000))last burnt 4–6 years previously at Lake Gardner (Smith 1987)last burnt 9 years previously in southern Fitzgerald River National Park (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Higgins & Peter 2002)last burnt 5–12 years previously around the Waychinicup River (McNee 1986)last burnt 14–28 years previously in northern Fitzgerald River National Park (McNee 1986)It also occurs in areas last burnt at least 50 years previously, but at a lower population density than it does in less mature vegetation (Smith 1987). Psophodes nigrogularis) (Atrichornis clamosus)  (Pezoporus wallicus flaviventris)','The diet of the Western Bristlebird consists of invertebrates and seeds. Known food items include the seeds of  Anarthria scabra ,  Daviesia  spp. and  Acacia  spp., as well as earthworms, snails and insects such as ants and beetles and their larvae (Buller 1945; Chapman 1999; Milligan 1902a; Smith 1987). The Western Bristlebird forages on or close to the ground, probing leaf-litter or pecking the ground, or gleaning items from the foliage of plants (Smith 1987).','FireThe main threat to the Western Bristlebird is extensive, or frequent, fire. Fires at intervals of less than 5–10 years may lead to its local extinction (Smith 1987). The optimum fire frequency for the species is unknown, however, the maximum fire frequency to maintain viable populations of the Western Bristlebird is not less than 20 years (Burbidge 2003). Severe or large scale fires have the potential to destroy all suitable habitat, including refuges (Gilfillan et al. 2007; McNee 1986; Smith 1977, 1987). Fire frequency greater than every 5–10 years will lead to the extinction of a population, but what happens to its heath habitat in the absence of fire for 50 or more years is unknown. Some areas of heath around Mt. Gardner have not been burnt for at least 45 years and the density of birds in these areas is less than in areas burnt 20 years ago (Smith 1987)Land Clearing and GrazingClearing of heathland and draining of swamps for agriculture and urban development has also contributed to the decline in numbers and contraction of the range of the Western Bristlebird. Grazing and land clearing are potential threats, and were probably major causes of the species\' decline around Albany (McNee 1986). Grazing and land clearing are no longer considered to be immediate threats to the species (Chapman 1999; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Smith 1977).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=515'),('533','Dasyornis brachypterus','Endangered','Aves','Pardalotidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=533'),('558','Amytornis dorotheae','Endangered','Aves','Maluridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=558'),('564','Amytornis woodwardi','Vulnerable','Aves','Maluridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=564'),('56790','Galaxiella pusilla','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Galaxiidae','The Eastern Dwarf Galaxias is a tiny, slender, freshwater fish that averages 30-40 mm in length. Like other Galaxiidae, it has all soft-rayed fins, a body lacking scales, and a single dorsal fin positioned well back on the body. The body depth is greatest mid-abdomen, tapering to both head and tail, while the lateral line follows the dorsal profile. The head is short and blunt with large eyes, while the mouth is small, terminal and oblique, with jaws roughly equal in length. The dorsal and anal fins are opposite, shortbased and rounded. The caudal fin is long and rounded, with fleshy flanges extending forward almost to the bases of the dorsal and anal fins. A fleshy abdominal keel (more pronounced in males) extends from the pelvic fin base posteriorly to the vent. Body colour is olive–amber on the dorsal surface and sides, with a silvery-white belly, while the fins are transparent (Saddlier et al 2010).','As outlined in the recovery plan (Saddlier et al. 2010), the Eastern Dwarf Galaxias has broad habitat requirements and occurs in slow flowing and still, shallow, permanent and temporary freshwater habitats such as swamps, drains and the backwaters of streams and creeks, often (but not always) containing dense aquatic macrophytes and emergent plants (Cadwallader & Backhouse 1983; McDowall 1996; Hammer 2002a). In larger pools, the species is usually found amongst marginal vegetation. Some wetlands where it occurs may partially or completely dry up during summer (Humphries 1986) and such wetlands rely on seasonal flooding plus linkages to other sites where the species occurs, for recolonisation (Backhouse & Vanner 1978). Wetlands connected to a more permanent waterbody (such as river or creek) may also be vital to their long-term survival (particularly during extended dry conditions) and must therefore be considered as part of the habitat requirement critical to survival (Saddlier et al. 2010).The Eastern Dwarf Galaxias are known to occupy a wide range of habitats, however the species\' specific (or \'preferred\') habitat requirements are not well known. The national recovery plan (Saddlier et al 2010) lists the determination of the species habitat use at different life history stages and across total range as a key objective of the plan. The determination would include the development of a predictive habitat model and the development of management strategies to maintain, enhance or restore essential habitat requirements (Saddlier et al 2010). In the interim, Bloink (2012) proposed that habitat can be broadly categorised as follows:Transient habitat only - typically parts of floodplains or ephemeral habitats that retain water for less than a month following inundation, or habitats dominated by faster flowing hydraulic habitats (e.g. riffle/run) that do not offer the slow or no flow hydraulic habitats preferred by the species. Transient habitats are important for dispersal and foraging.Spawning habitat only – typically ephemeral habitats with abundant aquatic or fringing terrestrial vegetation (e.g. grasses) that pool for sustained periods (e.g. 1-3 months) following inundation but ultimately dry out and/or contract back into short or long term refuge habitats nearby.Short term refuge habitat – habitats that only retain water for short periods (i.e. 3+ months or throughout wet years), or, habitats that retain water for longer but do not have the required attributes likely to be required to support a permanent, self-sustaining population of Eastern Dwarf Galaxias.  Such habitats are typically colonised or re-colonised following a flooding event.  In the case of short term refuge habitats that ultimately dry out, these can at least initially be extremely productive for spawning and recruitment, however such populations are often lost to habitat desiccation unless a flow/flooding event allows individuals to disperse beforehand.Long term refuge habitat – habitats that retain water and for long periods (i.e. years) or permanently and always support a self sustaining population of Eastern Dwarf Galaxias. Typically these are perennial waterways, or the deepest pools within an ephemeral waterway, or a dam or wetland on a floodplain. Eastern Dwarf Galaxias populations in these habitats are typically referred to as source populations, since it is these populations that persist during dry conditions and from which Eastern Dwarf Galaxias will again disperse during suitable flow conditions (e.g. flood).  The size and viability of Eastern Dwarf Galaxias populations in these refuge habitats varies markedly and is likely to be heavily influenced by a range of factors including habitat size, hydrological regime (e.g. water level variability and timing), connectivity with ephemeral habitats, the degree of cover provided by aquatic and fringing terrestrial vegetation, and fish community structure (e.g. the absence or abundance of pest fish species such as Eastern Gambusia ( Gambusia holbrooki )).Known Tasmanian sites appear to be associated with sand, gravel and alluvium deposits (Chilcott & Humphreys 1996). In South Australia, this species occurs in shallow waters heavily vegetated with Milfoil ( Myriophyllum propinquum ).The species is known to seek refuge in yabbie burrows (Monash City Council 2003) or crayfish burrows (Beck 1985). Where this species occurs in habitats which seasonally dry up, this species can also aestivate (become dormant) for several months in the mud in existing burrows or under logs and stones (Wager & Jackson 1993; McDowall 1996; Inland Fisheries Service 2000).','The Eastern Dwarf Galaxias is a generalist carnivore and feeds mostly in the water column on a variety of aquatic invertebrates including insect larvae (Chironomid (non-biting midges)), small crustaceans (copepods (small crustaceans), cladocerans (water fleas) and ostracods (seed shrimp)) and terrestrial insects that fall into the water (Humphries 1986, McDowall 1996). In a study of a South Australian population, Beck (1985) recorded the diet to include duckweed ( Lemna  spp.) and arthropods. In aquaria this species fed on plant material such as filamentous algae, and accepted insect larvae and other freshwater invertebrates (Backhouse & Vanner 1978).Based on mouth morphology and observation, the Eastern Dwarf Galaxias appears to be a more timid feeder and restricted to smaller prey items than the similarily sized Eastern Gambusia (Bloink 2013 pers. comm.).','Threats the Eastern Dwarf Galaxias include (Hardie et al. 2006; Jackson 2004; Saddlier et al. 2010; Unmack & Paras 1995):historical and continued (particularly on the urban fringe) degradation and loss of habitat throughout its range, caused by wetland drainage, wetland inundation, fouling by livestock, ploughing, concreting of waterways, chemical pollution and Carp ( Cyprinus carpio ) associated degradationhistorical and continued (particularly on the urban fringe) alteration to flow regime and reduced connectivity throughout its range, caused by dam and levee construction, surface and groundwater abstraction, drawdown associated with forestry/revegetationdrying caused by climate change, reducing suitable habitat and connectivity throughout its rangeincreased competition and predation by legally and illegally introduced aquatic species such as the Eastern Gambusia, Brown Trout ( Salmo trutta ), Rainbow Trout ( Onycorhynchus mykiss ) and Redfin ( Perca fluviatilis )illegal collection leading to localised depletions, possibly intensifying with increased community awareness.Agriculture has greatly reduced the number of viable habitats for this species in South Australia (Beck 1985). Of seven swamps observed in Hundred of Mingboo in South Australia over a 30 year period, only three still contained the fish in 1985 (Beck 1985). The reduction was attributed to chemical pollution and damage caused by cattle (Beck 1985).The Eastern Dwarf Galaxias is short lived and opportunistic. It can disappear from a large area relatively quickly and reduced connectivity and habitat suitability can restrict or prevent recolonisation of many areas. It is likely it was once ubiquitous in suitable habitats throughout its range. Small size and preference for still or slow flowing habitats suggests a considerable overlap in ecological niche with the introduced Eastern Gambusia. In terms of feeding behaviour and mouth morphology, Eastern Gambusia is likely to hold a considerable competitive advantage over Eastern Dwarf Galaxias, particularly in the upper part of the water column (Bloink 2013 pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=56790'),('56791','Craterocephalus fluviatilis','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Atherinidae','The Murray Hardyhead is a small, moderately deep bodied fish which grows to a maximum length of 76 mm, but is commonly 40–65 mm. Males have been recorded at 27–34 mm and females at 41–43 mm caudal fork length (Backhouse et al. 2008; Lintermans 2007). Its body is predomiNAtly luminescent silver to dark golden dorsally, with a distinct mid-lateral stripe, and a pale abdomen. It has a small mouth with protrusible lips, a restricted gape (Backhouse et al. 2008; FSC 2008a), and a single row of small teeth on the anterior part of both jaws (Crowley & Ivantsoff 1990). The species is usually found in schools of distinct size classes: juveniles are found throughout lakes, in open areas associated with edge structure; and adults have been observed over shallow habitats including open sand banks (Lintermans 2007).','The distribution of the Murray Hardyhead is characteristically patchy and fragmented according to availability of suitable habitat (Backhouse et al. 2008). Salinity may contribute to fragmentation of hardyhead populations in the River Murray. Salinity affects habitat complexity, the incidence of parasites and affects the metabolism of fish through the physiological consequences of changes in the osmotic environment (e.g. adjustments in osmoregulation or oxygen consumption). Spatial differences in salinity, therefore, could segregate fish species (Wedderburn 2008; Wedderburn et al. 2008b).The Murray Hardyhead is mostly recorded in saline lakes that are moderately acidic to highly alkaline (pH 6.0-10.4), have relatively low turbidity, wide ranging temperatures (8-34 °C) and variable dissolved oxygen concentrations (3.5-25.0 mg L). Although the species has been recorded in variable salinities (0.4-58.9 g L), salinity tolerances may be variable between distant subpopulations and adults may be more tolerant than early life stages. Also, records in particularly harsh environments may be representative of marginal refugia, rather than preferred habitat (see Ellis et al. 2013 for references). The reasons for its absence from freshwater habitats remain unclear (Wedderburn 2008; Wedderburn et al. 2008b).The species is found around the margins of lakes, wetlands, backwaters and billabongs. The Murray Hardyhead prefers open water, shallow, slow flowing or still habitats, with sand or silt substrates (Lintermans 2007). It can also be found in deeper habitats with dense aquatic vegetation such as Milfoil ( Myriophyllum  spp.) and Foxtail ( Ceratophyllum  spp.) (SA DEH 2008b). Eel Grass ( Ruppia  spp.) in particular appears to be a key aquatic plant species in saline lakes where the Murray Hardyhead occurs, providing shelter, a food source and a substrate for spawning (Backhouse et al. 2008; La Trobe University 2009).The species is associated with the Natural Drainage System of the Lowland Catchment of the Lachlan River ecological community, which is listed as endangered under the  Fisheries Management Act 1994  (NSW).','NA','The national recovery plan for the Murray Hardyhead (Backhouse et al. 2008) identifies a lack of water as the most significant threat to the species. The plan was written during the \'Millennium Drought\' (1997-2010) and the impact of the drought on freshwater fish in the Murray Darling Basin was exacerbated by human modifications to rivers and their catchments (Ellis et al. 2013). The effects of the drought were most acute between 2007 and 2010 when extreme water shortages and competing demands for dwindling water (irrigation vs environment) necessitated environmental watering of sites where the species occurs (Ellis et al. 2013). Impacts to the species caused by a lack of water include (Backhouse et al. 2008):water levels decreasing (exposing littoral vegetation, aquatic vegetation or aquatic structures) or water bodies drying completelyincreasing salinity and temperaturedecreasing dissolved oxygenfluctuating pH.Other threats to the species include (Backhouse et al. 2008; MDBC 2004):flow regulation that alters flooding and run-off, and reduces connectivity between floodplain habitat and the main river channelhigh nutrient levels causing excessive growths of phytoplankton (algal blooms), caused by urban and agricultural run-off, or large numbers of water birdsacid sulphate soils, which is known to have caused local extinctions in several saline lakes in Victoriaenvironmental contamination, such as fertiliser and pesticides, especially in terminal lakesbarriers to migration/movement, which may affect recolonisation after local extinction (the Lower Lakes subpopulation (South Australia) is effectively isolated from the rest of the Murray River (except in high flows) by Lock 1)predation and habitat destruction caused by introduced fish (common carp ( Cyprinus carpio ), goldfish ( Carrasius auratus ), redfin ( Perca fluviatilis ) and eastern gambusia ( Gambusia holbrooki ))predation caused by stocked native fish (Murray cod ( Macullochella peeli peeli ) and golden perch ( Macquaria ambigua )).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=56791'),('56792','Scaturiginichthys vermeilipinnis','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Pseudomugilidae','The Redfin Blue Eye is Australia\'s smallest freshwater fish, reaching a length of 30 mm (Fairfax et al. 2007). The species is a translucent to silvery fish with a plainly visible swim bladder and silvery-blue eyes. Sexually mature males, in the reproductive mode, have fins edged with a brilliant red (Tappin 2007).','The Redfin Blue Eye has a very restricted habitat (Fairfax et al. 2007). Individual springs range in size from a few square metres to approximately one hectare. The spring substrate is covered by a globular algae, which forms a loose layer up to 40 mm thick (Wager 1995b).When the Redfin Blue Eye was first found, the water in the clay-bottomed springs was clear, 26 °C and vegetated by grass tussocks and a small red-leaved plant (Ivantsoff et al. 1991). The water temperature in November 1990 was recorded at 36 °C with a pH of 8 and, in April 1991, varied between 23-25 °C just before darkness (Unmack & Brumley 1991). Water temperatures are extremely variable and the maximum and minimum water temperatures recorded are 38.5 °C and 3 °C respectively. Temperature in the shallow parts of a spring may vary by up to 27 °C over a 24-hour period (especially during the winter months) (Wager 1995b). This species usually occurs in waters with temperatures over 16 °C (Wager & Unmack 2004).The maximum depth of the water in the pools is 8 cm and the pools are in full sunlight most of the day (Unmack & Brumley 1991). Adults generally occupy water depth between 10 mm and 40 mm, although they can regularly occur in water less than 10 mm deep when summer evaporation restricts the availability of habitat. Juveniles occupy shallower habitats than adults, mostly with a depth ranging between 5-10 mm (Fairfax et al. 2007; Wager 1995b).The Great Artesian Basin springs provide a limited and very specialised habitat for a suite of endemic organisms, including plants (Fensham & Fairfax 2003), molluscs (Ponder & Clark 1990) and other macro-invertebrates (Ponder 2004). Eight described fish species are considered endemic to Great Artesian Basin spring wetlands and these represent a quarter of the native freshwater fish fauna naturally occurring in the Lake Eyre catchment (with an area of 1.3 million km²) of inland Australia (Wager & Unmack 2000).','The natural diet of the Redfin Blue Eye is unknown. Individuals have been observed taking a mouthful of substrate, expelling matter from the mouth and then picking particles from the expelled cloud. Individuals have also been observed picking particles directly from the substrate, from the surface of submerged vegetation and from the water column (Fairfax et al. 2007). It is thought that this species is a facultative omnivore (Wager 1995b), having a predatory or herbivorous diet depending on the condition and availability of its food.','Eastern Gambusia ( Gambusia holbrooki ) The introduced Eastern Gambusia appears to be the main threat to the survival of the Redfin Blue Eye in the wild (Unmack & Brumley 1991; Wager & Jackson 1993; Wager & Unmack 2004).The Eastern Gambusia is thought to have invaded springs during extensive flooding of the Aramac region and may invade other springs during further flooding (Wager & Unmack 2004). The Eastern Gambusia is implicated in the extinction of the Redfin Blue Eye from a number of springs (Fairfax et al. 2007; Wager & Unmack 2004). It was present in four of the five springs where Redfin Blue Eye populations have been lost. Four out of the five remaining populations of the Redfin Blue Eye are free of the Eastern Gambusia (Fairfax et al. 2007).There is evidence of spatial separation within the spring pools where the Redfin Blue Eye and the introduced Eastern Gambusia co-occur, although both species are forced together when seasonal extremes affect spring size and water temperature (Fairfax et al. 2007). It was noted that the length of the tail fin of the Redfin Blue Eye was being reduced through fin nipping by the Eastern Gambusia (Unmack & Brumley 1991). Wager (1994b) also noted that fin nipping by the Eastern Gambusia was common where both species were present, especially where the Eastern Gambusia was larger than the Redfin Blue Eye.The Eastern Gambusia (up to 60 mm) has shown a preference for the deeper parts of a spring (Wager 1994b). The Eastern Gambusia negatively impacts upon native freshwater fish by utilising similar food resources and occupying the same habitat, preying on eggs or fry and aggressive interactions (fin nipping) (Wager 1994b). It appears that shallow water habitat less than 4 cm deep is the key to the Redfin Blue Eye\'s survival in the presence of the Eastern Gambusia (Unmack 1992).Habitat destruction Habitat destruction due to trampling by domestic livestock and feral Pigs ( Sus scrofa ) that utilise the springs, and excavation of the springs to increase water storage for stock are also of concern due to the restricted distribution of the species (Wager & Jackson 1993). Domestic stock and Pigs have both been observed to trample and uproot vegetation, increase turbidity and affect depth and flow within springs. Stock and Pig faeces and rotting carcasses have been present in springs containing Redfin Blue Eye (Fairfax et al. 2007) and can result in ammonia levels toxic to fish (Erickson 1985). In 1997 two of the springs were fenced to examine the impact of excluding hard-hoofed animals (Wager 2001 pers. comm.).Three springs at Edgbaston have been totally excavated although it is not known whether these contained Redfin Blue Eye. Partial excavation has occurred in two springs that contained Redfin Blue Eye. Turbidity appears higher in fully excavated springs (Fairfax et al. 2007).Declining water levels Thousands of bores have been drilled to tap the Great Artesian Basin aquifer since 1878, primarily to provide permanent water for pastoral purposes. All artesian bores within 10 km of Edgbaston have reduced aquifer pressure, standing water levels and spring flows (Fairfax et al. 2007).Over-collecting Over-collecting for the aquarium trade or scientific research is a potential threat to the species (Wager & Jackson 1993), although probably not a major threat at present (Fairfax et al. 2007). Interviews with keepers of captive Redfin Blue Eye and specimen records indicate that approximately 1000 Redfin Blue Eye have been removed, mostly within the first few years of their discovery. However, the mainteNAce of captive breeding populations can be a useful method of preserving the species until the populations in the wild are secure (Tappin 1995; Unmack & Brumley 1991; Wager & Jackson 1993), though the success of such efforts has been limited to date (Wager 1994b; Wager & Unmack 2004). Regulations in Queensland now prevent the over-collecting of this species.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=56792'),('59','Physeter macrocephalus','','Mammalia','Physeteridae','Sperm Whales ( Physeter macrocephalus ) are the largest of the odontocetes (toothed whales) and the most sexually dimorphic cetaceans, with males considerably larger than females (Whitehead 2002a). Adult Sperm Whale females may grow to lengths of 11 m and weigh 15 tonnes, while adult males reach about 16 m and may weigh as much as 45 tonnes (Rice 1989).','The habitat of the Sperm Whale is difficult to categorise due to the cosmopolitan nature of this species and its ability to inhabit all oceans. Sperm Whales tend to inhabit offshore areas with a water depth of 600 m or more, and are uncommon in waters less than 300 m deep (NOAA Fisheries Fact Sheet 2006). Female Sperm Whales are generally found in deep waters (at least 1000 m) of low latitudes (less than 40° N, except in the North Pacific where they are found as high as 50° N). These conditions generally correspond to sea surface temperatures greater than 15 °C, and while female Sperm Whales are sometimes seen near oceanic islands, they are typically far from land (NOAA Fisheries Fact Sheet 2006). Concentrations of Sperm Whales are found where the seabed rises steeply from great depth, and are probably associated with concentrations of major food in areas of upwelling (Bannister et al. 1996). Immature males will stay with females in tropical and subtropical waters until they begin to slowly migrate towards the poles, anywhere between ages 4 and 21 years old. Older, larger males are generally found south of about 45° S down to the edge of the Antarctic pack ice (Thiele et al. 2000). On occasion, however, these males will return to the warm water breeding area (NOAA Fisheries Fact Sheet 2006).Sperm Whales occur around Australia\'s subantarctic islands, such as Macquarie and Heard Island, where they tend to feed on deep water species.','The major food for Sperm Whales comprises oceanic cephalopods, frequently taken at depth (Clarke 1980). While Sperm Whales feed primarily on large and medium sized squids, the list of documented food items is fairly long and diverse. Prey items include other cephalopods such as octopuses, and medium and large-sized demersal fishes, including rays, sharks and many teleosts (Bearzin 1972; Clarke 1977, 1980; Rice 1989).Sperm Whales are deep and prolonged divers and can therefore feed throughout the entire water column, even in very deep areas. However, they seem to forage mainly on or near the bottom, often ingesting stones, sand, sponges, and other non-food items (Rice 1989; Whitehead et al. 1992). As far as is known, Sperm Whales feed regularly throughout the year. Lockyer (1981) estimated that they consumed about 3.0–3.5% of their body weight per day.Several theories on how Sperm Whales hunt have been proposed, including: the use of echolocation to scan for prey; the detection (in the dark) of squid by their luminous organs; random searching for prey by Sperm Whales swimming with their mouths open (suggested following the discovery of a Sperm Whale with its lower jaw entangled in a deep sea cable); and, the use of the whales\' white lips to attract prey into the open mouth (CRRU 2006). Sperm Whales are known to co-ordinate their foraging dives, and they sometimes forage in a rank, often over 500 m long, with whales spread out underwater (Whitehead 2002a).Sperm Whale depredation of fishing longlines has been recorded throughout their range (Rice 1989), particularly in the subantarctic, around islands such as South Georgia (Ashford et al. 1996). Direct action taken by fishermen to protect their catch and gear from depredation by Sperm Whales could result in serious injury or mortality of the whales. This habit of attacking fishing lines therefore exposes Sperm Whales to a threatening process.','Overfishing of Sperm Whales in the early to mid-19th century, largely from pelagic United States, United Kingdom, and French vessels, caused some population declines (Best 1983), probably affecting Australian numbers. During the 20th century, Sperm whaling occurred from Albany, Western Australia in several phases, most recently from 1955 to 1978 (Kirkwood et al. 1980). Additionally, pelagic whaling in the south-east Indian, Southern and south-west Pacific Oceans (including Tasman Sea), caused significant Sperm Whale stock decline, especially off south-west Western Australia (Bannister et al. 1996). It is hypothesised that the reduction of breeding males through whaling possibly caused a decreased female reproductive rate.Current threats to Sperm Whales primarily include collision with large vessels on shipping lanes beyond the edge of the continental shelf, seismic operations in similar areas causing evasive responses, entrapment in fishing gear (including \'ghost nets\'), and illegal whaling or a resumption of legal commerical whaling. Pollution, including increasing amounts of plastic debris at sea, oil spills and dumping of industrial wastes into waterways and the sea, leading to bio-accumulation of toxic substances in body tissues is an unquantified threat to Sperm Whales (Reeves et al. 2003).Sperm Whales are among the cetaceans most likely to be sensitive to disturbance by loud or unfamiliar noise. Their deep-ocean distribution and far-ranging movements put them in potential conflict with a wide array of human activities, including mineral exploration and exploitation (e.g., seismic testing), military manoeuvres, and research using acoustic methods (National Marine Fisheries Service 2006).The calving interval for Sperm Whales is four to six years for prime-aged females and apparently much longer for females older than 40 years (Rice 1989). This low reproductive rate, plus the stable long-term associations between related and unrelated females forming the core groups of Sperm Whale social structure imply that population recovery is likely to be a slow process (Christal 1998).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59'),('59151','Crinia sloanei','Endangered','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59151'),('59170','Niveoscincus palfreymani','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Scincidae','A reptile, previously known as  Pseudomoia palfreymani , similar to  Pseudemoia spenceri  in colour, being dark brown to black above, the head variegated and spotted with pale brown or bronze, but with pale vertebral and dorso-lateral stripes absent (Cogger 2000).','Pedra Banca I. is formed of layers of sandstone reaching a maximum height of 55 m asl (Rawlinson 1974; Cogger  et al . 1993). The rock has practically no soil and only one terrestrial plant,  Salicornia blackiana , confined to the shelter of vertical or horizontal rock crevices (Rawlinson 1974; Rounsevell  et al . 1985; Cogger  et al . 1993).Skinks are restricted to areas where shelter can be found in the form of burrows under boulders, deep crevices, or tunnels in weathered sandstone. Only six sites, covering a total area of 1360 m², provide shelter. All are occupied by skinks (Rounsevell  et al . 1985).Burrows are critical habitat features, with the number of burrows proportional to the number of skinks occupying a site. Two individuals occupy some burrows. Skinks captured and released some distance from their burrows are subject to aggression from burrow owners as they move through the colony, suggesting burrows are vigorously defended and critical to survival (Rounsevell  et al . 1985).Younger individuals occupy poorer quality sites and were observed to roam the colonies more often than older individuals with higher quality burrows (Rounsevell  et al . 1985).','The preferred food is flesh of dead Jack Mackerel ( Trachurus declivis ) which litters the seabird colonies. Jack Mackerel is the main food of the Australasian Gannet ( Sula serrator ), which nest on the island from Oct. to May. Lizards occupying the site furthest from the seabird colony probably feed on the abundant terrestrial isopod  Ligia australiensis  (Rounsevell  et al . 1985).','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59170'),('59199','Eulamprus leuraensis','Endangered','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Blue Mountains Water Skink is a medium-sized lizard that reaches a maximum weight of around 10 g. It grows to approximately 20 cm long (average about 16 cm) with a snout-vent length of about 8 cm (LeBreton 1996). The body of the Blue Mountains Water Skink is much darker than the other species of  Eulamprus  found in the Blue Mountains. Across its back it is very dark brown to black with narrow yellow/bronze to white stripes along its length to the beginning of the tail and continuing along the tail as a series of spots. This gives the appearance of a distinctive dark dorsal stripe bordered by yellow lines. The limbs and sides are also dark brown to black with yellow to bronze streaks and small blotches. The head is brown to bronze with black flecks and its underside is cream to golden yellow with small dark blotches. The limbs are well developed and all have five digits (Cogger 2000; NSW NPWS 2001e).','The Blue Mountains Water Skink lives in high elevation habitats. The lowest altitude recorded for a population is 560 m at Williams Ridge, south of Hazelbrook (NSW NPWS 2002z). The species is restricted to isolated and naturally fragmented habitats of permanent sedge and shrub \'hanging\' swamps (these develop at moderate to high altitudes on sloping rock faces composed of Narrabeen sandstone which are subject to a constant supply of water), in open forest and open scrub or heath (Keith & Benson 1988; Kingston et al. 1979; Shea & Peterson 1985; Wells & Wellington 1984). In the Blue Mountains the skink has been found in dense clumps of swamp sedges or herbs (characterised by  Gymnoschoenus sphaerocephalus, Lepidosperma limicola  and  Xyris ustulata ) growing on peaty soils derived from sandstone (LeBreton in Cogger et al. 1993). On Newnes Plateau it has been found in shrub swamps bordering streams flowing over sandstone and surrounded by tall open forest (Cogger et al. 1993). Larger, wetter swamps, in closer proximity to other inhabited swamps, are more likely to be occupied by Blue Mountains Water Skink, than smaller (less than 0.7 ha) drier and more isolated swamps. Increased numbers of Blue Mountains Water Skinks are found when coverage two plant species,  Tetrarrhena turfosa  and  Baeckea linifolia  is higher. However, this does not necessarily indicate a direct relationship between the Blue Mountains Water Skink and the two plant species. It is possible that these plants rely on similar environmental conditions to the Blue Mountains Water Skink, or occur in areas of high food resources for the Blue Mountains Water Skink (LeBreton 1996). Within occupied sites, those with deeper leaf litter have a greater biomass (density) of Blue Mountains Water Skinks and those with more moist soil have a higher trapping frequency of Blue Mountains Water Skinks (LeBreton 1996).When disturbed, Blue Mountains Water Skinks appear to use dense grass or holes for shelter (Shea & Peterson 1985). The Blue Mountains sedge and shrub swamp habitats, that the Blue Mountains Water Skink occupies, are highly biodiverse with approximately 200 plant species occurring in them (Smith & Smith 1996).Other threatened (under the NSW TSC Act 1995) fauna species occurring in the same habitat as the Blue Mountains Water Skink include the Giant Dragonfly ( Petalura gigantea ), Red-crowned Toadlet ( Pseudophryne australis )  and the EPBC Act listed Giant Burrowing Frog ( Heleioporus australiacus ). The swamps also provide habitat for three regionally significant fauna species: the Southern Emu-wren ( Stipiturus malachurus ), Lewin\'s Rail ( Dryolimnas pectoralis ) and Buff-banded Rail ( Gallirallus philippensis ) (Washington 1999).Two threatened plant species that are known to occur in the Blue Mountains Water Skink\'s habitat are: the NSW TSC Act 1995 listed  Carex klaphakei , which is only known from three locations in hanging swamp at Blackheath (Washington 1999); and the EPBC Act listed  Pultenaea glabra  (NSW SC 2005a).','The diet of the Blue Mountains Water Skink appears to be mostly insectivorous, and includes grasshoppers, flies, moths, weevils and wasps. Analysis has shown that the eaten insects are not ground dwelling, suggesting foraging occurs in the grasses above the ground (NSW NPWS 2001e). A small fruit with a seed was found in a scat at Leura (Le Breton 1996).','The small number, and apparent isolation of populations in conjunction with the limited geographic distribution of the Blue Mountains Water Skink, make it vulnerable to the operation of threatening processes (NSW NPWS 2001e).The Blue Mountains Water Skink, and its habitat, are threatened by:Urban development, with an unknown number of past sites already lost and several current sites threatened by development and associated impacts (NSW NPWS 2001e).Weed invasion and the resulting changes to vegetation structure to sites near developed areas, disturbance from recreational users of swamps (e.g. walkers, mountain bike riders, four wheel drive enthusiasts), pollution and sedimentation (including stormwater run-off) ) (NSW NPWS 2001e).Predation from cats (LeBreton in Cogger et al. 1993).Several sites have been impacted by the mainteNAce of service corridors for powerlines and pipelines running through the swamps (NSW NPWS 2001e).The naturally fragmented nature of the habitat places many populations at risk, due to their isolation and small size. The size of swamps makes populations more vulnerable to \'edge effects\', increasing the risk of local extinctions via stochastic (random) processes (NSW NPWS 2001e).    Sites at Blackheath, Leura Falls Park and Wentworth Falls Lake currently face severe threats in the form of predation, disturbance, pollution and sedimentation resulting from nearby developed areas (NSW NPWS 2001e). Three sites in the Newnes Plateau State Forest occur adjacent to pine plantations and may be threatened by increasing acidity of run-off water and encroachment of feral pine seedlings (NSW NPWS 2001e). Fire management is also important to habitat conservation. Although no specific study into the fire ecology of the species has been done, low intensity, patchy burns appear to maintain vegetation without endangering populations (NSW NPWS 2001e).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59199'),('592','Rhipidura rufifrons','','Aves','Dicruridae','Rufous Fantail adults are medium sized birds, generally ranging from 14.5–18.5 cm in length (with an average of 15 cm); their wingspan is between 18–22.5 cm (with an average of 21 cm). They weigh approximately 10 g. The male and female of the species look identical, however, females are generally smaller than the males (Higgins et al. 2006). The forehead is a rich reddish-brown colour across the eyes. The eyes have a white arc underneath. The top of the head, back of the neck and the upper back, transition from an olive to reddish-brown colour, which then blends into a blackish-brown, long, fan-shaped tail. This blackish-brown tail, contrasts with the base of the tail, which is tipped with a paler colour, often white (Higgins et al. 2006).','In east and south-east Australia, the Rufous Fantail mainly inhabits wet sclerophyll forests, often in gullies dominated by eucalypts such as Tallow-wood ( Eucalyptus microcorys ), Mountain Grey Gum ( E .  cypellocarpa ), Narrow-leaved Peppermint ( E .  radiata ), Mountain Ash ( E. regNAs ), Alpine Ash ( E .  delegatensis ), Blackbutt ( E .  pilularis ) or Red Mahogany ( E .  resinifera ); usually with a dense shrubby understorey often including ferns. They also occur in subtropical and temperate rainforests; for example near Bega in south-east NSW, where they are recorded in temperate Lilly Pilly ( Acmena smithi ) rainforest, with Grey Myrtle ( Backhousia myrtifolia ), Sassafras ( Doryphora sassafras ) and Sweet Pittosporum ( Pittosporum undulatum ) subdomiNAts. They occasionally occur in secondary regrowth, following logging or disturbance in forests or rainforests. When on passage, they are sometimes recorded in drier sclerophyll forests and woodlands, including Spotted Gum ( Eucalyptus maculata ), Yellow Box ( E. melliodora ), ironbarks or stringybarks, often with a shrubby or heath understorey. They are also recorded from parks and gardens when on passage. In north and north-east Australia, they often occur in tropical rainforest and monsoon rainforests, including semi-evergreen mesophyll vine forests, semi-deciduous vine thickets or thickets of Paperbarks ( Melaleuca  spp.) (Higgins et al. 2006).','The Rufous Fantail forages mainly in the low to middle strata of forests, sometimes in or below the canopy or on the ground; in northern Australia they also forage in mangroves (Higgins et al. 2006). One example of a detailed study was in Five Day Creek Valley, NSW: of 719 feeding observations, about 1% were on the ground, about 42% were 0.1–3 m above ground, about 41% were 3.1–9 m, about 14% were 9.1–18 m, and about 2% were >15 m above the ground (Cameron 1985). In Paluma Range in Queensland, they tend to forage more at lower levels during the wet season than in the dry season (Frith 1984). They mostly forage aerially by sallying, but also glean food items from foliage and occasionally from the ground and fallen debris (Higgins et al. 2006). They are insectivorous; in Five Day Creek Valley, NSW, of 272 items from 14 stomachs, 4% of items were spiders, with the remaining 96% being insects from various orders, including Coleoptera, Diptera, Hemiptera, Hymenoptera and Lepidoptera (Cameron 1985).','The main threat to populations of Rufous Fantail is probably fragmentation and loss of core moist forest breeding habitat through land clearing and urbanisation; especially forest remNAts and corridors along the species\' migration routes (Huggett 2000). In Mountain Ash forests in central Victoria, they have been recorded in logged areas after about 4 years after logging (Loyn 1985a). In Lower Bucca State Forest in north-east NSW, birds forage more in retained forest compared with clear-felled areas. After logging, birds tend to forage more in the lower canopy and less in woody piles and dense shrub regrowth (Huggett 2000).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=592'),('59250','Christinus guentheri','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Gekkonidae','The Lord Howe Island Gecko is a pale olive-grey to dark brown, heavily built reptile growing to 8 cm, weighing around 12 g. It is peppered with dark brown spots and a series of six paler, W-shaped tranverse markings, continuous with the paler flanks. The tail has a dull, russet-red mid-dorsal stripe, is whitish/yellow-brown below and peppered with dark brown spots. The species has smooth, small scales, and long, slender fingers and toes (Cogger 2000, NSW OEH 2012ab).','The Lord Howe Island Gecko occurs in closed forest, low open woodland, tussock grassland and rocky islets. The species prefers rocky areas that offer protection, with crevices, rock slabs or boulders embedded in the soil (NSW OEH 2012ab).On Blackburn Island, the species is common among gentle slopes of loose basalt boulders on the leeward side, especially around the bases of low, windswept trees. Fewer individuals live on the windward side, where there are few boulder piles.On the Lord Howe Island mainland, the species is restricted to a single, rare habitat type behind Lagoon Beach and at the base of Malabar. The habitat consists of honeycombed beachrock partially embedded in the soil, surrounded by  Howea  palm forest, in which there is a thick layer of humus formed by leaf litter. The surfaces of the rocks are pitted with holes averaging 1-2 cm in diameter, tunnelling deep into the matrix of the rock. Some tunnels join to form larger chambers. The tunnels appear to provide the only safe shelter site from vertebrate predators. The surrounding humus provides many invertebrate prey items (Cogger 1971).On Phillip Island, the species occurs over all parts of the island, wherever cover offers protection from the sun. Maximum densities occur on grassy coastal cliffs and among trees and vegetation on boulder slopes in the central valley. In these habitats, the species shelters under rocks, fallen timber and other debris. There may be a difference in habitat preferences of males and females on this island: males predominate in relatively clear slopes beneath White Oak ( Lagunaria patersonia ) and females predominate in the boulder slopes beneath thickets of the introduced African Olive ( Olea africana ). In one study, the majority of eggs were found in African Olive thickets (Cogger et al. 1983).On Nepean Island, the species is abundant throughout the island, sheltering beneath surface rocks, litter and rocky crevices during the day. At night, individuals forage on open sand, rocky cliffs, grassy areas and in the littoral and adjacent splash zones. The largest numbers occur near White Oak thickets (Cogger et al. 1983).On Bird Rock and Moo-oo Rock, the species shelters beneath rocks partly embedded in the soil, in rock crevices and in particularly high densities near White Oak thickets (Cogger et al. 1983).The following threatened species may co-oocur with the Lord Howe Island Gecko (NSW OEH 2012ab)SpeciesCommon NameEPBC Act statusCyanoramphus cookieNorfolk Island Green ParrotEndangeredOligosoma lichenigeraLord Howe Island SkinkVulnerableAdvena campbelliiCampbell’s Helicarionid Land SnailCritically EndangeredMathewsoconcha grayiGray’s Helicarionid Land SnailCritically EndangeredMathewsoconcha phillipiiPhillip Island Helicarionid Land SnailCritically EndangeredQuintalia stoddartiiStoddart’s Helicarionid Land SnailCritically Endangered','Two important seasonal sources of food on Phillip Island are nectar, including that of the White Oak ( Lagunaria patersonia ) and the Swan Plant ( Gomphocarpus physocarpus ), and the fruit of the succulent herb, Pigface ( Carpobrotus  sp.) (Cogger et al. 1979, 1983; Stevenson cited in Cogger et al. 1993). Gut contents of specimens collected from Phillip Island included bracts or leaves from flowering plants, anthers and seeds (Cogger et al. 1983). Invertebrates also form a major part of the diet, with the following items occurring in over 20% of the stomachs examined from Phillip Island: spiders, mites, beetles, moths, caterpillars, flies, ants and wasps (Cogger et al. 1983).','Threats to the Lord Howe Island Gecko on Lord Howe Island include:habitat disturbance through weed invasion, trampling and clearing (NSW OEH 2012ab)predation by rat ( Rattus  spp.), cats ( Felis catus ) and pigs ( Sus scrofa ) on the main island (Cogger et al. 1993)accidental introduction of non-native invertebrates (e.g. Red Imported Fire Ant ( Solenopsis invicta ) or Yellow Crazy Ant ( Anoplolepis gracilipes )) or rats on to offshore islands (NSW OEH 2012ab)competition for food resources with the introduced Grass Skink ( Lampropholis delicata ), which was first detected in the early 1990s and spread from the settlement to the northern hills and Intermediate Hill (Cogger 2004).Threats to the Lord Howe Island Gecko on islands offshore of Norfolk Island include:accidental introduction of the Asian House Gecko or rats to Phillip and Nepean Islands (Cogger et al. 1979)historic predation by the Pacific Rat ( Rattus exulans ) which may have been the major cause of decline on Norfolk Island (Cogger et al. 1993)historic habitat destruction by rabbits, pigs and goats ( Capra hircus ) on Phillip Island; pigs and goats died out naturally, and rabbits were eliminated from the island in 1986 (Cogger et al. 1993).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59250'),('59254','Furina dunmalli','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Elapidae','Dunmall\'s Snake is a venomous snake that belongs to the Elapidae family. Dunmall\'s Snake is found only in Australia (Cogger 2000; Ehmann 1992b).','Dunmall\'s Snake has been found in a broad range of habitats, including:Forests and woodlands on black alluvial cracking clay and clay loams dominated by Brigalow ( Acacia harpophylla ),  other Wattles ( A. burowii ,  A. deanii ,  A. leioclyx ), native Cypress ( Callitris  spp.) or Bull-oak ( Allocasuarina luehmannii ) (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Covacevich et al. 1988; Stephenson & Schmida 2008).Various Blue Spotted Gum ( Corymbia citriodora ), Ironbark ( Eucalyptus crebra  and  E. melanophloia ), White Cypress Pine ( Callitris glaucophylla ) and Bulloak open forest and woodland associations on sandstone derived soils (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Stephenson & Schmida 2008, Threatened Species Network 2008).In other environments, one specimen was found on the edge of dry vine scrub near Tarong Power Station, Queensland, whilst another was found in hard ironstone country (Queensland Regional Ecosystem Land Zone 7) at Lake Broadwater near Dalby, Queensland.Little is known about the ecological requirements of Dunmall\'s Snake, however, the species has been found sheltering under fallen timber and ground litter (Brigalow Belt Reptiles Workshop 2010; Cogger et al. 1993) and may use cracks in alluvial clay soils (QLD DERM 2010; Richardson 2006).Records indicate the species prefers habitats between 200 to 500 m above sea level.For more information on Queensland Regional Ecosystems, please visit the Queensland Department of Environment and Resource Management website at  http://www.derm.qld.gov.au/wildlife-ecosystems/biodiversity/regional_ecosystems/ .','The diet of Dunmall\'s Snake consists of small skinks and geckos. Specific studies have found the gut contents of one specimen containing the remains of the Tree Skink,  Egernia striolata  (Shine 1981).','The major threats to Dunmall\'s Snake are similar in Queensland and New South Wales. These threats are identified as (NSW DECC 2005; Cogger et al. 1993;  McDonald et al. 1991):extensive clearing of habitat for development (mining and urban), agriculture or pasture improvementextensive  overgrazing of habitat by domestic stockloss of fallen timber and ground litter, e.g. fuel reduction burns, firewood collectioninvasion of habitat by predatory animals and introduced weedspossible drainage of swamps.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59254'),('59257','Natator depressus','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Cheloniidae','The Flatback Turtle has a low domed, fleshy carapace (shell) with reflexed margins and is grey, pale grey-green or olive in colour (Bustard 1972; Cogger 1996, 2000; Limpus 1971).','Post-hatchling and juvenile Flatback Turtles do not have the wide dispersal phase in the oceanic environment like other sea turtles (Walker & Parmenter 1990).Adults inhabit soft bottom habitat over the continental shelf of northern Australia, extending into Papua New Guinea and Irian Jaya (Spring 1982; Zangerl et al. 1988) although the extent of their range is not fully known (Zangerl et al. 1988). Capture locations from trawlers indicate that Flatback Turtles feed in turbid, shallow inshore waters north of latitude 25° S in depths from less than 10 m to depths of over 40 m (Robins 1995). Nesting habitat includes sandy beaches in the tropics and subtropics with sand temperatures between 25 °C and 33 °C at nest depth (Limpus 1995a).Hatchling to subadult Flatback Turtles lack a pelagic life stage and reside in the Australian continental shelf (Walker 1994; Walker &  Parmenter 1990). Flatback Turtles require sandy beaches to nest. Sand temperatures between 25 °C and 33 °C are needed for successful incubation. Beaches free from light pollution are required to prevent disorientation, disturbance, and to allow nesting females to come ashore.The species does not use refuge habitat.The species is not dependent on a threatened ecological community. Flatback Turtles  share nesting and foraging habitats with other marine turtle species.','Little is known about the diet of the Flatback Turtles, however juveniles are known to eat gastropod molluscs, squid and siphonophores (soft corals, hydroids, jellyfish) (Zangerl et al. 1988). Limited data indicate cuttlefish (Chatto et al. 1995) and crinoids (sea lilies) also form part of the diet (Zangerl et al. 1988).Studies of feeding behaviour have not been conducted.','Flatback Turtles face a number of threats associated with the following broad categories of human activity: commercial and recreational fishing; coastal infrastructure and development (including industrial, residential and tourism development); Indigenous harvest; feral animal predation; and climate change. Some specific threats, such as light pollution, may be associated with more than one of these broad categories.Fishing - commercial and recreational TrawlingHundreds of Flatback Turtles used to be killed annually in trawling activities in northern Australia (EA 2003ai) prior to the introduction of Turtle Excluder Devices (TEDs). Between 1991 and 1996, it is estimated that the Queensland East Coast Trawl Fisheries and the Torres Strait Prawn Fishery caught, on average, around 1368 Flatback Turtles each year, of which around 23–43 died (Robins 1995, Robins & Mayer 1998 cited in Limpus 2007). Poiner and Harris (1994, 1996 cited in Limpus 2007) estimated that around 335 Flatback Turtles were killed in both 1989 and 1990 in the Northern Prawn Fishery (NPF). The introduction of TEDs within all trawl fisheries (TEDs were made mandatory in the Queensland East Coast Otter Trawl fishery in 1999 and in the NPF in 2000) has seen the number of turtles captured and killed reduced significantly. A comparison of the Northern Prawn Fishery Data Summary reports (Garvey & Lilley 2002; Perdraeu & Garvey 2005) show that the number of turtles caught in trawl nets in this Fishery dropped from 780 in 1999 (with 248 deaths of Flatback Turtles) to 24 turtles caught in 2004 (with no Flatback Turtle mortalities). Gill netsMarine turtles may also become entangled in nets set for inshore fish species, such as barramundi and shark (DEWHA in prep.). In 1991, 24 Flatback Turtles were drowned in one shark net over a a two-week period (Guinea & Chatto 1992) while Limpus (2007) reported that Flatback Turtles are regularly drowned in gill nets set along the coast of the south-eastern Gulf of Carpentaria. Longline and Pot FishingTurtles may be hooked on, or entangled in, fishing line. Williams and colleagues (1996) report that turtles can be hooked on the front and hind flippers, head, mouth, neck and carapace or get entangled in either the monofilament, mainline or balldrop/buoy line. In pot fisheries, turtles may become entangled in the float lines or enter pot traps and drown (DEWHA in prep.). While the threat of these fisheries on Flatback Turtles has not been well quantified, around 400 turtles each year are accidentally caught by the two major longline fisheries, Eastern Tuna and Billfish Fishery and the Southern and Western Tuna and Billfishery (DEWHA in prep.). In pot fisheries, turtles may become entangled in the float lines or enter pot traps and drown (DEWHA in prep.), however, there are no reports, to date, of Flatback Turtles being captured in floatlines to crabpots or similar buoy lines (Limpus 2007). Ghost NetsGhost nets (lost and discarded fishing nets) pose a serious threat to marine turtles as they float in the ocean and coastal waters and indiscriminately capture marine animals (DEWHA in prep.). Ghost nets in the Gulf of Carpentaria are brought in by the wind and currents which then trap and circulate the nets in the Gulf indefinitely (DEWHA in prep.). The origin of the nets (from which sea or ocean) has yet to be resolved, with modelling suggesting a South Pacific origin and a route through the Torres Strait rather than drift from the Indian Ocean or the Arafua Sea (Griffin 2008). White (2006) found 406 discarded nets, weighing nearly 900 kg, over 28.6 km of coastline surveyed along six sites along the coastline of Arnhem Land and the Gulf of Carpentaria. Roeger and colleagues (2005, cited in DEWHA in prep.) found, in their survey, significant amounts of nets and marine debris in the Gulf of Carpentaria. On the basis of aerial surveys of the eastern Gulf, Limpus (pers. comm. cited in Kiesling 2003) estimates that a total of around 10 000 nets (or around 250 kg of fishing net per km) may be on Queensland coastline of the Gulf. Limpus (unpublished data in Limpus 2007) estimated that in the six weeks following a cyclone in February 2001, over 4000 nets washed ashore in the eastern Gulf of Carpentaria coastline, trapping in excess of 400 turtles. While the turtle mortality associated with ghost nets in the Gulf of Carpentaria is unquantified, it is likely to amount to many hundreds of turtles per year (Limpus 2007). Recreational fishing can also result in discarded nets and ropes which, when left on nesting beaches, have been known to trap nesting adult females (Limpus 2007). Coastal Infrastructure and Development Coastal developments, including residential, industrial and tourism development, can directly destroy or degrade beach habitats used as nesting sites for Flatback Turtles as well as degrade foraging habitat. Coastal development can also have indirect, but often cumulative, effects on nesting and foraging habitat. Light PollutionLight pollution on nesting beaches alters nocturnal behaviors in sea turtles, including; how sea turtles choose nesting sites; how they return to the sea after nesting; and how hatchlings find the sea after emerging from their nests (Witherington & Martin 1996). Light pollution can affect the beach finding ability or nesting behaviour of adult turtles (Salmon et al. 2000 cited in Limpus 2007). The most clearly demonstrated effect of artificial lighting on nesting is to deter turtles from emerging from the water (Witherington & Martin 1996). As such, Witherington and Martin (1996) regard artificial lighting of sea turtle nesting beaches as a form of habitat loss. If sea turtles can\'t choose the most favourable nesting sites, the use of sub-optimal nesting beaches may compromise hatchling fitness, sex ratio and survirvorship (Limpus 2007; Witherington & Martin 1996). In addition to the threat that this \"loss of habitat\"\" poses',' artificial lighting can also disorient nesting turtles on their way back to the water'),('59278','Petrogale coenensis','Endangered','Mammalia','Macropodidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59278'),('59281','Petrogale sharmani','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Macropodidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59281'),('59293','Turnix olivii','Endangered','Aves','Turnicidae','The Buff-breasted Button-quail is a large, plump and pale-eyed button-quail. Fully-grown males measure about 18 cm in length, and are slightly smaller than fully-grown females, which measure 19 to 22 cm in length (Marchant & Higgins 1993). The adults have rufous-brown upperparts; a white chin and throat; a pale olive-buff breast; an off-white belly; off-white tail coverts and flanks; a brown bill, with bluish-white cutting edge and lower mandible; yellow irides; and yellow legs and feet (Macdonald 1971; Marchant & Higgins 1993). They have white streaks and black bars on the back and shoulders, and white spots on the wings. The wings, when extended in flight, are grey-black above (on the outer and trailing edges), and light grey below (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','NA','The diet of the Buff-breasted Button-quail is practically unknown. The stomachs of four birds that were collected near Coen contained seeds, insect remains, and grains of coarse sand (Marchant & Higgins 1993).The foraging behaviour of the Buff-breasted Button-quail has not been recorded. However, it is likely to forage on the ground by scratching in leaf litter with its feet, and gleaning (pecking at) any food items exposed, as has been recorded in other members of the family  Turnicidae  (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','The lack of information on the Buff-breasted Button-quail makes it impossible to determine if any threatening process is impacting on the species. It has been speculated that the Buff-breasted Button-quail may have been eliminated from much of its former range because of changes in the suitability of habitat caused by grazing and the introduction of fire regimes that encourage extensive fires but promote the invasion of habitats by woody weeds (Crowley & Garnett 1998; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Harrington & Sanderson 1994). However, birds have been recorded in both grazed and ungrazed habitats, and known breeding sites in the Mount Molloy area, which are largely unaffected by grazing and fire, support only a very low number of birds, which suggests that other processes might be involved in the suspected decline of the species (Nielsen 2007, pers. comm.). It has been claimed that some known sites at the southern end of the distribution are at risk of being cleared for agriculture (Garnett & Crowley 2000).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59293'),('59297','Papasula abbotti','Endangered','Aves','Sulidae','Abbott\'s Booby measures about 80 cm from beak to tail; has off-white plumage; black panda-like eye patches; black wings, flank marks and tails; and black outer ends to its blue webbed feet. Males have pale grey bills, tipped black, while females have black-tipped pink bills (Pizzey & Knight 1999).','Abbott\'s Booby is a marine species. It spends much of its time at sea, but needs to come ashore to breed. It nests in tall rainforest trees in the western, central and northern portions of Christmas Island. Most nest trees are associated with uneven terrain created by gullies, hill-sides or cliffs. The location of Abbott\'s Booby nest sites is determined by the topography and nature of the canopy, resulting in a patchy distribution. Most nest trees are located in uneven canopy containing emergent trees, and sites are densest along crests of gullies and west facing slopes (Nelson & Powell 1986). The tree species most often used are  Syzygium nervosum  and  Planchonella nitida . Abbott\'s Booby will also use  Tristiropsis acutangula  trees when they become emergent (Nelson & Powell 1986; Yorkston & Green 1997).  The nest of Abbott\'s Booby is placed on branches 10 to 40 m above the ground in tall rainforest trees (Marchant & Higgins 1990; Reville et al. 1990a). It prefers nest sites with a clear area below and immediately downwind to facilitate take-off and landing. South-east trade winds prevail between April and November, thus emergent trees which can be approached from the north-west are most often used as nest sites (Nelson & Powell 1986).','Abbott\'s Booby feeds on fish and squid (Marchant & Higgins 1990; Reville et al. 1990a). Christmas Island is close to a number of cold water upwellings that probably provide food that is seasonal in nature, and upon which a number of the seabirds may depend for raising their young. This may be one reason why Abbott\'s Boobies are found only on Christmas Island.Abbott\'s Booby goes on very long fishing trips in a north-west direction (Nelson 1971, 1972) which is the direction of one of the major upwellings. It is thought that they may travel up to 400 km to feeding grounds when they are breeding (Becking 1976), but the location of fishing areas has not been confirmed.','Clearing of forest and wind turbulenceOn Christmas Island, clearing of primary rainforest for phosphate mining has resulted in loss of a large percentage of the boobies\' nesting habitat. In the mid 1980s, the Abbott\'s Booby Monitoring Program estimated that 33% of known Abbott\'s Booby habitat had been cleared (Reville et al. 1987). Tall emergent rainforest trees which are reasonably sheltered from the prevailing south east winds are required for nesting. Loss of nesting trees as a result of clearing for mining has resulted in a decline in the population.Furthermore, forested areas up to 300 m downwind of cleared areas suffer much greater wind turbulence in the canopy than other forested areas, and this has resulted in decreased breeding success and increased adult and fledgling mortality within these areas (Reville et al .  1990a, 1990b). In addition, experienced breeders moved nest sites more often when downwind of clearings and since forest clearing, there has been a slow movement of nest sites away from cleared areas to areas that were previously little used. These newer areas are more remote from clearings, but breeding success in these newer areas was lower than that upwind of clearings (Reville et al. 1990b). Pairs move nest sites only if they have been repeatedly unsuccessful, or the nest site has been destroyed. When displaced they probably move only a short distance, since the pair use the nest site as a focus for re-mating (Nelson & Powell 1986). Therefore, it takes a pair many years to move away from an area of disturbance. The edge of the forest downwind of clearings also shows signs of dieback due to increased wind exposure. In 1986 to 1987, 42.6% of the known population of breeding pairs were nesting within 305 m of clearings (Reville et al. 1990b). The surveys of 1991 found that 36% of the population was in areas affected by clearings (Yorkston & Green 1997).Sea Surface Temperature ConditionsAbbott\'s Booby probably relies on a seasonal increase in fish numbers associated with cold water upwellings to raise their young. Sea-surface temperature data obtained from satellites was strongly correlated with average annual breeding success of the Abbott\'s Booby, because seasons with long periods of low surface temperature had higher breeding success (Reville et al. 1990a). If sea-surface temperatures increase in the future as a result of global warming, this could result in lower breeding success for the Abbott\'s Booby regardless of nest location (DEH 2004).Storms and CyclonesA severe storm in March 1988 damaged significant areas of the island\'s rainforest. It felled approximately one third of the nest sites monitored by the Abbott\'s Booby Monitoring Program and also killed one third of the monitored fledglings (Reville et al .  1990a). It is uncertain what effect the storm had on adult mortality; in 1988 and 1989, numbers of adults attempting to nest were significantly lower than previous years (Reville et al. 1990a; Yorkston 1992), but there was no evidence of a decline in the adult population from a survey in 1991 (Yorkston 1992; Yorkston & Green 1997). It is evident however, that severe storms can have a marked effect on the reproductive rate of the Abbott\'s Booby in ensuing years.Deterioration of feeding areasCurrently there is very little information on the areas in which Abbott\'s Booby feeds. It is unknown whether feeding areas are safe or whether over-fishing is a potential problem. Abbott\'s Boobies have been sighted off the coast of Java (Becking 1976) and if they regularly feed close to the Java coast then there could be the potential for competition with Indonesian fishermen (DEH 2004).Yellow crazy antThe latest threat to the species is from the introduced Yellow Crazy Ant  Anoplolepis gracilipes , which, after a slow start, is spreading rapidly. The ants now occupy 15 to 18% of the island, but are mainly restricted to Shore Terrace forests. These ants are not only likely to prey directly on nestlings, but may alter the whole ecology of the island. The ants occupy the entire forest from below ground level to the canopy (Garnett & Crowley 2000).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59297'),('59300','Xenus cinereus','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Terek Sandpiper is pale brownish-grey with finer dark streaking on the upper body, head and sides of breast. Body length is approximately 22–24 cm, with a wing span of 36–45 cm and an average weight of 95 g (Marchant & Higgins 1993). The feet are orange to orange-yellow, the eye is brown and the bill black with a dirty range base and evenly-upcurved (Geering et al. 2007; Hayman et al. 1986). The underparts are white with a greyish wash forming an incomplete breast-band. On each scapular, a blackish band of feathers forms an irregular line down the centre (Hayman et al. 1986).','Habitat for feedingThe Terek Sandpiper mostly forages in the open, on soft wet intertidal mudflats or in sheltered estuaries, embayments, harbours or lagoons. The species has also been recorded on islets, mudbanks, sandbanks and spits, and near mangroves and occasionally in samphire ( Halosarcia  spp.). Birds are seldom near the edge of water, however, birds may wade into the water (Marchant & Higgins 1993).Occasionally, on sandy beaches, among seaweed and other debris and in rocky areas, Terek Sandpipers will use the supralittoral or upper littoral zone, where a film of water covers the sand. However, on exposed rock platforms, the species forages in the lower littoral zone and not the supralittoral or upper littoral zones (Marchant & Higgins 1993).Less often seen on sandy or shingle beaches, or on rock or coral reefs or platforms, Terek Sandpipers are occasionally sighted around drying sewage ponds and saltpans if surrounded by mudflats. The species is also found around brackish coastal swamps, lagoons and dune-lakes; and also on gravel or rocky edges of estuarine pools and freshwater river-pools (Marchant & Higgins 1993). Very occasionally, birds use swampy, grassy or cultivated paddocks near the coast (Marchant & Higgins 1993).Habitat for roostingPreferring to roost in or among mangroves, birds may perch in branches or roots up to 2 m from the ground, or beneath them in the shade on hot days. Occasionally, they roost in dead trees or among tangled driftwood. In Westernport Bay, Victoria, the Terek Sandpiper prefers to roost on isolated banks of mangroves, surrounded by water. Elsewhere, they may roost with other waders on flat shores, on muddy spits, islets or banks, and sometimes on sandy and pebbly beaches (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','Terek Sandpipers have been recorded eating crustaceans, insects, seeds, molluscs and arachnids (Marchant & Higgins 1993). At Cape Howe, Victoria, seven out of ten Terek Sandpiper faecal samples contained mostly amphipods. Insects, mostly flies ( Diptera  spp.) but also some beetles (Coleoptera), apparently formed the remainder of the diet (Schulz 1989). The species forages solitarily (Biljlsma & de Roder 1991), deliberately avoiding contact with other birds (Piersma 1986), and pecks, jabs or probes for prey on mudflats (Biljlsma & de Roder 1991).Birds forage at high and low tide; feeding in and on edge of flocks of other species including Hooded Plovers ( Thinornis rubricollis ),   Red-capped Plovers ( Charadrius ruficapillus ), Ruddy Turnstones ( Arenaria interpres ), Grey-tailed Tattlers ( Tringa brevipes ), Bar-tailed Godwits ( Limosa lapponica ), Red-necked Stints ( Calidris ruficollis ), Curlew Sandpipers ( C. ferruginea ), Red Knot ( Calidris canutus ), Wrybill ( Anarhynchus frontalis ), Double-banded Plover ( Charadrius bicinctus ) and Black-winged Stilt ( Himantopus himantopus ) (Marchant & Higgins 1993; Schulz 1989).Terek Sandpipers forage differently in relation to prey type and timing. When consuming crab species, the birds forage more slowly, with less pecking into the substrate than when they forage for polychaete worms (Piersma 1986). Larger crabs are often carried to pools and washed before eating, and many crabs are released alive, being rejected for unknown reasons. Foraging for worms involves \'runs\' from half to six metres where birds peck deeply into the substrate numerous times in order to catch prey (Piersma 1986).Piersma (1986) recorded birds foraging most actively at the beginning of low tide, when crabs become readily available and the birds themselves have not foraged for approximately 21 hours. The birds then become more selective after about two hours of foraging, when crabs are at peak abundance and birds have consumed a level of prey making digesting larger quantities of food difficult. Activity then increases slightly as prey become less available with the incoming tide and presumably birds have passed a digestion \"bottleneck\"\" (Piersma 1986).\"','Habitat lossThere are a number of threats that affect all migratory waders, including the Terek Sandpiper, that occur in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat facing waders is habitat loss, both direct and indirect (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for future development (e.g. Barter 2002, 2005b, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Moores 2006; Rogers et al. 2006; Round 2006). In many suitable staging areas along the East Asia Flyway many intertidal areas have been reclaimed, and the process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005b, 2005c). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows, which compound the problem (Barter 2002, 2005b; Barter et al. 1998; Melville 1997).DisturbanceIntensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in this region, where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter et al. 1998). Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998). Pollution, including nutrient enrichment and industrial discharge, and inappropriate land management practices can lead to habitat degradation. This could make birds more vulnerable to diseases and parasites (Harding et al. 2007; Straw 1992a). Competition for food resources with humans could also occur (Melville 1997).Disturbance from human recreational activities is another significant threat that has increased in recent years and which will probably continue to increase (Davidson & Rothwell 1993). When Terek Sandpipers are startled, Piersma (1986) noted they quickly congregate into tight flocks and cease foraging, and reduced foraging capacity may impact migration success.Climate changeGlobal warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to cause long term impacts on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997). Iwamura and colleagues (2013) found that rises in sea level could cause a dramatic collapse of population flow of this species caused by intertidal habitat loss. Taking into account upshore movements of intertidal habitat, their modelling indicates that this species population flow could reduce by 25% with a 100 cm sea level rise (Iwamura et al. 2013).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59300'),('59309','Actitis hypoleucos','','Aves','Scolopacidae','A small sandpiper of 19–21 cm in length with a wingspan of 32–35 cm. Breeding plumage of the Common Sandpiper is dark brown above, with a greenish gloss to feathers of cap, hindneck and mantle. Brown colouring is interspersed with irregular barring. Feathers are white underneath. The species has a prominent white eye-ring and indistinct dark eye-stripe from the bill to the rear of the ear coverts. White patches amongst darker feathers on the sides of the breast area are also notable. The species has a long tail that extends behind the wings when at rest, short legs, and a medium length bill (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Salt-water and fresh-water ecosystemsThe species utilises a wide range of coastal wetlands and some inland wetlands, with varying levels of salinity, and is mostly found around muddy margins or rocky shores and rarely on mudflats. The Common Sandpiper has been recorded in estuaries and deltas of streams, as well as on banks farther upstream; around lakes, pools, billabongs, reservoirs, dams and claypans, and occasionally piers and jetties. The muddy margins utilised by the species are often narrow, and may be steep. The species is often associated with mangroves, and sometimes found in areas of mud littered with rocks or snags (Geering et al. 2007; Higgins & Davies 1996).Foraging environmentsGenerally the species forages in shallow water and on bare soft mud at the edges of wetlands; often where obstacles project from substrate, e.g. rocks or mangrove roots. Birds sometimes venture into grassy areas adjoining wetlands (Higgins & Davies 1996).Roost sitesRoost sites are typically on rocks or in roots or branches of vegetation, especially mangroves. The species is known to perch on posts, jetties, moored boats and other artificial structures, and to sometimes rest on mud or \'loaf\' on rocks (Higgins & Davies 1996).','DietTypically carnivorous, the Common Sandpiper eats molluscs such as bivalves, crustaceans such as amphipods and crabs and a variety of insects such as Gryllidae; Myrmeleontidae; Cafius; Dicax; Scarabaeidae; Tenebrionidae; Chrysomelidae; Timareta; Coelopidae; Tabanidae; Camponotus; and Iridomyrmex (Higgins & Davies 1996).Outside of the Australian range of the species, algae and seeds, worms, spiders, fish, frogs and tadpoles have also been recorded in their diet (Higgins & Davies 1996).Feeding behaviourA study by Yalden (2008) showed the species feeds for extensive periods in grasslands consuming terrestrial prey, though riverine areas were also well utilised. The Common Sandpiper is a diurnal feeder. The species is said to snatch low-flying insects and dart forward to secure prey. Individuals locate prey visually on the ground (especially among stones and cracks), in low vegetation or in the faeces of mammals. Common Sandpipers rarely probe whilst foraging, although they may push their bills sideways under debris on beaches. Individuals sometimes wash prey before eating. The species has been associated with large animals to take disturbed prey and may take ectoparasites (Cramp & Simmons 1983; Higgins & Davies 1996).','Human activitiesIt is thought that human activities are the cause of the population decline of Common Sandpipers in Europe. Such activities include:habitat changesregulation of riverspollutionuse of pesticides (reducing prey abundance, especially in breeding periods) (Cramp & Simmons 1983).  Habitat loss There are a number of threats that affect all migratory waders, including the Common Sandpiper, that occur in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat facing waders is habitat loss, both direct and indirect (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for future development (e.g. Barter 2002, 2005b, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Moores 2006; Rogers et al. 2006; Round 2006). In many suitable staging areas along the East Asia Flyway many intertidal areas have been reclaimed, and the process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005b, 2005c). Reduction of quality and quantity of water In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows which compound the problem (Barter 2002, 2005b; Barter et al. 1998; Melville 1997). Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, such as organochlorines or heavy metals discharged into the sea from industrial or urban sources, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Barter 2005b; Blomqvist et al. 1987; Harding et al. 2007; Huettmann & Gerasimov 2006; Melville 1997; Schick et al. 1987). Global warming Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997). Potential threats Disturbance from human activities, including shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture, is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter 2005b; Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59309'),('59350','Pezoporus occidentalis','Endangered','Aves','Psittacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59350'),('59430','Acanthiza pusilla archibaldi','Endangered','Aves','Acanthizidae','This subspecies is a small bird with russet-brown forehead with indistinct pale scalloping, red eyes, olive-brown upperparts, a grey-brown tail with a dark band near the end, and off-white underparts with dark streaks on the chin, throat and breast. Sexes appear the same, but males are possibly larger than females (Bryant & Jackson 1999; Higgins & Peter 2002). It is 9 to 11.5 centimetres long and weighs 7 grams. There is no information about the social structure of this subspecies, but populations of Brown Thornbills elsewhere, on mainland Australia and mainland Tasmania, usually occur singly, in twos or in small family groups (Higgins & Peter 2002); as two birds were caught together in 1971 (McGarvie & Templeton 1974), this also probably reflects the social structure of this subspecies.','The Brown Thornbill (King Island) has been recorded in dense mixed scrub (Green & McGarvie 1971). The record in March 2002 was in wet forest dominated by Tasmanian Blue Gum  Eucalyptus globulus , with an understorey of Swamp Paperbark  Melaleuca ericifolia,  Rough Dogwood  Pomaderris apetala and  Goldenwood  Monotoca glauca  (Donaghey 2007, pers. comm.).One Brown Thornbill (King Island) was captured at Pegarah State Forest  in 1971, in dense mixed scrub about 10 m tall, comprising mostly  Eucalyptus  regrowth, Prickly Moses  Acacia verticillata , Variable Sallow Wattle  Acacia mucronata , Blackwood  Acacia melanoxylon , Silver Banksia  Banksia marginata , Lancewood  Phebalium squameum , Manuka  Leptospermum scoparium , Pink-beard Heath  Leucopogon ericoides , Tree Broom-heath  Monotoca elliptica  and Bracken  Pteridium esculentum . This scrub occupied about 90 ha of a total of 1100 ha of the reserve (Green & McGarvie 1971).Two Brown Thornbills (King Island) were also recorded and captured in a garden surrounded by farmland at Loorana.  The garden comprised hedges of African Boxthorn  Lycium ferrocissimum  and small thickets of paperbarks  Melaleuca  (McGarvie & Templeton 1974).Campbell (1903a) stated that the species inhabited areas of \"shorter scrub ... away from the watercourses\"\".It has been suggested that the Brown Thornbill (King Island) could occur in the same habitats as those inhabited by the critically endangered King Island subspecies of the Scrubtit  Acanthornis magnus greenianus  (Donaghey 2007',' pers. comm.; Garnett & Crowley 2000).\"','The food items taken by the Brown Thornbill (King Island) are unknown, but may be similar to populations of Brown Thornbills from mainland Tasmania  Acanthiza pusilla diemenensis , which are mostly insectivorous, but sometimes feed on seeds and fruits (Higgins & Peter 2002).Abbott (1973) suggested that Brown Thornbills on King Island might forage largely by using their long bill to probe bark. On mainland Tasmania, 20% of foraging observations by the mainland Tasmanian subspecies of the Brown Thornbill were in the tree canopy, 25% on twigs or branches of trees, 14% on tree trunks, 25% in saplings, 16% in low shrubs and none on the ground. Populations on mainland Tasmania spend more time probing bark than those on mainland Australia (Keast 1968).','The Brown Thornbill (King Island) is likely to never have been common. The reasons for its rarity and decline are unknown. Green and McGarvie (1971) speculated that its decline was caused by competition with the Tasmanian Thornbill  A. ewingii , which has apparently become increasingly common in many habitats on King Island, but this has been questioned (Abbott 1973).Extensive clearance and degradation of natural vegetation may be the main cause of the decline of the Brown Thornbill (King Island) (Bryant & Jackson 1999b; Garnett & Crowley 2000). Uncontrolled fires may pose a major threat to remNAts of suitable native vegetation for it (Garnett & Crowley 2000). Ticks have also been suggested as a possible threat to the King Island subspecies of the Brown Thornbill (Garnett & Crowley 2000), but there is no direct evidence for this speculation. There has been only one record of the species since the early 1970s, with two seen in Pegarah State Forest in March 2002 (Donaghey & Lloyd 2003).The small population of the Brown Thornbill (King Island) is likely to be susceptible to uncontrolled bushfires. The population of the Brown Thornbill (King Island) is so small that the genetic diversity of that population will inevitably be low.'),('59459','Stipiturus mallee','Endangered','Aves','Maluridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59459'),('59523','Calyptorhynchus latirostris','Endangered','Aves','Cacatuidae','Carnaby\'s Cockatoo is a large cockatoo 53 to 58 cm in length, with a wingspan of approximately 110 cm, and a mass of 520 to 790 g. It is mostly brownish-black or greyish-black in colour with narrow off-white margins on the feathers; a large patch over the ear coverts that is off-white or cream to brownish-white in males and yellowish-white (and slightly larger) in females; and broad white panels in the tail. It has a large bill that is black or greyish-black in males and off-white to greyish white with a black tip in females. The bill has a flaky texture. In both sexes the iris is dark brown or reddish-brown but the ring of skin that surrounds the eye is bright pink in males and grey or dark grey in females. In males, the legs and feet are grey or brownish to greyish-black with paler soles that may occasionally be tinged pinkish. In females, the legs and feet are typically paler and generally range from grey to light grey with a varying pink tinge; however, in the palest females, the legs and feet may be wholly pink or brownish-pink, and in the darkest females, the legs and feet may be coloured like those of the male (Higgins 1999; Johnstone & Storr 1998).','Carnaby\'s Cockatoo occurs in uncleared or remNAt native eucalypt woodlands, especially those that contain salmon gum and wandoo, and in shrubland or kwongan heathland dominated by hakea, dryandra, banksia and grevillea species. It also occurs in remNAt patches of native vegetation on land otherwise cleared for agriculture (Saunders 1974b, 1979c, 1980, 1982, 1986). The species forages seasonally in pine plantations in areas that receive high rainfall, e.g. the Swan Coastal Plain (Davies 1966; Saunders 1974a; Sedgwick 1968, 1973) and around the Perth metropolitan area on both native and non-native plants, such as liquid amber. It also forages in forests containing marri, jarrah or karri (Nichols & Nichols 1984; Saunders 1980).Breeding habitat Breeding habitat (or sites) encompasses those areas that contain suitable nest trees within the range of the species, and associated foraging habitat. Breeding activity is restricted to eucalypt woodlands mainly in the semiarid and subhumid interior known as the wheatbelt (records from Kalbarri in the north, the Three Springs District south to the Stirling Range, west to Cockleshell Gully and east to Manmanning). Breeding records indicate the species has expanded its breeding range westward and south into the jarrah-marri forests of the Darling Scarp and into the tuart forests of the Swan Coastal Plain (Johnstone et al. 2006), including the Yanchep area, Lake Clifton and near Bunbury (Johnstone et al. 2008; Lee et al. 2013).Carnaby\'s Cockatoo nests in large hollows in tall, living or dead eucalypts. It nests most commonly in smooth-barked wandoo and salmon gum, but birds have also been recorded breeding in red morrell ( E. longicornis ), york gum ( E. loxophleba ), tuart ( E. gomphocephala ), flooded gum ( E. rudis ), swamp yate ( E. occidentalis ), gimlet ( E. salubris ) and marri, and are said to nest in any species of eucalypt with a suitable hollow (Cale 2003; Carnaby 1933; Orton & Sandland 1913; Saunders 1979a, 1979b, 1980; Storr 1991).Suitable hollows can take from 120–150 years to develop (Pittman et. al. 2007). The size of the tree (measured as the diameter at breast height (dbh), which is approximately 1.3 metres) is a good indication of the hollow-bearing potential of the tree (Whitford 2002). Trees approaching 680 mm dbh are close to developing suitable hollows. Trees smaller than 500 mm dbh are considered to have the potential to develop hollows and are therefore also an important resource for Carnaby\'s Cockatoos. Nests are usually placed in the domiNAt species in the area, but there are exceptions. For example, at Tarwonga, birds breeding in woodland dominated by marri prefer to nest in wandoo, due to the relative scarcity of suitable nesting hollows in marri trees (Saunders 1979b).Recent trials have shown that birds will breed readily in restored or artificial hollows (Saunders et al. 2014; Saunders et al. 2014b; WA DPaW 2016).Foraging habitat Foraging habitat is that habitat used by the species for feeding (during or outside of the breeding season). During the breeding season, Carnaby\'s Cockatoo forages in native vegetation that surrounds woodlands used for breeding. During the non-breeding season, Carnaby’s Cockatoo forages extensively on banksia woodlands on the Swan Coastal Plain, including the Perth metropolitan area (Eco Logical Australia 2013), as well as in banksia heath on the southern coast. Carnaby’s Cockatoo also feeds in seeding marri and jarrah.Carnaby’s Cockatoos are opportunistic feeders and will utilise introduced food sources, including pine plantations (Saunders 1974a, 1979a, 1980; Sedgwick 1968, 1973), canola crops (Lee et al. 2013), pecan and almond trees (Saunders 1974a, 1979c, 1980, 1982; Whitlock 1939), and liquid amber ( Liquidambar styraciflua ) (Lee et al. 2013). The species will also feed on wild geranium ( Erodium  spp.) growing in pasture (Saunders 1977, 1979a, 1980, 1986; Saunders et al. 1985). It is thought that the foraging habitat within 20 km of breeding sites is one of the key factors in ensuring successful breeding (Cale 2003), particularly within 12 km of a nest. One study indicates that the more recent (2009-2012) successful fledging of chicks at Coomallo Creek is likely the result of feeding on canola, which is offsetting the loss of native vegetation in the area (Saunders et al. 2014).In breeding areas, foraging habitat typically occurs on the sandplains surrounding the woodlands used for breeding. Extensive fragmentation of foraging habitat within the breeding areas means that birds are forced to fly extended distances to find food. The increased travel time and energetic costs to reach foraging habitat means that less food is delivered to the young, particularly when daytime temperatures are higher. When insufficient food is available, or when it is far from the nesting area, chicks may die in the nest or have developmental impairments (e.g. low fledging weight which leads to juvenile deaths) (Saunders 1990). Maintaining foraging habitat close to breeding areas, and providing corridors of vegetation linking breeding areas to patches of foraging habitat is essential to allow birds to move between isolated patches, and for successful breeding (Saunders 1977, 1990).Carnaby\'s Cockatoos will traverse open space but may not use forage resources isolated from roosting habitat by long stretches of cleared agricultural land. Saunders and Ingram (1995) describe a lack of connectivity between patches as \"strongly implicated in the failure of Carnaby\'s Cockatoo to survive in heavily cleared and fragmented rural landscapes\"\". Corridors of vegetation that minimise breaks between foraging',' breeding and roosting sites are important to allow the birds to move between these areas.Heathland vegetation used during the breeding season may also be exploited during the non-breeding period (Saunders 1980). It is thought that at least some populations remain within 50 km of their breeding habitat throughout the year (Cale 2003).Carnaby’s Cockatoo has been observed feeding on revegetated foraging habitat at rehabilitated mine pits within four to eight years of establishment. Newly revegetated foraging habitat may be more productive for Carnaby’s Cockatoo because of a lack of canopy (Lee et al. 2013; Valentine et al. 2014).Roosting habitat During the non-breeding season',' when most of the cockatoos are on the coastal plains',' they roost in tall native or introduced eucalypts (Groom et al. 2014)'),('59550','Nangura spinosa','Critically Endangered','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Nangur Spiny Skink is brown above, with irregular narrow blackish cross-bands. The labial scales are edged with black. The skink is cream below with the dorsal and ventral colours merging on the flanks. Scales are in 28 to 30 rows at mid body, while the body scales are strongly keeled and forming longitudinal ridges and ventral scales are weakly carinate (Cogger 2000).  The Nangur Spiny Skink has no ear lobes, the ear-opening is large and vertically elliptic and the tympanum is superficial, lying just below the rim of the opening. There are a series of enlarged scales separating the labials from the small scales of the eyelid, which is entirely scaly (Cogger 2000). The Nangur Spiny Skink grows to a snout-vent length of 9.5 cm (Cogger 2000; Covacevich et al. 1993; Wilson 2005).','The Nangur Spiny Skink has been recorded in hoop pine plantation and in semi-evergreen vine thicket/forest. It has been found between 315–600 m altitude, the burrows in soils with a significant clay content and based on a \'Neara Volcanics\' geology. Ground level cover at burrow sites in both hoop pine plantation and native forest is approximately two-thirds fine leaf litter with little live vegetation. Burrow sites are normally well shaded, with an average projected vegetation cover of 85%. Plant species composition differs between burrow sites at the two known locations for the skink, and at one of these locations also varies between hoop pine plantation and native forest burrow sites, both on and away from roadside banks.','Examination of faecal pellets indicates the skink\'s diet consists of a variety of invertebrates with beetles and spiders preferred (Covacevich et al. 1993).','There is a significant threat to the Nangur Spiny Skink from hoop pine harvesting and replanting.The skink is also threatened by road mainteNAce. The banks and edges of the unpaved roadways along which the Nangur Spiny Skink occurs need protection from mainteNAce by heavy machinery. Over recent years road mainteNAce has been minimal where the skink occurs.Besides the expected degradation of habitat quality by any attempt to harvest and replant hoop pine plantations where the Nangur Spiny Skink currently occurs, other factors may affect habitat quality. Feral pigs occur on and in the vicinity of the two known locations for the skink. Unless a regular and systematic program to control feral pigs is maintained, pigs will continue to degrade and disturb ground level habitat of the skink, especially along drainage lines.At the two known sites, there are significant infestations of the shrubby weed  Lantana   camara  (lantana). Lantana can form dense thickets, although at known burrow sites no lantana thickets were recorded. However, lantana requires on-going control, especially at Nangur, to minimise impact on the Nangur Spiny Skink habitat quality.  Some roadways within the reserve are no longer trafficable because of lantana growth. The flammability of lantana facilitates fire spreading into vine scrub leading to death of fire-intolerant scrub species and further lantana invasion (Fensham et al. 1994; Gentle & Duggin 1977). The weed is also considered a threat to rainforest because it can form a monodomiNAt shrub layer that prevents rainforest regeneration, thus impeding natural succession processes (South-east Queensland Rainforest Recovery Team 2003b). Lantana along roadways in Nangur Forest Reserve also makes roadside surveys for the Nangur Spiny Skink difficult.Feral pigs, feral cats, foxes, dingoes and cane toads occur on or in the vicinity of known the Nangur Spiny Skink locations. All will feed on small reptiles and have the potential to significantly reduce numbers of the skink. One or more of these predators may already be part of the reason why there are low numbers of the Nangur Spiny Skink and why it has only been found at two locations. The impact of these potential predators needs to be assessed with some urgency and measures to ameliorate their impact implemented and monitored.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59550'),('59570','Acrocephalus orientalis','','Aves','Sylviidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59570'),('59612','Polytelis anthopeplus monarchoides','Vulnerable','Aves','Psittacidae','The eastern subspecies of the Regent Parrot is a slim, medium-sized (length: 37 to 42 cm; weight: 160 to 190 g) yellow or green parrot with contrasting blue-black wings and tail. The males and females appear different. The male has a bright yellow head and neck, which grades through yellow-olive on the hindneck to dark olive-green on the mantle and scapulars; the scapulars are also mottled blackish; the back and rump are bright yellow; and the uppertail is blue-black. The upperwings are mostly blue-black, with a prominent yellow shoulder-patch and red feathers on the inner secondary coverts and tertials; in flight, the red secondary coverts appear as a red band. The underbody is bright yellow except for the undertail, which is black. The underwings are bright yellow, contrasting with blackish flight feathers. The female has a similar pattern of plumage to the male, but appears duller: the head, neck and underparts are dull olive-green instead of bright yellow; the tail and flight feathers are dull bluish-green instead of blue-black; the shoulder-patch is duller greenish yellow; and the red markings on the wings are duller; and the underwings appear lime green instead of bright yellow (Higgins 1999).','The Regent Parrot (eastern) primarily inhabits riparian or littoral River Red Gum ( Eucalyptus camaldulensis ) forests or woodlands and adjacent Black Box ( E. largiflorens ) woodlands. Nearby open mallee woodland or shrubland, usually with a ground cover of spinifex ( Triodia ) or other grasses, supporting various eucalypts, especially Christmas Mallee ( E. socialis ) and Yellow Mallee ( E. costata ) Mallee, as well as Belah ( Allocasuarina cristata ), Buloke ( A. leuhmannii ) or Slender Cypress Pine ( Callitris preissii ) also provide important habitat for this subspecies. They often occur in farmland, especially if the farmland supports remNAt patches of woodland along roadsides or in paddocks.  The subspecies seldom occurs in more extensively cleared areas (Beardsell 1985; Burbidge 1985; Emison et al. 1987; Webster 1991).Breeding habitatNests are most often located in River Red Gum ( Eucalyptus camaldulensis ), and occasionally in Black Box ( E. largiflorens ), usually within 16 m of permanent water, or sometimes actually standing in water. Nest sites may sometimes occur near temporary water sources, such as ephemeral streams or seasonal billabongs, but these are usually within about 60 to 100 m of permanent water sites (Beardsell 1985; Burbidge 1985; Webster 1993; Webster & Leslie 1998). Nest trees are typically large (>150 cm diameter at breast height (DBH) and approximately 30 m tall) (Sluiter et al. 2007). Generally, about one-third of nests are in dead trees, but there is much variation between sites and between years (Burbidge 1985). In South Australia, this subspecies mainly nests in dead trees (Higgins 1999) but is also known to have nested in holes in cliffs along the Murray River (Campbell 1900; Ross & Howe 1930). Many breeding colonies, assumed to be traditional nesting sites, are in areas that have become drowned as a result lock and weir construction on the Murray River, although it is likely that birds have continued to nest at these sites in trees that are now dead (Higgins 1999; Smith 2001).There is a positive association between the position of Regent Parrot (eastern) nest sites and the presence of large nearby stands of mallee vegetation. The proximity of major nest sites to large stands of mallee (within 20 km, though usually 5 to 10 km) reflects the dependence of the Regent Parrot (eastern) on mallee vegetation as a feeding habitat during the breeding season (Burbidge 1985). During the breeding season, this subspecies makes two to three return trips each day between breeding sites in River Red Gums and foraging sites in mallee woodland (Burbidge 1985; Forshaw & Cooper 2002).Foraging habitatThe large stands of mallee that the Regent Parrot (eastern) forages in most often comprise Christmas Mallee ( Eucalyptus socialis ) and Yellow Mallee ( E. incrassata ). These large tracts of mallee vegetation often comprise a shrub and herb layer not found in smaller mallee remNAts dominated by Dumosa Mallee ( E. dumosa ), Red Mallee ( E. oleosa ) and White Mallee ( E. gracilis ), and it may be the presence of this understorey rather than the mallee trees themselves that is of importance to Regent Parrot (eastern) (Burbidge 1985). Regent Parrots (eastern) also feed in woodlands supporting Belah, Buloke and Slender Cypress-pine. They occasionally feed within degraded shrubland vegetation dominated by Slender-leaf Hopbush ( Dodonaea viscosa  ssp  angustissima ) and/or Berrigan ( Eremophila longifolia ) (Sluiter et al. 2007), as well as in farmland and along roadsides (Burbidge 1985; Emison et al. 1987; Webster 1993; Webster & Leslie 1998). Numerous records have also been made of Regent Parrots (eastern) feeding in open ground near remNAt vegetation (Morgan et al. 2001, cited in Sluiter et al. 2007).A survey for the Regent parrot in the Ouyen area in 2008 suggests that this area forms important feeding habitat for the species in the late summer-early autumn period, being located between two mainbreeding foci- the Murray River and Outlet Creek (Sluiter et al. 2008).As the Regent Parrot (eastern) relies on mallee woodland for its survival, it is associated with a number of other threatened species which also inhabit mallee habitats in southeastern Australia, such as the Malleefowl ( Leipoa ocellata ), Bush Stone-curlew ( Burhinus grallarius ), Major Mitchell\'s Cockatoo ( Cacatua leadbeateri ), Black-eared Miner ( Manorina melanotis ), Hooded Robin ( Melanodryas cucullata ), Southern Scrub-robin ( Drymodes brunneopygia ), Grey-crowned Babbler ( Pomatostomus temporalis ), Western Whipbird ( Psophodes nigrogularis ), Chestnut Quail-thrush ( Cinclosoma castanotus ), Crested Bellbird ( Oreoica gutturalis ) and Red-lored Whistler ( Pachycephala rufogularis  ) (Garnett & Crowley 2000).','The Regent Parrot (eastern) feeds mainly on the seeds of grasses and herbaceous plants, but also eats fruits, buds, flowers and occasionally insect larvae, psyllids and lerps. It usually feeds in pairs and small parties, but sometimes in large flocks. The species also often forages on cereal crops (Burbidge 1985; Higgins 1999; Webster 2001a).During the breeding season, males foray in feeding flocks, with groups ranging in size from two to 30 birds (Emison et al. 1987). Flocks generally remain within 2 km of their nest site, usually travelling to mallee, Black Box or low open Belah and Buloke woodlands, where they feed on grass seeds on the ground. Such feeding flocks have well-organised regimes, with constant numbers of males leaving nesting areas to feed at regular intervals throughout the day (Beardsell 1985). Males return to supply food to incubating females and developing young (Sluiter et al. 2007).In the non-breeding season, Regent Parrots (eastern) disperse and feed more widely across the Murray-Darling Bioregion (Sluiter et al. 2007). They are said to spend most of the day on the ground searching for food before returning to their roosting sites towards dusk. Regent Parrots (eastern) drink in the early morning before feeding, and in the evening before roosting (Forshaw & Cooper 2002).Regent Parrots (eastern) usually forage on the ground, though occasionally they also feed in the canopy of trees (Beardsell 1985; Burbidge 1985; Sonter 1984a). This ground-feeding habit occasionally attracts large numbers of Parrots to areas where grain has been spilt while being transported, especially along roadsides, where they are liable to be struck by passing vehicles (Anonymous 1980; Webster 1991). In one instance, 150 birds were killed in this manner (Anonymous 1980).Regent Parrots (eastern) appear reluctant to fly over open ground in search of feeding areas, preferring to move along vegetated corridors, such as roadsides (Morgan et al. 2001, 2006 as cited in Sluiter et al. 2007), or sometimes over horticultural crops to target feeding areas (Sluiter et al. 2007).In addition, Regent Parrots (eastern) are sometimes attracted to poisoned grain that has been laid out on the ground, with the intention of controlling European wild Rabbits ( Oryctolagus cuniculus ), resulting in the deaths of large numbers of Parrots (Burbidge 1985; Webster 1991). Regent Parrots (eastern) which feed in orchards and cereal and legume crops were formerly declared pests and shot by farmers (Boehm 1939; Condon 1947; McGilp 1934a; Schodde & Glover 1955).','The main threats to the Regent Parrot (eastern) are the clearing, fragmentation and modification of riparian River Red Gum and Black Box woodlands that are used for breeding and adjacent mallee areas that are used for foraging (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Webster & Leslie 1998).The greatest threat has been the loss of breeding season foraging habitat associated with the clearing of mallee vegetation within 20 km of the Murray River, for both agriculture and horticulture, with much of the remaining habitat now fragmented and separated too widely from breeding areas, making it inaccessible for breeding Regent Parrots (eastern), which must fly two to three times daily from breeding sites to foraging areas. Regent Parrots (eastern) are generally absent from potentially suitable breeding areas where significant stands of mallee vegetation no longer occur nearby (Emison et al. 1987). In addition, Regent Parrots (eastern) are reluctant to fly over extensive open areas and require corridors of habitat to allow them to move between breeding and foraging sites. Many of these corridors and habitats have been cleared or degraded. Vegetated roadside corridors, now important as potential connecting flyways, are not always continuous (Sluiter et al. 2007). The mallee vegetation provides a year-round food-source, while the cereal crops that replace it provide only seasonal availability of food (Burbidge 1985; Webster 1991; Webster & Leslie 1998). In addition, remaining areas of mallee are often grazed by stock, reducing or eliminating much of the ground cover which provides the Parrots\' food (Burbidge 1985; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Webster 1991).In addition, nesting habitat in River Red Gum forests and woodlands along the Murray River has also been destroyed, and its regeneration has been, and continues to be, hampered by commercial logging for timber, firewood collection, ringbarking on agricultural land, salinisation and waterlogging (Burbidge 1985; Garnett & Crowley 2000). Commercial logging of River Red Gum woodlands reduces the availability of nesting sites by limiting the number of mature trees available for nesting. Logging also removes trees that are approaching a large-enough size to produce hollows in the near future. Salinisation or waterlogging through irrigation, flood mitigation and other alterations to river-flow, reduce or prevent the regeneration of River Red Gums by interfering with seedling germination (Burbidge 1985; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Higgins 1999; Smith 2001, 2004; Webster 1991; Webster & Leslie 1998).There are also a number of other threats to the Regent Parrot (eastern). Use of agricultural and horticultural crops as foraging sites by Regent Parrots has exposed a proportion of the population to poisoning, shooting as pests in crops or orchards and, when feeding on spilled grain along roadsides, collisions with vehicles (Anonymous 1980; Burbidge 1985; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Smith 2001; Tzaros 2007, pers. comm.; Webster 1991; Webster & Leslie 1998). The loss of at least 41 Regent Parrots (eastern), including an estimated 33 mature adult breeding males as a result of death by shooting in northwest Victoria, is considered likely to severely compromise, if not eliminate entirely, the complete breeding colony from one of the largest known nesting sites of this species in Victoria (Sluiter et al. 2007). It is likely that the regional conservation status of the Regent Parrot (eastern) has been severely compromised, and it is possible it may result in the overall contraction of the Australian distribution of the species (Sluiter et al. 2007). Regent Parrots (eastern) are occasionally killed by eating poisoned grain intended for the control of rabbits (Burbidge 1985; Webster 1991). Additionally, feral Honey Bees ( Apis mellifera ) may exclude Regent Parrots from nest-hollows (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Smith 2001), although, overall, the availability of hollows in this case is considered not to be a limiting factor (Oldroyd et al. 1994).The wild population of the Regent Parrot (eastern) may also be subject to disease. Beak and feather disease is an infectious disease afflicting many species of parrot, and is caused by the Beak and Feather Disease circovirus. This common disease apparently originated in Australia, and is capable of causing very high death rates in nestlings. The potential effects of the disease on parrot populations vary from inconsequential to devastating, depending on environmental conditions, and the general health and immunity of the parrots. Lesions suggestive of the disease have been found in the Regent Parrot (eastern). The Beak and Feather Disease virus has the potential to be introduced to disease-free parrots via the movements of individuals carrying the disease (DEH 2005q). Thus, release or translocation of parrots must be closely monitored so as not to introduce the disease into disease-free populations.The Regent Parrot (eastern) relies on the specific combination of breeding habitat (usually River Red Gum  forests and woodlands, and occasionally adjacent Black Box woodlands) and foraging habitat (mallee woodlands) to be located no more than 20 km from each other for successful reproduction. The clearance or degredation of either habitat type threatens the survival of the subspecies (Garnett & Crowley 2000).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59612'),('59714','Cyclopsitta diophthalma coxeni','Endangered','Aves','Psittacidae','Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot is a small parrot that measures approximately 13 to 16 cm in length (Higgins 1999; Pizzey & Knight 1997). No information is available on the weight of the birds, but measurements of the other Australian subspecies suggest that Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot is likely to weigh about 35 to 40 g (Higgins 1999).','Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot occupies habitats that occur from sea level to approximately 900 m above sea level (Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot Recovery Team 2001).Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot occurs in rainforest habitats including subtropical rainforest, dry rainforest, littoral and developing littoral rainforest, and vine forest (Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot Recovery Team 2001; Holmes 1990; Templeton 1992). The fig-parrot was, in the past, probably most abundant in lowland subtropical rainforest (Holmes 1990, 1994b). However, this rainforest was extensively cleared following the arrival of Europeans (Cayley 1938; Illidge 1924; Martindale 1986). The remaining populations are now concentrated into fragmented remNAts of dry rainforest and cool subtropical rainforest that are drier and more hilly than the habitats that were occupied in the past (Holmes 1990; Martindale 1986). Within these rainforest habitats, the fig-parrot is likely to favour alluvial areas that support figs and other trees with fleshy fruits (Holmes 1990; Martindale 1986), in particular, habitats that have a high diversity of fig species, and that have a fruiting season that is staggered across moisture and altitudinal gradients (Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot Recovery Team 2001).Most recent records of the fig-parrot have been from small stands of remNAt native vegetation, at forest edges (Holmes 1994a), and in thin tracts of gallery forest (at edges of rivers or streams) (Norris 1964). Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot has also been recorded in other habitat types including sub-littoral mixed scrub; corridors of riparian vegetation in woodland, open woodland or other types of cleared or partially-cleared habitat; and isolated stands of fig or other trees on urban, agricultural or cleared land (Corfe 1977; Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot Recovery Team 2001; Irby 1930).Nests of Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot have been recorded in subtropical rainforest and dry rainforest, and in the ecotone (i.e. the zone of transition) between subtropical rainforest and sclerophyll forest (Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot Recovery Team 2001; Holmes 1994a, 1995).Coxen\'s Fig-parrots have also been recorded at trees in gardens, cultivated farmlands, and along streets in country towns (Forshaw 1969; Gynther et al. 1998; Holmes 1990; Irby 1930; Morris & McGill 1980).','Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot feeds on seeds and, occasionally, nectar and lichen. Food is mainly taken from fig trees, especially  Ficus macrophylla  and  F .  watkinsiana , but also  F .  rubiginosa ,  F .  virens ,  F .  obliqua ,  F .  racemosa ,  F .  coronata ,  F .  opposita ,  F .  fraseri ,  F .  superba  and the introduced  F .  carica . Other food plants that have been recorded in the diet include  Elaeocarpus grandis ,  Syzygium coryNAthum ,  Litsea reticulata  and  Grevillea robusta , and the introduced species  Cotoneaster lacteus ,  Eriobotrya japonica  and  Syagrus romanzoffianum  (Chisholm 1924; Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot Recovery Plan 2001; Forshaw 1969; Gynther et al. 1998; Holmes 1990; Irby 1930; Romer & Spitall 1994). It is possible that the fig-parrot feeds at introduced plants when native foods become scarce (Holmes 1990).It is possible that Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot may also take some other food items. For example, other subspecies of the Double-eyed Fig-Parrot have been recorded feeding on insect larvae (Gill 1970) and what appeared to be bark or fungus (Forshaw 1981) and, at the species level, the Double-eyed Fig-Parrot is known to eat flies and weevil larvae (Barker & Vestjens, undated).Little is known about the foraging behaviour of Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot. It mainly forages among the upper branches and foliage of tall trees where it takes seeds from fruits or, occasionally, nectar from flowers (Chisholm 1924; Lendon 1973; Holmes 1990; Irby 1930). It can return to the same food tree for several days in succession, or in successive years (Holmes 1990). Anecdotal evidence suggests that individual food trees may be used regularly until their supply of fruit is exhausted (Gynther et al. 1998).Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot usually forages in twos, or in small groups of up to 12 birds (Holmes 1990; Illidge 1924; Lendon 1973). It often forages in the company of other species including Wompoo Fruit-Dove  Ptilinopus magnificus , Topknot Pigeon  Lopholaimus antarcticus  and other pigeons, Figbird  Sphecotheres viridis , Green Catbird  Ailuroedus crassirostris , and parrots including Scaly-breasted Lorikeet  Trichoglossus chlorolepidotus , Musk Lorikeet  Glossopsitta concinna , Little Lorikeet  G .  pusilla  and Crimson Rosella  Platycercus elegans  (Holmes 1990; Irby 1930; Lendon 1973).Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot is usually very quiet and inconspicuous when feeding. Consequently, it may be less vulnerable to predators when foraging than it is at other times (Martindale 2002, pers. comm.).','The apparent decline in Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot numbers around the turn of 20th century was probably due to the loss of habitat caused by the clearing of lowland rainforest for residential and agricultural purposes and the logging of rainforest trees (Cayley 1938; Illidge 1924; Martindale 1986).The current potential threats to Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot include:The degradation of habitat by invasive weeds, especially in remNAts of lowland riparian subtropical rainforest where figs and other fleshy-fruited rainforest trees are concentrated (Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot Recovery Team 2001; Joseph 1988). The precise impact of weed invasion upon the Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot population is unknown, but significant invasion of gallery rainforest by the creeper  Macfadyena unguis-cati  has been recorded near Bundaberg in Queensland in close proximity to recent sightings of the fig-parrot (Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot Recovery Team 2001).The loss and degradation of habitat due to logging in the ecotone (i.e. zone of transition) between subtropical rainforest and eucalypt forest (Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot Recovery Team 2001).The loss of isolated stands of fig trees (which are likely to be an important source of food over winter) due to a lack of natural recruitment (Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot Recovery Team 2001).The illegal collection of birds or eggs for the avicultural trade (Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot Recovery Plan 2001; Holmes 1990).The associated impacts of the fragmentation, poor quality and small area of the remaining habitat, and the small population size (Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot Recovery Team 2001). For example, the lack of connections between habitat patches may provide a barrier to dispersal; the small population size and the fragmented state of the population and its habitat may make it difficult for birds to find sufficient food, particularly during winter; the lack of habitat may have increased the amount of competition between the fig-parrot and other species of birds, and possibly between the fig-parrot and flying-foxes, for limited resources; and the small population size (or, more specifically, the lack of social interaction) could inhibit birds from breeding (Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot Recovery Team 2001; Garnett 1993).Other factors that have the potential to impact upon the Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot include disease, stochastic events such as drought, and potential changes in the social structure of the population caused by the decline in population size (Coxen\'s Fig-Parrot Recovery Plan 2001).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=59714'),('601','Pachycephala rufogularis','Vulnerable','Aves','Pachycephalidae','The Red-lored Whistler is about 19 to 22 cm long. It has a wing-span of 30 to 33 cm, and a mass of about 37 g (Higgins & Peter 2002). The adults are mainly dull-brownish grey, but they have a distinct rufuous-orange facial patch that extends from the lores (i.e. between the bill and eyes) down to the chin and throat and, in all males and most adult females, rufous-orange colouring on the lower underbody (i.e. the lower breast, belly, vent and undertail-coverts). They have a black bill, dark red irises, dark grey skin around the eyes, and black to grey-black legs and feet. The sexes generally appear alike, but some females can have a duller colouration that makes them difficult to distinguish from immature males (Higgins & Peter 2002).','The Red-lored Whistler inhabits low mallee shrublands, heathlands and woodlands that have an open canopy and a moderately dense but patchy understorey (Emison & Bren 1989; Matthew et al. 1996; Menkhorst & Bennett 1990; Woinarski 1987).In tree mallee environments in the Murray Mallee region (such as those that occur in Murray Sunset National Park and Riverland Biosphere Reserve), the Red-lored Whistler displays a preference for habitats that support a mosaic of mallee and  Triodia  vegetation. In the more heath-dominated mallee environments located further south, it displays a preference for taller mallee heath (Clarke 2005a).The species has been detected at sites where the vegetation exhibits a post fire age of between five to fifty or more years (Clarke 2005a; Higgins & Peter 2002; Matthew et al. 1996; Sluiter & O\'Neill 1996; Woinarski 1987). In tree mallee habitats, the species nonetheless displays a preference for habitats that have remained unburnt for long periods, with post-fire ages of 20 or more years (in Murray Sunset National Park) or 40 or more years (in Riverland Biosphere Reserve) being of most significance (Clarke 2005a).The Red-lored Whistler mostly occurs in mallee vegetation that has a sparse or open canopy comprised of 2-5 m tall eucalypts such as  E .  incrassata ,  E .  dumosa ,  E .  foecunda ,  E .  socialis  and  E .  leptophylla ; a low (usually less than 1.5 m tall), moderately dense understorey that may be comprised of various species, including  Melaleuca uncinata ,  Callitris verrucosa ,  Leptospemum coriaceum ,  Phebalium bullatum ,  Baeckea behrii ,  B .  crassifolia ,  Hakea muelleriana ,  Leucopogon cordifolius ,  Allocasuarina muelleriana ,  Calytrix tetragona ,  Banksia ornata  and species of  Acacia ; and a sparse ground layer usually comprised of tussocks of  Triodia , and sometimes species of  Maireana ,  Sclerolaena ,  Chenopodium ,  Westringia ,  Zygophyllum ,  Ptilotus  and  Stipa , with extensive areas of bare ground (Matthew et al. 1995, 1996; Schodde 1965; Sluiter & O\'Neill 1996; Woinarski 1987). It rarely occurs in tall mallee (Matthew et al. 1996; Parsons & McGilp 1935; Schodde 1965). It has occasionally been recorded in other habitat types including eucalypt forest and banksia scrub (Hackett & Hackett 1986), eucalypt woodland (Cooper & McAllan 1995), and among rushes and lignum beside a swamp (Parker 1984).','The Red-lored Whistler mainly feeds on invertebrates including beetles, bugs, moths, caterpillars and grasshoppers (Lea & Gray 1935; Parsons & McGilp 1935; Sutton 1929). It is also said to eat some fruit (Parsons & McGilp 1935), and the stomach of one bird examined contained a single seed (Sutton 1929).The Red-lored Whistler forages on and close to the ground (Hunt 1976, 1979; Parsons & McGilp 1935; Woinarski 1987). It gleans (plucks) insects from the ground, and from the foliage, branches and occasionally bark of mallee plants including  Eucalyptus incrassata ,  E .  baxteri ,  Melaleuca uncinata  and  Leptospermum coriaceum . It also captures some insects in flight by sallying (Woinarski 1987).','The extensive clearance of mallee vegetation that occurred during the 19th and 20th centuries is believed to have been the main factor in the decline of the Red-lored Whistler (Garnett 1993; Matthew et al. 1996; Parker 1984; Woinarski 1987). It is claimed that at least half of the habitat of the species has been cleared (Garnett & Crowley 2000). The threat from clearing has diminished because broad-scale clearing no longer occurs in South Australia (Matthew et al. 1996) or Victoria and most of the remaining Red-lored Whistler populations occur on land that is managed for conservation purposes (Baker-Gabb 2005; Garnett & Crowley 2000). Even so, some clearing of mallee vegetation still occurs, and this may be having an ongoing impact upon some Red-lored Whistler populations (Baker-Gabb 2005; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Matthew et al. 1996). Furthermore, although clearing has subsided, the mallee vegetation that remains is fragmented into small and scattered patches (Baker-Gabb 2005; Woinarski 1987). This can prevent or limit the dispersal of sedentary species such the Red-lored Whistler, which in turn can increase the risk of extinction (Baker-Gabb 2005). The poor survival of populations in small fragments of habitat is demonstrated by the probable extinction of the Red-lored Whistler in the 145 ha Pulletop Nature Reserve (Baker-Gabb 2005; Barrett et al. 2003; Chapman 1990), and the absence of the species from some small (180 to 1500 ha) habitat fragments near Billiatt Conservation Park that, based on the habitat available and the proximity of extant populations in Billiatt Conservation Park,would formerly have been occupied (Clarke 2004b).The current major threat to the Red-lored Whistler is fire. Fire could potentially impact on whistler populations in two ways: by destroying areas of habitat, and the populations that inhabit them; and by altering the structure and composition of vegetation, thus reducing the suitability of habitat for occupation by the whistler, which displays a preference for vegetation that has remained unburt for at least five years (Baker-Gabb 2005; Clarke 2005a; Matthew et al. 1996; Sluiter & O\'Neill 1996; Woinarski 1987). There is a high risk that whistler populations will be exposed to fire: their preferred habitat, mallee vegetation, is described as fire-prone (Baker-Gabb 2005), and may be capable of supporting a wildfire every 10 to 20 years (Noble 1984). Furthermore, single large-scale wildfires in mallee areas can burn hundreds of thousands of hectares of vegetation (Noble 1984) and, thus, are capable of affecting large numbers of birds (Baker-Gabb 2005). For example, 90% of Billiatt Conservation Park was rendered unsuitable by fire in 1988, and large tracts of habitat in Ngarkat Conservation Park and the Big Desert were also made uninhabitable because of fires between 1986 to 1988 (Garnett & Crowley 2000).Other potential threats include harvesting of mallee vegetation, illegal collection of eggs, degradation of habitat by grazing mammalian herbivores, predation, and displacement by Gilbert\'s Whistler.Mallee harvesting operations occur in several tracts of mallee, and could possibly impact on the species by disturbing the birds, particularly during the breeding season, or by increasing the risk of exposure to other potential threats such predators, invasive weeds or pathogens (Baker-Gabb 2005). However, a study has shown that harvesting operations probably have little impact on the Red-lored Whistler, and that they may in fact be beneficial if they reduce the height of shrub foliage and encourage regrowth, and thus help to maintain habitats within the range of structural or age classes that are preferred by the whistler (Woinarski 1987).Grazing by mammalian herbivores, and predation, mainly by introduced animals such as foxes, are known to occur in mallee habitats and to impact upon mallee birds, but neither of these processes have been directly linked to the Red-lored Whistler. No information is available on the illegal collection of Red-lored Whistler eggs (Baker-Gabb 2005).Over a period of more than 20 years, the Red-lored Whistler has been replaced by Gilbert\'s Whistler in some areas of mallee in South Australia. This is attributed to changes in habitat (Garnett & Crowley 2000). However, it is not known whether it was meant that the Red-lored Whistler abandoned these areas after the habitat changed, and then was replaced by Gilbert\'s Whistler, or if the change in habitat led to competition between the two species, to the detriment of the Red-lored Whistler.Severe drought may be a threat to the Red-lored Whistler. There is no evidence to suggest that population eruptions occur following extended periods of above average seasonal conditions as occurs in some species that occupy semi-arid environments. Nonetheless, as with many other resident species, the Red-lorded Whistler is likely to exhibit increased breeding success in response to favourable conditions such as periods of above-average rainfall, and decreased success in response to unfavourable conditions such as prolonged drought (R. Clarke 2006, pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=601'),('604','Petroica multicolor','Vulnerable','Aves','Petroicidae','The Scarlet Robin is a sexually dimorphic species, with males being bright and conspicuous, and females duller. At the species level, male Scarlet Robins are black above with a large white forehead-patch, a bold white mark on each wing, white edges to the tail, black upperbreast and white underparts. Adult male Scarlet Robins have a bright scarlet to orange-red breast/chest. In contrast, females have a pink or reddish wash to the breast, large dull whitish forehead patch, buff-white wing marks, and a white edged tail. Immatures resemble females but lack the reddish wash to the breast (Pizzey & Knight 1999).','The Norfolk Island subspecies of the Scarlet Robin mainly inhabits native rainforest, but attains lower densities in habitats dominated by Norfolk Island Palms  Rhopalostylis baueri  or exotic African Olives  Olea europaea , and very occasionally lives in exotic eucalypt forest (Major 1989; Robinson 1988, 1997). It occurs mainly in guava-hardwood rainforest 5 to 8 m tall, and dominated by Red Guava  Psidium cattleianum  mixed with various species including Beech  Rapanea crassifolia , Ironwood  Nestegis apetala , Maple  Elaeodendron curtipendulum  and emergent 20 m or higher Norfolk Island Pines  Araucaria heterophylla .The Scarlet Robin generally prefers areas with a deep, moist litter layer, a dense shrub layer up to 10 m tall, and a rather open layer near ground level to provide visibility for foraging. Habitats with denser ground-layers, such as dense patches of olives and guavas, restrict visibility for foraging (Robinson 1988). Occasionally the subspecies occurs in regenerating forest (Major 1989; Robinson 1988, 1997). Young birds tend to shelter close to the ground (Robinson 1988).   The Norfolk Island subspecies of the Scarlet Robin requires mature forest habitat with a deep, moist, litter layer and dense 1 to 10 m understorey of hardwoods, Norfolk Island Pines, Red Guava or olives to provide shelter and nest sites, and a rather open ground-layer to provide visibility for foraging (Robinson 1988, 1997).Nests are placed near the top of the subcanopy, or in an upright fork or horizontal branch in a tree, such as Whitewood  Celtis paniculata  or Norfolk Island Pine  Araucaria heterophylla  (Hull 1909; Robinson 1988). The mean height of nests is 5.5 m (range 1.9 to 15, n=30) (Major 1989). One nest has been recorded as low as 0.7 m (Robinson 1988).In a detailed study, the number of nests (including old nests) found in various plant species were: Norfolk Island Pine 12, Ironwood  Nestigis apetala  4, Sharkwood  Dysoxylum patersonianum  3, Red Guava  Psidium cattleianum  5, Norfolk Island Palm  Rhopalostylis baueri  2, Oleander  Pittosperum bracteolatum  1,  Hakea saligna  1 and African olive  Olea europaea  2 (Major 1989). In another detailed study, the number of nests found in various plant species in rainforest habitat were: Red Guava 6, Sharkwood 4, Norfolk Island Pine 2, Ironwood 2, Maple  Eleodendron curtipendululm  1, Bloodwood  Baloghia lucida  1 and Palm 1. One nest was also built in a cypress tree in a eucalypt plantation (Robinson 1988).','The Norfolk Island subspecies of the Scarlet Robin eats invertebrates, mainly insects. A study examining stomach contents from 15 birds found insects at the following frequencies: Coleoptera (beetles) 100%, Collembola (springtails) 13%, Diptera (flies) 7%, Hemiptera (bugs) 14%, Hymenoptera (bees, ants and wasps) 53%, Lepidoptera (moth) larvae 7% and Orthoptera (grasshoppers) 7, pseudoscorpions 20% and spiders 7% (Major 1989).Most prey are captured on the ground. The Robin less often uses low horizontal branches of understorey vegetation or stumps from which to pounce on prey (Hull 1909; Robinson 1988; Smithers & Disney 1969). Of 245 foraging records collected, 60% comprised birds hopping along the ground and gleaning or probing for food in the litter layer, and 27% comprised birds pouncing from perches to take prey from the ground (Robinson 1988).','Habitat modification, clearing and grazing are the main threats to the Norfolk Island subspecies of the Scarlet Robin (Robinson 1988), which has declined due to clearance and modification of native habitat (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hermes 1985; Smithers & Disney 1969). However, removal of grazing may have temporary detrimental effect by reducing the openness of the understorey (Bell 1990).Introduced plant species invade and degrade the habitat of Robins (Robinson 1988; Smithers & Disney 1969), until the disturbed habitat develops an open understorey (Robinson 1997). African Olives  Olea europaea  may also produce sub-optimal habitat because of their apparently small, depauperate litter layer (Robinson 1988).Feeding on the ground makes the Scarlet Robin vulnerable to predation by cats  Felis catus . Contents of nests and young roosting close to the ground are also vulnerable to rats  Rattus rattus  (Major 1989; Robinson 1988).The subspecies may be threatened by pesticides and competition with introduced birds such as the Common Starling  Sturnus vulgaris , Common Blackbird  Turdus merula  and Song Thrush  Turdus philomelos  (Robinson 1988; Smithers & Disney 1969), although there is no evidence that these have caused a decline in Robin populations (Robinson 1988).The Norfolk Island Scarlet Robin is also vulnerable to catastrophic events such as cyclones (Robinson 1988).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=604'),('607','Monarcha frater','','Aves','Dicruridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=607'),('60756','Pristis pristis','Vulnerable','Chondrichthyes','Pristidae','The Freshwater Sawfish is a ray growing to 7 m, having five pairs of gill-openings on the ventral surface of the head; a distinguishing feature of rays. It has less than 20 teeth on each side of its saw (Allen 1989a; Phillips et al. 2008).','The name Freshwater Sawfish is a misnomer. It is a marine/estuarine species that spends its first three–four years in freshwater growing to about half its adult size (4 m+) (Allen 2000 pers. comm.).  Juveniles and sub-adult Freshwater Sawfish predomiNAtly occur in rivers and estuaries, while large mature animals tend to occur more often in coastal and offshore waters up to 25 m depth (Giles et al. 2006; Stevens et al. 2005). A study on the movement patterns of other sawfish species ,  P. clavata  and  P. zijsron , showed that the species had a high fidelity to an area, with movements restricted to only a few square kilometres within the coastal fringe, and influenced by tides (Stevens et al. 2008).In northern Australia, this species appears to be confined to freshwater drainages and the upper reaches of estuaries, occasionally being found as far as 400 km from the sea (Thorburn et al. 2007; Whitty et al. 2008). There are few reports of adult individuals at sea, with only  a few records of fish greater than 3 m in total length from the Pilbara coast, and one individual from Cape Naturaliste (south-western Australia) (Chidlow 2007 cited in Whitty et al. 2008).Freshwater Sawfish occur in fresh or weakly saline water (Last & Stevens 1994). The species tends to move up rivers during flood periods (Allen 2000 pers. comm.). Small specimens, mostly less than 150 cm, have been caught in remote ponds where they have been isolated for several years between floods (Last & Stevens 1994).The preferred habitat of this species is mud bottoms of river embayments and estuaries, but they are also found well upstream (Allen 1997). They are not found near riparian vegetation (Wilson 1999). They are usually found in turbid channels of large rivers over soft mud bottoms (Allen 1991) more than 1 m deep, but they will move into shallow waters when travelling upstream or while hunting prey (Wilson 1999). Thorburn and colleagues (2003) found Freshwater Sawfish caught as part of their northern Australian distribution study wre most often associated with deeper section of a river adjacent to a sand or silt shallow, such as a sandbar or shallow backwater.Individuals kept in aquaria prefer slightly alkaline waters between 22 ° C and 28 ° C (Wilson 1999).','The Freshwater Sawfish feeds on fishes and benthic invertebrates. The saw is used to stun schooling fish, such as mullet, and for extracting molluscs and small crustaceans from the benthic sediment (Allen 1982).In the Fitzroy River, the Blue Catfish ( Arius graeffei ), detrital matter and Cherabin ( Macrobrachium rosenbergii ) were important prey. Bony Bream ( Nematalosa erebi ) was also eaten (Whitty et al. 2008).The  differences in habitat utilisation by different age classes of Freshwater Sawfish are reflected in differences in diet. Prey available in shallow waters differs significantly day to night, with Cherabin and Bony Bream being more abundant in the shallows at night compared to the day. The diversity of small fish in the shallows at night, such as Spangled Perch ( Leiopotherapon unicolor ), Prince Regent Hardyhead ( Craterocephalus lentiginosus ),  Barred Grunter ( Amniataba percoides ), Flathead Goby ( Glossogobius giurus ) and Blue catfish, also increases substantially. Larger Freshwater Sawfish also utilise deeper waters on nights with greater moonlight, possibly as prey is more visible, or the species may go deeper to avoid predation (Whitty et al. 2008).','The Freshwater Sawfish is highly vulnerable to gillnet fishing. Populations may be threatened in streams where poaching for barramundi is a common practice (Last & Stevens 1994).Net fishing has been identified as contributing to a rapid decline in sawfish populations (Stevens et al. 2008; Peverell et al. 2004). Also, because of their life history characteristics, over-fishing and bycatch have been identified as being problematic (Stobutzki et al. 2002). Indigenous harvest, habitat modification and recreational \'trophy\' fishing have also been identified as threats to the Freshwater Sawfish (Peverell et al. 2004).Specimens are occasionally taken from the wild for aquarium display purposes (Cook et al. 1995). The high value of sawfish fins (up to A$250 per kg for dried fins) in the shark fin trade is a serious threat to the survival of all sawfish species (Rose & McLoughlin 2001).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=60756'),('609','Monarcha melanopsis','','Aves','Dicruridae','NA','The Black-faced Monarch mainly occurs in rainforest ecosystems, including semi-deciduous vine-thickets, complex notophyll vine-forest, tropical (mesophyll) rainforest, subtropical (notophyll) rainforest, mesophyll (broadleaf) thicket/shrubland, warm temperate rainforest, dry (monsoon) rainforest and (occasionally) cool temperate rainforest (Blakers et al. 1984; Bravery 1970; Emison et al. 1987; Ford et al. 1980; Gill 1970; Gosper 1992; Laurance et al. 1996; Morris et al. 1981; Officer 1969; Schodde & Mason 1999; Smith 1984; Storr 1984c). The species also occurs in selectively logged and 20—30 years old regrowth rainforest (Laurance et al. 1996). It is also sometimes found in nearby open eucalypt forests (mainly wet sclerophyll forests), especially in gullies with a dense, shrubby understorey as well as in dry sclerophyll forests and woodlands, often with a patchy understorey. The species especially occurs in \'marginal\' habitats during winter or during passage (migration) (Blakers et al. 1984; Emison et al. 1987; Ford et al. 1985; Gosper 1992; Kavanagh et al. 1985; Marchant 1979b; Morris et al. 1981; Officer 1969; Recher & Holmes 1985; Schodde & Mason 1999; Storr 1984c). Other areas in which the Black-faced Monarch may be found include: gullies in mountain areas or coastal foothills (Emison et al. 1987; Officer 1969;  Smith 1984; Storr 1984c; Taylor & COG 1992), softwood scrub dominated by Brigalow ( Acacia harpophylla)  (Leach 1995), coastal scrub dominated by Coast Banksia ( Banksia integrifolia ) and Southern Mahogany ( Eucalyptus botryiodes ) (Smith 1984), occasionally among mangroves (Draffan et al. 1983; Storr 1984c; Diamond & Bishop 1994) and sometimes in suburban parks and gardens (Taylor & COG 1992).','The Black-faced Monarch feeds mostly in rainforest but also in open eucalypt forest. They forage at all vertical levels of the forest, though most often at low or middle levels, within 6 m of the ground (Blakers et al. 1984; Coates 1990a; Hughes & Hughes 1980; Officer 1969; Recher & Holmes 1985). They collect most prey from the foliage, and to a lesser extent, branches and crevices of trees and shrubs. They may also catch prey in the air, but very rarely feed on the ground or from the trunks of trees and from loose bark (Blakers et al. 1984; Hughes & Hughes 1980; Laurance et al. 1996; Officer 1969; Recher et al. 1985). There are no detailed analyses of the diet of the Black-faced Monarch. However, they are known to eat arthropods, including: spiders (Arachnida, Araneae); beetles (Coleoptera); sawflies and wasps (Hymenoptera); grasshoppers (Orthoptera); bugs, cicadas and lerps (Hemiptera); moths and caterpillars (Lepidoptera); flies (Diptera); and dragonflies (Odonata) (Barker & Vestjens 1990; Blakers et al. 1984; MacGillivary 1914; North 1901-1914; Officer 1969).','Individuals occasionally collide with windows (Taplin 1991) and lighthouses (Makin 1961).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=609'),('610','Monarcha trivirgatus','','Aves','Dicruridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=610'),('612','Myiagra cyanoleuca','','Aves','Dicruridae','The Satin Flycatcher is a member of the Dicruridae family. They have a length around 17.5 cm, a wingspan of 23 cm and a weight of 17 g. The species is characterised by an upright posture, short erectile crest, and a distinctive habit of quivering the tail when perched. Males are glossy blue-black above, with a blue-black chest and white below, while females are duskier blue-black above, with a orange-red chin, throat and breast, and white underparts and pale-edged wing and tail feathers. Young birds are dark brown-grey above, with pale streaks and buff edges to the wing feathers, and a mottled brown-orange throat and chest (Higgins et al. 2006).','General habitat overviewSatin Flycatchers inhabit heavily vegetated gullies in eucalypt-dominated forests and taller woodlands, and on migration, occur in coastal forests, woodlands, mangroves and drier woodlands and open forests (Blakers et al. 1984; Emison et al. 1987; Officer 1969).Specific habitat detailsSatin Flycatchers mainly inhabit eucalypt forests, often near wetlands or watercourses. They generally occur in moister, taller forests than the Leaden Flycatcher,  Myiagra   rebecula , often occurring in gullies (Blakers et al. 1984; Emison et al. 1987; Officer 1969). They also occur in eucalypt woodlands with open understorey and grass ground cover, and are generally absent from rainforest (Emison et al. 1987; Officer 1969). In south-eastern Australia, they occur at elevations of up to 1400 m above sea level, and in the ACT, they occur mainly between 800 m above sea level and the treeline (Emison et al. 1987; Taylor & COG 1992).Satin Flycatchers are mainly recorded in eucalypt forests, especially wet sclerophyll forest, often dominated by eucalypts such as Brown Barrel,  Eucalypt   fastigata , Mountain Gum,  E .  dalrympleana , Mountain Grey Gum, Narrow-leaved Peppermint, Messmate or Manna Gum, or occasionally Mountain Ash,  E. regNAs . Such forests usually have a tall shrubby understorey of tall acacias, for example Blackwood,  Acacia melanoxylon . In higher altitude Black Sallee,  E.   stellulata , woodlands, they are often associated with tea-trees and tree-ferns (Emison et al. 1987; Loyn 1985a; Mac Nally 1997). They sometimes also occur in dry sclerophyll forests and woodlands, usually dominated by eucalypts such as Blakely\'s Red Gum,  E. blakelyi , Mugga Ironbark,  E. sideroxylon , Yellow Box, White Box,  E.   albens , Manna Gum or stringybarks, including Red Stringybark,  E.   macrorhyncha  and Broad-leaved Stringybark, usually with open understorey (Ford & Bell 1981; Traill et al. 1996). In the uplands of East Gippsland, they occur in pasture with scattered eucalypts (Emison & Porter 1978). On passage, they sometimes occur in riparian River Red Gums,  E. camaldulensis  (Emison et al. 1987). The few records in South Australia have mostly been from eucalypt mallee woodland or mixed eucalypt-Moonah,  Melaleuca   lanceolata , mallee shrubland with an understorey of heathy shrubs. They have also been seen in tall, open stringybark forest with scattered pine saplings,  Pinus radiata,  a lower tree stratum of Blackwood and ground cover of dense bracken and some flowering tea-trees up to 1.5 m tall (Carpenter 1985). In far south-eastern South Australia, Satin Flycatchers breed in open forest of Manna Gum and Brown Stringybark,  Eucalyptus baxteri , with understorey of Blackwood and Austral Bracken,  Pteridium esculentum . They have only been recorded in other habitats as a non-breeding visitor (Carpenter 1985). They are occasionally recorded in thickets of paperbarks, Brigalow shrubland, coastal thickets, heathland and mangroves (Storr 1984c).','Satin Flycatchers are mainly insectivorous, preying on arthropods, mostly insects, although very occasionally they will also eat seeds. They are arboreal foragers, feeding high in the canopy and subcanopy of trees, usually sallying for prey in the air or picking prey from foliage and branches of trees, flitting from one perch to another, constantly wagging their tail (Frith 1969; Green 1995; Loyn 1980, 1985a; Officer 1969; Taylor et al. 1997b). On Kangaroo Island, South Australia, they have been recorded sallying for flying insects in the middle and upper layers of 5 m tall eucalypt mallee.','Populations of the Satin Flycatcher are said to have been reduced by clearing and logging of forests in south-eastern Australia, mainly the loss of mature forests (Blakers et al. 1984). Satin Flycatchers are largely absent from regrowth forests (Loyn 1980; Loyn 1985a; Smith 1984; Taylor et al. 1997b).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=612'),('642','Motacilla cinerea','','Aves','Motacillidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=642'),('64383','Pipistrellus murrayi','Critically Endangered','Mammalia','Vespertilionidae','The Christmas Island Pipistrelle is a small insectivorous bat with dark brown fur, weighing between 3–4.5 g with a forearm length 30–33 mm (Churchill 1998). It is Australia\'s smallest species of bat, and there is no difference in the appearance of the sexes. It is sedentary, with females forming colonies of up to approximately 50 individuals, while males sometimes roost solitarily (Lumsden, unpublished data). It roosts under exfoliating bark on dead trees, under loose dead fronds of palm and pandanus trees, in hollows in large live trees and under strangler figs (Lumsden et al. 1999).','This species roosts in primary rainforest, both on the plateau and terraces. It forages in a range of habitats: primary rainforest, secondary regrowth and rehabilitated areas (Lumsden et al. 1999).The Christmas Island Pipistrelle has been recorded in a range of habitats, including plateau and terrace rainforest, secondary rainforest regrowth (of all ages), mine regeneration areas and formerly around the Settlement area (Tidemann 1985, Lumsden & Cherry 1997, Lumsden & Tidemann 1999, Lumsden et al. 1999). However, different habitat components may be important to provide for different life cycle requirements.Foraging HabitatThe Christmas Island Pipistrelle is an edge specialist where it forages on a variety of flying insects, in particular moths and beetles (Lumsden & Cherry 1997, Lumsden et al. 1999). Evidence suggests it favours vegetation ecotones, tracks and other small gaps within primary rainforest. It probably also uses the top of the canopy as a foraging edge. Tidemann (1985) recorded it foraging on the ecotone of primary rainforest and rehabilitation areas or secondary regrowth, and along tracks and drill lines within primary rainforest. Individuals were also encountered foraging around buildings in the settlement. Lumsden and colleagues (1999) found the highest levels of foraging activity occurred in areas of primary rainforest, secondary rainforest regrowth, and the ecotone of primary rainforest and secondary rainforest regrowth. Low levels of foraging activity were recorded in rehabilitation areas. Although individuals were recorded flying over mined sites no foraging activity was recorded here and they were likely to be using these areas as commuting routes to other foraging areas.Within primary rainforest, Lumsden and Cherry (1997) suggested that the main foraging activity was concentrated along edges within small clearings, such as tracks, regenerating drill lines and clearings caused by treefalls. Lumsden and colleagues (1999) tested this at 16 paired sites where bat activity levels were sampled on tracks and in the adjacent rainforest, and found higher foraging activity levels along tracks compared to adjacent rainforest away from distinct edges.Within foraging areas, bats have been recorded feeding from just above the ground level (approximately 0.1 m) to 20 m above primary rainforest canopy (Tidemann 1985, Lumsden & Cherry 1997, Lumsden et al. 1999).Diurnal Roosting HabitatAll roosts of the Christmas Island Pipistrelle have been located within primary rainforest. No roosts have been found in caves, rock overhangs or buildings (Lumsden et al. 1999, Lumsden & Tidemann 1999).Lumsden and colleagues (1999) tracked seven radio-tagged bats during the non-breeding season (June 1998) and found them roosting singly or in clusters of up to 47 individuals, in a variety of situations in primary plateau rainforest within the Christmas Island National Park:under exfoliating bark of dead canopy trees, predomiNAtly  Tristiropsis acutangula , 6 to 20 m above the ground (n = 7)under flaking fibrous matter on the trunk of live Arenga Palms ( Arenga listeri ), 15 m above the ground (n = 1)under dead fronds of live  renga palms  or Pandan ( Pandanus  sp.), 15 and 5 m above ground respectively (n = 2)under a Strangler Fig against the trunk of a canopy tree 5 m above the ground (n = 1)in the hollow of a  Syzygium nervosum  26 m above the ground level ( n  = 1).Available information suggests that roost site fidelity is variable; some individuals shift between roosts daily while others utilised the same site for at least seven consecutive days. As with many other small insectivorous bats, this species displayed roost area fidelity, shifting roost site regularly between a number of nearby roosts (distance between consecutive roosts: 14 to 186 m,  n  = 9).Early in the wet season, the Christmas Island Pipistrelle forms maternity colonies. Seven maternity roosts were located in December 2005 at the time when females were giving birth to their young. All roosts were under loose bark on dead trees. Colony sizes ranged up to 50 individuals. Although little data could be collected on the movement patterns between maternity roosts, it was apparent that individuals switched between a number of maternity roosts in a similar way to non-breeding individuals, although possibly not as often (Lumsden & Schulz unpublished data).','Only limited data is currently available on the diet of the Christmas Island Pipistrelle. In an examination of faecal pellets from 10 individuals in 1994, moths represented 52%, beetles 26%, flying ants 21%, bugs 1% and small Diptera 0.1% of the remains (Lumsden & Cherry 1997). Bark lice (Psocoptera) have also been recorded in faecal pellets (James 2005). Comparisons with data on insect availability is required to determine if this species is opportunistically taking what is available within the manageable size range, or whether particular Orders are being actively selected and if this varies seasonally as insect numbers fluctuate.The Christmas Island Pipistrelle catches its insect prey whilst in flight. The main foraging habitat appears to be small openings in the forest where they forage along the edge of the vegetation (Lumsden et al. 1999). These openings may be the result of habitat modification such as tracks, or due to natural openings from tree falls, and probably also includes the edge formed by the top of the canopy in primary rainforest. A large proportion of the foraging time is spent low to the ground. For example, 87% of observations of Pipistrelles in flight were less than 7 m above the ground in studies conducted in 1994 and 1998 (Lumsden et al. 1999).','The cause of the recent decline of the Christmas Island Pipistrelle is not known. Potential threats are listed below.Except for one death due to Yellow Crazy Ants (see below), no instances of predation have been recorded. However the likelihood of observing the predation of a small, cryptic nocturnal bat is extremely low, and predation is probably occurring but going unrecorded.Tthe  National recovery plan for the Christmas Island Pipistrelle Pipistrellus murrayi (Schulz & Lumsden 2004) and a further assessment of the possible threats by James (2005) identify the following threats.Predation or disturbance by the Common Wolf Snake ( Lycodon aulicus capucinus )   This species is a recent coloniser from South-East Asia that was first recorded in the Settlement area in 1987 (Smith 1988). Elsewhere it is known to forage predomiNAtly on lizards and occasionally small mammals on the ground or in the lower forest strata (Deoras 1978, Daniel 1989, Murthy 1990). The Common Wolf Snake is usually associated with human habitation and on Christmas Island is well established around the Settlement area (Fritts 1993; Rumpff 1992). Until 1998, the only record elsewhere on the island was of a population around the buildings at Grants Well in the centre of the island. In 1998, the location of a number of individuals further west indicated a range expansion for this species (Cogger & Sadlier 1999, Lumsden et al. 1999). This westward range extension continued, and the species is now widespread across the island, including in the far west (James 2005). Although the Common Wolf Snake has been recorded on the edge of primary rainforest it is not known whether it is confined to the edges or is spread throughout rainforest tracts. The Common Wolf Snake is capable of climbing trees (Auffenberg 1980) and may predate on roosting bats, particularly those sheltering under exfoliating bark on the lower trunks of rainforest trees. Non-volant young left in maternity roosts at night while the adults are away foraging may be particularly exposed to predation by this snake. In addition, adults could be preyed upon if trapped inside a roost with a single exit, such as many tree hollows.Lumsden and colleagues (1999) considered this snake to be a likely factor in the observed decline and westward range contraction of the Christmas Island Pipistrelle. In 1984 when Tidemann (1985) recorded the Pipistrelle to be widespread and common, including in the Settlement area, the snake was not yet introduced to the island. However, by the early 1990s, extremely high densities of the snake (up to 500 individuals per ha) were recorded (Rumpff 1992). In 1994 no Pipistrelles were observed in the Settlement, although low levels of activity were recorded at a single site nearby. No Pipistrelles were recorded anywhere in the far north-eastern section of the island in 1998, and anecdotal evidence suggested they disappeared from the Drumsite area of the Settlement several years before (Lumsden et al. 1999). The expansion of the Common Wolf Snake into the central region of the island coincided with the decline of the Pipistrelle in that region during the 1990s. Pipistrelles are now no longer present in this part of the island.Of all the introduced predators on Christmas Island, the Common Wolf Snake is the only species for which the timing of the introduction was immediately prior to the decline of the Pipistrelle and whose distribution mirrors that of the Pipistrelle. Having evolved in the absence of arboreal predators, the Christmas Island Pipistrelle is likely to be naive to the risk of climbing snakes and would not have developed strategies to avoid such predation. The Common Wolf Snake has had serious detrimental impacts when introduced to other islands. For example, on Reunion Island it has been attributed with causing a decline in endemic mice and the near extinction of a species of gecko (Cheke 1987). Weighing less than 5 g, the Christmas Island Pipistrelle is smaller than some of the other vertebrate species that the Common Wolf Snake has been recorded preying upon.The arguments against the Wolf Snake being the main cause of the decline is their limited climbing ability, \'sit and wait\' foraging strategy, sluggish behaviour and limited penetration into primary rainforest (James 2005). Recent dietary analysis of Wolf Snakes caught primarily in disturbed habitats, have not revealed any Pipistrelles in their stomach contents (D. James, 2005 pers. comm.).Predation by the introduced Black Rat ( Rattus rattus )   This exotic species has been attributed with the extinction, or decline, of bats on islands elsewhere in the world (for examples, see Daniel & Williams 1984; Pryde et al. 2005), and is thought to be a severe threat to native animals on Christmas Island (Commonwealth of Australia 2002). The Black Rat was introduced when the island was first settled in the 1890s, and is now common and widespread throughout the island, and occurs both in areas occupied and not occupied by the Pipistrelle. It is possible that the Black Rat may be a contributing factor in the decline of the Pipistrelle. It is highly arboreal and could be preying on bats within their roosts. Potential changes in the distribution and abundance of this opportunistic rat, in response to altered food resources as a result of the impacts of the Yellow Crazy Ant supercolonies on rainforest structure, may need to be considered.Predation by the Feral Cat ( Felis catus  )  This introduced predator became established soon after settlement, and is now common and widespread on the island. It is considered to pose a severe threat to native animals on Christmas Island (Commonwealth of Australia 2002). Although dietary studies have not revealed the Christmas Island Pipistrelle as a prey species (Corbett et al. 2003; Tidemann et al. 1994), it is possible that occasional individuals are captured given their low roosting and foraging habits.Predation by the Nankeen Kestrel ( Falco cenchroides )  On mainland Australia, the Nankeen Kestrel preys primarily on terrestrial vertebrates, with bats occasionally recorded as a dietary item (Lewis 1987; Marchant and Higgins 1993). Nankeen Kestrels first arrived on the island in the 1950s and were initially only in low numbers in the north-east section of the island (James 2005). They expanded their range and significantly increased in abundance in the 1980s (H. Rumpff pers. comm. cited in Lumsden et al. 1999). Although a bird of grasslands and other open habitats on mainland Australia, on Christmas Island this species is also widespread in areas of secondary rainforest regrowth. It is absent from extensive tracts of primary rainforest. However, it is present along the edges and tracks through some areas of primary rainforest, using these openings as foraging locations. In 1984, Tidemann (1985) recorded the Pipistrelle hawking insects along roads and ecotones during the late afternoon, several hours before dusk. Foraging by bats during daylight hours on islands elsewhere in the world has been attributed to a lack of avian predators (Speakman 1995). No daytime foraging of the Christmas Island Pipistrelle was observed in studies in 1994, 1998, 2004 and 2005 (Lumsden & Cherry 1997; Lumsden et al. 1999; James 2005) suggesting a temporal shift in foraging behaviour. Such a change in behaviour may be the result of predation pressure, with emergence shifting to dusk when predation risk is lower.The Nankeen Kestrel is widespread across the island, both in areas that the pipistrelle had disappeared from and in areas where it is still relatively common (James 2005; Lumsden et al. 1999. Therefore, it is unlikely that predation by this species is the primary cause of the decline, however, it may be a compounding factor.Predation and/or disturbance by the Yellow Crazy Ant ( Anoplolepis gracilipes  )  The Yellow Crazy Ant is a tramp species that has been recognised as among the top 100 of the \"world\'s worst\"\" invaders by the IUCN and the Global Invasive Species Database (O\'Dowd 2002). It has been listed as a key threatening process under the EPBC Act and has been recognised as a key threat to biodiversity on Christmas Island and a  Threat Abatement Plan for Reduction in Impacts of Tramp Ants on Biodiversity in Australia and its Territories has been developed (DEH 2006). It was accidentally introduced to the island some time between 1915 and 1934 (O\'Dowd et al. 1999). These ants form multi-queened supercolonies',' in which the density of ants is extremely high. Dramatic increases in supercolony formation began in the mid to late 1990s in several locations. The effect of the supercolonies is that the Yellow Crazy Ant may become the numerically domiNAt consumer on both the forest floor and in the canopy (O\'Dowd et al. 1999'),('64384','Cophixalus monticola','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Microhylidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64384'),('64385','Pseudophryne covacevichae','Vulnerable','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','The Magnificent Brood Frog is has a snout-vent length between 24 and 28 mm. It is distinguished from other members of the genus by a bright rufous, rusty brown or yellow triangular patch from the upper snout to the forehead. This colouration continues along the back and is usually bordered by diffuse dark patches. The sides and forearms of the frog are uneven grey, peppered with white and dark spots. The upper arms are bright yellow. The cloaca is surrounded by a bright yellow patch or line. The ventral surface of the frog is strikingly marbled with black and white. The skin sometimes possesses scattered tubercles above, but is smooth below (Cogger 2000; Ingram & Corben 1994).','The Magnificent Brood Frog appears to be restricted to specific habitats with all records being from the rhyolites of the Glen Gorden Volcanics. The species has been found around seepage areas in open eucalypt forests with an understorey comprised of  Themeda triandra ,  Xanthorrhoea  sp.,  Gahnia  sp.,  Lophostemon suaveolens ,  Allocasuarina littoralis  and  A. torulosa . In areas where cattle grazing has reduced ground cover the species has also been located in leaf-litter build up in first order streams (McDonald et al. 2000). The non breeding habitat for this species is unknown.','The diet of the Magnificent Brood Frog is unknown but is likely to consist of small ground-dwelling arthropods (McDonald et al .  2000).','Habitat loss and degradation appear to be the greatest threats to the Magnificent Brood Frog. The species habitat occurs on land under a variety of tenures, including National Parks, State Forests, local government reserves, grazing leasehold properties, crown land, freehold lands and road reserves. Ninety-seven percent of frog sites are located on unprotected land, most of which is in state forest or timber reserve. There are several activities likely to occur on these lands which may impact on the amount and quality of the frog\'s habitat, including grazing, logging, road works, clearing and development. Habitat in the south-east of Timber Reserve 245 and Tumoulin State Forest has been severely affected by cattle grazing. Grazing and trampling has the potential to degrade and destroy the seepage areas used by the frogs for breeding (McDonald et al. 2000).Similarly, erosion and subsequent siltation may cover seepage areas if future logging or clearing occurs. Roads and cuttings can alter the water quality and hydrology and may affect seepage areas and first order streams. Regrowth forest uses more water than old growth and therefore has the potential to reduce seepages. The population at the Ravenshoe rubbish dump has declined. Dump activities have destroyed or modified habitat, and previously known populations are now absent (McDonald et al. 2000).Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (DEH 2006).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64385'),('64389','Elusor macrurus','Endangered','Reptilia','Chelidae','The Mary River Tortoise is dark brown, rusty red-brown to almost black above, with a greyish underbody, a broadly oval shell with a median notch, and a moderately sized plastron (the lower half of the shell) which is about twice as long as broad (Cogger 2000; Thomson et al. 2006). The plastron may be cream to yellow, the skin of the inguinal areas pinkish-white, and the dorsal skin grey, suffused with pink on the transverse lamellae scales (Flakus 2002). The species also has pointed tubercles (small, rounded protuberances on the skin) on the neck. Unlike most Australian freshwater turtles (Berry & Shine 1979), males are larger than females. Females grow to 34 cm long, and males to 42 cm long. The shells of females are wider at the front than at the back, and the shells of males are narrow and straight-sided. Tails of males are very long and laterally compressed (Cogger 2000). The carapace (upper shell) of adult males is generally longer than 35 cm, and the tail is longer than 7 cm. This species displays physiological features that allow for cloacal respiration (it has bursae, which are structures like gills in its cloaca, with which it can obtain some oxygen from the water) (Flakus 2002). It has large hind feet, and is a fast swimmer (Thomson et al. 2006).','The Mary River flows for around 250 km from its source in the Conondale Range to the sea. Around ten percent of the land area of the catchment is natural vegetation. In 2002, the river system contained 11 water storages, and most barriers to turtle movement were on tributaries. Water infrastructure on the Mary River itself is limited to the Gympie Control Weir, a small weir 179.5 km from the river mouth that is regularly inundated by flows, and the Mary River tidal barrage at Tiaro, 59 km upstream from the river mouth (Kind 2002).Like other turtles with cloacal respiration, the Mary River Tortoise occurs in flowing, well-oxygenated sections of streams. Its habitat consists of riffles (particularly productive parts of a river that are shallow with fast-flowing, aerated water) and shallow stretches alternating with deeper, flowing pools. It generally does not occur in impoundments (Flakus 2002; Tucker et al. 1999). Limited data on juveniles suggest that they occur in rocky areas with sand or gravel on the river bed, in a variety of water depths (S. Flakus pers. comm. 2003) For example, a hatchling was found at a crossing in 10 cm of water by Latta & Latta (2006). Adults are usually found in areas with underwater shelter, such as sparse to dense macrophyte cover, submerged logs and rock crevices. They bask on logs and rocks (Flakus 2002; S. Flakus, pers. comm. 2003). Some turtles have also been captured at sites with little aquatic vegetation or submerged logs (Cann 1998). The species can occur in depths ranging from less than a metre to more than 5 m (S. Flakus pers. comm. 2003).Habitat of the Mary River Tortoise at Gunalda (140 to 145 km from the river mouth) consists of a chain of pools that are 1 to 4 m deep, shallow pools (less than 2 m deep) with fast-flowing water, interspersed with riffles that are 10 to 50 m wide (Flakus 2002; Flakus & Wright 1999). The river at Gunalda is typically 1 to 2 m deep with a sand and gravel bottom and boulders at the edges. The banks have steep sides and little vegetation, and there is a sandbank used as access for cattle. The water clarity was 2 m or more in 1997 and 1998, but the water was turbid after severe flooding in 1999. Habitat at Woolooga Bridge Crossing is fast flowing pools less than 2 m deep and riffles. The river is 10 to 40 m wide, and has a sand and gravel riverbed with submerged logs and abundant macrophytes at the edges. One bank is steep, and the riparian vegetation cover is 20 to 60%. There are two sand and gravel banks that are used as access for cattle. The water clarity was 5 m or more in 1997 and 1998, but the water was turbid after severe flooding in 1999. Habitat at Tiaro consists of large, slow-flowing pools (more than 6 m deep) which are usually turbid, some riffles, with a sand and silt riverbed, some boulders and undercut banks. There are few macrophytes or submerged logs, and moderate riparian vegetation cover (40 to 60%). Four sand and gravel banks (two with steep sides) are used as nesting sites for turtles, and as access for cattle (Flakus 2002).Mary River Turtles move upstream during times of high flow or flooding, and positioned themselves in backwaters or eddies until the flow returns to normal, when they return to their usual home ranges (Flakus 2002).','Adult Mary River Tortoises are mainly herbivorous, but eat some animal matter. Aquatic plants (macrophytes) make up 79% of the diet by weight. The most important plants in the diet are filamentous algae (43% of samples by mass, eaten by 53% of turtles sampled),  Vallisneria  sp. (17% of samples by mass, eaten by 50% of turtles), and  Myriophyllum  sp. (11% of samples by mass, eaten by 22% of turtles). They also eat  Cabomba caroliniana ,  Eloda canadensis ,  Hydrilla verticulata , and  Nitella  sp.  Two percent of the diet consists of terrestrial plants including buds of Forest Redgum  Eucalyptus tetricornis , seeds (and fruit) of the Blackbean  Castanospermum australe , and seeds (and fruit) of the lilly pilly  Waterhousia floribunda . 20% of the diet consists of aquatic insect larvae, particularly caddisfly larvae (Trichoptera), mosquito or midge larvae (Diptera) and moth larvae (Lepidoptera). They occasionally eat freshwater mussels  Velesuio ambiguus , and eggs of aquatic animals (unidentified) (Cann & Legler 1998; Flakus 2000; Flakus 2002).Juvenile Mary River Tortoises eat mainly aquatic insect larvae (53%) including caddisfly larvae (Trichoptera from the families Helicopsychidae and Hydropschidae), mosquito or midge larvae (Diptera), moth larvae (Lepidoptera), beetle larvae (Coleoptera), mayfly larvae (Ephemoptera), scorpionfly larvae (Mecoptera), lacewing larvae (Neuroptera), and drogonfly larvae and nymphs (Odonata) (53% of samples by mass) as well as freshwater sponges (21%) and aquatic plants (25%) (Flakus 2002). A former egg collector stated that hatchling Mary River Tortoises will only feed in the water (Flakus 2002).','Predation and lack of recruitmentThe Mary River Tortoise has suffered very poor breeding success for three to four decades. Around 12 000 eggs per year were collected commercially from the banks of the Mary River between Tiaro and Gympie for a period of twelve years (1962 to 1974). It is likely that there was little or no recruitment during this time in this stretch of 120 km (around 60% of the known range of the species within the main river channel). After the last laying of each season, collectors dug up entire sand banks throughout the area to make sure that they had not missed any nests (interview with a former egg collector, cited in Flakus 2002). Nesting data collected during the five years up to 2003 in the Tiaro area indicate that there has been a decline of 89% in the number of nests since the 1960s and 1970s (Flakus 2002; van Kampen et al. 2003).Hatching success in the wild continues to be very low. According to a former egg collector, foxes became much more common in nesting areas after the 1970s (interview cited in Flakus 2002). Predation of nests is now frequent. In 1997, 17% of nests monitored by Flakus (2002) were destroyed by foxes within 24 hours of laying, a further 8% were destroyed by goannas, and eggs in the remaining 75% of nests disappeared, presumably because they were taken illegally by collectors. In 1998, 22% were destroyed by goannas, 33% by unknown agents, and the remaining 45% of nests were removed for artificial incubation, and the nestlings released. In 1999, all nests were destroyed by severe flooding. In 2002, nests were caged the morning after eggs were layed to protect them from predators resulted in around 78% of protected eggs produced hatchlings. A third of nests were flooded, but this was after the estimated hatching date. However, foxes, dogs and goannas had destroyed many of the nests that were not found in time to be caged (van Kampen et al. 2003). Van Kampen et al. (2003) also found evidence that dogs killed some adult tortoises. The size distribution of the Mary River Tortoise indicates that there have been long periods without recruitment. Most of the current population consists of either large adults (28 to 42 cm long), or immatures (9 to 17 cm). Sub-adults and hatchlings are rare. Of 112 captures, only four were sub-adults between 17 and 28 cm long. This is not the case in other species of turtles in the same sections of the Mary River (Flakus 2002).Dams and weirsDams and weirs are poor quality of habitat for the Mary River Tortoise, and this species rarely occurs in impoundments. By surveying species at more than 50 sites in central Queensland catchments, Tucker (1999) showed that impoundments reduce turtle biodiversity relative to the flowing parts of the river, because the Mary River Tortoise and other tortoises that are habitat specialists with slow reproduction are absent from most dams. The larger the impoundment, the more severe this effect is. Reasons why the Mary River Tortoise does poorly in impoundments include:Decline in water quality . The preferred habitat of this species (and of other turtles with cloacal respiration) is flowing water with plenty of dissolved oxygen throughout (Thomson 2006; Tucker 1999). Still water in dams typically has a sharp decrease in oxygen below the top 2 m, and almost no oxygen below 5 m.    Probable increased predation on juveniles . The decline in water quality reduces the time that turtles with cloacal respiration can spend diving for food, and increases exposure of juveniles to predators when they surface frequently to breathe (Priest & Franklin 1999). This is likely to be exacerbated by the lack of protective cover, as macrophyte density is reduced in dams.   Decline in food quality and availability . The aquatic insect larvae that juvenile Mary River Tortoises eat rely on shallow riffle habitat, so they are absent or nearly absent from impoundments. Adult tortoises eat mainly macrophytes (water plants), which are severely reduced or lost when impoundments are created and when their water levels fluctuate. Flooding washes away macrophyte beds, and turbid (muddy) flows smother recovering macrophytes. Construction of impoundments results in initial loss of food plants as shallow areas upstream are inundated. For example, Duivenvoorden (1998) reported that macrophytes died and decomposed within six weeks of construction of an impoundment in another river in central Queensland. After the water level upstream became constant, new growth of water plants established after a further six to nine weeks, but these plants died when the water level fluctuated again. Fallen fruit from riverside trees is important in the diet of adult Mary River Tortoises, and these trees are also lost when impoundments are constructed, because fruiting species such as figs, blackbean, and lilly pilly do not tolerate root inundation (Tucker et al. 1999).   Nest site loss, and loss of access to traditional nesting areas.  Nesting areas of the Mary River Tortoise are lost or reduced in sizethrough flooding when dams and weirs are built, and conditions in impoundments do not create the sand banks needed for nesting. Some traditional nesting areas were lost or reduced in size when the Tiaro barrage was flooded, including formerly highly productive nesting areas near Petrie Park (interview with a former egg collector, cited in Flakus 2002). Breeding females migrate from their usual home ranges to places that have suitable sand banks for nesting. Unlike other Australian freshwater turtles which often nest in soft soil anywhere near the water, Mary River Tortoises use traditional nesting sites in restricted areas. Therefore, dams and weirs that block access to these nesting sites would severely hinder breeding success and could eventually eliminate local populations (Flakus 2002).   Lack of access to refuge habitat during floods . Flakus (2002) found that Mary River Turtles move upstream to safer sites during floods, to protect themselves from being washed downstream of their home ranges. Dam walls block this movement. At times of low water storage, overcrowding and disease can affect turtles in impoundments. Tucker (1999) observed high densities of turtles with skin ulcers in a dam that had little water, little food and poor water quality.Van Kampen et al. (2003) suggested that disturbance from water skiing using powered boats within the Mary River Barrage may be one reason for the low abundance of Mary River Tortoises in this impoundment. Dams can also reduce the water quality downstream, because they often release poorly oxygenated water, increase sediment and cause bank erosion through flow regime changes (Walker 1985). Changed flows can promote aquatic weeds such as water hyacinth and para grass, which choke the waterway, reduce water quality and block the turtle\'s access to nesting banks over a larger area than the impoundment itself (Tucker 19999). Turtles can be injured or killed by abrasion and shearing against the spillway face when they pass over the top of dam walls during high water flows. Other species have been observed passing over the tidal barrage on the Burnett River and being unable to return upstream. If Mary River Tortoises are washed into the estuary over the top of the Mary River Barrage, they will be stranded and are likely to be killed by the salt water (Berghuis 2001; Tucker et al. 1999). Other threats to the habitatThe habitat of the Mary River Tortoise is affected by soil erosion, and soil and water pollution (Cogger et al. 1993; Cann 1998; Flakus 2002). According to John Cann (as cited in Cogger et al. 1993), local residents claim that the nearly constant turbidity of the mid-reaches of the Mary River has only occurred since the 1970s (see also Cann & Legler 1994). Increased siltation and filling of deeper holes may have reduced the area of available habitat (Cogger et al. 1993; Hauser et al. 1992). Habitat loss will decrease the population size of the species, especially because the tortoise shows signs of being territorial (Cann 1998; Flakus 2002). Water quality in the vicinity of Gympie is affected by discharge from a sewerage treatment plant, which increases nutrients and decreases oxygen in the water. Meatworks effluent, pesticide and herbicide runoff also affect the river bank and water quality in sections of the Mary River (EPA 2001). The Mary River Tortoise is affected by damage to the riverside vegetation and to the structure of the riverbank. The banks of the Mary River are used for sand and gravel mining. There were 13 legal mines and a number of illegal mines in 2002, including a large operation at Tiaro (NRM 2001, as cited in Flakus 2002). Sand mining results in the loss of sand banks, stream bank erosion and siltation of the water, and the industry is prevalent in areas which were formerly the most productive nesting sites of the Mary River Tortoise (Flakus 2002). Much of the vegetation surrounding the lower and middle sections of the Mary River has been cleared for agriculture and cattle grazing (Flakus 2002; Tucker 1999). Nests could be damaged by stock. Cattle trampled all nesting sand banks monitored by Flakus in 1997 and 1998, but in these cases the eggs were buried deep enough to escape damage. Cattle trampling damaged the anti-predator screen over one nest in 2002 (van Kampen et al. 2003). Weed infestation can cause sand banks to become unsuitable for nesting. For example, one traditional nest site of the Mary River Tortoise at Gunalda, that was known to egg collectors between 1962 and 1974, is now vegetated. Tucker et al. (1999) noted that weeds such as Para Grass  Urochloa mutica , Lantana  Lantana camara , and Thistles (species in the family Asteraceae) block the access of turtles to nesting banks. Weeds growing on the nesting banks can also kill eggs. Two nests monitored by van Kampen et al. (2003) contained eggs that were penetrated by the roots of couch grass (possibly Cynodon dactylon).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64389'),('644','Motacilla flava','','Aves','Motacillidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=644'),('64405','Diomedea amsterdamensis','Endangered','Aves','Diomedeidae','The Amsterdam Albatross is a huge, full-bodied albatross with extremely long wings (wing span 2.5–3.5 m) and a short, wedge-shaped tail. The bill is very large and pink, with a bulbous tip (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The subspecies is similar in appearence to the Wandering Albatross with uniform dark brown plumage, and a contrasting clown-like white mask extending from the top of the bill, behind the eyes, around the cheeks and under the chin, and white underwings (Pizzey & Knight 1999).','The Amsterdam Albatross is a marine, pelagic seabird. It nests in open patchy vegetation (among tussocks, ferns or shrubs) near exposed ridges or hillocks (Weimerskirch et al. 1985). It sleeps and rests on ocean waters when not breeding (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Amsterdam Albatross forages in open water, mainly in the Indian Ocean. Some birds concentrate over shelves near Amsterdam Island or continents; in productive waters at upwellings; and boundaries of currents. Others birds remain in pelagic waters all year (Weimerskirch et al. 1985). This subspecies feeds on squid, fish and crustaceans (Weimerskirch & Jouventin 1998; Weimerskirch et al. 1997).','General threatsWhen migrating through the East Marine Region, the Amsterdam Albatross may be threatened by a reduction in food stock, ingestion or being caught in marine debris, oil spills and pollution (DEWHA 2009m). The chick is unlikely to survive if a parent is killed while it is foraging at sea (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Longline fishingThe primary threat to the Amsterdam Albatross is drowning in longline fishing gear (Garnett & Crowley 2000) and related hook and plastic ingestion (DEWHA 2009m). One Amsterdam Albatross was recorded caught during longline fishing south of Tasmania (Gales 1998). The foraging behaviour of large seabirds that eat fish and squid on or close to the surface, such as diving for baits, makes them the most susceptible to being drowned in longline fishing gear (AGDEH 2006q). It is stipulated that the Amsterdam Albatross cannot sustain any level of incidental bycatch (Inchausti & Weimerskirch 2001).Oceanic longline fishing has targeted pelagic and demersal fish in southern oceans since the 1950s, and is used in most Australian waters (AGDEH 2006q). Of all birds killed on longlines and retained for identification, albatrosses represented 75% of those caught (Gales & Brothers 1995). Internationally, some longline fishing fleets still operate without substantial bycatch mitigation measures (Environment Australia 2001f). Between 50 and 100 million hooks are set each year in the Southern Ocean and as many as 1.1 billion hooks are set globally. Both seabirds and fishing vessels concentrate in areas of high biological productivity (Environment Australia 2001f).Other fishing-related deathsOutside of the Australian Fishing Zone, trawlers carrying netsonde monitor cables (or their equivalent) may cause substantial collision mortality to Amsterdam Albatross. The subspecies may also be shot for sport or by fishers protecting bait (Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1998).DiseaseRecent evidence suggests that the Amsterdam Albatross is threatened by avian cholera and the bacterial disease  Erysipelas . These diseases are known to occur in the Amsterdam Island region. The diseases apparently killed 66% of chicks in 2000 and 74% in 2001 (Weimerskirch 2004).Breeding colony threatsPredation of the Amsterdam Albatross by introduced cats and rats pose a further threat on Amsterdam Island (ACAP 2007a). Human disturbance through habitat destruction, fire management and cattle farming have also degraded breeding sites on the island.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64405'),('64415','Astacopsis gouldi','Vulnerable','Malacostraca','Parastacidae','The Giant Freshwater Crayfish is the largest freshwater invertebrate in the world. The species has been reported to grow up to 6 kg but, currently, animals weighing 2–3 kg are considered large. In general, females weigh about 500 g with a carapace length (CPL) of 12 cm and males weigh around 300 g and have a CPL of 7.6 cm. Adults range from dark brown-green to black or blue (TSS 2006j). The species is spiny and has distinct chelae (front pincers), walking legs, carapace (head shell) and abdomen ending in a tail fan. Males have larger pincers than females. The pincers are brown with greenish tips and the tubucles and spines are yellow (Bryant & Jackson 1999b).','This species requires well-shaded streams that have good water quality, low sediment levels, snags, pools and undercut banks (Growns 1995; Hamr 1990a, 1990b; Lynch 1967). The Giant Freshwater Crayfish requires a stable thermal regime of relatively low water temperature (TSS 2006j). In captivity, the species is not tolerant of water temperatures that exceed 18 °C for several weeks (Forteath 1987). In the wild, temperatures of study streams occupied by the species ranged from 5.2–21 °C (Hamr 1990a; Lynch & Blühdorn 1997; Webb 2001). The Giant Freshwater Crayfish may also be found in hydroelectric impoundments, e.g. Lake Barrington (TSS 2006j).The Giant Freshwater Crayfish is believed to occur in all sizes of stream, and is found in flowing and still waters. Adults live in still, deep pools, sheltered beneath submerged and decaying logs and undercut banks, and move through shallow riffle zones (Hamr 1990a; Lynch 1967). Smaller juveniles also inhabit shallow fast-flowing streams (Hamr 1990a) and favour habitats with large rocks that are: big enough to be stable; are not embedded in finer substrates; are overlying coarser substrates; and/or have a distinct cavity underneath them (Davies & Cook 2004).The species has also been recorded in stream reaches with non-native riparian vegetation (e.g. pine plantations), without riparian vegetation and in farm dams (TSS 2006j).','The main food of the Giant Freshwater Crayfish is decaying wood and its associated microbes, though its diet varies with age. It also eats leaves and animal flesh, including small fish, when available (Forteath 1987; Hamr 1996; Lynch 1967).','The main threats to the Giant Freshwater Crayfish are past legal, and current illegal, fishing pressure (the species is easily caught), and large-scale habitat disturbance (Growns 1995; Hamr 1990b; Horwitz 1990; Lynch 1967; Lynch & Blühdorn 1997). Other threats include drought and climate change (Eastman & Eastman 2007; TSS 2006j).FishingThe impact of fishing on population dynamics of the Giant Freshwater Crayfish is not fully understood, but appears to have resulted in the loss of many large, mature individuals from the populations (TSS 2006j). Assessment of fishing in the past indicates that mainly adults and large sub-adults have been targeted (Davies 1991). From 1993 to 1998, fisheries regulations prohibited the taking of crayfish with a CPL of less than 130 mm (Inland Fisheries Commission 1993a). Fishing for the Giant Freshwater Crayfish was prohibited from 1 January 1998 ( Inland Fisheries Act 1995 ), though enforcement is minimal (Jackson & Blühdorn 1999). A study of baitlines indicated that the regulations applicable at the time (prohibiting capture of males and crayfish fishing in certain catchments) had no discernible effect on implied fishing pressure (Jackson & Blühdorn 1999).Habitat disturbanceHabitat disturbance includes the removal or destruction of riparian vegetation, bank erosion, removal of snags, channelisation, siltation, nutrification, toxic chemical inputs, instream barriers to crayfish movement such as culverts and farm dams, and alterations to stream flow and thermal regime (TSS 2006j). Many streams inhabited by the Giant Freshwater Crayfish have been disturbed as a result of agricultural, forestry and urban activities, and much of the floodplain-riparian area within its range has been heavily modified (Jackson & Blühdorn 1999). Intensification of forestry has resulted in increased access (Jackson & Blühdorn 1999), which may result in increased fishing pressure on previously undisturbed populations (Hamr 1996). Riparian and aquatic habitats continue to be affected by activities associated with roads, logging and plantations. Continuing effects include loss of canopy cover, increased runoff, sedimentation, and changes in hydrology (TSS 2006j). It is known that increased siltation and turbidity places increased stress on the Giant Freshwater Crayfish ability to transpire oxygen through the gills (Eastman & Eastman 2007). These threats are known to occur in every catchment (Jackson & Blühdorn 1999).DroughtThe Giant Freshwater Crayfish is threatened by the drying up of streams and rivers associated with drought conditions. Low environmental flows in 2006–2007 caused deaths in several catchments in the north-west and north-east of Tasmania. Particular concern has been raised over a lack of contingency planning by authorities to prepare for reduced environmental flows in these areas, which are utilised by land owners for irrigation of crops (Eastman & Eastman 2007).Climate changeClimate change is a significant overarching threat to the Giant Freshwater Crayfish that may result in altered stream flows, altered stream temperatures, and changes to catchment vegetation. Such habitat disturbance may affect the entire local crayfish population, not just the large individuals (TSS 2006j).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64415'),('64418','Brachionichthys hirsutus','Critically Endangered','Actinopterygii','Brachionichthyidae','Spotted handfish are small, colourful, slow moving benthic (sea-floor dwelling) fish that are easily approached and photographed. Adults are typically 70–90 mm TL (Last et al. 2007) and grow to a maximum size of 143 mm (Last & Gledhill 2009). They use their illicium (modified dorsal fin ray) to attract food (Edgar et al. 1982) and to probe egg masses (DEH 2005u), sometimes extending and resting it on the seafloor (Bruce et al. 1998).','This species occurs in benthic (seafloor) environments in association with coarse to fine sand and shell grit or silt (Spotted Handfish Recovery Team 2002). The species was recorded from depths between 2-30 m in 2002, but observations around this time suggested that they are most common in depths of 5-10 m (Spotted Handfish Recovery Team 2002).Spotted handfish are often found in shallow, shell-filled depressions or near rocks of low relief projecting from the substrate (Bruce et al. 1998). Unspoilt shallow, benthic, sandy habitats with suitable spawning substrates (e.g. primarily stalked ascidians  Sycozoa sp., but also sponges, and seagrasses) are believed to be critical to the survival of this species (Pogonoski et al. 2002).Availability of suitable spawning substrate appears to be critical to the reproduction capacity of spotted handfish. Due to their limited distribution and observed decline, all of the areas within which spotted handfish are found are considered important habitat.','A study conducted in the late 1990s found that the species\' diet was found to include small crustaceans, polychaete worms (Bruce et al. 1998) and small shells (Kuiter 1996). In addition, stomachs of two small, wild juveniles contained amphipods (Bruce et al. 1997).','Historical causes of declineDeclines in the abundance of handfish during the 1900s may be a result of a number of factors, including commercial and recreational dredging and land management activities that caused shifts in turbidity, water and sediment quality. Scallop dredging previously occurred in the D’Entrecasteaux Channel and Great Oyster Bay, with these areas intensely harvested during the 1960s to the 1980s (Last & Gledhill 2009). These fishing practices are known to have significant impacts on benthic habitat and are effective at catching small, slow-moving benthic fish (Bruce et al. 1999). Dredging may have significantly impacted spotted handfish reproduction and survival by decreasing the availability of important habitat, particularly critical spawning substrate (Bruce et al. 1999; Spotted Handfish Recovery Team 2002). However, there has been no commercial or recreational scallop dredging in the D’Entrecasteaux Channel, Frederick Henry Bay or Storm Bay since the late 1980s and there has not been any Danish Seine fishing in the D\'Entrecasteaux Channel or Frederick Henry Bay since at least 1995 (Pullen 2005, pers. comm.).Current threatening processesKey threats to handfish species covered by this plan include:loss/degradation of habitat, particularly spawning substrate;pollution and siltation of waterways from both diffuse and point-source activities;anchor chain drag from traditional boat moorings; and,the spread of invasive Northern Pacific seastars (Asterias amurensis).Other possible threats to handfish include:fishing;direct predation;illegal collection for the aquaria trade;bioaccumulation of heavy metals; and,climate change.Furthermore, the three species of handfish all exhibit the shared features of small population sizes, highly fragmented distributions and low dispersal abilities (Department of the Environment 2014pb). Given these factors all three species face an increased risk of localised extinction as a result of stochastic events and are susceptible to a loss of genetic variation.Habitat degradation and loss of spawning substrateThe principle threat to handfish appears to be reduced abundance and distribution of benthic organisms suitable for egg mass attachment (Spotted Handfish Recovery Team 2002). This reduction in the availability of suitable spawning substrate was found to limit the reproductive success of spotted handfish in the Derwent Estuary (Spotted Handfish Recovery Team 2002). All three species of handfish rely on semi-rigid vertical structures, such as stalked ascidians, sponges and fleshy alga, on which to attach their egg masses (DEH 2005u). When spawning substrate is absent handfish are unable to secure and guard their egg masses, which often results in any eggs laid being swept away in the current. Anecdotal reports suggest there has been a significant decline in abundance of the preferred spawning substrate for spotted handfish in recent years (Flukes 2014, pers comm.), with divers in the Derwent Estuary noting that stalked ascidians were present only in low densities with a patchy distribution and observed specimens appeared to have been juveniles.While reports indicate that handfish may use alternative forms of substrate, such as filamentous alga, this strategy may not be reproductively viable (Jacques 2014). Semi-rigid alga (such as  Caulerpa  species), while still subject to disturbance, provides greater reliability as a spawning substrate for handfish egg mass attachment then filamentous brown and red alga which is more prone to disruption from storm events. However, filamentous alga can often out-compete  Caulerpa  species and form into dense mats which may smother other substrate. Furthermore, blooms of filamentous alga may smother the egg masses and possibly restrict the movement of handfish. Several species of unidentified red and brown filamentous alga have been recorded in the Derwent Estuary (Barrett et al. 2010). Filamentous alga cover varies in space and time and often appears in seasonal flushes. Anecdotal evidence indicates that warm summers and increasing water temperatures favour the growth of filamentous alga, which appears to outcompete other alga such as branching  Caulerpa  species (Flukes 2014, pers comm.). In spring and summer 2010 high covers of filamentous red and brown alga (unidentified species) were recorded at sites across the Derwent Estuary (Barrett et al. 2010). Divers have reported that they have not observed spotted handfish at sites in the Derwent Estuary where high covers of filamentous alga were present (Flukes 2014, pers comm.).Other native species that have increased in abundance as a result of human activity may also impact on the availability of spawning substrate and interfere with the recruitment of juvenile handfish. The common butterfly-shell oyster ( Electroma georgiana ) is a rapidly growing species which experiences population explosions that result in the formation of large, smothering accumulations on the sea floor; these leave behind extensive swathes of decomposing matter when they die off (Green 2014, pers. comm.). This species tends to proliferate under high nutrient conditions (Aquenal Pty Ltd 2008), such as those found in the Derwent Estuary where high sediment and nutrient loads are associated with urban and industrial development and changes in catchment use (Australian Government Land and Coasts 2010). A high abundance of these oysters was observed at a site in the Derwent Estuary in the late 1990s. The proliferation of this oyster at this site, \'may have affected the recruitment of spotted handfish by smothering egg masses, hindering development and hatching of emerging fish or smothering sediments and restricting access of juvenile fish to benthic prey\' (Green & Bruce 2000).The native sea urchin ( Heliocidaris erythrogramma ) has also increased in abundance, possibly due to fishing activities that remove its predators, such as rock lobsters ( Jasus edwardsii ) (Brereton 2010, pers comm.) and wrasse species (Labridae family) (Flukes 2014, pers comm.; Gowlett-Holmes 2014, pers comm.).  H. erythrogramma  form into large aggregations, known as barrens, that remove larger macroalgae (potential handfish spawning substrate) from the reef resulting in overgrazed habitat (Edgar 1997) with low productivity and biodiversity (Valentine & Johnson 2005).Pollution and siltation of waterwaysAnthropogenic activities such as land clearing, land reclamation, dredging, port construction, damming and industrial and urban waste inputs often have significant impacts on estuarine ecosystems and can lead to increases in run-off and sediment loads and reductions in water quality, habitat quality and availability, and fish abundance (Edgar et al. 2000). The Derwent Estuary is no exception. After the city of Hobart was established on the western bank of the Derwent in the early 1800s extensive land clearing and agriculture development commenced, followed by the damming of the river (Butler 2006). A rapidly expanding population led to increases in industrialisation and urbanisation around the shores of the Derwent Estuary during the 20th century (Butler 2006). Discharges into the Derwent River increased considerably throughout the first two centuries of European settlement in the catchment (Butler 2006).The Derwent Estuary has been identified as one of the most heavily polluted waterways in the world with high concentrations of heavy metals in the estuary’s soft sediments (Whitehead et al. 2013). Historic sources of contamination include a zinc smelter and paper and pulp mill which operated along the estuary in the 1900s, while current sources include sewage, storm water, contaminated ground water from the zinc smelter, and aerial emissions (Whitehead et al. 2013).In recent decades considerable effort has been put into improving water quality in the Derwent Estuary, including site works to reduce heavy metal discharge at the zinc smelter, expansion of the wastewater treatment plant at the paper mill, introduction of effluent reuse schemes for sewage from metropolitan Hobart and improvements to storm water management (Whitehead et al. 2013). Sediment samples taken in 2011 indicate that concentrations of heavy metals have decreased at some sites in the Derwent since 2000, however levels vary across the estuary and copper, arsenic, zinc and cadmium concentrations increased in some spotted handfish locations (Whitehead et al. 2013).Due to their distribution in shallow coastal habitats in close proximity to urban and industrial areas handfish, particularly spotted handfish, are exposed to numerous impacts from anthropogenic activities (DEP 2013). Impacts to handfish populations from coastal developments can arise as a result of increased top soil runoff and sedimentation in surrounding waterways, while impacts from marine developments can occur due to the loss or modification of habitat (DEP 2013).Traditional boat mooringsTraditional block and chain swing moorings can have significant localised impacts on benthic habitat in sensitive areas (SEQ Catchments 2014). In the Derwent Estuary a large number of traditional boat moorings are located in known, historic or potential spotted handfish habitats due to the deliberate positioning of moorings in shallow and sheltered estuarine embayments (Green 2014, pers comm.). Traditional moorings consist of a concrete block (or other dump weight) with a heavy chain attached and are designed to allow boats to move in response to winds and currents, often resulting in the slack chain dragging across the seabed and scouring the surrounding substrate (DPI 2014). Scientists conducting spotted handfish surveys at Battery Point in the Derwent Estuary have observed damage to artificial spawning habitat caused by boat mooring chains dragging across the substrate and noted an absence of handfish in these disturbed areas (Green et al. 2014).Northern Pacific seastar ( Asterias amurensis )Northern Pacific seastars are believed to have been present in the Derwent Estuary since at least the early 1980s when they were introduced via ballast water, however the species subsequently spread to areas outside of the estuary (Whitehead 2008). The Derwent Estuary is now believed to support some of the highest known concentrations of northern Pacific seastars in the world (Whitehead 2008). Surveys in 2009 and 2010 found that a significant component of the macro-invertebrate biomass of the Derwent Estuary consisted of introduced species, with greater than 50% of individuals counted at Bellerive Bluff and Battery Point transects represented by introduced pests such as the Northern Pacific seastar (Barrett et al. 2010). Northern Pacific seastars are opportunistic, generalist feeders that are known to affect the abundance of a wide variety of benthic fauna within their native range, including molluscs, ascidians, bryozoans, sponges, crustaceans, polychaetes, fish and echinoderms (Hatanaka & Kosaka 1959; Fukuyama 1994; Fukuyama & Oliver 1985). Within the Derwent Estuary northern Pacific seastars have been observed feeding on stalked ascidians ( Sycozoa  sp.) and have been identified as a potential contributing factor in the decline of spotted handfish due to their reduction of available spawning substrate (Bruce & Green 1998). If northern Pacific seastars were to colonise, or increase in abundance, in areas that support red handfish or Ziebell’s handfish colonies they may also impact upon the availability of spawning substrate for these species.Other potential threatening processesAny form of fishing that degrades the benthic habitat can be considered to pose a threat to handfish species (Spotted Handfish Recovery Team 2002).The environmental impacts of aquaculture can vary considerably depending on factors such as the species being stocked, the stocking density and the management methods used (Wu 1995). Significant organic and nutrient loadings into the surrounding environment can occur in the vicinity of aquaculture farms, however this is usually confined to within 1 km of the farm (Wu 1995). Given the increasing number of aquaculture projects in the Derwent Estuary, D’Entrecasteaux Channel and Huon River there is potential for handfish colonies downstream of farms to be adversely affected by changes to any water quality that may arise. Nevertheless, the impacts of aquaculture farms can be significantly reduced through careful management (Wu 1995).Reductions in prey abundance, possibly related to decreases in benthic cover of seagrasses and alga that provide habitat for invertebrates, may impact upon handfish survival and reproduction (Spotted Handfish Recovery Team 2002).Illegal collection for the aquaria trade may also pose a threat to handfish. While experts consider the likelihood of poaching to be low, the consequence of removing even a few individuals from the wild is considered to be severe given the small population size of each species.Climate change and warming ocean temperatures also pose a potential threat to all handfish species. Increased water temperature may impact upon handfish survival and reproductive capacity both directly, as handfish held in aquaria appeared distressed at temperatures above 18 °C (Gledhill & Green, unpub.), and indirectly, through the creation of conditions favourable to the growth of filamentous alga and the spread of native urchins. Furthermore, climate change driven increases in severe weather events may dislodge spawning substrate and degrade habitat (Gowlett-Holmes 2014, pers comm.). At the Frederick Henry Bay site during the early 2000s, storms during the breeding season of the spotted handfish over successive years could have threatened the population (Spotted Handfish Recovery Team 2002) as seagrass, which formed a part of the primary spawning substrate at this site, was susceptible to storm damage.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64418'),('64420','Megascolides australis','Vulnerable','Oligochaeta','Megascolecidae','The Giant Gippsland Earthworm is one of the largest earthworms in the world. It grows to 80–100+ cm long and is 2 cm in diameter. It has 300 to 400 body segments. The front third of the body, including the head, is dark purple and the remainder is a pinkish-grey (Taylor et al. 2004). Weight\'s of up to 400 g have been recorded with an average weight of 200 g (Van Praagh 1992, 1994).','The Giant Gippsland Earthworm is generally found in the deep blue-grey clay-like soils over cretaceous rocks in the western Strezlecki Ranges and in the alluvial soils in depositional zones to the north and south-west (Smith & Peterson 1982; Yen & Van Praagh 1993). Rainfall in the area is over 700 mm a year (Yen & Van Praagh 1993). The earthworm is usually associated with creek banks (especially smaller tributaries of the Bass River), soaks, river flats or on slopes with a southerly or westerly aspect and is rarely found on north facing slopes (Yen & Van Praagh 1993). The species is absent from soil with a high levels of coarse sand (Van Praagh & Hinkley 2000a) and areas of waterlogging and compaction (Van Praagh & Hinkley 2002).Populations are usually found within close proximity to streams or drainage channels, usually within 40 m but are often restricted to within 5 to 10 m of the banks. They are associated with streams (but not under stream beds) and active streambanks and are almost always found above the active flood plain. Intermittent flooding and siltation of the larger river-banks may explain the absence of the species from sites below the active flood plain (Van Praagh & Yen 2010).Pasture habitatThe Giant Gippsland Earthworm occurs in permanent pasture, with agriculture representing the major land use throughout its range. Distribution studies of the Giant Gippsland Earthworm at Mt Worth found that it occurred mainly in the open, pastured areas surrounded by remNAt vegetation and was absent from under the remNAt vegetation (Van Praagh & Hinkley 2000b). Similar findings have been observed along revegetated stream banks and areas of remNAt bush where the species was confined to the more open, disturbed areas (Van Praagh et al. 2004, 2005; Van Praagh 2008).The species has been predominately detected on farms with dairy/beef cattle, and occasionally on farms growing potatoes, vegetable or fruit (Taylor et al. 2004; Van Praagh & Hinkley 2004). Of the 41 sites where Giant Gippsland Earthworms were found, during a survey in the early 1990s (Yen & Van Praagh 1993), most (90.3%) were in areas dominated by introduced pastures, and often (31.7%) along roadsides (Yen & Van Praagh 1993). In another survey, over 80% occurred within 40 m of banks of streams or soaks (Van Praagh 1992). On farmland, populations tend to be restricted to steep hillsides and gullies without ploughing (Taylor et al. 2004).BurrowsThe Giant Gippsland Earthworm lives in complex, permanent subsoil burrows that extend to around 1–1.5 m in depth (Van Praagh & Hinkley 2002) with the species at an average depth of 52 cm (Kretzschmar & Aries 1992; Van Praagh 1992). Water balance within burrows is important for worm movement and respiration (Van Praagh et al. 2002). Burrows are very wet (even in summer) and usually have a free-flow of water in them (Van Praagh et al. 2002).','The Giant Gippsland Earthworm feeds on roots and organic matter in the soil, although it may occasionally feed on plant material on the surface by poking its head out of the burrows (Taylor et al. 2004; Yen & Van Praagh 1994).','The Giant Gippsland Earthworm is threatened by intensification of soil disturbance (cultivation), alteration to local drainage patterns or watertables, earthworks, urbanisation, the use of soluble biocides, effluent discharge into waterways, excessive fertiliser use, the collection of individual worms and fragmentation of populations (Taylor et al. 2004; Van Praagh & Yen 2010). The species\' low recruitment rate, slow growth rate and poor dispersal ability increase the risks associated with these threats.Altered hydrologyWater table and drainage pattern alterations are one of the most serious threats to the Giant Gippsland Earthworm. Drain construction is thought to have resulted in local extinction of the species from a section of roadside habitat west of Loch that was widened in the mid-1990s. The Giant Gippsland Earthworm was found at this site in 1990 (Van Praagh 1994), and again in 1993 when an overtaking lane was constructed (Dent 2004 pers. comm. cited in Van Praagh & Yen 2010). This section of road was widened and table drains constructed in 1995, causing lowering of the water table. A survey five years later failed to locate any Giant Gippsland Earthworms in the area (Van Praagh & Hinkley 2000b).Soil disturbanceDirect soil disturbance kills earthworms and destroys their burrows. According to Van Praagh and Hinkley (2002a), the Giant Gippsland Earthworm is extremely fragile and even slight bruising or damage may cause death. Activities that can disturb soil include soil excavation, road construction, dam construction, deep ripping and the laying of cables (Taylor et al. 2004; Van Praagh & Hinkley 2002).CollectionHistorically, the Giant Gippsland Earthworm has been collected for recreation, commercial purposes (including public display) and scientific research. Intensity of collection has ranged from incidental to extensive. Worms can only be collected by digging them out of the ground, which destroys burrow systems and often injures and kills worms. Also, skins of earthworms can burst as they try to escape capture (Van Praagh 1994). Recent research indicates that collection depletes local populations, and the removal of even small numbers of the worms may, over time, cause the extinction of the populations from which they have been taken (McCarthy et al. 1994). It is an offence to collect, possess or display the species without an appropriate permit issued by the Victorian Government (Taylor et al. 2004).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64420'),('64435','Aquila audax fleayi','Endangered','Aves','Accipitridae','The Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) is a large bird that measures 100 to 110 cm in length, with a wingspan of 1.9 to 2.3 m, and a mass of 3.5 to 5.5 kg. Females are larger than males; they have a longer body, a much larger bill, and are about 15% heavier (Bell & Mooney 1998).','The Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) inhabits coastal, lowland and highland regions. It has been recorded in a wide variety of habitats including dry sclerophyll forest, temperate rainforest, sub-alpine forest, dry woodland, coastal heathland, small wetlands, riparian vegetation, sedgeland, grassland and farmland. However, breeding is restricted to a range of old-growth native forests, especially those dominated by  Eucalyptus  species (Bell & Mooney 1998; Gaffney & Mooney 1992; Marchant & Higgins 1993; Mooney & Holdsworth 1991; Thomas 1979).Breeding HabitatThe Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) nests in a range of old-growth native forests, from almost pure rainforest to isolated eucalypts in  Acacia  forest. However, the majority of nests occur in forests that are dominated by eucalypts. Forest habitats used by the eagle for nesting usually have a closed canopy. Most nests are located in multi-aged communities in which most of the trees present are classified as old-growth. More than 50% of known nests occur in tall open forest above an open or closed understorey (Bell & Mooney 1998; Brown & Mooney 1996; Gaffney & Mooney 1992; Mooney & Holdsworth 1991). The nest is almost always built in an emergent tree that is among the tallest and broadest of those available at a nest site. Nests are usually located in trees that are situated on sloping ground, at an aspect that offers protection from the prevailing winds (e.g. on the leeward side of a ridge, and on the lower part of the slope, so that the top of the tree is below the ground level at the top of the ridge) (Mooney 1988a; Mooney & Holdsworth 1991). The Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) will not nest in areas that have high human densities (Bell & Mooney 1998).Foraging HabitatThe Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) forages in open areas. It has been recorded hunting over most types of Tasmanian terrestrial habitat including coastal heath, dry woodland, temperate rainforest, dwarf coniferous forest, sub-alpine forest, grassland and cleared land. The subspecies is also capable of hunting over snowfields, although forests are the preferred foraging habitat (Gaffney & Mooney 1992).','The Wedge-tailed Eagle is carnivorous, and feeds on both live prey and carrion. It feeds mainly on rabbits and hares, but a wide variety of vertebrate prey is consumed, including reptiles, birds and mammals (Marchant & Higgins 1993). It is capable of killing prey several times their own body weight, though most prey items taken are much smaller (approximately 25% or less of the eagle\'s mass) (Bell & Mooney 1998).In rural Tasmania, the diet of the Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) consists of rabbits, hares and cats (which comprise approximately 45% of items consumed); wallabies, possums, echidnas and wombats (approximately 30% of items consumed); birds (approximately 10% of items consumed); sheep and goats (approximately 7.5% of items consumed); and reptiles (approximately 5% of items consumed) (the remaining 2.5% of the diet is composed of other items) (Gaffney & Mooney 1992). Carrion is a major source of food, especially for immature birds (which lack hunting experience), although adults will also feed heavily on carrion during winter (Bell & Mooney 1998).The Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) captures most of its live prey by sallying. This typically involves a bird launching itself from a perch and then attacking prey on the ground or, less frequently, in flight, but can include other variations such as diving at prey from high altitudes whilst in flight, or slow quartering (( methodical search of an area) whilst flying at 10-20 m above the ground. Prey can also be captured by means other than sallying, e.g. eagles hunt for Brush-tailed Possums  Trichosurus vulpecula  by flying slowly through the canopy in search of shallow hollows in trees which, upon discovery, are examined from a perch (Bell & Mooney 1998). Hunting usually takes place during the day. Prey is usually eaten where it is captured, except during the breeding season when much of the food is taken back to the nest and is fed to the young (Bell & Mooney 1998).','The major threats to the Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) are loss of nesting habitat and disturbance of nesting birds and, to a lesser degree, persecution by humans (Bell & Mooney 1998; Gaffney & Mooney 1992; Mooney 1997).The nesting habitat of the Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) (i.e. old-growth forest dominated by  Eucalyptus  species) has been lost through clearance for agriculture, forestry and housing (Bell & Moloney 1998; Gaffney & Mooney 1992). In Tasmania, it has been estimated that a combined total of at least 40% of forests (including dry, wet and swamp forests) and dry woodlands have been cleared since the time of settlement (Gaffney & Mooney 1992). Furthermore, contemporary logging operations often leave nest-trees isolated or in small patches of remNAt habitat. Such sites are very rarely re-occupied by eagles for breeding purposes, possibly due to the increased exposure of nest sites, and to the reduced availability or lack of alternative nest sites in the surrounding area (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Mooney 1988a, 1997). Given that 80% of known nests occur on private land or in State Forest, there is potential for a large proportion of the breeding population to be affected by forest clearance (Bell & Mooney 1998).The breeding success of the Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) is thought to be declining due to the increased disturbance of nesting pairs. The eagle is described as an \'extremely shy\' nester, and pairs readily desert nests if exposed to elevated levels of disturbance such as that associated with logging operations, roadworks and development/construction, and less obvious activities such as recreation, tourism and research (Bell & Mooney 1998; Gaffney & Mooney 1992; Mooney 1997; Mooney & Holdsworth 1991). The ongoing development of both rural and residential areas is considered to be the most important source of disturbance, as the disturbance is, in all likelihood, irreversible (Bell & Mooney 1998). However, intensive logging is also of concern due to its increased spread in recent years, and because intensive post-winter logging operations usually coincide with the incubation period of the eagle, a time when breeding pairs are highly sensitive to disturbance (Mooney 1988a). Given that 80% of known Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) nests occur on private land or in State Forest, there is potential for a large proportion of the breeding population to be exposed to and affected by disturbance (Bell & Mooney 1998).The Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) is subject to ongoing conflict with livestock owners and other parts of the public.  Wedge-tailed Eagles, and especially immature birds, feed on carrion, including that of domestic livestock. Research on the predation of domestic livestock by Wedge-tailed Eagles has shown that very few live animals are taken, and of those that are taken, they are typically sick or dying. Despite this, a misunderstanding of this fact has led to the implementation of shooting, trapping and poisoning programs (Bell & Mooney 1998; Mooney 1988a, 1997). The shooting of birds by vandals, and the collection of small numbers of birds for the small and illegal market for mounted specimens, are additional sources of mortality (Bell & Mooney 1998). It is estimated that a minimum of 5% of adult and 35% of immature Wedge-tailed Eagles (Tasmanian) are killed each year as a result of the ongoing conflict (Bell & Mooney 1998; Mooney & Holdsworth 1991).There are several additional causes of mortality which, in concert with primary factors listed above, increase the threat of extinction to this species. These include non-target and secondary poisoning, collisions with vehicles, collisions with overhead wires and fences, collisions with wind turbines, and electrocution (Bell & Mooney 1998; Mooney 1997; P. Olsen 2006, pers. comm.). Its habit of feeding on carrion exposes the Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) to secondary poisoning (e.g. via ingestion of rabbits laced with pindone) and, when feeding on road-kill, to collisions with vehicles (Martin et al. 1994; Bell & Mooney 1998; Mooney 1997). Non-target poisoning can occur when birds ingest baits intended for dogs, ravens  Corvus  or Tasmanian Devils  Sarcophilus harrissi  (Bell & Mooney 1998; Mooney 1997). Electrocution results from contact with power lines and installations, which may be used as perches when hunting (Bell & Mooney 1998; Mooney 1997). The frequency of collisions with vehicles, wires and fences, and of electrocution, will presumably increase as rural and residential areas become more developed (Bell & Mooney 1998). Collision with wind turbines has been identified as a potential threat to the Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian). Raptors are thought to be at higher risk of collission due to their tendancy to make flights in the swept area (WBPWF FR 2007a). However, a number of studies have found that the risk of collission is extremely low, with birds avoiding the swept area of the turbine blades in over 98% of cases (Biosis Research 2007; Smales &#038: Muir 2005; WBPWF FR 2007b).The loss of suitable habitat has also increased conflict between the Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) and the White-bellied Sea-Eagle  Haliaeetus leucogaster  for nest sites, and this is known to have caused breeding failures in both species (Spencer & Lynch 2005).The Wedge-tailed Eagle (Tasmanian) is unlikely to be severely affected by any \'catastrophic\' threats (i.e. potentially catastrophic threats such as drought or wildfire were not identified as a risk to the subspecies in either of the published recovery plans (Bell & Mooney 1998; Gaffney & Mooney 1992).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64435'),('64436','Calyptorhynchus lathami halmaturinus','Endangered','Aves','Cacatuidae','The Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) is a medium-sized cockatoo about 48 cm in length and 510 to 515 g in weight, with a wing-span of approximately 90 cm. The adults are mainly black, with black-brown colouring on the head, neck and underbody, and panels of red (in males) or orange-red with black bars (in females) in the tail. The adult female also has conspicuous yellow patches on the head. These patches are absent from most males, but they may be expressed weakly in a few individuals (Higgins 1999).','The Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) inhabits woodlands that are dominated by Drooping Sheoak ( Allocasuarina verticillata ) and often interspersed with taller stands of Sugar Gum ( Eucalyptus cladocalyx ). These woodlands occur in small gullies adjacent to cleared land in coastal and sub-coastal areas, generally on shallow acidic soils on the steep and rocky slopes of gorges and valleys, along inland creek and river systems (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Joseph 1982; Mooney & Pedler 2005; Pepper 1996, 1997). Though most activity is confined to Drooping Sheoak and Sugar Gum, the Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) occasionally utilises other tree species, including Blue Gum ( Eucalyptus leucoxylon ),  Manna Gum ( E .  viminalis ) for breeding and Slaty Sheoak ( Allocasuarina   muelleriana ) for foraging (Joseph 1982; P. Mooney 2007, pers. comm.; Pepper 1993, 1996).The Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) does not occur in any of the threatened ecological communities, nor is it associated with any other threatened species, listed under the EPBC Act.','The Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) feeds almost exclusively on the seeds of Drooping Sheoak(Bebbington 1990; Joseph 1982; Pepper 1993, 1996). It occasionally also feeds on the seeds of Slaty Sheoak(Glossy Black-Cockatoo Recovery Team, unpublished data; L. Pedler 2007, pers. comm.; Pepper 1993). It was reported to feed on the seeds of an unknown species of  Acacia  by Cleland (1942), but numerous observers have been unable to confirm this during extensive observations conducted over more than a decade as part of the recovery effort. Consequently, it is believed that the record of Cleland (1942) could refer to a different species of cockatoo, such as the Yellow-tailed Black-Cockatoo (L. Pedler 2007, pers. comm.). The Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) has sometimes been observed chewing on the bark, wood or fruit of Sugar Gum, and on the branches of  Allocasuarina  trees, but this activity seems to be associated with social and grooming behaviour rather than foraging (Mooney & Pedler 2005; Pepper 1993, 1996).The Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) spends much of its day foraging, especially during the breeding season (Chapman & Paton 2002; Pepper 1993, 1996). It forages by walking or climbing along the branches of a food tree, and stopping intermittently to pick at all cones that are within reach, before moving on a short distance in the tree to a new clump of cones (Pepper 1996, 2000). It feeds on closed seed cones (Joseph 1982; Pepper 2000) by removing a cone from a tree with the bill, and then transferring the cone to the left foot. The cone is then rotated with the foot while the bird shreds the outer layer of the cone with its bill and removes the seeds with its tongue. The husked fragments of the cone, and the empty cone itself, are both discarded (Crowley & Garnett 2001; Joseph 1982; Pepper 1993, 1996).The Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) forages in trees of varying size and density (Mooney & Pedler 2005). It appears to prefer foraging in large trees that have large seeds, a high ratio of seed mass to cone mass, and a high proportion of seeds with kernels (Crowley & Garnett 2001; Mooney & Pedler 2005; Pepper 2000). Individual birds tend to feed in one tree for hours at a time. They usually remain in one small foraging area for a period of several days or weeks. They often return to individual trees that have been used previously, and will sometimes make repeated visits to one tree over a period of several weeks, until the tree is almost stripped of cones (Pepper 1996, 2000).The Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) drinks in the late afternoon after feeding or, on hot days, in both the morning and afternoon. It drinks at stream pools and man-made stock ponds and, after heavy rains, from flooded tree hollows (Pepper 1996).The extreme dependence of the Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) on Drooping Sheoak for food makes this subspecies highly vulnerable to any process (such as wildfire or clearing) that might reduce the extent or availability of Drooping Sheoak dominated habitats (Mooney & Pedler 2005).','Current threats to the long-term survival and recovery of the Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) include a low rate of recruitment of juveniles into the adult population, and the loss of habitat due to wildfire, land clearance and grazing (Mooney & Pedler 2005). Current potential threats include the spread of the infectious and fatal Psittacine Beak and Feather (or Psittacine Circovirus) Disease (DEH 2005q), the loss of genetic diversity due to inbreeding, the removal of eggs or nestlings for the pet trade, and the loss of community support for the recovery program (Mooney & Pedler 2005).The past declines in Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) numbers and distribution have been attributed to habitat loss. This was caused by the widespread clearance of  Allocasuarina  habitat for settlement and agriculture, and the harvesting of  Allocasuarina  trees for timber and firewood, and also, perhaps, by an increase in the frequency of fires since the time of European settlement (Baird 1986; Cleland & Sims 1968; Joseph 1989b; Mooney & Pedler 2005)Low Rate of RecruitmentThe low recruitment rate of the Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) has been attributed to four factors: predation, mostly by Brushtail Possums; interference at nests by Galahs, Little Corellas and Suphur-crested Cockatoos; a shortage of suitable nest hollows due to past management practices (including clearing, harvesting, ring-barking and burning) and to competition for tree hollows with other species including Brushtail Possums, Yellow-tailed Black-Cockatoos, Galahs, Little Corellas, and introduced Honey Bees; and the breeding biology of the Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) (pairs that breed successfully rear only one fledgeling per year) (Garnett et al. 1999; Mooney & Pedler 2005). The impact of predation by Brushtail Possums has been eased by the introduction of management and recovery measures such as the application of iron collars around tree trunks and pruning of overlapping canopy to prevent possums from gaining access to Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) nests. Population monitoring has shown that breeding success has almost tripled since the introduction of these measures (Mooney & Pedler 2005). However, incidences of nest competition and nest interference could possibly have become more frequent because the Kangaroo Island populations of the Galah and Little Corella, and possibly the Yellow-tailed Black-Cockatoo, have increased in recent decades (Garnett et al. 2000; Mooney & Pedler 2005).Habitat LossWildfire and altered fire regimesWildfire is a major threat to the habitat of the Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island). There are numerous wildfire events each year on Kangaroo Island,  caused mainly by farm machinery, lightning strikes, and the accidental spread of fire from stubble burn-off. The manner in which wildfire is most likely to affect the Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) population is through the loss of trees used for feeding and/or nesting. It takes at least ten years for stands of  Allocasuarina verticillata  to recover their fruiting capacity after being burnt by fire. Trees that contain hollows suitable for nesting are thought to be at least 100 years old. The loss of stands of these trees in a series of fires over ten to fifteen years, or in a single widespread catastrophic fire, could significantly reduce the amount of food and/or the number of nesting sites available to the Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island), and this in turn could have a significant negative effect on breeding success (Mooney & Pedler 2005; Pepper 1997). It is possible that such fires could also affect the Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) population in other ways, for example, by increasing predation, habitat fragmentation, competition for tree hollows, and the potential for inbreeding (Burbidge & Raines 2003; Mooney & Pedler 2005; Pepper 1997).Though fire can have a negative impact on the Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) and its habitat, periodic fire is necessary for the habitat of the Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) to regenerate effectively. It takes many decades for fire to generate suitable foraging and nesting habitat, and thus the need to determine and establish an appropriate fire regime is considered to be of critical importance to the conservation effort (Mooney & Pedler 2005).Land clearance formation of new conservation reserves the establishment of Heritage Agreements with some private landowners the introduction of the  Native Vegetation Act   1991 , which prohibits broad-scale clearance of native vegetation, and the introduction other legislation and regulations by the South Australian government and the listing of the Glossy Black-Cockatoo (Kangaroo Island) under the EPBC Act 1999 (Garnett et al. 2000; Mooney & Pedler 2005). Grazing Psittacine Beak and Feather (Psittacine Circovirus) Disease Loss of Genetic Diversity Due to Inbreeding Removal of Eggs or Nestlings for the Pet Trade Loss of Volunteer Support for the Recovery Program','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64436'),('64438','Fregetta grallaria grallaria','Vulnerable','Aves','Hydrobatidae','The White-bellied Storm-Petrel (Tasman Sea) is about 20 cm long. It has a wingspan of about 40 to 48 cm and a mass of 45 to 65 g (Marchant & Higgins 1990; Hutton 1991). It is polymorphic. In its most common form, a light morph, it is a blackish-brown colour, with white fringes to the feathers of the shoulders, back, and rump; a pale greyish-brown patch on the shoulder of each wing; a white patch on the upper tail-coverts; a white lower breast, belly and vent; white flanks; a large white panel on the underside of each wing; and some white in the under tail-coverts. In the less common dark morph, it is dark blackish-brown except for some white mottling on the belly and upper tail-coverts, and a patch of dark brown on the shoulder of each wing (Marchant & Higgins 1990; van Tets & Fullagar 1984). Intermediate plumage morphs, displaying a continuous variation in characters between the light and dark morphs, also have been recorded. The plumages of adult males and adult females are alike, and juvenile birds cannot be distinguished from the adults (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The White-bellied Storm-Petrel occurs across sub-tropical and tropical waters in the Tasman Sea, Coral Sea and, possibly, the central Pacific Ocean (Harrison 1983; Hutton 1991; Marchant & Higgins 1990). In the non-breeding season, it reaches and forages over near-shore waters along the continental shelf of mainland Australia (Holmes 1977; Priddel 1996). It breeds, in Australian territory, on offshore islets and rocks in the Lord Howe Island group (Hutton 1991). It nests in crevices between large volcanic rocks (Fullagar et al. 1974; Hutton 1991), and in burrows excavated in banks (Hindwood 1940; McAllan et al. 2004). Breeding colonies are often situated along dykes (Fullagar 2002, pers. comm.). The White-bellied Storm-Petrel (Tasman Sea) does not occur in any of the ecological communities that are listed as threatened under the  EPBC Act 1999 . It is not known to associate with any other species or subspecies that is listed as threatened under the  EPBC Act   1999 .','The White-bellied Storm-Petrel (Tasman Sea) feeds on small crustaceans and squid (Hutton 1991).The White-bellied Storm-Petrel (Tasman Sea) forages by skimming low over the ocean, sometimes pattering the water with its feet, and plucking small crustaceans and squid from beneath the surface of the water. It forages both at day and at night, usually far from shore (Hutton 1991). The White-bellied Storm-Petrel has been observed foraging with petrels  Pterodroma , Buller\'s Shearwaters  Puffinus bulleri  and Masked Boobies  Sula dactylatra  in the southern Pacific Ocean (Ainley & Boekelheide 1983). It is possible that such foraging associations could also occur with the White-bellied Storm-Petrel (Tasman Sea), given that the pelagic distribution of the White-bellied Storm-Petrel (Tasman Sea) overlaps with the pelagic distributions of Buller\'s Shearwater, the Masked Booby, and several species of petrel (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The only potential threat to the White-bellied Storm-Petrel (Tasman Sea) that has been identified is the accidental introduction of exotic terrestrial predators, specifically rats or cats, to the offshore islets and rocks on which the White-bellied Storm-Petrel (Tasman Sea) breeds (Baker et al. 2002; Garnett & Crowley 2000). The White-bellied Storm-Petrel (Tasman Sea) formerly bred on Lord Howe Island, but the breeding colonies on Lord Howe Island were eliminated during the 20th century, evidently as a result of predation by cats and, possibly, Black Rats (Fullagar & Disney 1975; Hindwood 1940; Priddel 1996).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64438'),('64440','Geophaps scripta scripta','Vulnerable','Aves','Columbidae','The Squatter Pigeon (southern) is a medium-sized, ground-dwelling pigeon that measures approximately 30 cm in length and weighs about 190-250 g. Adults are predomiNAtly grey-brown, but have black and white stripes on the face and throat, blue-grey skin around the eyes, dark-brown (and some patches of iridescent green or violet) on the upper surfaces of the wings, blue-grey on the lower breast and belly, white on the lower region, flanks of the belly and extending onto the under surfaces of the wings, and a blackish-brown band along the trailing edge of the tail. They have black bills, dark-brown irises, and dull-purple legs and feet. The sexes are similar in appearance (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Squatter Pigeon (southern) habitat is generally defined as open-forests to sparse, open-woodlands and scrub that are (Baldwin 1975; Beruldsen 1972; Cooper et al. 2014; EPA 2006; Frith 1982b; Leach 1988; North 1913-14; Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011):mostly dominated in the overstorey by  Eucalyptus ,  Corymbia ,  Acacia  or  Callitris  speciesremNAt, regrowth or partly modified vegetation communities, andwithin 3 km of water bodies or courses.In New South Wales, the Squatter Pigeon (southern) is thought to have formerly occurred in woodlands dominated in the overstorey by  Eucalyptus  species, intersected with patches of  Acacia  species and stands of Cypress Pine ( Callitris columellaris ) and which have a groundcover of grasses and herbs (Frith 1982b).Foraging  and b reeding  habitatSoil landscapes are good indicators of where natural, foraging and breeding habitats for the Squatter Pigeon (southern) occur (Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011). Well-draining, gravelly, sandy or loamy soils support the open-forest to woodland communities with patchy, tussock-grassy understories that support the subspecies\' foraging and breeding requirements. Given that the subspecies nests in shallow depressions in the ground, it requires well-draining soils. The subspecies also prefers to forage and dust-bathe on bare ground under an open canopy of trees (Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011).Natural foraging habitat for the Squatter Pigeon (southern) is any remNAt or regrowth open-forest to sparse, open-woodland or scrub dominated by  Eucalyptus ,  Corymbia ,  Acacia  or  Callitris  species, on sandy or gravelly soils, within 3 km of a suitable, permanent or seasonal waterbody (Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011).Breeding habitat occurs on stony rises occurring on sandy or gravelly soils, within 1 km of a suitable, permanent waterbody (Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011).Typically, the ground covering vegetation layer in foraging and breeding habitat is considerably patchy consisting of native, perennial tussock grasses or a mix of perennial tussock grasses and low shrubs or forbs. This patchy, ground layer of vegetation rarely exceeds 33% of the ground area. The remaining ground surface consisting of bare patches of gravelly or dusty soil and areas lightly covered in leaf litter and coarse, woody debris (e.g. fallen trees, logs and smaller debris). The patchiness of the ground layer vegetation in patches of foraging and breeding habitats tends to be variable over a given area (Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011).In Queensland, Squatter Pigeon (southern) foraging and breeding habitat is known to occur on well-draining, sandy or loamy soils on low, gently sloping, flat to undulating plains and foothills (i.e. Queensland Regional Ecosystem Land Zone 5), and lateritic (duplex) soils on low \'jump-ups\' and escarpments (i.e. Queensland Regional Ecosystem Land Zone 7) (Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011). In New South Wales, the subspecies\' foraging and breeding habitat occurs on the same soil types as occur in Queensland, and may occur in open-forests and woodlands on black clay soils in the more temperate regions of the subspecies\' range in NSW (Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011).Water resourcesThe Squatter Pigeon (southern) is known to access suitable waterbodies to drink on a daily basis. Waterbodies suitable for the subspecies include permanent or seasonal rivers, creeks, lakes, ponds and waterholes, and artificial dams. The subspecies prefers to drink where there is gently sloping, bare ground on which to approach and stand at the water\'s edge. While patchy to moderate ground covering vegetation may occur along the banks of suitable water bodies, a small patch (less than a square metre) of bare ground at the water\'s edge is all that the bird requires (Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011).Waterbodies that are suitable for the subspecies occur on the lower, gentle slopes and plateaus of sandstone ranges (equivalent to Queensland Regional Ecosystem Land Zone 10), alluvial clay soils on river or creek flats (represented by Queensland Regional Ecosystem Land Zone 3) or non-alluvial clay soils on flats or plains which are not associated with current alluvial deposits (represented by Queensland Regional Ecosystem Land Zone 4). Hence, where natural foraging or breeding habitat occurs (i.e. on Queensland Regional Ecosystem Land Zones 5 and 7), the Squatter Pigeon (southern) may be found in vegetation types growing on the above soil types.  Dispersal habitatSquatter Pigeon (southern) dispersal habitat is any forest or woodland occurring between patches of foraging or breeding habitat, and suitable waterbodies. Such patches of vegetation tend not to be suitable for the subspecies\' foraging or breeding, but facilitate the local movement of the subspecies between patches of foraging habitat, breeding habitat and/or waterbodies, or the wider dispersal of individuals in search of reliable water sources during the dry season or during droughts (Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011).Clay soils usually support denser vegetation types which the Squatter Pigeon (southern) is unlikely to use as foraging or breeding habitat. However, given that clay soil types tend to form in lower lying areas where the drainage and storage of water naturally occurs in the landscape, the subspecies is known to utilise forests or woodlands occurring on these soils to move between patches of foraging or breeding habitat and suitable waterbodies (Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011).The Squatter Pigeon (southern) is only likely to occur in vegetation on non-alluvial clays (equivalent to Queensland Regional Ecosystem Land Zone 4) where the ground covering vegetation layer has been thinned through current land-use practices in a way that suits the subspecies, for example through a light cattle grazing regime (Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011).The Squatter Pigeon (southern) has been recorded in sown pastures with scattered remNAt trees (Leach 1988; Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011). The subspecies often moves into adjacent natural grasslands and highly modified or degraded habitats, such as pastures, stockyards, road reserves, railway easements and settlements, to forage for seed on the ground, drink from stock troughs or dams with gently sloping banks, and dust-bathe on bare, dusty ground (Longmore 1976; Lord 1956; Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011).The subspecies is unlikely to move far from woodland trees which provide protection from predatory birds (Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011). Where scattered trees still occur, and the distance of cleared land between remNAt trees or patches of habitat does not exceed 100 m, individuals may be found foraging in, or moving across modified or degraded environments (Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011).','It is estimated that approximately 95% of the Squatter Pigeon\'s (southern) diet consists of seeds (Chrome 1976b). The subspecies mainly forages on seeds which have fallen to the ground from low vegetation, such as grasses, herbs and shrubs (Chrome 1976b; Chrome and Shields 1992). Crome (1976b) found that the subspecies sometimes eats fallen seeds from  Acacia  species.Squatter Pigeons (southern) commonly forage along the sides of roads or along dusty tracks. The subspecies is also commonly seen foraging in and around stockyards, where they also pick seeds and ticks from the droppings of livestock and drink from stock troughs (Chrome 1976b; Chrome and Shields 1992; EPA 2006; Porter 2006 pers. comm.).No other information is available on the diet of the Squatter Pigeon (southern). The diet of the northern subspecies is said to consist of seeds (of a variety of plants including grasses, legumes, herbs, shrubs and trees) and arthropods (mainly insects), and varies according to seasonal cycles in the availability of food items (Crome 1976b; Crome and Shields 1992; Frith 1982b).','Historic threatsThe combined effect of habitat loss and degradation, and predation, is thought to have caused the decline in Squatter Pigeon ( Geophaps scripta)  during the late 19th and early 20th centuries (Barnard 1925; Campbell 1924; Frith 1982b; Le Souef 1923; Lord 1956; North 1913-14) and are continuing to threaten the subspecies today (EPA 2006; Garnett 1993; Frith 1982b; Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011).The subspecies was hunted by settlers. Its \'tame\' nature made it an easy and susceptible target (Campbell & Barnard 1917; Le Souef 1923; North 1913-14; White 1922e). The nature and extent of the impact that hunting had upon the Squatter Pigeon (southern) is unknown. The species has been fully protected in Queensland since the early 1920s (Chisholm 1922), but some illegal shooting has continued to occur (Crome 1976b; Frith 1982b).Current threatsThe main threats to the Squatter Pigeon (southern) are the loss and fragmentation of habitat due to clearing for agricultural purposes, the degradation of habitat by overgrazing by domesticated herbivores, especially the sheep ( Ovis  species) and the cow ( Bos  species), the degradation of habitat by invasive weeds, such as Buffel Grass ( Cenchrus ciliaris ), and predation by numerous avian and terrestrial predators (EPA 2006; Frith 1982b; Le Souef 1923; North 1913-14; Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011).The clearance of woodland habitat continues to fragment the Squatter Pigeon (southern) population (Garnett & Crowley 2000). The overstocking of habitats with livestock remains a major problem (Squatter Pigeon Workshop 2011), and large areas of the subspecies\' habitat is gradually being degraded in Central Queensland by the establishment of the highly invasive, improved pasture species, Buffel Grass, and its associated management practices (such as blade-ploughing) (Porter 2006 pers. comm.).Known predators include birds of prey, snakes, the dingo ( Canis lupus dingo ), the fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) and the cat ( Felis catus ). Feral cats and foxes are likely to be having the greatest impact upon the Squatter Pigeon (southern) population (Ayers et al. 1996; EPA 2006). For example, cats were implicated in the decline of Squatter Pigeon (southern) sub-populations in the Duaringa and Murphy\'s Creek districts in south-eastern Queensland (Barnard 1925; Campbell 1924; Lord 1956) and most declines in sub-populations have occurred in areas where foxes are highly abundant (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Porter 2006 pers. comm.).Catastrophic threatsIt has been suggested that drought and bushfires may exacerbate the impacts of other threatening processes and contribute to, or accelerate, some population declines as a result (Frith 1982; North 1913-14). For example, there was a rapid decline in Squatter Pigeon (southern) numbers in eastern Central Queensland following a severe drought in 1901-02 (Barnard 1927; Barnard 1925). Barnard (1925, 1927) attributed the cause of this decline to predation by cats, but it has since been speculated that the decline may have been due to the combined impacts of habitat loss, over-grazing by cattle and the impact of the drought (Frith 1982b).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64440'),('64441','Geophaps smithii smithii','Vulnerable','Aves','Columbidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64441'),('64442','Malurus coronatus coronatus','Endangered','Aves','Maluridae','The Purple-crowned Fairy-wren (western) is a small bird measuring approximately 14 cm in length, with a wing-span of approximately 16 cm, and weighing 9-13 g (Higgins et al. 2001; Rowley & Russell 1993). The plumage varies according to sex and age and, in males, season, but all birds, regardless of age, sex or time of year, are mostly warm-brown above, and white below with a buff wash, and have a long blue tail, dark bill, dark irises, and brownish legs and feet (Higgins et al. 2001).','The Purple-crowned Fairy-wren (western) inhabits dense, riparian vegetation in the wet-dry tropics of Western Australia and the Northern Territory (Boekel 1979; Smith & Johnstone 1977; Rowley & Russell 1993, 1997). It is found near permanent rivers and springs (or associated billabongs and swamps) (Rowley 1988, 1993), where it occupies dense thickets of  Pandanus aquaticus  or canegrass and also occurs, less frequently, in rushes and shrubs (Boekel 1979; Mathews 1918; Rowley 1993; Sharland 1962; Smith & Johnstone 1977; Storr 1980; Rothwell 1962; van Doorn 2006, pers. comm.; Whitlock 1925).The term canegrass is a generic one that is used to describe various species of bamboos and grasses that grow in dense thickets close to permanent water (Rowley 1993); the species of canegrass that is most used by the Purple-crowned Fairy-wren is  Chionachne cyathopoda , but it also utilizes other canegrass species including  Mnesithea rottboellioides  and  Ophiuros exaltatus  (Higgins et al. 2001; A. van Doorn 2006, pers. comm.). The habitats occupied by the Purple-crowned Fairy-wren (western) also usually contain tall emergent trees, which are generally species of  Eucalyptus  and  Melaleuca . These trees are normally little used by the species (Boekel 1979; Rowley 1993; van Doorn 2006, pers. comm.).The Purple-crowned Fairy-wren (western) is said to rarely occur more than 10 m from permanent rivers and springs (Rowley 1988, 1993). However, it is regularly observed more than 10 m, and sometimes up to 1 km or more, from the Victoria River (Higgins et al. 2001; van Doorn 2006, pers. comm.), and it has also been recorded up to 180 m from the Fitzroy River (Smith & Johnstone 1977).The Purple-crowned Fairy-wren (western) may also occur in other habitat types. For example, it is plentiful in dense grasslands at the Victoria River Crossing in the Northern Territory (Higgins et al. 2001), and was once recorded in a stand of mangroves (Wheeler 1965). In some areas of the Victoria River, it is common in dense patches infested by weeds such as  Xanthium strumarium  (Higgins et al. 2001; van Doorn 2006, pers. comm.).Tall emergent trees (generally species of  Eucalyptus  and  Melaleuca ) are not normally used by the fairy-wren, but they provide an important refuge when the rivers flood and burst their banks and the more typical habitat of the fairy-wren becomes inundated (Boekel 1979; Rowley 1993; van Doorn 2006, pers. comm.).','The Purple-crowned Fairy-wren (western) feeds on insects (including beetles, ants, bugs, wasps, grasshoppers, moths and flies) and their larvae, and spiders (Boekel 1979; Hall 1902; Mathews 1918; Rowley & Russell 1993; van Doorn 2006, pers. comm.). It is also said to feed on leaf material (Hall 1902) and, based on species level information (Schodde 1982), may also take some seeds.The diet of the Purple-crowned Fairy-wren (western) may vary somewhat according to climatic conditions. For example, ants appear to be a more important food source during dry years than they are in years of greater rainfall (Rowley & Russell 1993).The Purple-crowned Fairy-wren (western) forages in thickets of  Pandanus  and canegrass (especially  Chionachne cyathopoda ), and occasionally in herbs, shrubs, trees and adjacent grasslands (Boekel 1979; Rowley & Russell 1993; A. van Doorn 2006, pers. comm.). It forages on the ground and in vegetation (see below), and sometimes captures insects in flight (Hall 1902; Mathews 1918; Rowley & Russell 1993). On the ground, it hops rapidly and searches for food items amongst the leaf litter, roots, and around the boles of  Pandanus  plants (Boekel 1979; Hall 1902; Rowley & Russell 1993; Whitlock 1925; van Doorn 2006, pers. comm.). In vegetation, it moves rapidly amongst  Pandanus  leaves, using its feet to grasp the blades of the leaves, and searches amongst the debris that becomes trapped in  Pandanus  plants during floods (Boekel 1979; Rowley & Russell 1993).','The Purple-crowned Fairy-wren (western) is threatened by the loss and degradation of its riparian habitat. This is mainly due to overgrazing and trampling by cattle and sheep, and burning (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Officer 1964; Rowley 1988, 1993), but degraded habitats are also susceptible to soil erosion and weed invasion, which can prevent the native vegetation inhabited by the fairy-wren from regenerating (Rowley 1993). The loss and degradation of riparian habitat due to pastoral activity and associated processes, and to the flooding of the Ord River valley in the 1970s to form Lake Argyle and Lake Kununurra, led to a severe reduction in the distribution and numbers of the fairy-wren during the 20th century (Rowley 1988, 1993).The impact, or potential impact, of these processes is likely to have subsided in more recent years. The impacts of pastoral activity have been mitigated in some parts of the Kimberley and Victoria River system by the exclusion of stock from riparian areas on some large stations (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Rowley 1993), and many of the remaining populations are located on lands that are now designated as conservation reserves (Higgins et al. 2001). However, the effectiveness of these actions has probably been partially diminished in the Victoria region by damage to fences on many properties, which allows stock to access riparian areas, and increased numbers of buffalo, which potentially graze and trample, and therefore degrade, riparian habitat (A. van Doorn 2006, pers. comm.).The degree of weed invasion is increasing along many rivers occupied by the fairy-wren (Garnett & Crowley 2000), but one of the densest fairy-wren populations on the Ord River occurs in weed-infested riparian understorey (Garnett & Crowley 2000). This suggests that an increase in weeds may actually be beneficial (Higgins et al. 2001) in some instances. However, this is not the case along the Victoria River system, where weed-infested habitat is used less often than native vegetation, and is not used at all for breeding purposes (A. van Doorn 2006, pers. comm.).There is some potential for extensive flooding or a large fire, especially at the end of the dry season, to have a major impact on populations if most or all of the riparian vegetation along a river or river system is affected (E. Russell 2006, pers. comm.; A. van Doorn 2006, pers. comm.)','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64442'),('64443','Neochmia phaeton evangelinae','Endangered','Aves','Passeridae','The Crimson Finch (white-bellied) is a small bird that measures about 13 cm long, has a wing-span of about 16 or 17 cm, and a mass of about eight to 10 g.','The Crimson Finch (white-bellied) occurs in rank grasses and other vegetation that grows near bodies of fresh water such as rivers and swamps. It is especially common in habitats that are associated with  Pandanus  or dune swales (Dorricott & Garnett 2004; Garnett & Bredl 1985; MacGillivray 1918).Two key habitat types have been identified. The first,  Pandanus  type habitat, is usually located within 10 km of the coast, and consists of swampy grasslands with scattered  Pandanus spiralis , or of dune woodlands with a dense understorey of long grass, a midstorey dominated by  P .  spiralis , and a canopy comprised of varying species of trees. Crimson Finch (white-bellied) sub-populations near Aurukun and Pormpuraaw inhabit this type of habitat (Dorricott & Garnett 2004).The second key habitat, cane-grass type habitat, consists of open forest with a dense understorey of grasses, and is usually located along watercourses. This is the type of habitat used by the Crimson Finch (white-bellied) sub-populations near Kowanyama and in the Lakefield region. The canopy in cane-grass habitat is usually dominated by  Corymbia tessellaris  on the east coast of the Cape York Peninsula, and by  C .  tessellaris  var.  dallachyana  on the west coast. The midstorey includes deciduous shrubs and palms such as  Corypha elata  and species of  Livistona . In the Lakefield region, the understorey is mostly composed of  Chionachne cyathopoda , although other grasses probably fulfil a similar role (Dorricott & Garnett 2004).The Crimson Finch (white-bellied) has also been recorded around human settlement at Pormpuraaw (Garnett & Bredl 1985), where the habitat of the finch extends right to the edge of the town (Todd 2006, pers. comm.).The preferred habitat of the Crimson Finch (white-bellied) is regularly burnt by wildfire and deliberate burning. The finch is able to persist in burnt areas by occupying unburnt shrubs and other habitat remNAts nearby. For example, near Pormpuraaw, the Crimson Finch (white-bellied) moved from its burnt preferred habitat into vegetation surrounding a lagoon in a crocodile farm, and into unburnt vine forest on nearby sand dunes (Garnett & Crowley 2000).The Crimson Finch (white-bellied) is not known to occur in any of the threatened ecological communities listed under the  EPBC Act 1999 . However, the sub-population near Pormpuraaw could potentially occur in \'the community of native species dependent on natural discharge of groundwater from the Great Artesian Basin\'. The Great Artesian Basin community is listed as Endangered under the  EPBC Act 1999 ,The distribution of the Crimson Finch (white-bellied) also overlaps with that of the Golden-shouldered Parrot  Psephotus chrysopterygius , and the Buff-breasted Button-quail  Turnix olivii , both of which occur in grassland habitats (Dorricott & Garnett 2004), and which are listed as Endangered under the  EPBC Act 1999 .','The Crimson Finch (white-bellied) feeds mainly on immature and ripe seeds of grasses and herbaceous plants, including  Chrysopogon elongatus  and  Tridax   procumbens , and species of  Hibiscus ,  Panicum  and  Themeda  (Thompson 1935; Todd et al. 2003). It also takes some animal matter such as insects and their larvae, lerp (the sugary protective coating excreted by psyllid nymphs) and spiders (MacGillivray 1918; Todd et al. 2003). The composition of the diet varies throughout the year, but seeds are the main food in all months. Animal items appear to be taken opportunistically (i.e. when they are available) (Todd et al. 2003), although spiders are said to be very prominent in the diet of adults when they are feeding nestlings (Todd 2006, pers. commm).The Crimson Finch (white-bellied) forages on the ground and in vegetation (Todd et al. 2003; Todd 2006, pers. comm.), and occasionally captures insects in flight (MacGillivray 1918). It takes seeds from the ground and from the seed-heads of grasses and herbaceous plants, and plucks spiders and insects from the foliage of  Pandanus  and  Corypha  palms. It has also been observed collecting lerp from the canopy foliage of  Corymbia tessellaris , and insect larvae from among the shoots of the legume  Dendrolobium umbellatum  (Todd et al. 2003; Todd 2006, pers. comm.), and capturing termite alates in flight (MacGillivray 1918). The Crimson Finch (white-bellied) usually stays near cover (i.e. near dense grasses or trees and shrubs, such as  Barringtonia acutanglia ) when foraging in grasslands or on patches of open, and often burnt, ground (Dorricott & Garnett 2004; Todd 2006, pers. comm.).','The threats to the Crimson Finch (white-bellied), and their impact upon the subspecies, are poorly known. The major threat is habitat degradation. This can be caused by fires, invasive weeds and grazing animals (Dorricott & Garnett 2004).Fire:  Fires, if they occur at the wrong time, and especially during the dry season, can destroy the finch\'s habitat. Large fires, capable of destroying large areas of habitat, are an infrequent occurrence in the riparian habitat that is occupied by the Crimson Finch (white-bellied) in the southern part of its range. However, it is possible that these rare but extensive fires in the late dry season may have restricted the Crimson Finch (white-bellied) to small areas of habitat along the banks of creeks (Dorricott & Garnett 2004; Garnett & Crowley 2000).Invasive weeds:  The Rubber Vine  Cryptostegia grandifolia , which is classified as a  Weed of National Significance , has invaded some areas of Crimson Finch (white-bellied) habitat along the Mitchell River, where it is smothering the native vegetation, and may have been responsible for the disappearance of the subspecies from some parts of the Laura River (Garnett & Crowley 2000). The Rubber Vine degrades the habitat of the finch by shading native grasses and preventing their regeneration (Dorricott & Garnett 2004).Grazing:  Grazing mammals such as pigs and cattle can degrade riparian habitats during the dry season when they congregate around sources of fresh water and destroy the rank grasses by feeding upon and trampling them (Garnett & Crowley 2000; M.K. Todd 2006, pers. comm.). One formerly occupied site near Aurukun was degraded in this manner (Garnett & Crowley 2000).The other threat that has been identified is illegal trapping for the bird trade. The Crimson Finch (white-bellied) is highly valued in the avicultural industry, and a number of birds were introduced for trade, from an unknown source, during the 1990s. Information from aviculturists suggests that the illegal collection of birds is now a minor threat, and is not sufficiently common to require specific action, although some illegal trapping may continue (Dorricott & Garnett 2004; Garnett & Crowley 2000).It is considered unlikely that a cyclone could have a major impact on the Crimson Finch (white-bellied) population (M.K. Todd 2006, pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64443'),('64444','Pachycephala pectoralis xanthoprocta','Vulnerable','Aves','Pachycephalidae','At the species level, the Golden Whistler is a small songbird, growing to 16.5–18.5 cm in height. Males have a distinctive black head, extending to the top of the nape and under the throat in a thick band. The black plumage area separates the white throat from the rich golden yellow nape band and chest/underparts. The male\'s tail is grey with a black tip. The females, in contrast, are grey-brown above, and grey-buff underneath. The amount of lemon-coloured plumage on the vent/under-tail area varies with the geographic location of the bird (Pizzey & Knight 1999).','The Norfolk Island Golden Whistler usually inhabits shrubby understorey in rainforest, palm forest and Norfolk Island Pine ( Araucaria heterophylla ) forest. It also occurs in regenerating forest and gardens, and sometimes in remNAt patches of vegetation in farmland (Hermes 1985; Smithers & Disney 1969). In the 1960s and 1970s, it was recorded in or at the edges of habitat pockets, including riparian clumps of rainforest trees and thickets, throughout the island (Smithers & Disney 1969; Schodde et al. 1983). However, much habitat has been cleared or fragmented since then, and the subspecies\' range has contracted as a result. The bird is now mainly confined to the largest tract of remNAt forest in NINP (De Ravin 1975; Garnett & Crowley 2000).Hull (1909) reported that the Norfolk Island Golden Whistler nests at \'no great height\' in small trees such as Currajong (or Kurrajong-  Brachychiton populneum ) and Lemon ( Citrus limon ) trees, or in hanging masses of vines.','On Norfolk Island, insects and berries are eaten by the Golden Whistler (Wakelin 1968). In Australia, the species is known to eat a large variety of insects, especially larvae and Coleoptera (beetles) (Higgins & Peter 2002).The movements of the Norfolk Island Golden Whistler are slow and deliberate. It hops from branch to branch in search of food, and often ventures onto the ground (Hermes 1985; Wakelin 1968), where it sometimes hops along the ground gleaning from leaf litter (Robinson 2002 pers. comm.).','The Golden Whistler has declined due to: habitat clearance and fragmentation (including clearing of vegetation in gardens and subdivision) (De Ravin 1975; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hermes 1985); and introduced predators such as the Black Rat ( Rattus rattus ) and the Cat ( Felis catus ) (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hermes 1985).Cup-shaped nests, placed in accessible sites, are vulnerable to predation by rats ( Rattus  sp.) (Major 1989; Robinson 1988).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64444'),('64445','Pachyptila turtur subantarctica','Vulnerable','Aves','Procellariidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64445'),('64447','Poephila cincta cincta','Endangered','Aves','Passeridae','At the species level, the Black-throated Finch is a sleek but thickset grass-finch, which measures approximately 12 cm in length, and weighs approximately 15 g. It has a grey head and neck, with a short black loral stripe, and a conspicuous, large black \'bib\' over the chin, throat and upper breast. The bill is short, thick, conical and coloured black. The eye is a dark reddish-brown. The breast, back, and most of the belly, are brown. The wings are a darker shade of brown, and when folded have a narrow white stripe along the leading edge. The rump and the tail, which is short and rather rounded or square-tipped, are both black. The lower underbody is white, but with a black patch on the rear flanks. The legs and feet are a bright pinkish-red. Juveniles appear very similar to adults, but with duller colouring (Higgins et al. 2006a).','The Black-throated Finch (southern) occurs mainly in grassy, open woodlands and forests, typically dominated by  Eucalyptus ,  Corymbia  and  Melaleuca , and occasionally in tussock grasslands or other habitats (for example freshwater wetlands), often along or near watercourses, or in the vicinity of water (Baldwin 1976; Britton & Britton 2000; BTF Recovery Team 2004; Ley & Cook 2001; NRA 2005; Wieneke 1989). Almost all recent records of the finch from south of the tropics have been in riparian habitat (Baldwin 1976; BTF Recovery Team 2004; Ley & Cook 2001). The subspecies is thought to require a mosaic of different habitats in which it can find seed during the wet season (Mitchell 1996). Some of the more common species of eucalypts in woodlands and forests frequented by the subspecies include Narrow-leaved Ironbark ( E .  crebra ), River Red Gum ( E .  camaldulensis ), Silver-leaved Ironbark ( E .  melanophloia ), Reid River Box ( E .  brownii ), Yellowjacket ( E .  similis ) and Forest Red Gum ( E .  tereticornis ). The subspecies occasionally occurs in  Melaleuca  woodlands, or in grasslands comprised of genera such as  Astrebla ,  Dichanthium  or  Panicum  (BTF Recovery Team 2004).In NSW, all of the most recent records have been in riparian vegetation dominated by River Sheoak ( Casuarina cunninghamiana ) and Rough-barked Apple ( Angophora floribunda ) (BTF Recovery Team 2004). Around Inverell, the subspecies was formerly recorded in riparian vegetation consisting of thickets of Yellow Tea-tree ( Leptospermum flavescens ) and  Melaleuca , and dense stands of River Sheoak (Baldwin 1976). In south-eastern Queensland, it was formerly recorded in open forest on ridges, on grassy hillsides, and on \'mountain flats\' (Lord 1956). Recent studies conducted further north (near Townsville) have recorded the Black-throated Finch (southern) in both modified and relatively intact vegetation communities (Mitchell 1996; NRA 2005).The Black-throated Finch (southern) has occasionally been recorded in other habitats, including in freshwater wetlands (BTF Recovery Plan 2004), in cultivation surrounded by woodland (Hall 1974), and in a heavily grazed paddock (Ley & Cook 2001). It is likely that permanent sources of water (and the habitat surrounding these) provide refuge for Black-throated Finches (southern) during the dry season, especially during drought years (NRA 2007). Associations with other threatened species or ecological communitiesThe Black-throated Finch (southern) has been recorded in 21 regional ecosystems (all of which occur in Queensland) since 1994. Two of the 21 regional ecosystems are listed as Endangered under the Queensland  Vegetation Management Act 1999 :  Eucalyptus blakelyi  woodland on alluvial plains; and  E. conica ,  E .  microcarpa ,  E .  melliodora  woodland on alluvial plains; both of which occur within the Queensland section of the New England Tableland Bioregion. Two of the 21 regional ecosystems are listed as being Of Concern under the  Queensland Vegetation Management Act 1999 :  E. tereticornis  and/or  Eucalyptus  spp. tall woodland on alluvial plains in the Brigalow Belt South bioregion; and  E. camaldulensis  fringing open forest within the Queensland section of the New England Tableland Bioregion (BTF Recovery Team 2004).The regional ecosystems in Queensland are also assigned a biodiversity status by the Queensland Environmental Protection Agency. Three of the 21 regional ecosystems that the Black-throated Finch (southern) occurs in have a biodiversity status of Endangered:  E. blakelyi  woodland on alluvial plains;  E. conica ,  E .  microcarpa ,  E .  melliodora  woodland on alluvial plains; and  E. camadulensis  fringing open forest. Five of the regional ecosystems are assigned the biodiversity status Of Concern: mixed open forest to woodland commonly including  Corymbia clarksoniana ,  E. portuensis ,  E .  crebra ,  C .  citriodora  on red kandasols on Tertiary surfaces in the Einasleigh Uplands bioregion;  Melaleuca fluviatilis  and/or  E. camaldulensis  woodland along watercourses in the Desert Uplands bioregion;  E. camaldulensis  or less often  E .  tereticornis  open-forest to woodland fringing drainage lines in the Brigalow Belt North bioregion; freshwater wetlands in the Brigalow Belt North bioregion; and  E. tereticornis  and/or  Eucalyptus  spp. tall woodland on alluvial plains in the Brigalow Belt South bioregion (BTF Recovery Team 2004).The Black-throated Finch (southern) is not known to regularly associate with any other listed threatened species.','Black-throated Finches (southern) require habitat where there is access to seeding grasses and water, and will utilize a variety of different habitats for foraging (Mitchell 1996; NRA 2005), particularly in north Queensland during the wet season (BTF Recovery Team 2007; Mitchell 1996; Zann 1976). At Ross River Dam, Black-throated Finches (southern) mainly foraged around roads, but they were also seen feeding in other cleared and open areas, in tall open woodland dominated by species of  Erythrophloia  or  Platyphylla , in riparian habitats, and on flat, raised areas (Mitchell 1996).Black-throated Finches (southern) feed on the seeds of grasses (such as  Urochloa mosambicensis ,  Digitaria ciliaris ,  Melinis repens ,  Chloris inflata ) and herbaceous plants (Mitchell 1996; NRA 2005). There appears to be some seasonal variation in the diet. At Ross River Dam, their diet was dominated during the non-breeding period by seeds of  Urochloa mosambicensis . However, after dispersing into breeding areas,  Digitaria ciliaris  was the main species of seed eaten (Mitchell 1996).At the species level, Black-throated Finches feed mainly on the half-ripe seeds of grasses (for example,  Dactyloctenium ,  Digitaria ,  Eremochloa ,  Paspalidium ,  Setaria ), and less often on the seeds of other plants (for example  Stylosanthes ). They also eat insects (for example termites) and their larvae, especially during the wet (breeding) season (BTF Recovery Team 2004; Cayley 1932; Immelmann 1982; North 1901-14; Smedley 1904; Zann 1976). Black-throated Finches (southern) take seeds from the ground or from inflorescences. They obtain most of their food by pecking seeds from the ground. However, they will also reach or jump up to take seeds from low inflorescences, perch on stems to take seeds from inflorescences, perch on grass stems and use their body weight to bring the stems to the ground to feed, and reach for inflorenscences from perches other than the food plant (Mitchell 1996).At the species level, Black-throated Finches drink by sucking, submerging their bills in water for a few seconds at a time. They tend to drink mainly in the early morning and late afternoon, especially when water is scarce, but at sites where water is abundant small numbers may drink throughout the day (Immelmann 1982; Zann 1976).','The decline of Black-throated Finches (southern) began early in the 20th century, and coincided with the development of pastoralism (Franklin 1999a). The decline began, and has been most severe, in the southern part of their range, where the grazing of grassy, riparian woodlands (the main habitat of the subspecies) by sheep and rabbits is likely to have been a major cause of the contraction in range (BTF Recovery Team 2004; Frith 1982b; Garnett & Crowley 2000). The ongoing clearance of woodland habitats is likely to be increasing the pressure on the subspecies (Garnett & Crowley 2000). In addition, the trapping of birds for captive trade is a potential additional cause of the decline, and may have led to the extinction of some local populations (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Roberts 1979).Known threats to the Black-throated Finch (southern) include:Clearance and fragmentation of woodlands, riparian habitats and wattle shrublands (BTF Recovery Team 2004; NRA 2005).Degradation of habitat by domestic livestock and rabbits, including the alteration of fuel loads, vegetation structure and the availability of food during the wet season  (BTF Recovery Team 2004; NRA 2005).Alteration of habitat by changes in fire regimes (BTF Recovery Team 2004; NRA 2005).Invasion of habitat by exotic weeds, including exotic grasses (BTF Recovery Team 2004).Illegal trapping (BTF Recovery Team 2004).Predation by introduced predators (BTF Recovery Team 2004).Hybridization with the northern subspecies (BTF Recovery Team 2004).Other threatsIt has also been suggested that land management practices that alter and/or reduce the availability of food during critical stages of the life cycle, or that reduce the quantity, duration and/or distribution of water sources within a landscape, could have a detrimental effect on Black-throated Finch (southern) populations (NRA 2005).The distribution of the Black-throated Finch (southern) indicates that birds could be exposed to cyclonic activity. No information is available on the impact of cyclones upon Black-throated Finch (southern) populations, however, studies have shown that breeding can fail if nests are exposed to strong winds and heavy rainfall during storms (NRA 2005). This information, together with the small size and fragmented nature of the remaining populations, suggests that cyclones could potentially have a significant impact on the long-term survival of the subspecies.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64447');
INSERT INTO `animals_profile` VALUES ('64449','Psophodes nigrogularis nigrogularis','Endangered','Aves','Psophodidae','The Western Whipbird (western heath) is a medium-sized ground-dwelling songbird with a short crest, powerful legs, short wings and a long tail. It is 19–25.5 cm long and weighs 45 g. On adults, the upper body is olive and the underbody is olive or greyish, except for: a distinct, narrow, black submoustachial stripe bordered below by a narrow white submoustachial stripe; a black chin and throat; an off-white stripe along the centre of the breast and the belly, with fine blackish mottling on the latter. The tail has a blackish subterminal band and broad white tips. The upperwing is greyish-olive with a brown tinge, and the underwing is mostly light brownish-grey. The bill is blackish above and pinkish-brown below; the eyes are dull red; and the legs and feet are dark grey. The sexes are alike. Juveniles are similar to adults, but lack the submoustachial stripes, chin-throat patch and pale belly-stripe of adults, and are generally paler (Higgins & Peter 2002).','The Western Whipbird (western heath) inhabits dense heath-like shrubby thickets on coastal dunes, and mallee woodland or shrubland with an open upperstorey above a dense shrubby understorey (Ford 1971; Keast 1958b; Schodde & Mason 1991; Smith 1991b). Preferred habitat is usually 2–3 metres tall and dominated by shrubs such as  Agonis marginata , hakeas (e.g.  Hakea elliptica  and  H. trifurcata ), Showy Dryandra ( Banksia formosa ),  Eutaxia obovata,   Acacia mityfolia  and Heart-leaf Poison-bush ( Gastrolobium bilobum ), usually with a dense shrubby understorey, and sometimes intermixed with stunted eucalypts such as Marri ( Eucalyptus calophylla ) and Jarrah ( E. marginata ) (Gilfillan et al. 2007; Smith 1991b). A study in Two Peoples Bay Nature Reserve found that Western Whipbirds (western heath) mostly occur in shrubby thickets (62.9%), less often in the ecotone between heathland and low eucalypt forest, with a similar structure to the thicket habitat (23.6%), and very occasionally in heathland (8.6%) and low eucalyptus forest (4.9%) (Smith 1991b).The frequency of burning determines the structure of the component vegetation; in Two Peoples Bay, Western Whipbird (western heath) territories were established in some areas 4–6 years after fires had burnt the area, and 7–10 years in other areas (Smith 1985, 1991b). The subspecies is less sensitive to fires than the Noisy Scrub-bird ( Atrichornis clamosus ) (Garnett & Crowley 2000), and can survive a fire, provided that there is adequate unburnt vegetation nearby (McNee 1986). The topography of the Mount Gardner prevents the whole area being burnt at once, thus allowing the species to persist in unburnt refuge areas (Smith 1985).In Two Peoples Bay, the Western Whipbird (western heath) coexists with other EPBC Act threatened species such as the Vulnerable Western Bristlebird ( Dasyornis longirostris ) and Noisy Scrub-bird ( Atrichornis clamosus ) and the Endangered Western Ground Parrot ( Pezoporus wallicus flaviventris ).','The diet of the Western Whipbird (western heath) comprises invertebrates, mainly insects such as beetles, ants and grasshoppers and their larvae, but also occasionally gastropods (snails) and spiders, and very occasionally small reptiles (Milligan 1902; Smith 1991b; Whittell 1951). The Western Whipbird (western heath) forages actively on the ground, usually below dense low vegetation, where it probes leaf litter or dead stumps, and gleans food items from the lower sections of plants; and it very occasionally forages higher in the vegetation, where it pulls bark from trunks and branches, probes bark and flowers, and gleans foliage (Smith 1991b). Terrestrial foraging habits would make individuals vulnerable to predation, though the dense nature of the foraging habitat would mitigate this.','The range of the Western Whipbird (western heath) has contracted greatly due to land clearing for agriculture and changes to fire intensity and frequency in south-west WA. The current main threat to the subspecies is extensive or frequent fire (Ashby 1921; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Gilfillan et al. 2007; Higgins & Peter 2002; McNee 1986; Smith 1977, 1985, 1991b; Whitley 1971). The habitat of approximately half of the population of this subspecies was burnt by bushfires between 2001 and 2005 (Burbidge et al. 2005; Gilfillan et al. 2007).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64449'),('64450','Pterodroma neglecta neglecta','Vulnerable','Aves','Procellariidae','The Kermadec Petrel (western) has a length of 38 cm, a wingspan of 92 cm and a mass of 370–590 g (Hutton 1991; Marchant & Higgins 1990). On Lord Howe Island, most birds express a dark plumage morph, which consists of an almost entirely dark brown or blackish-brown body, with a few spots of white or grey on the face, white bases to the primary feathers, and black legs and feet (Brown 1979; Hutton 1991; Marchant & Higgins 1990; McAllan et al. 2004). However, some birds express a light plumage morph, which consists of a white or grey head, sooty-brown upperparts, white underparts, white bases to the primaries, and whitish-pink legs and feet. Others display plumage characters that are intermediate between these two extremes. In all plumage morphs the irides are brown and the bill is black (Hutton 1991; Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Kermadec Petrel (western) is a pelagic seabird that occurs in tropical, subtropical and temperate waters of the Pacific Ocean (Gould 1983; Gould & King 1967; Marchant & Higgins 1990; Mayr & Cottrell 1979; Reid et al. 2002; Spear et al. 1992; Wahl 1978). It has been recorded in waters of 15–25 °C in the subtropics (Gould 1983; Jenkins 1970) and in colder waters in temperate regions, with one bird sighted in the northern Pacific Ocean in waters of about 6 °C (Wahl 1978). It breeds on islands, atolls and islets in the southern Pacific Ocean (Marchant & Higgins 1990; Mayr & Cottrell 1979).Breeding habitat in Australia includes: Balls Pyramid, a tall rock stack where it occurs above an altitude of 400 metres, and nests on sheltered tussock ledges on steep cliff faces, and may be seen flying at high altitudes around the cliffs (Brown 1979; Hutton 1991; McAllan et al. 2004); and on Phillip Island, where pairs nest beneath Olive ( Olea europaea ) shrubs in elevated regions around the centre of the island (Carlile 2007; Priddel 2007). It formerly nested on almost inaccessible ledges at Mount Gower and Mount Lidgbird on Lord Howe Island (Hindwood 1940) and, although this breeding colony is now extinct, it is thought that some birds continue to fly about the cliffs of Mount Gower (Hutton 1991).','The Kermadec Petrel (western) feeds on squid, fish, crustaceans and, during the breeding season, insects (Hutton 1991; Imber et al. 1995; Oliver 1974). It forages by skimming low over the ocean and snatching prey from the surface, or by diving from higher altitudes to take prey from below the surface (Hutton 1991; Prince & Morgan 1987). It may also engage in kleptoparasitism, or food piracy, from other species of petrel (Spear & Ainley 1993).','Due to their small size, breeding populations of the Kermadec Petrel (western) in Australian territory are threatened by stochastic events (Garnett & Crowley 2000). Other threats include predation and longline fishing. Outside of Australia, the subspecies is threatened by predation, collection by humans and habitat degradation caused by the Rabbit ( Oryctolagus cuniculus ) (del Hoyo et al. 1992; Merton 1970; Schlatter 1984; Warham 1996).PredationAccidental introduction of the Cat ( Felis catus ) or the Black Rat ( Rattus rattus ) to either of the two predator-free breeding locations could have a significant impact to the subspecies in Australia (Baker et al. 2002; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Priddel 1996). Predation by the Cat and the Black Rat is thought to have caused the extinction on Lord Howe Island (Fullagar & Disney 1972; Priddel 1996), declines on Henderson Island in the Picairn Isands and Raoul Island in the Kermadec Islands group (Merton 1970), and prevented establishment of breeding colonies on Norfolk Island (Garnett & Crowley 2000)The Nankeen Kestrel ( Falco cenchroides ) is reported to prey on adults and the Purple Swamphen ( Porphyrio porphyrio ) is reported to \'destroy\' nests on Phillip Island (Carlile 2007; Garnett & Crowley 2000).Longline fishingLongline fishing is another potential threat to the Kermadec Petrel (western). It is not known if the Kermadec Petrel (western) suffers any mortality as a result of longline fishing (Garnett & Crowley 2000), but the threat is a known major threat to other species of petrel in Australian territory (Baker et al. 2002).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64450'),('64451','Sterna vittata bethunei','Endangered','Aves','Laridae','NA','The Antarctic Tern (New Zealand) prefers embayments with rocky shores or cliffs and feed in inshore waters, which often support large beds of kelp. They prefer to breed in rocky areas, either very near the coast or a short distance inland, including steep slopes or cliffs adjacent to the sea. Breeding on Macquarie Island is confined to offshore rock stacks. This is thought to be a response to predation of nests on the shore by the Cat ( Felis catus ) or the Black Rat ( Rattus rattus ) (Schulz & Gales 2004). Nests on the shore are usually made on live vegetation, though occasionally in unvegetated crevices, in slight scrapes in shallow peat and vegetation, or vegetation in a crevice of rock, lined with a thin layer of leaves. On Snares Island, NZ, nearly all nests were near groups of nesting Silver Gulls ( Larus novaehollandiae ) (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Higgins & Davies 1996; Miskelly et al. 2001; Sagar 1978). During summer, they forage in kelp beds in waters close to the islands. The area of feeding habitat may be limited by the extent of the continental shelf and weather conditions. They forage in coves, bays, inlets, harbours and off estuaries, often in heavy surf, and in straits separating islands (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Higgins & Davies 1996; Miskelly et al. 2001; Petyt 1995). They roost in large groups, mostly on rocks on islands, usually on ledges or in cavities of steep sea-cliffs and stacks, or rocky ridges, and less often on sheltered beaches of coves and estuaries (Higgins & Davies 1996).','When foraging, individuals patrol back and forth 3—8 m above the surface and, on sighting prey, hover, then plunge and also dip to the surface to snatch prey. The Antarctic Tern (New Zealand) normally forages alone or in small groups of up to five or six. There have been occasions when larger foraging flocks have been observed, and other species may forage alongside them, such as the Cape Petrel ( Daption capense ), Silver Gulls ( Larus novaehollandiae ), Sooty Shearwaters ( Puffinus griseus ), Snares Crested Penguins ( Eudyptes robustus ), Common Diving-Petrels ( Pelecanoides urinatrix ), Fairy Prions  (Pachyptila turtur ), Buller\'s Albatross ( Diomedea bulleri)  and Shy Albatross  ( Diomedea salvini ). They are predominately carnivorous, and dietary studies have indicated that they feed mainly on fish, crustaceans and occasionally molluscs, algae and insects (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Higgins & Davies 1996; Miskelly et al. 2001). High winds and rough seas affect the subspecies\' feeding ability, reducing the rate of attempt, capture and success (Higgins & Davies 1996; Miskelly et al. 2001).','Predation of shore nests has forced most pairs on Macquarie Island to breed on offshore rock stacks, which increases vulnerability to flooding from king tides and storm surges (Schulz & Gales 2004). The absence of nesting Antarctic Terns (New Zealand) from the main island of Macquarie Island was caused by predation on nests and hatchlings by the Cat ( Felis catus ), the Black Rat ( Rattus rattus ) and the Weka  ( Gallirallus australia ). However, recent feral eradication efforts have eliminated these predators. Given the small size of the remaining population and ongoing rates of nesting failure due to natural causes, the persistence of the population on Macquarie Island must be considered tenuous. The ongoing prevention of feral animal establishment on Macquarie Island following the eradication program must be maintained in order to promote the recovery of the local Antarctic Tern (New Zealand) population and perhaps allow pairs to return to shore-nesting, where the threat of flooding is less than nesting on offshore rock stacks.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64451'),('64452','Sterna vittata vittata','Vulnerable','Aves','Laridae','The Antarctic Tern (Indian Ocean) is about 32 to 34 cm in length with a mass between 115 and 188 g. Adults are predomiNAtly white and grey with a red bill and a partially black head. The colour of the bill and extent of black on the head varies seasonally. In the breeding season, the bill is bright red and a black cap forms over the head. In the non-breeding season, the bill fades to dark red and the black cap recedes to some streaking across the crown and a band that extends from the eyes to the nape. Juveniles can be distinguished from the adults by their buff wash and coarse buff and black markings (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Marine Habitat During the breeding season, the Antarctic Tern (Indian Ocean) forages close to shore, and mostly within the kelp-zone that extends up to 200 m from shore, in the shallow waters of coves, bays, inlets, harbours and estuaries. It typically feeds close to, or in, the surf zone, and often amongst heavy surf, diving from heights of 1-4 metres above the water\'s surface to capture prey. It occasionally forages much farther from shore, particularly during the non-breeding season, when it migrates over pelagic waters between breeding and wintering sites. It rarely feeds on land, although it was observed, on a single occasion, to pick food items from wet sand exposed by receding waves (Woehler 2007 pers. comm.).  Terrestrial Habitat The Antarctic Tern (Indian Ocean) nests on rocky terrain that is typically located less than 1 km from the coast. Nests can be situated amongst boulders at the bases of cliffs, on rocky ridges, spits and peninsulas, headlands, rock stacks, rocky islets, pinnacles, glacial moraines, raised lava platforms, rock fields in close proximity to fresh water, and boulder-strewn beaches. It rarely nests at sites other than these, although breeding has also been recorded on coarse shingle beaches and, at Heard Island, on outwash flats below glacial snouts. Nests can be situated amongst low, sparse vegetation such as mosses and grasses ( Poa  spp.) (Higgins & Davies 1996; Woehler 2002 pers. comm.).  The Antarctic Tern (Indian Ocean) usually roosts on rocky surfaces, especially on ledges and in cavities of steep coastal cliffs and stacks, or on rocky ridges. It roosts less regularly on wet sand on sheltered beaches in coves and estuaries (Higgins & Davies 1996; Woehler 2002 pers. comm.). It typically roosts close to its nesting sites during the breeding season (Woehler & Auman 2001).','The Antarctic Tern (Indian Ocean) is carnivorous, feeding mainly on fish and crustaceans, and rarely on molluscs, algae and insects (Higgins & Davies 1996).When foraging, the Antarctic Tern (Indian Ocean) patrols back and forth at a height of 3-8 m above the water\'s surface, behind and within the surf zone, and sometimes within 5 m of the shore. It forages in flocks of more than 100 birds at Heard Island (Woehler 2002 pers. comm., 2007 pers. comm.). On sighting its prey, the Antarctic Tern (Indian Ocean) may hover and then plunge, or make a low dipping flight to the surface, to snatch prey. Strong winds and rough seas inhibit its ability to forage, as quantified by reductions in the frequency of foraging attempts and the rates of prey capture (Higgins & Davies 1996; Sagar 1991).','The main potential threat to the Antarctic Tern (Indian Ocean) population on Heard Island is the accidental introduction of the Rat ( Rattus rattus ) (Garnett & Crowley 2000) or other vertebrate predators such as the Cat ( Felis catus ) (Brooke et al. 1988). Rats are known to raid nests of subspecies Antarctic Tern (New Zealand) on Campbell Island (Sadleir et al. 1986) and are alleged to have caused colonies of subspecies  S. v. tristanensis  to abandon accessible nest sites on Tristan da Cunha (Elliott 1957). The small size and restricted distribution of the population on Heard Island may also render it vulnerable to catastrophic events such as disease or severe weather events (Garnett & Crowley 2000). Other potential threats include disturbance of breeding pairs by human activity, which can cause adults to abandon eggs or chicks and/or result in opportunistic predation of unguarded eggs or chicks by the Kelp Gull ( Larus dominicanus ) or skuas ( Catharacta  spp.) (Woehler 2007 pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64452'),('64454','Amytornis textilis myall','Vulnerable','Aves','Maluridae','Thick-billed Grasswrens are thickset, dull brown grasswrens with dark stout bills. The underparts are pale grey-buff, with fine streaking from the chin to the breast, and on the back. Female Grasswrens have chestnut flanks (Pizzey & Knight 1999).','The Gawler Ranges subspecies of the Thick-billed Grasswren occurs in open chenopod shrublands, often where dense stands of Dead Finish  Acacia tetragonophylla  or Blackbush  Maireana pyramidata  surround drainage lines (Higgins et al. 2001; Matthew 2002, pers. comm.; Matthew & Carpenter 1993). It also occurs in saltbush  Atriplex  spp. and bluebush  Maireana  spp. shrublands with a sparse or open overstorey of low trees or shrubs, such as Western Myall  Acacia papyrocarpa , Black Oak  Casuarina cristata pauper , Australian Boxthorn  Lycium australe , Bullock Bush  Alectryon oleaefolium  and Sugarwood  Myoporum platycarpum  (Higgins et al. 2001; Joseph & Black 1983; Matthew & Carpenter 1993; Rowley & Russell 1997; Schodde 1982).The Gawler Ranges subspecies of the Thick-billed Grasswren has also been recorded in Nitre Bush  Nitraria billardierei  on coastal shellgrit ridges South of Whyalla (G.C. Carpenter, as cited in Higgins et al. 2001); and, very occasionally, in spinifex  Triodia  spp. on rocky hills in the Gawler Ranges (L. Pedler, as cited in Higgins et al. 2001).At one site on Nonning Station, where the Gawler Ranges subspecies of the Thick-billed Grasswren was studied in November 1991, estimates of vegetation cover were: Blackbush 15%, Bearded saltbush  Atriplex vesicaria  7%, grasses and annuals 2%, Spiny goosefoot  Rhagodia ulicina  1%, stem and leaf-litter 13%, and bare ground 62% (J.S.Matthew & G.C. Carpenter, as cited in Higgins et al. 2001). It usually builds its nest close to the ground and in the centre of a low shrub such as saltbush  Atriplex  spp. or bluebush  Maireana  spp. (Higgins et al. 2001; Rowley & Russell 1997).','As with other subspecies, the Gawler Ranges subspecies of the Thick-billed Grasswren is probably omnivorous, eating seeds, fruits, insects and other invertebrates (Higgins et al. 2001).   The Gawler Ranges subspecies of the Thick-billed Grasswren forages mainly on the ground, under and around the bases of shrubs, but sometimes also in open areas (Higgins et al. 2001; Rowley & Russell 1997; Schodde 1982).','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64454'),('64456','Diomedea sanfordi','Endangered','Aves','Diomedeidae','Adult Northern Royal Albatross have a white head, neck, body and tail, sharply contrasting against the black wings. The underwing is white except for a dark trailing edge and a large dark tip. Juvenile Northern Royal Albatrosses have indistinct brown mottling on the crown, and pronounced black mottling on the lower back and rump, and a narrow black terminal band on the tail. The bill is large, with a bulbous tip, pinkish coloured horn and a diagnostic black cutting edge on the upper mandible. In breeding birds, the bill may flush to a brighter pink. The iris is brown, and the feet and legs are pinkish to blueish-white, with blueish webs (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Northern Royal Albatross is marine, pelagic and aerial. Its habitat includes subantarctic, subtropical, and occasionally Antarctic waters (Marchant & Higgins 1990). It occurs where the surface temperature of the water is between 6–20 °C (Barton 1977, 1980; Jehl 1973; Szijj 1967). In Chile, its preferred range of water temperatures is 8–12 °C (Jehl 1973).The Northern Royal Albatross flies low or moderately high over open waters, using updraft from wave fronts for lift (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The Northern Royal Albatross nests on flat or gently sloping ground, on slopes, ridges, gullies and plateaux of large islands, and on the summits of islets (Bailey & Sorensen 1962; Dawson 1973; Westerkov 1963). Depressions, gullies, lee slopes and vegetation provide shelter for its nests, but exposed sites are also needed nearby so that the Southern Royal Albatross can take off and land. Its nests are placed among vegetation that are open enough for adults to easily walk through (Westerkov 1963).','The Northern Royal Albatross feeds primarily on cephalopods, fish, crustaceans and salps (pelagic tunicates) (Gales 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1990). Most food is taken by surface seizing and rarely by surface plunging (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Large seabirds such as albatrosses feed on or close to the surface of the water. Foraging behaviours such as flying long distances to search for food, following boats, feeding aggressively on offal and diving for baits make them susceptible to drowning in longline fishing gear (AGDEH 2006q).','The primary threat to the Northern Royal Albatross is drowning in longline fishing gear (Garnett & Crowley 2000). Oceanic longline fishing has been used to target pelagic and demersal fish in the southern oceans since the 1950s, and is used in almost all Australian waters today (AGDEH 2006q). Gales and Brothers (1995) reported that 75% of the birds killed on longlines and retained for identification were albatrosses. Internationally, some longline fishing fleets still operate without substantial bycatch mitigation measures. Therefore, birds breeding within the Australian Fishing Zone are still killed on longlines from vessels operating outside the Australian Fishing Zone (Environment Australia 2001f). Hook and plastic ingestion also potentially threaten the Northern Royal Albatross. Between 50 and 100 million hooks are set each year in the Southern Ocean and as many as 1.1 billion hooks are set globally. Both seabirds and fishing vessels concentrate in areas of high biological productivity (Environment Australia 2001f).The Northern Royal Albatross may also die from collisions with cables and warps used on fishing trawlers. Outside of the Australian Fishing Zone, trawlers carrying netsonde monitor cables or their equivalent may cause substantial mortality in albatrosses. Trolling (trailing a line with baited hooks) for pelagic species such as Albacore Tuna  Thunnus alalunga  is another potential threat (Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1998; Weimerskirch & Jouventin 1998). The species may also be shot by fishermen to protect bait or for sport (Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1998). The chick is unlikely to survive if a parent is killed while it is foraging at sea (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Fishing mortality will probably decrease the global population of the species over the next three generations, around 75 years (Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1998; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Marchant & Higgins 1990).When migrating through the East Marine Region the Northern Royal Albatross may also be at threat from a loss of food stock, ingestion or being caught in marine debris, oil spills, pollution and commercial fishing that occurs within the region (DEWHA 2009m).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64456'),('64457','Thalassarche eremita','Endangered','Aves','Diomedeidae','The Chatham Albatross is a medium sized albatross, with a wing-span less than 2.1 m. The bright yellow bill has a distinctive black spot near the tip of the lower mandible, allowing discrimination from the similar Shy Albatross. The Chatam Albatross has a sooty grey wash over the crown, cheeks and neck, and a dark back and wings. Its blackish notch at the front of the wing, next to the body, is the darkest of the Shy Albatross complex (Pizzey & Knight 1999).','The Chatham Albatross is a marine species. It occurs in subantarctic and subtropical waters reaching the tropics in the cool Humboldt Current off South America (Marchant & Higgins 1990). It has been noted in shelf-waters around breeding islands, over continental shelves during the non-breeding season, and occurs inshore and offshore (Cox 1976; Falla 1937; Marchant 1977). It enters harbours and bays (Jehl 1973) and is scarce in pelagic waters (Falla 1937; Jehl 1973).The Chatham Albatross preference for sea-surface temperatures is poorly known. In Chilean waters it has been observed over waters of 11.5 to 15°C (Jehl 1973). The species nests on level or gently sloping ledges, summits, slopes and caves of rocky islets and stacks. It is usually in broken terrain with little soil and vegetation (Brothers 1979a, b; Fleming 1939; Green 1974; Marchant & Higgins 1990; Miskelly 1984).','The Chatham Albatross probably eats fish and cephalopods (E. Reid 2002, pers. comm).The Chatham Albatross has been recorded following fishing boats (E. Reid 2002, pers. comm.). The species gathers to scavenge at commercial fishing grounds (Marchant & Higgins 1990). It takes food from the surface or just below, and has been observed diving to depths of 2 m or more for offal (Nicholls 1979).','Threats to the Chatham Albatross at Pyramid Rock include predation by introduced predators and degradation of the breeding habitat through human or other disturbance.The hunting of populations by humans is responsible for earlier population declines (Environment Australia 2001f).Longline fisheries are also responsible for the deaths of foraging Chatham Albatross, both inside and outside the Australian Fishing Zone (Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1993,1998; New Zealand Ministry of Fisheries 1997).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64457'),('64458','Diomedea antipodensis','Vulnerable','Aves','Diomedeidae','Antipodean Albatrosses are difficult to distinguish from the Wandering Albatross ( Diomedea exulans ).  Adult Wandering Albatrosses are significantly larger, however juvenile Antipodean Albatrosses are very similar to juvenile Wandering Albatrosses. Breeding Antipodean Albatrosses have a mixed white and brownish plumage. Breeding females have chocolate-brown upperparts with white winding, wavy outlines on their back; a white face mask and throat; a white lower breast and belly with brown undertail-coverts; a white underwing with dark tips; and a broad brown breast-band. Breeding males are whiter than females but darker than the Wandering Albatross. Males and females have pink bills. Male Antipodean Albatrosses may be distinguished from other  D. exulans  subspecies by their darker cap and tail, and less white on their humeral flexure (BirdLife International 2009).','The Antipodean Albatross is marine, pelagic and aerial. It rarely enters the belt of icebergs region of Antarctica (Hicks 1973), but in late summer, it may approach the edge of pack-ice (Darby 1970). It sleeps and rests on ocean waters when not breeding. The Antipodean Albatross nests in open patchy vegetation, such as among tussock grassland or shrubs on ridges, slopes and plateaus (BirdLife International 2009; Warham & Bell 1979). On Antipodes Island, they nest in relatively uniform densities, but avoid areas of tall vegetation on steep coastal slopes, or amongst the tall ferns on poorly drained parts of the peaks near the island\'s centre (Walker & Elliott 2005).','The Antipodean Albatross feeds primarily on cephalopods, fish and crustaceans (BirdLife International 2009; Gales 1998). Large seabirds, such as Albatrosses, feed on or close to the surface of the water. Their foraging behaviours, such as flying long distances to search for food, following boats, feeding aggressively on offal and diving for baits, make them susceptible to being drowned in longline fishing gear (AGDEH 2006q).','Longline fisheriesThe primary threat to the Antipodean Albatross is drowning in longline fishing gear (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Walker & Elliott 2006). The study by Walker and Elliott (2006) found that 75% of the range of the Antipodean Albatross is likely to have overlaped with longline fisheries in the past 40 years, and since the 1990s, approximately 40% overlap. Oceanic longline fishing has been used to target pelagic and demersal fish in the southern oceans since the 1950s, and is used in almost all Australian waters today (AGDEH 2006q). Gales and Brothers (1995) reported that 75% of the birds killed on longlines and retained for identification were albatrosses. Internationally, some longline fishing fleets still operate without substantial bycatch mitigation measures. Therefore, birds breeding within the Australian Fishing Zone (AFZ) are still killed on longlines from vessels operating outside the AFZ (Environment Australia 2001f).Other fisheriesAlthough Walker and Elliott (2006) found there is substantial range overlap with longline fisheries over Antipodean Albatrosses\' full dispersal range, currently there is little longline fishing for tuna near their breeding islands. There are however, significant demersal and trawl fisheries on both the Campbell Shelf and the Chatham Rise. The high densities of Antipodean Albatrosses around the Auckland and Antipodes Islands means these are areas where even a small amount of fishing could result in significant losses of birds, particularly if fishing was conducted during the courting and hatching period in late summer when birds forage near the islands.Trolling, trailing a line with baited hooks, for pelagic species such as Albacore Tuna ( Thunnus alalunga ) is another potential threat (Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1998; Weimerskirch & Jouventin 1998).Litter ingestionHook and plastic ingestion also potentially threaten the Antipodean Albatross. Between 50 and 100 million hooks are set each year in the Southern Ocean and as many as 1.1 billion hooks are set globally. Both seabirds and fishing vessels concentrate in areas of high biological productivity (Environment Australia 2001f).Walker and Elliott (2006) note that there have been occasional reports of Antipodean Albatrosses foraging on discards from longline fishing boats operating in shelf waters of the Chatham Rise, and that fisheries litter (hooks, nylon braid, plastic bags, fresh food scraps) are often found in chick regurgitations on both Adams and Antipodes Islands. This can potentially impact on breeding success because the large amounts of fisheries litter consumed chicks can lead to their poor condition and death.Other threatsThe Antipodean Albatross may also die from collisions with cables and warps used on fishing trawlers. Outside of the AFZ, trawlers carrying netsonde monitor cables or their equivalent may cause substantial mortality in Albatrosses (Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1998; Weimerskirch & Jouventin 1998).When migrating through the East Marine Region the Antipodean Albatross may also be at threat from a loss of food stock, ingestion or being caught in marine debris, oil spills, pollution and commercial fishing that occurs within the region (DEWHA 2009m). The species may also be shot by fishermen to protect bait or for sport (Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1998). An albatross chick is unlikely to survive if a parent is killed while it is foraging at sea (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Predation by feral pigs ( Sus scrofa ) may be responsible for the near extirpation of the subspecies on Auckland Island, and are probably still taking eggs and chicks.  Feral cats ( Felis catus ) may also kill some chicks (BirdLife International 2009).Fishing mortality will probably decrease the global population of the species over the next three generations, around 75 years (Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1998; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Marchant & Higgins 1990).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64458'),('64459','Thalassarche impavida','Vulnerable','Aves','Diomedeidae','The Campbell Albatross is a medium sized albatross, with a wingspan of 210–250 cm. Like the Black-browed Albatross ( Thalassarche melanophris ), adult Campbell Albatross have a white head with a distinctive black brow, bright yellow-orange bill and broad black leading edge on the underwing. The Campbell Albatross differs from the Black-browed Albatross in having a heavier black brow (more extensive in front of the eye); a honey coloured (not dark-brown) iris; slightly broader black leading edge on underwing; and a series of bold streaks running from the elbow and extending inwards to the base of the wing, creating an isolated white patch in the centre of the wing-pit (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Campbell Albatross is a marine sea bird inhabiting sub-Antarctic and subtropical waters from pelagic to shelf-break water habitats (Marchant & Higgins 1990). In the Antarctic, it occurs through the belt of icebergs to the edge of the consolidated pack-ice (Falla 1937; Hicks 1973). The Campbell Albatross does not penetrate the ice-packs, perhaps because ice inhibits soaring by dampening sea swells (Ainley et al. 1984). They tolerate sea surface-temperatures from 0–24 °C (Bierman & Voous 1950; Grindley 1981; Jehl 1973), but are mainly found in the sub-Antarctic (Jehl 1973; Johnstone & Kerry 1976). In December, the subspecies southern limit in the Ross Sea is at the 1.0 °C isotherm and in January at the 0.0 °C isotherm (Ainley et al. 1984).In breeding and non-breeding seasons, the Campbell Albatross are specialised shelf feeders, concentrating around breeding islands or over adjacent submarine banks (Weimerskirch et al. 1986, 1988). In winter, they are commonly found in the coastal waters of continents, over up-wellings or boundaries of currents (Brown 1975; Cooke & Mills 1972; Weimerskirch et al. 1985).The Campbell Albatross breed on Campbell Island (Marchant & Higgins 1990). They make their nests on tussock-covered ledges and terraces of cliffs, slopes and hills, overlooking the sea or valleys, and on the summits of rocky islets (Bailey & Sorenson 1962; Downes et al. 1959; Weimerskirch et al. 1986).','The Campbell Albatross feeds on krill and fish, with some cephalopods, salps and jellyfish. They are enthusiastic scavengers, and often follow fishing boats (Marchant & Higgins 1990). They take food from the sea surface or just below, occasionally plunging from heights of up to 9 m (Harper 1987; Prince 1980; Voisin 1982). They have been recorded to reach depths of 2–4 m when taking offal (Nicholls 1979; Oatley 1979).The Campbell Albatross often feeds with other albatrosses and petrels (family Diomedeidae). They are aggressive feeders and dominate all other species, except for the great albatrosses ( Diomedea  spp.) (Weimerskirch et al. 1986).','Drowning in longline fishing gear is the primary threat to the Campbell Albatross in Australian waters, with sub-adults being over-represented in the bycatch (Waugh et al. 1999b). Foraging birds may also suffer from collision with cables and warps used on fishing trawlers (EA 2001f; Gales 1998).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64459'),('64460','Thalassarche bulleri','Vulnerable','Aves','Diomedeidae','Buller\'s Albatross is a lightly built albatross that is 76–80 cm long and has a wingspan of 200–213 cm (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Males are slightly larger than females. The bill is long and slender, with striking black and yellow colouration: yellow on the top and bottom of the bill, and black on the sides. They have a light grey head, prominent white or silvery-white forcap and a dark area in front of the eyes (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The underparts are very pale grey, with a wide black margin on the leading edge of the wing, a narrow black margin on the trailing edge and white in-between (Pizzey & Knight 1999).','Buller\'s Albatross are marine and pelagic, inhabiting subtropical and subantarctic waters of the southern Pacific Ocean (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Specific habitat requirements are poorly known, but they have been observed in association with fishing boats close inshore and over waters 180–360 m deep in New Zealand (Robertson & Jenkins 1981; Secker 1969). This species does not appear to be as strongly associated with fishing boats as other albatrosses (Marchant & Higgins 1990).In Australia, Buller\'s Albatross are seen over inshore, offshore and pelagic waters. They appear to congregate over currents where water temperature exceeds 16 °C (Blaber 1986).Breeding habitat of Buller\'s Albatross occurs on subtropical and subantarctic islands and rock stacks in the New Zealand region. Nests are made in a range of inland habitats including:bare substrate or fern and tussock covered cliffs, slopes or ridgesopen grassy meadowssummit plateaus under  Olearia  forest (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','Buller\'s Albatross feeds mostly on squid, supplemented by fish, krill and tunicates (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Buller\'s Albatross probably takes food by surface-siezing, although they have been recorded following fishing boats as well as diving to 10 m into swarming euphausiids at Snares Island. Most feeding has been observed during the day (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The  National recovery plan for Albatrosses and Giant-Petrels  (Environment Australia 2001f) identified incidental catch during longline fishing operations, competition with fisheries for marine resources and marine pollution as the biggest threats to Buller\'s Albatross populations in Australian waters. When migrating through the East Marine Region, Buller\'s Albatross may be at threat from a loss of food stock, ingestion or being caught in marine debris, oil spills, pollution and commercial fishing that occurs within the region (DEWHA 2009m).Incidental catch during longline fishing operationsLongline fishing has been identified as the primary threat currently affecting albatross (Gales 1998). The two main forms of mortality that affect albatross are bycatch during line-setting, and ingestion of (discarded) fishing hooks.Incidental bycatch during line-settingSince the 1950s longline fishing fleets have expanded into every major oceanic sector to the point that most individual albatrosses are likely to interact with longline fishing vessels at some stage in their lives. During line-setting, baits attached to hooks are paid out from the stern of the ship. Albatross habitually follow fishing vessels and aggressively compete for baits. In doing so, birds risk getting hooked on the lines and being drawn underwater to drown (Alexander et al. 1997).Ingestion of fishing hooksAlbatross captured on longline fishing hooks may survive the hauling process, but retain the long-line hooks, causing death or disability (Brothers 1991; Nel & Nel 1999). Presumably, most instances of hook ingestion occur as a result of the processing procedures (notably the discarding of hooked fish heads by factory crew) undertaken on non-Australian and/or illegal demersal longlining vessels. Occasionally, fishing gear is regurgitated to chicks, resulting in chick-death (Environment Australia 2001f). The frequency of longline hooks being regurgitated at South Georgia nest sites of Wandering Albatrosses ( Diomedea exulans ) and Black-browed Albatrosses ( Thalassarche melanophris ) had reportedly increased six-fold in the 1990s (Cooper 1995; Huin & Croxall 1996). Since almost all albatross species have been recorded on longline hooks, it is very likely that most, or all, albatross species suffer from swallowing fishing equipment (Environment Australia 2001f).Competition with fisheries for marine resourcesThe progressive degradation of the marine habitat, particularly the global over-extraction of marine resources, may have serious long-term effects on the status of albatross (Croxall & Gales 1998). Seabird populations have declined through direct competition with fisheries for prey (Croxall & Gales 1998; Environment Australia 2001f). The ecological sustainability of fisheries is crucial to albatross (Environment Australia 2001f).Marine pollutionOrganochlorines and heavy metals degrade very slowly in the environment. These chemical contamiNAts are retained by organisms and become concentrated in the tissues of higher-order feeders. Consequently, top order predators, such as albatross, may build-up hazardous levels of synthetic chemicals in their tissue. Furthermore, because albatross are a long-lived and typically highly dispersive species, they have even greater opportunity to accumulate high levels of chemical contamiNAts (Environment Australia 2001f). Elevated levels of persistent organic pollutants can have deleterious population level effects through diminished reproductive success caused by eggshell thinning, embryo non-viability and offspring deformities (Croxall et al. 1984; Ludwig et al. 1998).In addition, sea-jettisoned marine debris can impact upon albatross in two ways: through ingestion or via entanglement (Huin & Croxall 1996). Many albatross species ingest plastic and other marine debris that have a wide range of lethal or sub-lethal effects. The debris can cause physical damage, perforation, mechanical blockage or impairment of the digestive system, resulting in starvation. Some plastics are also a source of toxic pollutants, which are released into the blood stream (Ryan 1988a; Ryan et al. 1988). The subsequent reduction in fitness can lower the bird\'s ability to reproduce, catch prey and/or avoid predation (Fry et al. 1987; Sileo et al. 1990).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64460'),('64462','Thalassarche steadi','','Aves','Diomedeidae','The White-capped Albatross has a grey back and wings; faint or absent greyish wash on cheeks; and a white head, neck and rump. The underwing is mostly white with a narrow black margin and a small dark notch at the wing-pit. The bill is pale greyish straw colour, with a yellowish tip (Pizzey & Knight 1999). There is also a thin black eyebrow and a delicate, grey wash over the face.','The White-capped Albatross is a marine species and occurs in subantarctic and subtropical waters. It reaches tropical areas associated with the cool Humboldt Current off South America (Marchant & Higgins 1990). It is unknown what sea-surface temperatures this subspecies prefers; however, in the southern Indian Ocean it has been observed in waters of 6.4–13.5 °C (Rand 1963).The White-capped Albatross has been noted in shelf-waters around breeding islands and over adjacent rises. During the non-breeding season, birds have been observed over continental shelves around continents. The species occurs both inshore and offshore (Cox 1976; Falla 1937; Marchant 1977) and enters harbours and bays (Jehl 1973). The species is scarce in pelagic waters (Falla 1937; Jehl 1973). Birds gather to scavenge at commercial fishing grounds.Birds nest on slopes vegetated with tussock and succulents on Auckland Island (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The White-capped Albatross probably has a diet of inshore cephalopods (squid) and fish, but this has not been studied (Gales 1993; Marchant & Higgins 1990). This subspecies takes food from the surface, or just below, and has been observed diving to depths of 2+ m for offal (Nicholls 1979). The birds scavenge at commercial feeding grounds (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The White-capped Albatross is threatened on Auckland Island by pig predation at nests (Croxall & Gales 1998; Environment Australia 2001f).The White-capped Albatross is threatened by drowning in longline fishing gear and collision with trawl warps (steel rope connecting trawl gear to vessel) while foraging (Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1993, 1998). The partitioning (and quantification) of Shy Albatross and White-capped Albatross longline deaths is very difficult as their appearence is very similar (Gales et al. 2000). The mobile nature of juvenile White-capped Albatrosses exposes them to many fisheries, however, it has been suggested that most deaths occur in South African, Namibian and New Zealand fisheries (Baker et al. 2007). One estimate suggests that 6850–7050 worldwide drownings occur annually and, due to its far greater movement range, this species is far more likely to drown due to fishing rather than the Shy Albatross (Baker et al. 2007). In Australian waters, it is estimated that less than ten White-capped Albatross drown annually (Baker et al. 2007).When migrating through the East Marine Region the White-capped Albatross may threatened by reduced food stock, ingestion or being caught in marine debris, oil spills, pollution and commercial fishing that occurs within the region (DEW 2007a).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64462'),('64463','Thalassarche salvini','Vulnerable','Aves','Diomedeidae','Salvin\'s Albatross is a large albatross, with a wingspan of 212–256 cm. They are sexually dimorphic, with the males being larger than females (Marchant & Higgins 1990). As a member of the black-backed group, dark mottling over the back of Salvin\'s Albatross contrasts with its white rump. The head and neck are light grey with a pronounced whitish cap. The bill is grey, with contrasting ivory-horn stripes on the top and bottom, and a black mandibular spot on the lower tip of the bill (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The underwing is mostly white, with very narrow black margins and a distinctive black notch at the base of the leading edge of the wing.','Salvin\'s Albatross is a marine species occurring in subantarctic and subtropical waters, reaching the tropics in the cool Humboldt Current, off South America (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The sea-surface temperature preferences of Salvin\'s Albatross are poorly known. In the southern Indian Ocean the species has been observed over waters of 6.4–13.5 °C (Rand 1963). Birds have been noted in shelf-waters around breeding islands and over adjacent rises.During the non-breeding season, the species occurs over continental shelves around continents. It occurs both inshore and offshore (Cox 1976; Falla 1937; Marchant 1977) and enters harbours and bays (Jehl 1973). Salvin\'s Albatross is scarce in pelagic waters (Falla 1937; Jehl 1973).Salvin\'s Albatross nest\'s on level or gently sloping ledges, summits, slopes and caves of rocky islets and stacks, usually in broken terrain with little soil and vegetation (Brothers 1979a, 1979b; Fleming 1939; Green 1974; Miskelly 1984).','Salvin\'s Albatross probably takes inshore cephalopods (squid) and fish (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The species feeds primarily in shelf waters, takes food from the surface or just below and has been observed diving to depths of two metres or more for offal (Nicholls 1979). The birds have been known to scavenge at commercial feeding grounds (Marchant & Higgins 1990) and also commonly follow fishing boats (Barton 1979; Environment Australia 2001f; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Marchant & Higgins 1990). Individuals aggregate to scavenge at commercial fishing grounds. Birds fly low to moderately high, using updraft from wave fronts for lift (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Habitat preferences during the nonbreeding period varies little compared to the breeding period (Cherel et al. 2012).','It is projected that Salvin\'s Albatross will have a population decline of 30-49% over 3 generations (70 years) as a result of mortality associated with fishing (Garnett et al. 2011). The coincidence of the foraging territory with the range of longline fisheries exposes Salvin\'s Albatross to drowning in longline fishing gear (EA 2001f). Globally, fisheries exhibit various bycatch trends; many have reduced bycatch substantially from the highs of the 1990s, although some still take unsustainable seabird bycatch (Anderson et al. 2011; Spear et al. 1995, 2003). Deaths of this species may also result from collision with cables and warps on fishing trawlers (EA 2001f; Gales 1998). Two studies in New Zealand showed that the species was taken, at varying frequencies, by fishers all year round (Thompson 2010, 2010a).In the East Marine Bioregion, Salvin\'s Albatross may be at threat from a loss of food stock, ingestion or being caught in marine debris, oil spills, pollution and commercial fishing that occurs within the region (DSEWPaC 2012aa).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64463'),('64464','Thalassarche carteri','Vulnerable','Aves','Diomedeidae','The head and neck of the Yellow-nosed Albatross are white, with a small dusky patch before the eye, a narrow white line bordering the rear of the eye and extending beneath. They have a light grey wash across the cheeks and ear-coverts, which may be lost through wear.The rump and upper tail-coverts are white. The tail is grey, becomming darker with wear. The underwings are mostly white with inky-black wing-tips and narrow margins. The bill is glossy black with a distinctive, narrow bright yellow strip, becoming more orange over the hill ridge, and yellow again at the extreme tip of the bill. The isis is dark brown, and the legs and feet are blueish to pinkish-blue (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Indian Yellow-nosed Albatross is a marine bird, located in subtropical and warmer subantarctic waters (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The Indian Yellow-nosed Albatross has been observed over waters of surface-temperature 10° to 23°C, but is most abundant over the warmer parts of the subtropical zone (Biermann & Voous 1950; Brown et al. 1975; Cooke & Mills 1972).  In breeding and non-breeding seasons, the species concentrates over the productive waters of continental shelves, often at coastal upwellings and the boundaries of currents (Brown et al. 1975; Cooke & Mills 1972; Weimerskirch et al. 1985). Birds breeding south of the Subtropical Convergence may be pelagic and travel far to subtropical feeding grounds (Weimerskirch et al. 1986).In the Australasian region, the species occupies inshore and offshore waters (Latham 1980; Storr 1964; Swanson 1983), particularly where there are calm seas and light winds (Cox 1973; Storr 1964). The birds fly low or at medium heights over the sea, using air currents rising off swells for lift (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The Indian Yellow-nosed Albatross breeds on islands of the southern Indian Ocean. The southern limit of breeding may be determined by the distance to subtropical waters used for feeding (Weimerskirch et al. 1986).The species nests on tussock-covered coastal cliffs and slopes, often in rocky situations (Grindley 1981; Weimerskirch et al. 1986). On Ile Amsterdam, the birds are confined to steeper slopes, nesting up to 800 m asl., on bare ground or among  Poa  or  Scirpus  (Jouventin et al. 1983) (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Indian Yellow-nosed Albatross takes cephalopods (squid) and fish.The species frequently follows fishing boats, leading to it being caught in considerable numbers on longline fishing gear (Cherel & Klages 1998; Klaer & Polacheck 1997; Weimerskirch et al. 1986).','There is considerable and continuing population decline of the Indian Yellow-nosed Albatross as a result of its association with fishing boats. The most serious threat in Australian waters is probably drowning in longline fishing gear and collision with cables and warps used on fishing trawlers (Environment Australia 1999; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Klaer & Polacheck 1997; Marchant & Higgins 1990).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64464'),('64468','Nannoperca oxleyana','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Percichthyidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64468'),('64470','Carcharodon carcharias','Vulnerable','Chondrichthyes','Lamnidae','The Great White Shark is a member of the Lamnidae family (mackerel sharks) and as such is a close relative of the Mako ( Isurus  spp.) and Porbeagle ( Lamna nasus ) sharks (Last & Stevens 2009). It has a moderately stout, torpedo-shaped body, coloured blue-grey to grey-brown or bronze on the upper surface and white below. The snout is relatively short and bluntly conical, the teeth large, erect, triangular and serrated (Last & Stevens 2009). The mouth extends beyond the eyes. The Great White Shark is a large apex predator that grows to at least 6 m in length and can weigh up to 3000 kg (Last & Stevens 2009; Mollet & Cailliet 1996). Reports of sharks reaching 7 m in length (near Kangaroo Island, South Australia) have not been verified (Mollet & Cailliet 1996).','Great White Sharks can be found from close inshore around rocky reefs, surf beaches and shallow coastal bays to outer continental shelf and slope areas (Pogonoski et al. 2002 in DEWHA 2009). They also make open ocean excursions and can cross ocean basins (for instance from South Africa to the western coast of Australia and from the eastern coast of Australia to New Zealand). Great White Sharks are often found in regions with high prey density, such as pinniped colonies (DEWHA 2009).','Great White Sharks eat a variety of prey including finfish, other sharks and rays, marine mammals, such as seals, sea lions, dolphins and whales, as well as squid, crustaceans and seabirds. They are known to change their diet as they grow: juveniles less than 2.7 m feed primarily on fish and other sharks and rays while larger sharks (3.4 m+) feed on marine mammals (Estrada et al. 2006; Malcolm et al. 2001). The shift in diet has been attributed to such things as decreasing agility with size and changes in tooth morphology (Tricas & McCosker 1984). Energy requirements of the species may be several times higher than previous estimates, underscoring the importance of seasonal feeding around seal colonies to meet these needs (Semmens et al. 2013).Great White Sharks often occur singly or in pairs, but can be found around food sources (such as Sea Lion ( Neophoca cinerea ) colonies) in feeding aggregations. Schooling does not apparently occur (Compagno 1984). A domiNAce hierarchy has been described, in which smaller Great White Sharks avoid larger individuals when feeding (Strong et al. pers. comm in Klimley & Anderson 1996).Great White Sharks, of about 3 m in length and larger, frequent Fur Seal ( Arctocephalus pusillus doriferus  and  Arctocephalus forsteri ) and Australian Sea Lion colonies in Australian waters (DEWHA 2009). Pinnipeds have also been reported as the major prey item for large Great White Sharks off the western coast of North America (Klimley & Anderson 1996). Bruce and colleagues (2006) suggest that some individuals rapidly switch between periods dominated by predation centered around pinniped colonies to very different predatory strategies targeting demersal finfish or chondrichthyans in nearby habitats.Reported sightings of large Great White Sharks (>400 cm) in the middle and upper reaches of Spencer Gulf and Gulf St Vincent, where pinnipeds do not commonly occur but dolphins are frequently sighted, suggest that dolphins may be important prey items (Bruce 1992).','While natural mortality in Great White Sharks is not well understood, there are some activities that represent a threat to the population of Great White Sharks in Australia. In 1996, at the time of its nomination for protected status in Australia, it was estimated that around 500 Great White Shark mortalities occured annually due to human activities in Australian waters, 300 of which were most likely related to commercial fishing (including capture as bycatch due to accidental entanglement in fishing gear) (EA 1996, cited in EA 2002g). While targetted fishing by commercial or recreational fishers is no longer legal in Australia, accidental catch or bycatch, beach protection measures and illegal trade continue to cause injury and mortality to Great White Sharks in Australia. There is also some concern over possible impacts of tourism-related activity, such as shark cage viewings (DEWHA 2009).Bycatch in commercial fisheries Great White Sharks generally have very low resilience to fishing pressure (Green et al. 2009), though because of their overall low abundance have not been commonly targetted by commercial fisheries (CITES 2004). While protected from intentional capture from the commercial or game fishing sector within Australia, and in many other jurisdictions, the Great White Shark can be accidentally caught or injured in long-lines and in nets of professional fishers (CITES 2004). Bruce (1992) found 10% of Great White Sharks encountered in South Australian waters showed evidence of previous encounters with commercial fishing gear while Strong and colleagues (1996) found 10% of Great White Sharks observed in the Spencer Gulf, South Australia, carried short remNAts of longlines and gillnets.Quantification of injury or mortality associated with accidental interactions with commercial fishing is, however, difficult to assess (Bruce 1992). The most comprehensive study of Great White Shark mortality as a result of interactions with the commercial fishing sector estimated that approximately 165 Great White Sharks were caught per year and, of those, an estimated 92 died before they could be released (Malcolm et al. 2001). This study acknowledged that the average annual variability was probably high, and that the mortality estimate of 92 was probably an underestimate due to post-release mortality. This study was based on fisher logbooks and through phone interviews of fishers.Information from logbooks from Commonwealth managed fisheries indicates that there were approximately 37 Great White Sharks caught between 2002–2008 of which 27 were reported as being released alive (DEWHA 2008aaaa). The Australian Fishery Management Authority (AFMA) publishes interactions that Commonwealth-managed fisheries have with Great White Sharks, with the Southern and Eastern Scalefish and Shark Fishery reporting capture in gillnet equipment (Johnstone 2008), the Southern and Eastern Scalefish and Shark Fishery-South East Trawl reporting capture in trawls (Johnstone 2008a) and the Eastern Tuna and Billfish Fisheries reporting hooking of Great White Sharks (Johnstone 2007).Only South Australia and Western Australia reported interactions from within their state managed fisheries - of those, Western Australia reported 10 interactions in 2007–2008 while South Australia reported five interactions in 2007–2008 (DEWHA 2008aaaa).Other fisheries known to interact (Environment Australia 2002g) with Great White Sharks include the :snapper fisheries in Victoria and the Gulf of St Vincent and Spencer Gulf in South Australiatuna farming industry (Great White Sharks have been killed after entering cages or harassing stock during capture and transport operations)Tasmanian Scalefish Fishery.Historic Game Fishing While the Great White Shark now has protected status within its distribution in Australia, it was once targeted by game or trophy fishers who particularly sought out large mature specimens (CITES 2004). During 1961–1990, a total of 7879 records of shark catches were made from the 10 game fishing clubs in south-eastern Australia (Rose 2001). Of these, 2% (or some 157) of those sharks were Great White Sharks. The Game Fishing Association of South Australia recorded a peak of Great White Shark captures in the 1950s to less than one per year in the 1990s (Bruce 1992). Rose (2001) details the game fishing records in NSW, where catches of Great White Shark averaged less than eight per year during 1961–1980 then dropped significantly to four sharks caught between 1981–90 and 12 captured between 1991–1999. After 1997, Great White Sharks were no longer targeted (Chan 2001 in Rose 2001).Numbers of shark captured and landed in NSW from game fishing club records 1989–1999 (Chan 2001 in Rose 2001)Reported common name1989/9090/9191/9292/9393/9494/9595/9696/9797/9898/99Total per speciesGreat White Shark013025200013Chan (2001, in Rose 2001) observed that from the mid 1980s, the practice of tagging and release of most shark species overtook the practice of landing and killing sharks in game fishing off the coast of NSW, possibly as a result of increased conservation concern for sharks.Beach meshing and baiting for human protectionNSW NSW introduced netting along beaches in the 1930s to protect bathers from shark attack. There are 51 ocean beaches from Wollongong to Newcastle netted between 1 September and 30 April each year using bottom-set mesh nets (Green et al. 2009). The shark meshing program is identified as a  Key Threatening Process  under both the  Fisheries Management Act 1994  and the  Threatened Species Conservation Act 1995  in recognition of its impacts on threatened species. The NSW meshing program is now jointly managed under both legislations to address concerns about impact on threatened (such as the Great White Shark of the critically endangered Grey Nurse Shark ( Carcharias taurus (east coast population)) or non-target species such as marine turtles (Green et al. 2009).Some 577 Great White Sharks were captured in shark meshing programs in NSW between 1950/51 and 2007/08 (Green et al. 2009). Between 1990/91–2007/08 there was an average of approximately six Great White Sharks caught in the NSW Shark Meshing Program each year. The sex ratio of caught sharks is effectively 1:1 and not biased toward females (Green et al. 2009). Few large, mature, female Great White Sharks are caught in this netting program, with the annual mean length of shark caught since 1950/51–2007/08 declining from 2.5 m to 1.75 m. Large and/or dangerous sharks caught in the nets used to be euthanased and disposed of at sea, but now all sharks found alive in the nets, or with a reasonable chance of recovery from injuries, are released alive (Green et al. 2009). Mortality is relatively high in Great Whites caught in the nets, and only 17 of the 100 Great White Sharks caught between 1990–91and 2007–08 survived entanglement and were subsequently released alive (Green et al. 2009).September and October are the peak months for capture of Great White Sharks in the neshing program, with 57% of all Great Whites caught between 1990–91 and 2007/08 being caught in those two months. Of the 57 Great Whites caught in the months of September and October from 1990–2008 15 were caught at Stockton Beach, 18 at other beaches in the Newcastle region, and 16 on the Central Coast. Nine of the 16 Great White Sharks from the Central Coast were caught in September in each of the three seasons from 2005–06–2007–08 (Green et al. 2009).The impact that beach meshing may have on the population dynamics of Great White Sharks may be informed by the frequency of capture at beaches identified as important areas for juvenile Great White Sharks. For instance, Stockton Beach and Wattamolla, Redhead and Catherine Hill Bay beaches are all areas frequented by juvenile Great White Sharks during their northward, autumn-winter movements not long after birth in the Great Australian Bight (Bruce et al. 2006). The estimated birth size of Great White Sharks is between 1.2–1.5 m (Francis 1996). Of the 19 sharks caught at Stockton since 1990–91, 15 were under 2 m in length, the smallest of which was 1.3 m long. The smallest Great White Shark caught since 1990–91 was 1.1 m at Catherine Hill Bay (Green et al. 2009).Table 1: Great White Shark entanglements by NSW region and decade between 1950 and 2008 (Green et al. 2009)Region1950/51– 1959/601960/61– 1969/701970/71– 1979/80first 30 years1980/81– 1989/901990/91– 1999/20002000/01– 2007/08Last 28 yearsTotalNewcastle871039228230242579361Central CoastNAaNAa410102424Sydney North502176913452291Sydney South131375195152980Illawarra102331158Unspecified001313000013Total151106161418594456159577Queensland Queensland\'s Shark Control Program (QSCP) began in 1962 and is implemented by the Queensland Department of Primary Industries and Fisheries (Qld DPI&F 2006). The program, which operates along some 1720 km of beach from the Gold Coast to Cairns, uses both nets and baited drumlines. There are 6.5 km of mesh nets and 344 drumlines to protect 84 beaches. Nets and drumlines are in place all year round (Green et al. 2009), reflecting the year round bathing habits. Nets are 186 m in length and have a depth of 6 m and a mesh size of 500 mm. Drumlines catch actively feeding sharks with baited hooks suspended from a large plastic float, which in turn is anchored to the sea bed, The hook is baited every other day with fresh sea mullet, which is a naturally occurring food source for sharks (Qld DPI&F 2006).Between 1985–1986 and 2008–09, some 18 900 sharks were caught in the Queensland Shark Protection Program (Qld OESR 2009). Of these, 214 (or approximately 1%) were Great White Sharks. Between 1998–99 and 2008–09, there was an average of just under seven Great White Sharks caught a year. This compares to an average of nearly 13 per year in the period between 1988–89 and 1998–99 (Qld OESR 2009). During the first 20 years of beach meshing in Queensland an average of about 20 Great White Sharks per year were caught by the nets (Environment Australia 2002g). Paterson (1990) observed that nearly 90% of Great White Shark captures occurred in southern Queensland off the Gold and Sunshine Coasts. The peak in captures also occurred when water temperatures were low (Paterson 1990).Trade International illegal trade Despite the protection provided to Great White Sharks in Australia and overseas, markets exist at both the national and international levels for a variety of Great White Shark products, particularly jaws and teeth (CITES 2004). High demand from collectors in many countries combined with high prices provide strong incentive for fishermen and traders to supply this market, perhaps resulting in the killing and trade of sharks that might otherwise have been released alive (Government of Australia 2004). There is evidence of a thriving international trade in jaws and teeth on the internet (Anon. 2004 in CITES 2004). In a supporting document to the nomination of the Great White Shark under Appendices II of CITES, the Australian Government (Government of Australia 2004) documented the following \"one day snapshot\"\" of their internet search results:At least two sets of great white shark jaws',' one offered at US$12 500'),('64475','Dasyurus maculatus gracilis','Endangered','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','Physical','The subspecies is mostly confined to the relatively cool, wet and climatically equable upland closed-forests (mostly above 900 m altitude) that occur in the upper catchments of rivers draining east and west of the Eastern Escarpment in the Wet Tropics bioregion of north-eastern Queensland (Burnett 2001, cited in Long & Nelson 2010a). Maxwell and colleagues (1996) also suggest the species occurs in lower altitude notophyll, mesophyll and wet sclerophyll forests in lesser numbers. Vegetation types typical of this habitat are simple and complex notophyll vine forest, simple microphyll vine-fern forest and simple microphyll vine-fern thicket (Long & Nelson 2010a).The subspecies utilises dens for resting and for raising young. Dens have been found in tree hollows, logs, rock crevasses and even among building materials. Maternal dens often have long entrances (Qld DERM 2006).','The Spotted-tailed Quoll (North Queensland subspecies) eats a range of animals either as prey or carrion, including insects, reptiles, birds and mammals up to the size of a small wallaby. It is also attracted to areas of human habitation in search of food scraps and, in particular, poultry (Qld DERM 2006).','Habitat lossHabitat loss, modification and fragmentation are serious threats to the species due to the species large home range requirements and resultant low densities that affects the ability of populations to remain viable (Jones et al. 2003).Impacts of fire, either wildfire or prescribed burning, on habitat is also suggested to impact negatively on the species, through lowering refuge sites, creating homogeneity in vegetation and affecting prey abundance and type, such as arboreal species (Jones et al. 2003).Habitat disturbanceOther major threats to the Spotted-tailed Quoll (North Queensland subspecies) include heavy timber harvesting that opens up areas with roads and tracks to clearing, non-target poison baiting, competition and predation from introduced carnivores such as cats, deliberate killing, road mortality, poisoning by Cane Toads ( Bufo marinus ) and climate change through the alteration of the small pockets of suitable habitat they are now found in (Burnett 1993; Jones et al. 2003; Laurance 1991; Long & Nelson 2010a; Maxwell et al. 1996).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64475'),('64483','Egernia stokesii badia','Endangered','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Western Spiny-tailed Skink is one of the larger subspecies of  Egernia stokesii , growing to 194 mm (snout to vent length). Its skin is coloured with heavily keeled scales. It has a short, flattish, distinctively spiny tail (Chapple 2003; Wilson & Swan 2003) which it uses as anchorage within crevices when defending itself (Chapple 2003). There are two forms of Western Spiny-tailed Skink: a reddish brown form, with angular pale blotches arranged in irregular bands and a paler underside, in the northern and central wheatbelt; and a wholly black form in the Murchison region (Ecologia Environment 2010). As with all species in the Egernia genus, its fourth toe is much longer than its third (Wilson & Swan 2003).','Brown form - Wheatbelt area and Shark BayMost records of the brown form Western Spiny-tailed Skink are in York Gum ( Eucalyptus loxophleba ) woodland (Smith pers. comm. cited in Cogger et al. 1993; How et al. undated) with some records in Gimlet ( E. salubris ) and Salmon Gum ( E. salmonophloia ) woodland. Populations persist in woodland patches as small as one hectare and completely surrounded by wheatfields. Sites with the greatest number of individuals contain numerous fallen logs and were subjected to low-intensity grazing by domestic stock (How et al. undated).Hollow logs are used as refuge sites in woodland habitat (Smith pers. comm. cited in Cogger et al. 1993; How et al. undated). Preferred refuges consist of piles of several, overlapping, hollow logs providing a combination of basking and shelter sites (How et al. undated). An increasing number of skinks are being located in altered habitat under piles of wood, scrap metal or under buildings on private property (Hartley 2008).On Dirk Hartog Island, the species occurs in the transition zone between the  Eucalyptus  dominated south and the  Acacia  dominated interior (Wilson & Knowles 1988). Specimens have been found under limestone slabs in low, open heath and under corrugated sheet iron (Maryan et al. 1984).Black form - Murchison regionDuring 2006–09 surveys, all records of the black form of Western Spiny-tailed Skink were on small, isolated stands of granite containing suitable habitat to larger, more extensive clusters of rock (Ecologia Environment 2010). Flat granite domes, with no boulders or crevices, do not support Western Spiny-tailed Skink (Ecologia Environment 2010). This is distinct from the tree hollow habitat of the brown form (How et al. 2003).','The diet of the Western Spiny-tailed Skink is not known, but the species ( Egernia stokesii ) is known to be omnivorous, with juveniles feeding mainly on insects, and adults largely consuming plant material (Duffield & Bull 1998).','Whilst the distribution of the Western Spiny-tailed Skink occurs mainly in the wheatbelt, the remaining habitat patches are threatened by clearing for agriculture, grazing and crop production (Cogger et al. 1993). The long-term survival of populations in grazed areas may be threatened as the presence of livestock may disrupt the dispersal of young between log piles (How et al. undated).The following activities could result in a significant impact on the Western Spiny-tailed Skink (WA DEC 2012b):the introduction of vertebrate predators, including rats ( Rattus  spp.), onto islands where the subspecies occurs.the removal of available refugia, or the destruction or degradation of habitat or potential habitat.the decrease in the connectivity of woodland remNAts.the removal of timber from woodland habitats.increased grazing, compaction or salinity within identified or potential habitat.prescribed fire or arson in woodland remNAts.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64483'),('64487','Eulamprus tympanum marnieae','Endangered','Reptilia','Scincidae','An olive-brown reptile growing to 80mm with head variegated with black and scattered black scales on the back, a broad, dark upper side zone from below the eye to the base of the tail, scattered small white/cream spots, whitish lower flanks with scattered black scales, white belly, limbs variegated with black and throat spotted with black (Cogger 2000).','Found in grassy open woodland and cleared pastures dotted with ephemeral swamps and lakes, on rocky basaltic soils (Cogger  et al . 1993). Within these areas, the lizards inhabit rocky mounds or \"stony rises\"\"',' sheltering in rock crevices and man-made drystone walls (Cogger  et al . 1993; Hutchinson & Rawlinson 1995). Deep rock crevices may provide moist cover during the dry summer (Hutchinson & Rawlinson 1995).The preferred habitat is a geographically peculiar landform comprising basalt ridges and boulder heaps resulting from the collapse of lava tunnels (Robertson 2000). Skinks occur at localities with high shrub density (often  HymeNAthera dentata )',' high cover of Stinging Nettle ( Urtica incisa )',' short distances to vegetation cover'),('64698','Chlamydogobius micropterus','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Gobiidae','The Elizabeth Springs Goby is a freshwater fish growing to 6.2 cm (Unmack 2003a).','Elizabeth Springs is a group of about 40 low freshwater mound springs associated with the Great Artesian Basin (Unmack & Wager in prep). The springs consist of dry or non-flowing mounds with little or no vegetation; vegetated marshy soaks with no surface water; springs with small outflows among marshy vegetated areas; and well-vegetated springs with many short, well-defined outflows. The wetted area of the springs range in diameter up to about 140 m. Maximum water depth is 100 mm. This species only occurs in some of the larger springs. During daylight they shelter in or near emergent vegetation, while at night they can be observed some distance from cover and are apparently foraging (Unmack & Wager in prep).','This species appears to be omnivorous (Unmack & Wager in prep.).','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64698'),('64721','Cyclodomorphus praealtus','Endangered','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Alpine She-oak Skink is a medium-sized scincid lizard with a snout vent length up to 126 mm (Clemann 2007, pers. comm., cited in TSSC 2009bq) with smooth, overlapping scales and four distinct but short limbs, each with five fingers or toes. The tail is relatively short compared to species from coastal areas (Green & Osborne 1994). Dorsal colouration is olive green to reddish-brown, with dark edges to scales that form broken, wavy stripes and occasionally irregular, narrow bands (Wilson & Swan 2008). The ventral surface is usually orange to reddish (TSSC 2009bq).','In Victoria, the Alpine She-oak Skink has only been recorded from alpine tussock grasslands, alpine heathland and alpine grassy heathland, usually above the tree line, although it does occur in grassy areas of very sparse Snow Gums ( Eucalyptus pauciflora ). In NSW, the species has only been observed in tussock grassland within the Kosciuszko region (Hunter 2009, pers. comm., cited in TSSC 2009bq).The species is not known to use heathlands, bogs, woodland and herbfields in the Kosciuszko region in NSW (Hunter 2009, pers. comm., cited in TSSC 2009bq). The species has not been observed in boulder fields or rocky outcrops despite considerable survey and research undertaken in Kosciuszko National Park (Hunter 2009, pers. comm., cited in TSSC 2009bq) and in Victorian alpine regions (Clemann 2008, pers. comm., cited in TSSC 2009bq). The Alpine She-oak Skink has a limited capacity for dispersal (Koumoundouros et al. 2009).The topography in areas of known occurrence ranges from flat plains to rolling alpine hills and because of the cold climate, the species usually selects sunny aspects (TSSC 2009bq).','The diet of the Alpine She-oak Skink comprises mainly molluscs and arthropods, however small lizards and snakes, such as the White-lipped Snake ( Drysdalia coronoides ), are occasionally consumed (Clemann 2003; Shea 1988).','The main current threats to the Alpine She-oak Skink are loss and degradation of habitat, wildfire and predation. Climate change and weeds are potential threats. Construction of dams is a past threat.WildfireWildfire is a current threat with direct loss of individuals and habitat loss and further degradation of habitat through subsequent vegetation succession. The species is known to retract from areas that have recently been burnt (Hunter 2006, pers. comm., cited in TSSC 2009bq). Wildfire has the potential to eliminate the species if it occurs frequently enough (Green 2008, pers. comm., cited in TSSC 2009bq; Fitzgerald 2009, pers. comm., cited in TSSC 2009bq) and exacerbate habitat fragmentation (Fitzgerald 2009, pers. comm., cited in TSSC 2009bq).Degradation of habitatHistorically, large tracts of habitat have been lost as alpine resort villages have been constructed and expanded. Construction of dams has destroyed habitat that was almost certainly occupied by the species. Concurrent development of infrastructure such as roads, tracks and ski runs have also destroyed and fragmented habitat. Development of ski runs may have a greater than expected effect on habitat for Alpine She-oak Skinks, as it is more favourable to build ski runs in large, continuous grassy areas that provide a uniform surface. These large grassy areas are the optimal habitat of the Alpine She-oak Skink. This loss of habitat has reduced the area of occupancy of this species and probably isolated some populations (TSSC 2009bq).Various other activities have led to a degradation of the species\' habitat, including grazing and trampling by cattle, feral horses, deer and pigs and grooming of ski runs. This degradation of habitat can extirpate the species from an area, or it can subdivide formerly continuous populations. The removal of grazing from alpine national parks has been beneficial to this species (TSSC 2009bq).PredationPredation by Rats ( Rattus rattus ), Foxes ( Vulpes vulpes ), Cats ( Felis catus ) and Wild Dogs ( Canis lupus familiaris ) is a current threat. These exotic predators are now present in alpine areas. The impact of predation on the Alpine She-oak Skink has not been quantified, however, it is reasonable to assume that these predators have a negative influence on the species, including direct loss of individuals (TSSC 2009bq).Weed invasionA potential threat to the Alpine She-oak Skink is the invasion of Orange Hawkweed ( Hieracium aurantiacum ). Orange Hawkweed has invaded parts of Kosciuszko National Park, and has the capacity to spread and dominate in sub-alpine grassland areas (Williams & Holland 2007).  If not effectively controlled, this invasive weed has the capacity to greatly reduce the extent of suitable habitat for the Alpine She-oak Skink in Kosciuszko National Park (Hunter 2009, pers. comm., cited in TSSC 2009bq).Climate changeSpecies in alpine areas are especially adapted to a limited suite of climatic conditions, and fauna, such as the Alpine She-oak Skink, depend upon specific vegetation structure. Changes to climate, and vegetation change as a response to climate change, are likely to have a distinct and negative impact on alpine biota, including the Alpine She-oak Skink (TSSC 2009bq).Changes in vegetation structure, as a response to climate change, will include upslope migration of shrubs and heaths currently found at lower elevations, consequently overtaking tussock grassland which the species depends on. Furthermore, as it already occurs on an alpine plateau, this species will have little scope for upslope migration in response to a warming climate. It is suspected that upslope migration of tussock grasslands will not occur or not be at a rate fast enough to provide habitat for the Alpine She-oak Skink at higher altitudes, due to nutrient poor skeletal soils which are not be able to support vegetation such as tussock grasses. Any impacts of climate change on the Alpine She-oak Skink will affect this species across its geographic range (TSSC 2009bq).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64721'),('64733','Litoria littlejohni','Vulnerable','Amphibia','Hylidae','Littlejohn\'s Tree Frog is similar in appearance to the Jervis Bay Tree Frog,  Litoria jervisiensis , from which it may be distinguished by its broad head, absence of a white glandular stripe from below the eye through the angle of the mouth, and its distinctive call (a series of 6 to 14 rapidly repeated low, drawn-out whistles). Its snout-vent length is 55 to 60 mm (Cogger 2000).','Littlejohn\'s Tree Frog is known to inhabit forest, coastal woodland and heath from 100 to 950 m above sea level (White & Ehmann 1997), but the species is not associated with any specific vegetation types (Lemckert 2004).Breeding habitat has been variously reported as rocky streams and semi-permanent dams (Barker et al. 1995), still water in dams, ditches, isolated pools and flooded hollows (Hero et al . 1991), dams, creeks and lagoons (Griffiths 1997), semi-permanent or permanent dams, ponds and creeks (Anstis 2002) and temporary pools when sufficient run-off water was available (White et al. 1994). White and Ehmann (1997) give a more broad breeding habitat description of temporary pools in forested areas, deep permanent pools of slow creeks (in hanging swamps) or slow, rock-lined rivers, and in fire dams within undisturbed natural vegetation. Lemckert (2004) presents evidence that the species has been recorded calling at temporary pools, permanent ponds and streams, and therefore that all of the above habitat types are potential breeding habitat.Non-breeding habitat is unknown. Other species in the  Litoria ewingii  species complex appear to spend their time in leaf litter and low shrubs and this may be the same for Littlejohn\'s Tree Frog. However they have well-developed suckers on their toes which suggests they could be inclined to climb (Hero et al. 2002).Analysis of presence absence data in the Watagan Mountains area, found that the species is more likely to occur in areas with a grass-free, moist, sunny areas that are relatively flat (Lemckert 2010). However, these variables are too broad to accurately predict Littlejohn\'s Tree Frog presence based on a specific water body, and the species is absent at many suitable sites (Lemckert 2010).','Tadpoles have been observed feeding on vegetation, sediment and surface matter as well as on jelly capsules of egg clusters of their own species and of the Whistling Tree-frog,  Litoria verreauxii verreauxii  (Anstis 2002).Adult Littlejohn\'s Tree Frog presumably eat invertebrates, but their diet has not been investigated (Hero et al. 2002).','White and Ehmann (1997) report Littlejohn\'s Tree Frog as only occurring in relatively undisturbed forested areas with infrequent natural fires and unpolluted, non-turbid water. They consider Littlejohn\'s Tree Frog to be very sensitive to habitat changes, and propose that increased bushfire frequency may have caused the species to disappear from National Parks around Sydney.Lemckert (2004) argues many of the sites where the species persists have been disturbed by logging or have been partially cleared, and that the species is therefore not particularly sensitive to disturbance. However there are no records of Littlejohn\'s Tree Frog from areas with 100% clearing so disturbances that involve total land clearance are considered a threat to the species (Lemckert 2004).The introduction of Mosquitofish ( Gambusia holbrooki ) and Yabby ( Cherax destructor ) into streams could reduce recrutement success (Daly & Craven 2007).Another potential threat to the species may be disease. Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (DEH 2006o).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64733'),('64782','Spicospina flammocaerulea','Vulnerable','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','The Sunset Frog is a black or very dark grey frog growing to 35 mm.  It has bright reddish-orange hands and feet as well as orange patches below the anus and margins to jaws.  It has a bright orange throat, anterior chest and cloacal glands.  The belly has small bright blue spots (Cogger 2000).','The Sunset Frog is a habitat specialist. The region from which this species has been recorded is thought to have undergone a change from a subtropical wet to a seasonally arid climate about five to six million years ago and the peat swamps where the species occurs are considered to be relicts of an earlier environment. The persistence of the species in well separated swamps is no doubt attributable to this change in environment (Wardell-Johnson et al. 1996). The species is found in isolated and permanently moist peat based swamps with organically-rich soils (Roberts et al. 1997), in a high rainfall area of moderate relief with granite outcrops and associated ranges of hills rising to 300 to 400 m (Roberts et al. 1999). These sites have a high moisture content in the soil and are protected from climatic extremes, often by local seepages that maintain water availability uncharacteristically into spring and summer (Roberts et al. 1997).','NA','An extremely small geographic range makes the Sunset Frog particularly susceptible to local catastrophes. An apparent decline in frog numbers at one locality (Mountain Road, Mt Franklin National Park) following wildfires in 1994 suggests a possible risk from fire. Frequency of fire varies between localities but the majority of sites have experienced wildfires in the last 50 years. This suggests some capacity to recover post-fire but the time and conditions required for full recovery, which could set an optimal fire interval and intensity regime, are unknown (Roberts et al. 1999). Fires which burn the substrate (peaty swamps) or fire regimes which lead to a greater propensity of substrate ignition, may well be detrimental to the persistence of the species (Roberts et al. 1997). Loss of vegetation through fire or disease (such as the fungus  Phytophthora ) may alter soil water tables affecting both availability of breeding sites and peat formation and mainteNAce (Roberts et al. 1997; Wardell-Johnson et al. 1996).There are no threats to populations on publicly owned lands that cannot be controlled by appropriate management but there has been no analysis of threats to populations found on private property. Fieldwork is currently being undertaken to evaluate declines and variation in population size by assessing population size more directly using mark-recapture techniques and surveys of tadpole populations (Roberts et al. 1999). Excavation by feral pigs is common in swamps close to the type locality and pigs may have a direct impact on frog survival (Roberts et al. 1997). However, monitoring of known populations and adjacent control sites from 1997 to 1998 has shown little indication of pig damage (Roberts et al. 1999).Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (AGDEH 2006o).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=64782'),('654','Atrichornis clamosus','Endangered','Aves','Atrichornithidae','The Noisy Scrub-bird is a medium-sized bird in which the sexes differ markedly in size. Males are about 23 cm in length and weigh 46–58 g, while females are about 19.5 cm in length and weigh 25–37 g (Clench & Smith 1985; Danks 1993; Higgins et al. 2001). The adults are mostly dark brown above with faint dark barring and rufous wings. They are off-white or buff below, merging to rufous brown on the vent, with dark brown irides, a grey-brown and pink bill and pink-brown or silver-grey legs and feet. The adult male has a diagnostic blackish triangle on the throat and foreneck that is highlighted by bold white stripes on the side of the chin and throat. In contrast, the adult female lacks or has only a trace of the dark marking on the throat and foreneck, and lacks the white stripes along the sides of the throat. Juvenile birds can be distinguished from the adults on the basis of the rich and mainly uniform rufous-brown plumage (with contrasting dark grey rump, tail, vent and flanks) and yellow gape. Immature birds appear like a duller version of the adult female, but the difference is sufficient for them to be distinguished from the adults (Higgins et al. 2006).','The Noisy Scrub-bird inhabits ecological communities that support a dense understorey or lower stratum of sedges and shrubs, a dense accumulation of leaf litter and an abundant population of litter-dwelling invertebrates (Smith 1996; Welbon 1993). It mainly occurs in low closed forests 5–15 m in height that are dominated by  Eucalyptus  or  Agonis  and  Banksia littoralis  and occur in the steep and wetter gullies, and drainage lines of hills and granite mountains ( Eucalyptus ), and on the margins of freshwater lakes ( Agonis  and  B .  littoralis ). It is also common in low closed forests up to 5 m in height that are dominated by  Hakea elliptica ,  Eucalyptus  or  Agonis  and  B .  littoralis  and occur around granite outcrops ( H .  elliptica ), in shallower and drier gullies ( Eucalyptus ) and on the margins of freshwater lakes ( Agonis  and  B .  littoralis ). It is less common in shrublands > 3 m in height that support a diverse range of plant species and occur in the swales of sand dunes in lowland areas and around granite outcrops, on stony ridges and in drier areas of the drainage lines of hills and granite mountains. It is least common (and has not been recorded to breed) in heathlands up to 1 m in height that support a diverse range of plant species and occur in lowland areas, between gullies and on the walls of shallower gullies (Danks et al. 1996; Smith 1985b, 1996; Smith & Robinson 1976).Historical records, and more recent observations, at historical sites indicate that this species formerly occurred in forests dominated by  Eucalyptus calophylla  and  E .  marginata , within which it appears to have been confined to wetter areas at the ecotone between swamp and forest where dense stands of  E .  megacarpa ,  Leptospermum  and  Lepidosperma  are common (Smith 1996; Smith & Robinson 1976).There are some differences in the habitats used for breeding and foraging. Breeding habitat occurs in wetter areas and is characterised by a dense ground cover of sedges (mostly  Lepidosperma ) and/or small shrubs which provide a source of nest material, nest sites and cover (Smith 1996). Foraging habitat occurs in drier and more elevated areas and is characterised by a less dense ground cover, a dense layer of leaf litter and an abundant population of litter-dwelling invertebrates (Smith 1996; Welbon 1993).Post-fire age appears to be an important determiNAt of habitat suitability. The Noisy Scrub-bird mostly occurs at sites that have not been burnt for 10 or more years (Danks et al. 1996) and it is most abundant at sites that have not been burnt for 20 or more years (Gilfillan et al. 2007). It has been recorded at sites burnt as little as three or four years earlier (Danks 1997; Smith 1977), but it is not known if such sites are used for breeding (Danks 1997). In drier areas it can take up to 10 years for habitat to become suitable after fire (Smith 1985b, 1985d). It is not known if there is a maximum post-fire age after which the suitability of habitat declines (Danks 1997), but the Noisy Scrub-bird has been recorded breeding in habitat not burnt for 50 or more years at Mount Gardner (Danks et al. 1996) and in habitat probably not burnt for 100 or more years at Bald Island (Danks 1997).The Noisy Scrub-bird does not occur in any of the threatened ecological communities that are listed under the EPBC Act. It is not known to associate with any other threatened species or subspecies that is listed under the EPBC Act, but at some locations it does occur in the same areas and/or habitat as the following nationally listed threatened species: Gilbert\'s Potoroo ( Potorous gilberti ), Western Whipbird (western heath) ( Psophodes nigrogularis nigrogularis ), and Western Bristlebird ( Dasyornis longirostris ) (Danks et al. 1996; Department of Conservation and Land Management 1995).','The diet of the Noisy Scrub-bird is dominated by a variety of invertebrates including beetles, ants, spiders, crickets, cockroaches, bugs, centipedes, millipedes, earthworms, flies, moths, butterflies, woodlice, scorpions, termites, ticks, mites, amphipod crustaceans, mantids, and unidentified pupae and larvae. Other food items, such as seeds and small frogs and lizards, are occasionally consumed (Danks & Calver 1993; Smith & Calver 1984; Whittell 1943, 1951).The Noisy Scrub-bird forages on or near the ground. It collects its food from leaf litter, clumps of rushes, leaves and stems of low dense shrubs, and decaying wood including dead  Xanthorrhoea  trees and fallen logs (Danks 1991; Smith 1985c; Smith & Robinson 1976). It mainly forages by flushing invertebrates from leaf litter. It occasionally turns over leaves with a flick of the head, or inserts its head into and rummages through piles of leaves (Smith & Robinson 1976).','The primary cause of the historical decline of the Noisy Scrub-bird is thought to have been a reduction in the area of suitable habitat due to fire and clearance of native vegetation for agricultural purposes by European settlers (Abbott 1999, 2000; Burbidge et al. 1986; Danks et al. 1996; Smith 1977; Smith 1985c).Extensive and/or frequent fireExtensive and/or frequent fire is the main threat to the Noisy Scrub-bird. The Noisy Scrub-bird is vulnerable to fire because it has a restricted distribution (Comer & Danks 2000; Danks et al. 1996; Gilfillan et al. 2007), occurs in fire-prone habitats (Gilfillan et al. 2007) and has a limited ability to disperse (Danks 1991; Smith 1976). The latter characteristic reduces the capacity for individuals to find refuge in unburnt habitat when confronted with fire, and for isolated populations to be replenished or recolonised in the aftermath of fire (Gilfillan et al. 2007). Extensive fires, and especially those of high intensity, thus have the potential to eliminate substantial numbers of birds and to render large areas of habitat temporarily unsuitable (Burbidge 2003; Gilfillan et al. 2007). For example, a series of wildfires in the Albany Management Zone since 2001 have reduced the area of optimal habitat for the Noisy Scrub-bird in the zone from about 13 000 ha to about 4500 ha, and one of these fires, at Mount Manypeaks in December 2004, eliminated two-thirds of the total population of the Noisy Scrub-bird (Gilfillan et al. 2007).The preference of the Noisy Scrub-bird for habitat that has not burnt for at least three or four years and more usually ten or more years (Danks 1997; Danks et al. 1996; Smith 1977) suggests that frequent fires could also eliminate the species from otherwise suitable locations (Danks et al. 1996; Gilfillan et al. 2007). The absence of the Noisy Scrub-bird from sites that have recently been burnt suggests that it takes a minimum of three or four years for the habitat in such sites to attain a structure and invertebrate fauna capable of sustaining a population of the Noisy Scrub-bird (Danks et al. 1996).Predation by introduced predatorsThe habit of the Noisy Scrub-bird to nest near the ground and forage on and near the ground (Higgins et al. 2001; Smith 1985c; Smith & Robinson 1976) may render it vulnerable to predation by introduced terrestrial predators. The European Red Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ), feral cat ( Felis catus ), Black Rat ( Rattus   rattus ) and House Mouse ( Mus musculus ) occur in areas inhabited by the Noisy Scrub-bird and are considered potential predators (Department of Conservation and Land Management 1995; Gilfillan et al. 2007). Feathers of the Noisy Scrub-bird were recovered from the stomach of one feral cat from Two Peoples Bay Nature Reserve. Two incidences of predation in a translocated population in the Darling Range have been attributed by the Black Rat (Gilfillan et al. 2007).The impact of predation by introduced predators is essentially unknown, but there is circumstantial evidence to indicate that it has had a limited effect on population trends. The European Red Fox and feral cat are not considered to be major threats because, in contrast to habitat preferences of the Noisy Scrub-bird, they tend to utilise tracks and avoid areas with dense understorey vegetation (Danks et al. 1996; Gilfillan et al. 2007). The opinion that the European Red Fox and other introduced predators are minor threats to the Noisy Scrub-bird is supported by evidence from Two Peoples Bay Nature Reserve, where a steady increase in numbers of the Noisy Scrub-bird was observed throughout the 1970s and 1980s despite the presence of the European Red Fox (Danks et al. 1996) and the likely presence of the Feral Cat, Black Rat and House Mouse (S. Comer 2007, pers. comm.). The potential for introduced predators to impact on the Noisy Scrub-bird has been reduced by the implementation of a control program for the European Red Fox in 1988 and the opportunistic control of other feral species at Two Peoples Bay Nature Reserve (Danks et al. 1996; Department of Conservation and Land Management 1995).Dieback caused by the soil fungus  Phytophthora cinnamomi Phytophthora cinnamomi Clearing of native vegetation Degradation of habitat by introduced mammals  weed invasion and changes in hydrology or climate  Grazing and trampling by domestic and feral mammals with hard hooves can disturb and alter the structure and/or composition of ecological communities occupied by the Noisy Scrub-bird and consequently can render such communities unsuitable or less suitable (Gilfillan et al. 2007; Smith 1985c). The impact of grazing and trampling was observed by Smith (1985b) at one formerly occupied site near Margaret River where grazing and trampling by cattle had destroyed and degraded habitat that would otherwise have been suitable for breeding.Extensive infestation by weeds could potentially alter the structure and composition of ecological communities occupied by the Noisy Scrub-bird and consequently render such communities unsuitable or less suitable. However, to date, there is no evidence to indicate that invasive weeds have had, or are having, a deleterious impact on the Noisy Scrub-bird (Gilfillan et al. 2007).Changes in hydrology in south-western Western Australia, and especially changes that result in an increase in the salinity of soils in this region, could potentially alter the composition and structural diversity of ecological communities occupied by the Noisy Scrub-bird (Cramer & Hobbs 2002; George et al. 1995). Such changes could potentially render such communities unsuitable or less suitable for inhabitation. There is, thus far, no evidence to indicate that changes in hydrology have had or are having a deleterious impact on the Noisy Scrub-bird. However, Western Australia is considered more likely to experience an increase in the salinity of soils, in coming decades, compared to any other location in Australia, and the extent of saline soils in southern coastal regions of Western Australia is projected to expand by 2050 (National Land and Water Resources Audit 2001).Climate change is a potential threat to the Noisy Scrub-bird. The Noisy Scrub-bird is considered to be vulnerable to the effects of climate change for two main reasons; it inhabits dense vegetation; and it has a restricted and fragmented distribution (Comer & Danks 2000; Danks et al. 1996) and limited ability to disperse (Danks 1991; Smith 1976). An increase in aridity could potentially reduce the density and consequently the suitability of habitat for the species. The limited dispersal ability means the species may be unable to avoid or escape from areas affected by climate change. The area around Two Peoples Bay, where the majority of the population of the Noisy Scrub-bird occurs, has thus far not experienced the same declines in rainfall and increases in temperature that have been recorded in other regions of south-western Western Australia in recent decades (IOCI 2002). However, trends suggest that overall increases in temperature and decreases in rainfall are likely to occur in future, and it is possible that these changes could result in direct and indirect impacts that combined might reduce the extent and quality of habitat used by the Noisy Scrub-bird (IOCI 2002; Gilfillan et al. 2007). One example of a direct impact is a potential decline in the density and therefore quality of the habitat due to reduced rainfall. One example of an indirect impact is a potential increase in the incidence of dry lightning storms and a consequent increase in the incidence of associated wildfires (Gilfillan et al. 2007). Interactions with the Red Imported Fire Ant Solenopsis invicta Loss of genetic variation','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=654'),('655','Atrichornis rufescens','Endangered','Aves','Atrichornithidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=655'),('66','Xeromys myoides','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Muridae','The water mouse is a small rodent with short, dense silky fur that is dark slate-grey above and pure white below (Van Dyck and Strahan 2008).','Habitat overview Although the water mouse had been documented in three distinct locations (Northern Territory, central south Queensland, south-east Queensland) they require similiar habitat including mangroves and the associated saltmarsh, sedgelands, clay pans, heathlands and freshwater wetlands. The main habitat difference at each location is the littoral, supralittoral and terrestrial vegetation which differs in structure and composition. These differences dictate the species\' nesting behaviour.  Northern Territory habitat The species\' habitat in the Nothern Territory is not as well documented as that of Queensland due to a low number of records of the species. The Water Mouse appears to utilise both intertidal and freshwater habitats. Most records have been from mangrove forests, saltmarsh, sedgelands, clay pans and freshwater melaleuca wetlands (Magnusson et al. 1976; Redhead and McKean 1975; Woinarski et al. 2000). Capture records along the Daly River were from moist regions at the edges of freshwater lagoons which had receded during the dry season from an outer margin of Paperbark,  Melaleuca nervosa , and freshwater mangrove,  Barringtonia acutangula . The dry season had left an exposed plain of dry cracked earth covered in grasses and sedges (Redhead & McKean 1975).  A specimen recorded from mangroves along the Tomkinson River in Arnhem Land was captured beneath corrugated iron 3 m from the rivers edge in a small patch of saltmarsh,  Sporobolus virginicus , grassland surrounded on three sides by mangrove forest comprised of  Avicennia eucalyptifolia ,  Lumnitzera racemosa ,  Exoecaria agallocha  and  Ceriops tagal var. australis  (Magnusson et al. 1976). On Melville Island from the banks of AndraNAgoo Creek, they were found nesting within a mound of black friable mud within a tall  Bruguiera parviflora  mangrove forest with a few  Ceriops tagal  (Magnusson et al. 1976). Habitat information from more recent captures in the Northern Territory on the floodplain of the Glyde River (Woinarski et al. 2000) included an extensively inundated saline light clay plain, with scattered low chenier ridges and patches of low chenopod shrubland intergrading with the saline grassland. This grassland was sparsely vegetated with  Sporobolus virginicus ,  Cyperus scariosus  and  Cressa cretica  and lacked any water in the immediate vicinity.  Central south Queensland In central south Queensland, the water mouse has only been captured in the high inter-tidal zone in tall, closed fringing mangrove forest containing only  Ceriops tagal  and/or  Bruguiera sp  (Ball 2004). Although not considered core habitat, the Water Mouse has also been captured in saline grassland adjacent to a closed forest of  Ceriops tagal  and  Bruguiera sp  and in closed forest of  Avicennia marina . A supralittoral bank is usually absent in this subregion (Ball 2004). Although these observations are relevant to the Cape Palmerston-Cannonvale areas (Ball 2004), habitat used in the central Queensland area may be more diverse and include habitat types similar to what is used in south-east Queensland (Ball pers. comm. cited in QGC 2013).  The type specimen from near Mackay was caught in a permanent reed swamp, covered with tall grass, shrubs and  Pandanus , one mile from a beach near Mackay (Troughton 1943). The moist wallum, heath, sedgeland and freshwater influences along mangrove ecotones as described by Van Dyck (1997) were not present to any large degree at the capture sites in south central Queensland and more typically comprised distinct ecotones between mangroves and dry sclerophyll woodlands and/or saltpan (Ball 2004). South-east Queensland In south-east Queensland, water mouse habitat includes mangrove communities and adjacent sedgelands, grasslands and freshwater wetlands. Mangrove communities in this region are typically comprised of  Avicenna marina var. australasica ,  Rhizophora stylosa ,  Bruguiera gymnorrhiza ,  Aegiceras corniculatum  and  Ceriops tagal var. australis  (Van Dyck & Durbidge 1992; Van Dyck 1997; Van Dyck & Gynther 2003). In south-east Queensland the upper tidal areas on the shoreward side of the mangrove zone often support sedgelands or salt meadows, comprised of  Juncus kraussii ,  Baumea juncea ,  B. rubiginosa ,  Fimbristylis ferruginea  and  Sporobolus virginicus . The adjacent terrestrial communities are typically freshwater wetland, coastal woodland or wet heathland dominated variously by species such as  Melaleuca quinquenervia ,  Corymbia intermedia ,  Casuarina glauca ,  Eucalyptus robusta ,  Leptospermum liversidgei ,  Gahnia sieberiana  and  Caustis blakei . A supralittoral bank may also be present and be utilised by the Water Mouse for nesting (Van Dyck & Durbidge 1992; Van Dyck 1997; Van Dyck & Gynther 2003). Studies on North Stradbroke Island suggested that the most productive zone for the water mouse lies between nests at the supralittoral bank and the first 100 m into the mangroves (Van Dyck 1997). The floor of mangrove habitats provide a variety of microhabitat features important to the water mouse including tidal pools, channels, crab holes, pneumatophores, crevices in bark and around roots, hollows in standing and fallen timber, suspended drifts of twigs and leaves and driftwood. These microhabitats vary according to the structure of the community (Van Dyck 1997).  The water mouse has also been captured from a variety of freshwater wetland and wet heath habitats in south-east Queensland. The water mouse was captured in a dry creek-bed of the Beerwah scientific area which comprised dense  Persoonia ,  Banksia robur ,  Gahnia  and grass inside a five-year old slash pine plantation, 25 m from a stream fringed with  Casuarina  and  Callitris , and 30 m from a sedge swamp fringed by  Melaleuca  (Dwyer et al. 1979). In Cooloola, south-east Queensland, the water mouse was captured in dense restiad swamp with some  Gahnia  and shallow surface water, within 300 m of Noosa River (Dwyer et al. 1979). On Fraser Island, the water mouse was recorded near Garry\'s Anchorage in an ecotone of reedy ( Lepironia articulata ) swampland and wet heathland (DEWHA 2009p). The Queensland Department of Environment and Resource Management maps \'Essential Habitat\' for endangered, vulnerable, rare or near threatened species in Queensland. This mapping is based on the buffering of known water mouse records. Essential habitat for the water mouse is currently only mapped for the Central Queensland Coast bioregion however there are plans to extend this into the Brigalow Belt and south-east Queensland bioregions in the near future (DEWHA 2009p). The water mouse may nest or forage in the following Queensland Regional Ecosystems: 8.1.1, 11.1.1, 11.1.2, 11.1.4, 12.1.1, 12.1.2, 12.1.3, 12.2.5, 12.2.7, 12.2.11, 12.2.12 and 12.2.14. Regional Ecosystems that are or likely to be essential habitat for the water mouse are listed in the table below:Bioregion (Sattler and Williams 1999)Description (EPA 2007)Essential HabitatCentral Queensland CoastMangrove vegetation of marine clay plains and estuaries.YesBrigalow BeltSporobolus virginicus  grassland on marine clay plains.LikelyBrigalow BeltSamphire forbland or bare mud-flats on Quaternary estuarine deposits.LikelyBrigalow BeltMangrove low forest on Quaternary estuarine deposits.LikelySoutheast QueenslandMangrove shrubland to low closed forest on marine clay plains and estuaries.LikelyNesting habitat The water mouse creates nests which are important for breeding and refuge from high tide and predators. The Water Mouse constructs five types of nests: free-standing, termitarium-like mound nests or mounds at the base of mangrove trees (e.g.  Avicennia marina ), mound nests on small elevated \'islands\' within the tidal zone, mound nests or holes in supralittoral banks; nests inside hollow tree trunks, and nests in spoil heaps created as a result of human activity (Van Dyck & Gynther 2003; Van Dyck et al. 2003). Nest mounds are usually 20 to 60 cm in height with a basal circumference of 1.6 to 4.8 m, with one to three entrance holes, although other entrances may be hidden (Magnusson et al. 1976; Van Dyck & Durbidge 1992; Van Dyck & Gynther 2003). Burrow entrances can be at the top, sides or bottom, or in adjoining banks or fallen timber (Van Dyck & Gynther 2003). Fresh mud plastering on the top of nest mounds can indicate that a mound has been built up to maintain its height above high tide level (Van Dyck & Gynther 2003). Mud pathways also may be present on the side of mounds where the Water Mouse has excavated mud from a tunnel and spread it along a track. These mud plastering\'s may include bits of vegetation, dried leaves, sedges and crab shells (Van Dyck & Gynther 2003). The nests recorded in sites adapted from spoil heaps include materials such as excavated or bulldozed sand, rocks and earth, and tree-stump waste (Van Dyck & Gynther 2003). A distinctive odour may indicate whether the water mouse is nesting in a mound (Van Dyck & Gynther 2003). Nesting in central south Queensland does not appear to include free standing nests ascribed to the species elsewhere but seem restricted to mud ramps constructed between the buttress roots of  Ceriops tagal  or more commonly  Bruguiera parviflora  or  B. gymnorrhiza  (Ball 2004). Magnusson and colleagues (1976) however discovered similar free standing nests to that in south-east Queensland on Melville Island in the Northern Territory. The nest was described as a mound of black friable mud, 60 cm in height and semi circular at the base, against and interlocked within the buttress trunk of a  B. parviflora . It is assumed the water mouse does not need to build mounds or obvious nest structures in non-tidal environments.','The diet of the water mouse has been well surveyed. Van Dyck (1997) investigated the diet of the Water Mouse on North Stradbroke Island in south-east Queensland. The composition of the diet included a variety of crustaceans ( Parasesarma erythrodactyla ,  Helice leachi  and  Australoplax tridentata ), marine polyclads, marine pulmonates ( Salinator solida ,  Ophicardelus quoyi  and  Ochidina australis ) and marine bivalves ( Glauconome sp. ). Investigations of middens within and outside tree hollows also revealed the remains of the mud lobster  Laomedia healyi  and mottled shore crab  Peragrapsis laevis  (Van Dyck 1997). This suite of species is common on intertidal saltmarsh habitats in south-east Queensland (Breitfuss et al. 2004). The dietary preferences in central south Queensland appear to be similar and include grapsid crabs (Ball 2004). Whilst limited information exists on the diet of the water mouse in the Northern Territory, the remains of a grapsid crab,  Neoepisesarma mederi  were discovered within and outside a mound nest on Melville Island (Magnusson et al. 1976). Plant foods to date have not been reported in the diet of the water mouse, however gut morphology suggests that the diet of the Water Mouse should not be totally carnivorous (Van Dyck 1997).','Threat overview The removal and degradation of habitat as a result of development actions is the principal threat to the survival of the Water Mouse. Development actions likely to impact on the Water Mouse include sand mining, urban residential development, resorts and marina development, bund walling, aquaculture projects and creation or upgrading of easements for energy distribution or infrastructure such as electricity, gas or water pipelines. Habitats used in central south Queensland are often directly adjacent to terrestrial areas that are subject to ongoing disturbance, modification and clearing, aquaculture and housing (Ball 2004) and important populations in south-east Queensland on North Stradbroke Island are continually threatened by expansion of mining activities (Van Dyck 1997). In the Northern Territory there is a paucity of information to determine what the actual key threatening processes are (Woinarski et al. 2000). Development actions such as, but not limited to, those described above have the potential to introduce threatening processes to Water Mouse habitat, or contribute to or increase the intensity and magnitude of existing threats to the Water Mouse. Habitat removal Regional Ecosystem (RE) data (EPA 2007) estimates the area of Water Mouse habitat cleared in Queensland since pre-clearing times. Using regional ecosystems considered or likely to be considered essential habitat in Queensland resulted in an estimate that 31 213 ha of Water Mouse habitat had been cleared between pre-clearing times and 2005.  The table below provides specific infomation on the extent of Water Mouse habitat cleared in Queensland. This data refers only to intertidal habitats. It does not consider freshwater habitat that has been lost and is likely to be an underestimate.Description (EPA 2007)Pre clearing extent (ha)Extent remaining in 2005 (ha)Estimate of clearing (pre clearing to 2005)  (ha)Mangrove vegetation of marine clay plains and estuaries.41 02440 248776Sporobolus virginicus  grassland on marine clay plains.35 00817 63317 375Samphire forbland or bare mud-flats on Quaternary estuarine deposits.11 3110104 0739037Mangrove low forest on Quaternary estuarine deposits.85 29184 2821009Mangrove shrubland to low closed forest on marine clay plains and estuaries.53 49950 4833016Alteration of natural hydrology The  Draft National Recovery Plan for the Water Mouse  (DERM 2009a) lists the following alterations to hydrology as threats to the Water Mouse:Changes in natural hydrology including increased freshwater inflows and sedimentation from storm water run-off as a result of adjacent development.Physical changes to saltmarsh such as runnelling or bundwall construction that modify tidal amplitude and frequency of inundation.Modified water levels and salinity in tidal waterways resulting from installation of flow control gates for flood mitigation.Drainage of coastal and terrestrial wetlands for urban and industrial developments.The alteration of overland water flows such as the concentration of stormwater run-off from adjacent urban areas has been observed in central south Queensland (Ball 2004). Such artificial physical processes may impact on the Water Mouse indirectly. For example, increased stormwater runoff from expanding urbanisation causes changes to salinity and sediment loads which are detrimental to populations of grapsid crabs, a major food source of the Water Mouse (Ball et al. 2006). Fragmentation The fragmentation of freshwater and intertidal wetland communities is considered one of the most important issues to the Water Mouse as it can reduce potential feeding resources and nesting opportunities, extend edge effects, promote weed invasion and increase pest densities or their impacts on native fauna (DERM 2009a). Fragmented populations of Water Mouse are thought to be at high risk of local extinction through fox and possibly cat predation (DERM 2009a) and habitat fragmentation probably exacerbates feral predator impacts and restricts recruitment or recolonisation from adjacent areas (Gynther & Janetzki 2008). Development actions such as residential development are the main cause of fragmentation whilst the creation of easements for power, water and gas pipelines can also result in the fragmentation of habitat. Clearing to the edges of mangrove habitat is evident in central south Queensland (Ball 2004) and is likely to have impacts on local Water Mouse populations. Acid sulfate exposure An estimated 2.3 million hectares of acid sulfate soils occur along 6500 km of the Queensland coastline (DERM 2009b), coinciding with known and likely Water Mouse habitat (see Figures 1-3). Without appropriate management, development activities in coastal habitats have the potential to disturb acid sulfate soils which can release sulphuric acid and often toxic quantities of iron, aluminium and heavy metals. Acid sulfate soils can have a number of negative implications for the Water Mouse relating to habitat degradation and poor plant productivity and, most significantly, can impact negatively upon crustaceans, marine pulmonates and molluscs which are important food resources. Weeds Although there is insufficient information available to assess the impacts of possible threatening process in the Northern Territory, the most plausible threatening processes relate to broadscale habitat changes, especially the spread of weeds (Woinarski et al. 2007). Much of the lowland wetland communities in the Northern Territory likely to support the Water Mouse are being transformed by the spread of exotic plants including  Mimosa pigra  and exotic pasture grasses such as Para Grass and Olive Hymenachne (DERM 2009a). Predation Direct biological impacts on the Water Mouse include predation pressures from native and introduced fauna (DERM 2009a). Predation pressures from feral and domestic dogs, foxes and feral and domestic cats are likely to pose significant threats to populations of the Water Mouse; particularly those located close to urban environments in parts of coastal Queensland. However, these pressures have not been quantified for isolated populations (DERM 2009a). Feral pigs, foxes and both feral and domestic cats are common throughout the central Queensland coast and their impact as predators on the Water Mouse are likely to be significant (Ball 2004). Remains of the Water Mouse have been detected in dingo scats on Fraser Island (DEWHA 2009p), although the population-level significance of predation of Water Mouse by dingoes is unknown (DERM 2009a). The remains of a Water Mouse have also been discovered in a crocodile in the Northern Territory (Magnusson et al. 1976) however the degree to which this predation occurs is unknown. Van Dyck (1997) noted the presence of the Carpet Python ( Morelia spilota ), the Rough Scaled Snake ( Tropidechis carinatus ), and Tawny Frogmouth ( Podargus strigoides ) in Water Mouse habitat in south-east Queensland. Although no evidence of actual predation exists, the presence of these species in this habitat and their life history suggests the Water Mouse may be a potential prey item. It is also possible that the Water Mouse represents a prey item for the Water Rat ( Hydromys chrysogaster ) (Van Dyck 1997). Herbicides, pesticides and oil pollution In south-east and central Queensland, saltmarsh and mangrove habitats occur adjacent to agriculture (for example sugar cane lands) and urban development. Herbicides and pesticides are employed for pest management, but may also persist in natural environments (Zimmerman et al. 2000), possibly impacting non-target populations and potentially affecting the Water Mouse and/or its prey and habitat (DERM 2009a). Off-shore pollution events such as oil spills (from tankers or pipelines) have the potential to negatively influence the function and health of mangrove communities. As a result, the cumulative impacts from these activities may result in secondary effects on populations of the Water Mouse and/or its primary food sources (DERM 2009a). Researchers in North Queensland have recently discovered that a common agricultural herbicide, diuron, is correlated with the severe dieback of common grey mangroves  Avicennia marina  (Shearer 2004). The use of insecticides for mosquito control is also a process that may directly or indirectly affect Water Mouse populations as this process has been observed to take place in south-east Queensland where a once-known population is now considered extinct (DERM 2009a). Other threats The use of recreational vehicles in intertidal areas is considered a threat to the Water Mouse (DERM 2009a). The creation of wheel ruts has the potential to cause saltwater incursion and supralittoral dieback. Any prolonged or intensive wave action from recreational vessels (for example jet skis, motorboats) could result in the erosion of supralittoral banks or the washing away of mound nests. The discovery of a nest mound exposed by fire on an island in the supralittoral zone in Donnybrook, south-east Queensland (Van Dyck & Gynther 2003) suggests that fire in the supralittoral zone, whether as a result of development actions, natural or recreational activities or arson events, poses a threat to the Water Mouse. The destruction or degradation of habitat by feral and hard-hoofed animals (for example pigs) has been recorded from a number of populations of the Water Mouse (DERM 2009a). Cattle grazing in the supralittoral zone may pose a threat to Water Mouse habitat through trampling and denudation of intertidal habitats, altering hydrology, removing vegetative cover protecting animals from predation and potentially allowing for acid sulfate soil incursions.Small terrestrial mammals, including the Water Mouse, reduce their noctorinal foraging activity in response to increasing moonlight intensity (e.g. Beier 2006), and such response occurs in all natural environments including heavily forested situations. Artificial light is expected to evoke the same response, even in forests or mangroves with relatively dense canopies. Predation risk is increased and dispersl movements are also impacted in artifically lit landscapes (Beier 2006). The species is unlikely to benefit from \"diffuse noctornal illumination\"\" as reported by QGC (2013)',' as the referred study (Santos et al. 2009) is about waders and not rodents or the Water Mouse. The Water Mouse has small eyes resembling those of small insectivorous bats (Van Dyck 1994) and behavioural observations suggest that the species relies most heavily on olfaction (smell)'),('662','Hirundo rustica','','Aves','Hirundinidae','The Barn Swallow is a small bird with steel-blue coloured upperparts, white underparts and a rufous-chestnut forehead, chin and throat. A well-defined blue breast-band, and long outer tail feathers help distinguish the species. Sexes are similar but females lack the length in tail streamers (tail feathers are forked in both sexes), and the white markings on outer tail feathers are also shorter. Juveniles generally have duller colouration than adults (Higgins et al. 2006). The average length is 15–18 cm and weight is approximately 17 grams (Higgins et al. 2006). Barn Swallows form large flocks, which can number in the thousands, when not breeding (Turner & Rose 1989).','When breeding in Europe and north Africa, the Barn Swallow utilises open country with water or low moist green vegetation, such as pastures and farm crops, near margins of wetlands and human settlements. The species usually avoids densely populated areas. The Barn Swallow occurs from sea level up to about 3000 m above sea level. The bird prefers areas with a good supply of accessible artificial structures, such as barns, sheds and bridges for nesting and plenty of overhead wires or bare branches and twigs for perching, sunning and preening (Cramp 1988;Turner & Rose 1989).AustraliaIn Australia, the Barn Swallow is recorded in open country in coastal lowlands, often near water, towns and cities. Birds are often sighted perched on overhead wires (Pizzey 1980; Blakers et al. 1984), and also in or over freshwater wetlands, paperbark  Melaleuca  woodland, mesophyll shrub thickets and tussock grassland (Schodde & Mason 1999).Asia-Pacific regionIn New Guinea, the species is known mainly from large freshwater swamps utilising dead trees for perches and nearby grassland for foraging (Coates 1990a). In east Indonesia, the Barn Swallow is also recorded in mangroves (Coates & Bishop 1997). In the Philippines, the species is recorded in forested mountain passes (Kennedy et al . 2000).Northern hemisphereIn the northern hemisphere, Barn Swallows are found roosting in reedbeds (Cramp 1988; Lekagul & Round 1991; Coates & Bishop 1997) with up to 100 000 birds recorded roosting together at some sites in late summer. In cold weather, the species may also roost communally in buildings (Cramp 1988).','The Barn Swallow is almost entirely insectivorous, consuming mainly flying insects (Cramp 1988). The species feeds by aerial pursuit (sallying) or gleaning or skimming insects from plants or water surface. They feed mainly low over the ground or water (Cramp 1988; Coates & Bishop 1997; Higgins et al. 2006; Turner & Rose 1989). Occasionally, birds are recorded feeding on clear ground, such as roads, paths and beaches, by walking around and picking at the surface (Cramp 1988; Turner & Rose 1989).Insect dietInsect Orders recorded in the summer diet of the Barn Swallow in the western Palearctic region (Europe and northern Africa) include Ephemeroptera (mayflies), Odonata (damsel flies), Plecoptera (stoneflies), Orthoptera (grasshoppers), Dermaptera (earwigs), Psocoptera, Hemiptera (bugs), Neuroptera (lacewings), Lepidoptera (adult and larvae moths and butterflies), Trichoptera (caddis flies), Diptera (flies), Hymenoptera (bees, ants and wasps) and Coleoptera (beetles) (Cramp 1988).The species is also recorded as taking spiders, sandhoppers (Amphipoda), stickleback (a fish, Gasterosteidae), bread, berries, grit and eggshell. In the non-breeding range, a smaller variety of insects in the diet is recorded, with the Barn Swallow more dependent on Hymenoptera (bees, ants, wasps) in Africa than in Britain. The species is also recorded eating termites (Isoptera) (Cramp 1988). No information on diet in Australia is known (Barker & Vestjens 1990).','A past and current threat to the Barn Swallow is loss of habitat (Cramp 1988). Historically, pesticides were responsible for a significant decrease in population numbers in Israel during the 1950s (Cramp 1988).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=662'),('66471','Diomedea dabbenena','Endangered','Aves','Diomedeidae','The Tristan albatross is a large albatross, with a length of 110 cm and a wingspan of approximately 3.5 m. They are very similar in plumage to the wandering albatross ( Diomedea exulans ). The two species are often indistinguishable in the field (at sea), although the plumage of the Tristan albatross is generally darker (BirdLife International 2016). The Tristan albatross may be distinguished by its slightly smaller size, and slower acquisition of white adult plumage; never attaining the very white plumage of the wandering albatross (BirdLife International 2016).','The Tristan albatross is a marine, pelagic seabird. It forages in open water in the Atlantic Ocean near the Cape of Good Hope, South Africa. It sleeps and rests on ocean waters when not breeding (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Tristan albatross feeds on squid, fish and crustaceans (Gales 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1990). The Tristan albatross feeds pelagically (in the open ocean) close to the waters surface (Gales 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1990). Their foraging behaviours, such as flying long distances to search for food, following boats, feeding aggressively on offal and diving for baits make them susceptible to being drowned in longline fishing gear (AGDEH 2006q).','The Tristan albatross is threatened by drowning in longline fishing gear, particularly off South America (BirdLife International 2011, cited in Garnett et al. 2011; Wanless, cited in ACAP 2009). Oceanic longline fishing has been used to target pelagic and demersal fish in the southern oceans since the 1950s, and is used in almost all Australian waters today (AGDEH 2006q). Gales and Brothers (1995) reported that 75% of the birds killed on longlines and retained for identification were albatrosses. Internationally, some longline fishing fleets still operate without substantial bycatch mitigation measures (Environment Australia 2001f). Both seabirds and fishing vessels concentrate in areas of high biological productivity increasing the incidence of interaction (Environment Australia 2001f). The chick is unlikely to survive if a parent is killed while it is foraging at sea (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Other threats to the species in Australian foraging habitat include plastic ingestion, collisions with cables and warps used on fishing trawlers, and by being shot by fishermen to protect bait or for sport (Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1998)Including other species of birds, approximately 60% of all chicks die on Gough Island before fledging each year due to mice predation (BirdLife International 2008). On the breeding island of Tristan da Cunha, the Tristan albatross was almost certainly eliminated by man (Fraser et al. 1988; Hagen 1952). On Inaccessible Island, the population decreased from 200 pairs in the 1870s to nearly to extinction prior to 1938 due to pig predation (Fraser et al. 1988). The colony on the island has not recovered and has 2-3 pairs, and 0-1 annual breeding attempts (ACAP 2009).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66471'),('66472','Thalassarche melanophris','Vulnerable','Aves','Diomedeidae','The Black-browed Albatross is 80–95 cm in length, has a mass of 3–5 kg and a wingspan of 210–250 cm (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Adults of either gender are white with dark-brown irides; an orange-yellow bill; a black brow, back, upperwing and tail; broad black edges to the underwing; and bluish-grey legs and feet (Brooke 2004; Marchant & Higgins 1990). Juvenile and immature birds can be distinguished from the adults by the colour and pattern of the plumage and by the darker bill which has a black tip (Brooke 2004; Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Black-browed Albatross is a marine species that inhabits Antarctic, subantarctic and temperate waters and occasionally enters the tropics (Brooke 2004; Marchant & Higgins 1990; Tickell 2000; Woehler et al. 1991). It can tolerate a broad range of sea-surface temperatures from 0–24º C (Ainley et al. 1984; Bierman & Voous 1950; Brown et al. 1975; Grindley 1981; Reid et al. 2002) or probably more based on occasional records from the tropics. It forages around the breaks of continental and island shelves and across nearby underwater banks (Prince et al. 1998; Reid et al. 2002; Terauds et al. 2006; Weimerskirch et al. 1988, 1997), but also frequents other marine habitats, such as oceanic waters (Reid et al. 2002; Terauds et al. 2006; Woehler et al. 1991) and the iceberg belt at the limit of the Antarctic pack ice (Falla 1937; Hicks 1973; Murphy 1936; Raymond & Woehler 2003; Woehler et al. 2003). In the non-breeding season it follows cold water currents north to the continental shelves of Australia, South America and Africa where it can occur in coastal and inshore waters and sometimes enter fjords and channels (Cox 1973, 1976; Jehl 1973; Marchant 1977; Murphy 1936; Swanson 1973; Tickell 2000).The Black-browed Albatross breeds on subantarctic and peri-antarctic islands (Marchant & Higgins 1990) in colonies located on terraces of coastal cliffs, slopes of nearby hills, summits of rocky islets or on flat or gently-sloping ground. The terrain in such areas is rocky, but usually supports a moderately-dense cover of tussock grasses (Downes et al. 1959; MacKenzie 1968; Tickell 2000; Tickell & Pinder 1975). The species is rarely sighted over land away from its breeding islands (Marchant & Higgins 1990), although individuals have been observed travelling over land to utilize a large freshwater lake in Argentina (Stiles 1974).The Black-browed Albatross does not occur in any of the threatened ecological communities listed under the EPBC Act. The Black-browed Albatross sometimes breeds in close proximity to colonies of Grey-headed Albatross ( Thalassarche chrysostoma ) (Marchant & Higgins 1990) and Light-mantled Sooty Albatross ( Phoebetria palpebrata ) (E.J. Woehler 2007a, pers. comm.), which are listed under the EPBC Act.','The diet of the Black-browed Albatross primarily consists of a combination of fish, molluscs (mostly cephalopods) and crustaceans (mostly krill). The diet also includes other items such as carrion, jellyfish and salps that are taken less frequently (Cherel et al. 2000; Croxall et al. 1988; Downes et al. 1959; Harper 1987; Petry et al. 2007; Prince 1980; Reid et al. 1996; Ridoux 1994; Rodhouse & Prince 1993; Thompson 1992; Tickell 1964; Weimerskirch et al. 1986). More detailed information on the diet is available in a review by Cherel and Klages (1998).The Black-browed Albatross is believed to forage during both day and night (Bevan et al. 1995; Croxall & Prince 1994; Harper 1987; Prince & Morgan 1987). It obtains most of its food while settled on the surface of the water by reaching down to seize a food item in the bill or, less frequently, by submerging momentarily to capture prey just below the surface (Gibson & Sefton 1955; Harper 1987; Harrison et al. 1991). It occasionally plunges into the water from a height of 2ץ9 m to take a food item from below the surface. In employing the latter two techniques, the Black-browed Albatross usually remains visible above or immediately below the surface and employs little or no additional propulsion to reach its target (Gibson & Sefton 1955; Harper 1987; Harrison et al. 1991; Prince 1980). However, on rare occasions it will use its wings to \'swim\' down beneath the surface in pursuit of a food item (Nicholls 1979; Oatley 1979; Voisin 1982). Data from depth recorders and observations from boats indicate that the Black-browed Albatross is capable of diving to depths of about 4.5 m (Nicholls 1979; Oatley 1979; Prince et al. 1994a). Timed observations show that it can remain submerged for up to 5.8 seconds at a time (Harrison et al. 1991; Voisin 1982), although an observation of a Campbell Albatross making a single dive of about 20 seconds duration (Harper 1987) suggests that longer dives might be possible.The Black-browed Albatross commonly forages with other seabirds, and often forages in association with whales, dolphins, seals and penguins (Ainley & Boekelheide 1983; Enticott 1986; Harrison et al. 1991; Jehl 1974; Raymond & Woehler 2003; Woehler et al. 2003), which may drive prey to the surface, discard prey remains that can be scavenged and, when attacked by other predators, provide a source of carrion (Tickell 2000). It has been observed to steal fish from shags ( Phalacrocorax ) (Bullock 1929).The Black-browed Albatross is a well-known scavenger that regularly trails fishing vessels to collect discarded items (Barton 1979; Brooke 2004; Harper 1987; Hicks 1973; Thompson 1992; Thompson & Riddy 1995). By foraging around fishing vessels, the Black-browed Albatross is exposed to accidental mortality through interactions with longline and trawl fishing operations, which are the two main threats to the species in Australia and elsewhere (Baker et al. 2002; BirdLife International 2007a; Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1998), and increases the potential for ingestion of discarded plastics and other potentially harmful inorganic materials (Petry et al. 2007).','Longline fishingThe primary threat to the Black-browed Albatross in Australian waters is incidental mortality resulting from interactions with longline fishing operations (Baker et al. 2002; Gales 1998). The most common cause of mortality is drowning when birds swallow baited hooks during the setting (and, less frequently, hauling) of a line and are then dragged underwater by the weight of the line (Baker et al. 2002; Gales et al. 1998). A lesser number of birds probably die from critical injuries sustained after being released from lines with hooks embedded in their bodies (Gales et al. 1998; Huin & Croxall 1996; Weimerskirch & Jouventin 1987) or after ingesting discarded items that contain hooks (AAD 2005a; Brothers 1995; Environment Australia 2001f; Nel & Nel 1999). Others may be killed or critically injured when they come into contact with adjacent lines or hooks while attempting to remove their target bait (AAD 2005a; Brothers 1995; Environment Australia 2001f). The death of a breeding adult would likely also result in the loss of the respective egg or chick, and given the long-term pair-bonds established between breeding pairs of albatrosses, the loss of a partner would likely reduce the productivity of the surviving parent for some years to come (AAD 2005a).The Black-browed Albatross was one of the most common species of seabird recorded in the bycatch of the Japanese longline fishery for Southern Bluefin Tuna ( Thunnus   maccoyii ) (Brothers 1991; Gales 1998; Gales et al. 1998) that operated in the Australian Fishing Zone from 1986 to 1997 (Caton 2003). In the latter stages of its operation, when observers were stationed on vessels to record seabird bycatch, this fishery is estimated to have killed up to 1528 Black-browed Albatrosses per year (Gales et al. 1998). The incidence of mortality has evidently declined since the late 1990s following the listing of \'incidental catch (or bycatch) of seabirds during oceanic longline fishing operations\' as a key threatening process under Australian Federal Government legislation in 1995 and the subsequent development and implementation of a Threat Abatement Plan in 1998 to alleviate the effects of this process (AGDEH 2006q; Environment Australia 2001f). No published data are available on the numbers of Black-browed Albatrosses present in longline bycatch in recent years, but a reduction in incidental mortality can be inferred from:a decline in the proportion of albatrosses in the bycatch of longline fishing operations in the Australian Fishing Zone due to changes in the distribution of fishing effort (albatrosses comprised about 75% of seabird bycatch in the Japanese longline fishery from 1989 to 1995 [Gales et al. 1998] but only about 10% of seabird bycatch in assorted pelagic longline fisheries in recent years [AAD 2005a; Baker & Wise 2005])an overall decline in the incidence of seabird bycatch in longline fisheries in the Australian Fishing Zone from an estimated minimum rate of 0.15 birds/1000 hooks in the Japanese longline fishery in the latter stages of its operation (Gales et al. 1998) and an observed rate of 0.58 birds/1000 hooks in the Australian longline fishery for Southern Bluefin Tuna in 1994–1995 (Brothers & Foster 1997) to rates of less than 0.05 birds/1000 hooks for a number of longline fisheries in recent years (AGDEH 2006q).It is important to note that, although measures have been taken to reduce the impact of longline fishing operations on the Black-browed Albatross and other seabirds in the Australian Fishing Zone, the ability to disperse over long distances suggests that some proportion of the Black-browed Albatrosses that breed in Australian waters probably come into contact with longline fishing operations outside of Australian jurisdiction, many of which continue to operate with less stringent bycatch mitigation (Environment Australia 2001f). Furthermore, illegal, unregulated and unreported longline fisheries continue to operate in oceanic waters throughout the range of the Black-browed Albatross. The bycatch of seabirds by these fisheries, which operate without observers or bycatch mitigation measures, is considered to be substantial (E.J. Woehler 2007, pers. comm.).Trawl fishingA secondary threat to the Black-browed Albatross within Australian waters is incidental mortality or injury through interactions with trawl fishing operations (Baker et al. 2002; Environment Australia 2001f). Seabirds may be killed or injured by becoming entangled in trawl nets or lines, colliding with trawl apparatus or adhering to lubricated cables and being crushed in trawl winches (Bartle 1991; Duhamel et al. 1997; Environment Australia 2001f; Ministry of Fisheries and Department of Conservation 2000). Interactions with trawl fishing operations are known to cause considerable mortality of seabirds in waters outside of Australian jurisdiction (Adams 1992; Bartle 1991; Ministry of Fisheries and Department of Conservation 2000; Schlatter 1984; Williams & Capdeville 1996), but their effect on seabird populations in the Australian Fishing Zone is less well documented.There is potential for interactions with trawl fishing operations to have a significant impact on the Black-browed Albatross within the Australian Fishing Zone. A considerable trawl fishing operation is conducted in the Australian Fishing Zone, and much of the trawl fishing effort is concentrated in waters around Heard Island, McDonald Islands and Macquarie Island (Environment Australia 2001f). One vessel that operates around Macquarie Island has reportedly been attended by as many as 106 Black-browed Albatrosses at a time. Most of the Black-browed Albatrosses that attend this vessel are adults and potentially represent up to 50% of the breeding population on Maquarie Island (Environment Australia 2001f). Despite the potential for interactions, recent monitoring of the subantarctic and south-eastern Australian trawl fisheries has recorded only low incidences of interaction between vessels and attending seabirds (Baker et al. 2002; Knuckey & Liggins 1999). However, additional reliable data on rates of interaction are required before the impact of trawl fisheries on the Black-browed Albatross and other seabirds in the Australian Fishing Zone can be determined conclusively (Baker et al. 2002; Environment Australia 2001f).Dependence on fishery discardsThere is evidence to suggest that the tendency of the Black-browed Albatross to scavenge food around fishing vessels, as well as directly exposing the birds to incidental mortality, could have an indirect adverse effect on breeding success. Preliminary studies at Macquarie Island have found that breeding individuals can become habitually attracted to items discarded from fishing vessels. Consequently, some individuals may return to their nests less frequently during critical stages of the nesting period, resulting in the failure of the nesting attempt (Baker et al. 2002; Terauds & Hamill 1999; Thompson 1992; Thompson & Riddy 1995).Parasites and associated diseaseTicks recovered from adult and nestling Black-browed Albatrosses on the Falkland Islands are known to transmit a potentially fatal avian pox virus. These ticks are also present on Macquarie Island (Selkirk et al. 1990; Gales 1993) and may have the same effect on the birds that nest there (Environment Australia 2001f).Other threatsOther potential threats to the Black-browed Albatross in Australian waters are incidental mortality through interactions with coastal gillnet fisheries, reduced food stocks due to competition from fisheries, reduced breeding success due to exposure to chemical pollutants in the marine environment or (on Macquarie Island) predation of eggs or chicks by Black Rats ( Rattus rattus ), incidental mortality caused by ingestion of or entanglement in items of marine debris, and (on Macquarie Island) erosion of colony sites through grazing by European Rabbits ( Oryctolagus cuniculus ) (Baker et al. 2002; DEW 2007a; Environment Australia 2001f; Tas PWS 2007a). The impacts of these threats on the Australian populations of the Black-browed Albatross have not been determined.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66472'),('66491','Thalassarche chrysostoma','Endangered','Aves','Diomedeidae','The Grey-headed Albatross is a medium sized albatross with a length of 70–85 cm, a wingspan of 1.8–2.05 m, males weigh 3.4–3.7 kg and females weigh 3–3.6 kg (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Adults have a distinct combination of a wholly grey head, neck and mantle, and a black bill with narrow yellow stripes along the culmen and the bottom of the lower mandible. Grey-headed Albatrosses have a white breast, black upperwings, the central lengths of the underwings are white, with a dark grey stripe on the forward edge and a lighter, narrower grey strip on the trailing edge (Marchant & Higgins 1990; Pizzey & Knight 1999). They have a white crescent behind the eye and their eyes are black with a brown iris. The legs and feet are usually grey or pink (Pizzey & Knight 1999). Juvenile Grey-headed Albatrosses have mostly black bills and heads, with napes darker than adults, indistinct white eye-crescents, and virtually no white on their underwings (BirdLife International 2009a).','The Grey-headed Albatross is marine, pelagic and migratory. Its habitat includes subantarctic, subtropical, and occasionally Antarctic waters in the Pacific, Indian, Atlantic and Southern Oceans (del Hoyo et al. 1992; Marchant & Higgins 1990). Non-breeding and immature Grey-headed Albatrosses disperse widely over the Southern Ocean, mostly between 35–65° S (del Hoyo et al. 1992). During summer, they feed mainly in the cold waters on either side of the Antarctic Convergence in the subantarctic and Antarctic seas, avoiding pack ice, between 46–64° S (Ainley et al. 1984; Hicks 1973; Weimerskirch et al. 1986; Zink 1981a). In winter, most leave the Antarctic Zone and their range extends into the warmer southern Subtropics between 39–51° S (Amiet 1958; Brown et al. 1975; Secker 1969). Along the South American coast the species occurs 4–30 km offshore in the cool Humboldt Current north to 15° S (Jehl 1973). In the Cook Strait, New Zealand, the species concentrate over tidal rips (Secker 1969).Grey-headed Albatrosses fly low to fairly high over open waters, using updraft from wave fronts for lift (Marchant & Higgins 1990). They remain at sea outside of the breeding season (Marchant & Higgins 1990) and generally only come onto land to find a nest site, find a mate and to breed (TSSC 2009cu). Juvenile Grey-headed Albatrosses spend up to 11 years at sea before returning to their natal island (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Grey-headed Albatrosses breed on subantarctic and Antarctic islands of the Indian and Atlantic Oceans and seas south of New Zealand (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Nests are found on tussock-covered cliffs, steep slopes and hillsides overlooking the sea, or run inland from the coast (Grindley 1981; Rand 1954; Weimerskirch et al. 1988) and they often nest among Black-browed Albatrosses (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The nest is a column of packed soil and grass with a bowl-shaped depression at the top. Material is gathered from around the nest, sometimes from nearby nests, which can lead to fierce fights (Marchant & Higgins 1990). On Macquarie Island, the breeding slopes are usually covered in the tussock grass  Poa foliosa  (Scott & Kirkpatrick 2008, cited in TSSC 2009cu) and this nesting area has been included on the EPBC Act Register of Critical Habitat (TSSC 2009cu).','The diet of the Grey-headed Albatross varies geographically and includes fish, squid, crustaceans, penguin carrion and lampreys (Cherel & Klages 1998; Reid et al. 1996; Rodhouse et al. 1990). Most prey is taken by surface-seizing (Wood 1992). Prince and colleagues (1994b) also discovered that Grey-headed Albatrosses can also dive to at least 6 m below the surface, and swim underwater for up to 11 seconds, in search of prey.Foraging of the Grey-headed Albatross is primarily away from the continental shelf (Prince et al. 1998). They are generally pelagic, feeding far from shelf waters around breeding islands and continental land masses (Rand 1963; Weimerskirch et al. 1986, 1988). However, they occasionally occur in inshore and offshore waters in the Australasian region (Barton 1979; Secker 1969). The birds frequently forage behind fishing boats (Brothers 1991; EA 2001f; Reid et al. 1996).During the incubation period the adults travel long distances to feed in oceanic waters. However, during the brooding period, the adults forage closer to the nesting site. The parents return to oceanic feeding once the chick is able to be left unattended, but continue to provide for the chick until it fledges (TSSC 2009cu). Once fledged, the adults spend the rest of the year foraging at sea (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Phillips and colleagues (2004) described sexual segregation during incubation, with largely mutually exclusive core foraging ranges for each sex of Grey-headed Albatrosses. In the Kerguelen Islands, dietary differences also suggest interspecific segregation of foraging areas (Cherel et al. 2002, cited in DEWHA 2009s).','The greatest threat to Grey-headed Albatrosses is accidental mortality due to fisheries related bycatch in longline fisheries, trawl fisheries, driftnetting and trolling operations (TSSC 2009cv).Longline fisheriesOceanic longline fishing has been used to target pelagic and demersal fish in the southern oceans since the 1950s, and is used in almost all Australian waters today (AGDEH 2006q). Gales and Brothers (1995) reported that 75% of the birds killed on longlines and retained for identification were albatrosses. Internationally, some longline fishing fleets still operate without substantial bycatch mitigation measures. Therefore, birds breeding within the Australian Fishing Zone (AFZ) are still killed on longlines from vessels operating outside the AFZ (EA 2001f).In southern waters, Japanese longline fisheries alone are estimated to kill more than 1375 Grey-headed Albatrosses per year, with at least 100–500 of these deaths occurring in the Australian Fishing Zone (Brothers 1991; EA 2001f; Klaer & Polacheck 1997). The projected expansion of the longline industry in the high seas is likely to increase the impact on the species (EA 2001f; Gales 1993; Prince et al. 1998).Within the Australian jurisdiction, implementation of the  Threat Abatement Plan for the Incidental Catch (or bycatch) of Seabirds during Oceanic Longline Fishing Operations  (AGDEH 2006q) has significantly reduced levels of albatross bycatch from longlining, such that it is currently not considered to be a major threat within Australian waters (DEWHA 2009s). An analysis of Macquarie Island population data from 1975 to 2005 found that longline fishing was not likely to have significantly impacted on the Macquarie Island population (Terauds et al. 2005). However, even though it currently may not be significant, accidental mortality due to fisheries related bycatch is still a threat to the small Macquarie Island population in international waters where actions to mitigate fisheries related bycatch are not enforced (DEWHA 2009s)Other fisheriesTrolling, trailing a line with baited hooks, for pelagic species such as Albacore Tuna ( Thunnus alalunga ) is another potential threat (EA 2001f; Gales 1998; Weimerskirch & Jouventin 1998). The survival of the species may also be threatened by expansion of commercial squid fishing operations in the Southern Ocean (EA 2001f; Gales 1998; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Marchant & Higgins 1990; Prince et al. 1998).Grey-headed Albatrosses may also die from collisions with cables and warps used on fishing trawlers. Outside of the AFZ, trawlers carrying netsonde monitor cables or their equivalent may cause substantial mortality in albatrosses (EA 2001f; Gales 1998; Weimerskirch & Jouventin 1998).Litter ingestionHook and plastic ingestion also potentially threaten the Grey-headed Albatross. Between 50 and 100 million hooks are set each year in the Southern Ocean and as many as 1.1 billion hooks are set globally. Both seabirds and fishing vessels concentrate in areas of high biological productivity (EA 2001f).Grey-headed Albatrosses have been observed regurgitating fishing gear and plastic debris to their chicks on breeding sites outside of Australia (EA 2001f; Huin & Croxall 1996, cited in DEWHA 2009s). This can potentially impact on breeding success because the large amounts of fisheries litter consumed by chicks can lead to their poor condition and death.RabbitsThe major, imminent, threat to the Macquarie Island population of Grey-headed Albatross is breeding habitat reduction due to grazing by the European Rabbit ( Oryctolagus cuniculus ). Grazing by rabbits has severely degraded the quality of the Grey-headed Albatross\' nesting habitat, leading to high levels of erosion, little remaining tussock, and an increased frequency of landslides reducing available nesting habitat (TSSC 2009cv). The grazing and resultant slope instability has the potential to lower breeding success on Macquarie Island as landslips remove vegetation and soil cover, exposing rock or clay, which the albatrosses are unable to nest on (Trebilco et al. 2007, cited in TSSC 2009cv).Other threatsWhen migrating through the East Marine Region, Grey-headed Albatrosses may also be at risk from a loss of food stock, ingestion or being caught in marine debris, oil spills, pollution and commercial fishing that occurs within the region (DEWHA 2009m). The species may also be shot by fishermen to protect bait or for sport (EA 2001f; Gales 1998). An albatross chick is unlikely to survive if a parent is killed while it is foraging at sea (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Human disturbance may also be a threat (EA 2001f). On Macquarie Island, some nest attempts have been abandoned as a consequence of scientific activity. It is possible that the disturbance to an adult Grey-headed Albatross caused the subsequent failure of its chick in 1995–96 (EA 2001f). Earlier population decreases were a result of hunting and egg-collecting (Gales 1998).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66491'),('66501','Geophaps smithii blaauwi','Vulnerable','Aves','Columbidae','The Partridge Pigeon (western) is 24 to 29 cm long and weighs 160 to 245 g (Hill 1911; Johnstone 1981; Johnstone & Storr 1998). It is mostly olive-brown or grey-brown, with distinctive facial markings, a black bill, white, yellow, grey or brown irides, a patch of metallic green (male) or purple (female) on the upper side of each wing, white flanks (which appear as a white crescent around the head of each folded wing), a white to buff belly, and pink, brown or grey legs and feet. The facial markings consist of a large area of bright yellow skin around each eye, bordered above and below with narrow black lines, and with broader white lines that, below the eye, extend from the base of the bill to the ear coverts and down the neck; and a white chin and throat, extending to the ear coverts and bordered below with a narrow band of grey, brown or black (Higgins & Davies 1996; Johnstone 1981; Johnstone & Storr 1998). Juvenile and immature birds can be separated from the adults on the basis of their plumage, which is extensively marked. The upperparts of juvenile and immature birds have greyish-brown and buff speckles, flecks, bars and fringes. Furthermore, the patch of metallic green or purple on each wing is absent or reduced in size (Johnstone & Storr 2004).','The Partridge Pigeon (western) occurs primarily in low, open, grassy woodland, particularly on the ecotone between the rugged King Leopold Sandstones and alluvial flats of the Kimberley region (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Johnstone 1981). Its preferred habitat is dominated by low woodland, tall shrubland and tall open shrubland, and has vegetation comprised of various species of  Eucalyptus  (including  E .  apodophylla ,  E .  bigalerita ,  E .  latifolia ,  E .  miniata , and  E .  polycarpa ), and species of  Acacia  (including  A .  holosericea  and  A .  kelleri ), with  Terminalia fitzgeraldii ,  Adansonia gregorii , and a suite of grasses including  Sorghum ,  Eriachne ,  Themeda australis ,  Chrysopogon latifolius  and  Plectrachne pungens  (Johnstone 1981; Johnstone & Storr 1998). The Partridge Pigeon (western) has also been recorded foraging alongside roads, and in areas that have recently been burnt (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Johnstone 1981).The variety of habitats inhabited by the Partridge Pigeon (western) suggests that a patchy mosaic of habitats may be important to the subspecies (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Johnstone 1981).They nest on the ground, at the base of a clump of dry grass, often with broken stems of grass hanging over and sheltering the nest. Nests may also be placed on a grass tussock or at the base of a tree.This species usually roosts on the ground among thick ground-cover, but occasionally roosts on the lower branches of trees (Higgins & Davies 1996). This habit makes the Partridge Pigeon (western) vulnerable to predation by feral cats, foxes and dingos. The Partridge Pigeon (western) does not occur in any of the threatened ecological communities that are listed under the  EPBC Act 1999 . It is not known to associate with any other species or subspecies that is listed as threatened under the  EPBC Act 1999 .','The Partridge Pigeon (western) feeds on the seeds of grasses, legumes and herbs, particularly species of  Acacia  and  Euphorbia , and on invertebrates including grasshoppers, beetles, caterpillars and small snails (Frith et al. 1976; Hill 1911; Johnstone & Storr 1998).  The Partridge Pigeon (western) forages on the ground and has been observed foraging singly, in pairs or in flocks of five to twenty birds (Higgins & Davies 1996). It is often seen foraging beside roads and creeks, on short grass, or in areas that have recently been burnt (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Johnstone 1981). It is said to drink in the morning and late afternoon (Hill 1911), although it may drink at any time of the day (Frith 1982b).','The only threats to the Partridge Pigeon (western) that have been identified are the degradation and loss of its habitat. The habitat of the Partridge Pigeon could potentially be degraded by changes to the fire regime, or overgrazing, and lost through clearance of native vegetation (Fraser 2002, pers. comm.; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Johnstone 1981; Lewis 2002, pers. comm.). It is presumed that the Partridge Pigeon (western), like the eastern subspecies ( G. s. smithii ), requires a temporal and spatial mosaic of burning, traditionally employed by Aboriginal people, to maintain its habitat. However, there has been a shift in the fire regime of the Kimberley Division, whereby fires are now concentrated in the late dry season, and promote the invasion of Partridge Pigeon (western) habitat by annual sorghum, a trend that is likely to continue (Garnett & Crowley 2000). This change could also reduce the amount of vegetative cover that is available and in such a situation the Partridge Pigeon (western), which nests on the ground, could be more susceptible to terrestrial predators such as the Dingo ( Canis lupis dingo ) and feral cat ( Felis catus ) (Graham 2007, pers. comm.; Woinarski 2005).The impact of grazing is not entirely clear. Feral cattle ( Bos ) and pigs ( Sus scrofa ) have been present in the Kimberley Division for some time, and there is no evidence to indicate that they have had any adverse effect on the Partridge Pigeon (western) or its habitat (Garnett & Crowley 2000). However, it has more recently been suggested that grazing by introduced herbivores can reduce the availability and abundance of seeds of perennial grasses, which are a key component of the diet of the Partridge Pigeon (western) in the early wet season (Fraser 2002, pers. comm.; Lewis 2002, pers. comm.).The Partridge Pigeon (western) is also dependent on permanent sources of water (such as springs and soaks) during the late dry season, and any threatening process that reduces the availability or quality of these water sources could potentially have an adverse impact on the Partridge Pigeon (western) (Fraser 2002, pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66501'),('66631','Perameles bougainville bougainville','Endangered','Mammalia','Peramelidae','Western barred bandicoots are the smallest species of bandicoot, weighing approximately 220 g. Animals are lightly built, have a long, pointed snout, large erect ears and a short tail that is sometimes lost in fights with other members of their species. The fur is a light grey-brown, with two or three dark bars running across the hindquarters. The chin, underbelly and feet are white (Australian wildlife conservancy 2017).','The western barred bandicoot is the smallest bandicoot and the only one where females are larger than males, although this may be the case only on Bernier and Dorre Islands and be the result of island dwarfism (Short et al. 1998, cited in Burbidge & Woinarski 2016). Habitats recorded for mainland animals included a variety of fairly open vegetation types in semi-arid and arid parts of southern Australia, such as \'at the base of elevated dunes\' on Peron Peninsula, Shark Bay (Quoy and Gaimard 1824, cited in Burbidge & Woinarski 2016), dense scrub including thickets of  Allocasuarina  seedlings, open bluebush and saltbush plains and stony hills bordering scrub (Friend 2008, cited in Burbidge & Woinarski 2016). Their preference for open vegetation, contrasting with Isoodon spp., which typically occur in more dense vegetation, would have made them particularly susceptible to predation by feral cats and red foxes (Short et al. 1998, cited in Burbidge & Woinarski 2016).On Bernier and Dorre Islands western barred bandicoots are particularly common in scrub associated with vegetated dunes behind beaches, but occur in all vegetation types (Friend 2008, Short et al. 1998, both cited in Burbidge & Woinarski 2016). They shelter during daytime in well-concealed nests made from plant material and constructed in a hemispherical hollow scrape beneath a low or prostrate shrub. Near the coast, nests may be made from accumulated dead seagrass (Friend 2008, cited in Burbidge & Woinarski 2016).','Animals are omnivorous, consuming a wide variety of invertebrates, some plant matter and, occasionally, skinks and mice (Australian wildlife conservancy 2017).','The current major threats to the natural subpopulations of the species include: the accidental introduction of predators (introduced cats and foxes), fire, and disease (Richards 2007, cited in Burbidge & Woinarski 2016). These same threats apply to varying degrees to the reintroduced populations. Fluctuations in subpopulations on islands are a threat, but this threat is seen as minor relative to the risk of exotic predators being introduced (Short et al. 1997, cited in Burbidge & Woinarski 2016). However, with extreme weather events becoming more common and all but one location for the species being located in Shark Bay, these fluctuations are a cause for concern. Introduced rats and mice are also a concern, but to a lesser degree than introduced predators (Burbidge & Woinarski 2016).On the mainland this species was probably extirpated through predation by introduced cats, dogs, and foxes, modification of vegetation by rabbits and stock, and possibly changed fire regimes in parts of the range (Maxwell et al. 1996, cited in Burbidge & Woinarski 2016). Pathogens are a problem in Bernier Island (they seem to be endemic in the subpopulation); the impact of these diseases on the subpopulation size is unknown (Burbidge & Woinarski 2016).Their main native predators are raptors, owls, goannas and snakes (Australian wildlife conservancy 2017).Papillomas and carcinomas have been detected in western barred bandicoots from Bernier Island and these have been shown to be caused by a previously-unknown virus (Woolford et al. 2007, cited in Burbidge & Woinarski 2016) that can cause death. A workshop held in 2002 (Friend 2002, cited in Burbidge & Woinarski 2016) resulted in management and research recommendations aimed at minimising the spread of the virus from Bernier Island and ensuring that translocated animals were free of the disease. The presence of this disease has meant that only Dorre Island bandicoots are available for translocations (Burbidge & Woinarski 2016).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66631'),('66632','Macquaria australasica','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Percichthyidae','The Macquarie Perch is a moderate-sized fish with an elongate-oval body which is laterally compressed. The lateral line is obvious and there are conspicuous open pores on the lower jaw (Lintermans 2008).  Macquarie Perch have been recorded growing to 46 cm and 3.5 kg within the western distribution of their range, but are distinctly smaller in maximum size at maturity in the eastern distribution of their range where they grow to less than 25 cm and 1.5 kg. In the Murray-Darling Basin the species varies from almost black or dark silvery grey to bluish grey or green-brown above, paler to off-white below, often with a yellowish tinge. In the Shoalhaven and Hawkesbury River systems, fish are usually blotched with grey-brown, buff and dark-greyish over the head and body and can be pale grey-brown when living in shallow sandy streams (Allen 1989a; McDowall 1996).','The Macquarie Perch is a riverine, schooling species. It prefers clear water and deep, rocky holes with lots of cover. As well as aquatic vegetation, additional cover may comprise of large boulders, debris and overhanging banks (Cadwallader & Eden 1979). Spawning occurs just above riffles (shallow running water). Populations may survive in impoundments if able to access suitable spawning sites (Wager & Jackson 1993).Spawning sites used by the Macquarie Perch in the rivers flowing into Lake Eildon (between 1966–69) consisted of rubble substrate of small boulders, pebbles and gravel. Water depth was 0.2–0.9 m (usually 0.4–0.6 m) and water velocity was 0.3–0.6 m/s. There was also a pool (usually 15–30 m long and at least 1.5 m deep) immediately upstream, and fast-flowing broken water immediately downstream. Although this species can tolerate temperatures of < 9 °C (the temperature of the water at the bottom of Lake Eildon) they appear to require a temperature of at least 16.5 °C for spawning to occur. Newly hatched yolk sac larvae shelter amongst pebbles (Cadwallader & Rogan 1977). In Seven Creeks, this species occurred in deep pools and riffles above falls where the substrate was gravel and boulders (Brumley et al. 1987).','Analysis of the stomach contents of 14 fish (taken from Lake Eildon and inflowing rivers during the 1966–69 spawning seasons) showed that insects and larvae form a substantial part of the Macquarie Perch diet (Lake 1971). Results indicated that the primary food items consisted of the nymph/adult stages of flies and mosquitoes (Order Diptera), caddisflies (Order Trichoptera) and mayflies (Order Ephemeroptera); while secondary food items comprised stoneflies (Order Plecoptera), dragonflies and damselflies (Order Odonata), bugs (Order Hemiptera) and beetles (Order Coleoptera) (Cadwallader & Rogan 1977).The basic food of 204 individuals taken from Hughes Creek, the Seven Creeks River system (tributaries of the Goulburn River, Victoria), and the Mitta Mitta River (Victoria) consisted of beetles, flies and mosquitoes (particularly Family Chironomidae), mayflies and caddisflies. Secondary food items included Crustacea, bugs, damselflies and gastropod snails (Order Mollusca). Large fish (115–287 mm) ingest their food by a sucking action and fed on a greater diversity of food types than small fish (46–65 mm) with decapods found to replace dipterans as the preferred food source (Lintermans 2006). This species is basically a bottom feeder and only takes a small proportion of its food at the water surface (Cadwallader & Eden 1979). In diet studies, the role terrestrial insects played in the diet was minimal (Lintermans 2006), supporting the species\' bottom-feeding nature.During the initial filling phase of Lake Dartmouth, this species fed on typical river-dwelling organisms such as mayflies, stoneflies and caddisflies that were carried into the lake by inflowing rivers. However, they also consumed terrestrial organisms that became displaced as the water level rose, and still or slow water organisms such as shrimps (Order Decapoda: Family Atyidae) and cladocerans (Order Crustacea: Family Daphniidae). The numbers of these latter aquatic organisms rapidly increased in the newly created lake (Cadwallader & Douglas 1986).','Changes in habitat caused by river siltation, river regulation, reduced spawning habitat access and the effects of predation and competition from introduced species have caused a drastic decline in both the abundance and range of the Macquarie Perch (ACT Government 1999d; Anonymous 1974; Lake 1971). Local extinction of this species from catchments can be the result of a number of factors. For example, the virtual disappearance of this species from Lake Eildon was probably caused by a combination of habitat alteration, overfishing of spawning stock, predation by exotic fish species and competition for food with exotic fish species (Cadwallader & Rogan 1977).River siltationRemoval of riparian vegetation, land use changes and construction activities all have the potential to increase the sediment input to rivers and streams. Silt filling deep holes and settling on the river bottom provides unfavourable conditions for the demersal (bottom dwelling) eggs and blankets rocky substrate and interstitial spaces (Cadwallader 1981; Lintermans 2006). Silt also affects the composition of the benthic fauna that forms the main component of the Macquarie Perch\'s diet (Cadwallader & Rogan 1977). The most viable populations of this species remain in the upper reaches of river catchments where siltation loads are reduced and deep holes, interspersed with shallow riffles, are relatively undisturbed (Cadwallader 1981).River regulation and degradationInstream barriers such as dams, weirs and road crossings can limit fish migration, prevent fish reaching spawning and feeding areas, interrupt genetic transfer between populations, cause fish populations to fragment, and reduce water temperatures below impoundments (ACT Government 1999d; Cadwallader 1981; Lake 1971; Lintermans 2008). Within the Murray-Darling Basin, there are more than 3600 structures that are known to impede fish passage (Koehn 2005). Macquarie Perch populations present in reservoirs require unimpeded access to inflowing streams for spawning (Lintermans 2006). Barriers can prevent fish gaining access to these important spawning sites or re-colonising areas after drought or local catastrophes (Koehn 2005). Fast-flowing water through culvert pipes may be just as impassable as a vertical weir to most native fish species (Lintermans 2006).Altered flow regimes as a result of large dams and reservoirs have a major impact on Macquarie Perch ecology. Altered regimes generally involve reduced flow of water downstream, and reduced frequency and magnitude of natural flooding, leading to reduced habitat quality, loss of spawning cues, and reduced opportunities for dispersal and migration (Lintermans 2008).The release of cold water from the base of water storages affects most river reaches where Macquarie Perch were historically found. Macquarie Perch rely on temperature cues to initiate spawning movements (Lintermans 2002). Discharge of cold water from large dams can prevent Macquarie Perch breeding (Lintermans 2008). Cold water release during spawning has been implicated in the disappearance of two separate populations of Macquarie Perch in the Mitta Mitta River following the construction of Dartmouth Dam (Koehn et al. 1995).Habitat degradationAdditional habitat degradation in the Murrumbidgee River catchment has resulted from the effects of sand and gravel extraction, heavy metal pollution and urban development (ACT Government 1999d).Degradation caused by bushfiresThe 2003 ACT bushfires resulted in reduced foliage cover of streams and extensive siltation of some Macquarie Perch habitats in the Cotter and Goodradigbee Rivers. The fires also damaged riparian vegetation at these locations and probably reduced leaf litter inputs into streams for many years (Lintermans 2006). Water quality can also be affected by extreme bushfires resulting in consequent ash poisoning and siltation of waterways.DroughtPersistent drought has also impacted remNAt populations in the Queanbeyan River (NSW) with fish failing to recruit during the 2002/2003 spawning seasons, and possibly longer (Lintermans 2006).Recreational fishingIn NSW, the Macquarie Perch has been protected since 1994 (Harris & Rowland 1996), but illegal fishing continues (ACT Government 1999d). A review of recreational fishing practices in the ACT proposed a total ban on taking the species and this proposal received widespread community support (ACT Government 1999d). In 1959, about three tonnes of Macquarie Perch were caught from one pool in the Goulburn River on the first morning of the open season (Anonymous 1974). Such concentrated overfishing of spawning aggregations has contributed to its decline (Cadwallader & Rogan 1977). In the Seven Creeks system, the lack of exploitation by anglers has probably allowed this species to persist in a small area of suitable habitat (Brumley et al. 1987). The population of this species in Lake Dartmouth is subjected to a closed season during spawning (Koehn & O\'Connor 1990a).Introduction of exotic fishExotic fish introductions have occurred for recreational angling, commercial angling and biological control reasons, and as a result of accidental aquarium releases and interbasin water transfers. Macquarie Perch face competition and predation from species such as European Carp ( Cyprinus carpio ), Redfin Perch ( Perca fluviatilis ), Rainbow Trout ( Oncorhynchus mykiss ), and Brown Trout ( Salmo trutta ) (Gilligan 2005).Trout have been recorded to feed on small Macquarie Perch (Butcher 1967). In addition, Macquarie Perch may not be able to compete successfully with trout for food (Jackson 1981). Netting in the Goulburn River, near Jamieson, in November/December 1971 yielded 128 fish of which 62 (48.4%) were Redfin, 53 (41.4%) were Goldfish ( Carassius auratus ), 12 (9.4%) were trout and only a single Macquarie Perch (0.8%). This indicates that introduced species now dominate the fish fauna in this region (Cadwallader & Rogan 1977). Introduced Trout and Redfin adversely affect Macquarie Perch through competition for food items, such as aquatic insects (Cadwallader & Rogan 1977). One event includes the introduction 750 000 Rainbow Trout and more than 250 000 Brown Trout into Lake Eildon in 1958–1967 (Cadwallader & Rogan 1977). Redfin Perch also appeared in Lake Eildon as a result of deliberate introductions and as a result of being washed out of farm dams that were inundated during the initial filling of the lake (Cadwallader & Rogan 1977). Increases in the stocking rate of Rainbow Trout coincided with the decline of Macquarie Perch in the upper Murrumbidgee River more than any other factor (Gilligan 2005).Damaging parasites and diseaseMacquarie Perch is reported to be infected by two parasitic protozoans, several nematodes and the parasitic copepod  Lernaea cyprinacea  (Ashburner 1970; Beumer et al. 1982; Merrick & Schmida 1984; Robinson 1981). Carp or Redfin Perch are considered to be the source of the Australian populations of  Lernaea cyprinacea (ACT Government 1999d; Langdon 1989a). The viral disease Epizootic Haematopoietic Necrosis Virus has been responsible for the death of large numbers of Redfin in south east Australia, mainly in outbreaks in early summer among juveniles (Langdon & Humphrey 1987). There is preliminary experimental evidence that Macquarie Perch is also highly susceptible to the virus and the virus may have been partly responsible for the rapid decline of the population in Lake Eildon (Langdon 1989a, b). There is concern that this virus will impact upon the remaining populations of this species (ACT Government 1999d; Koehn & Morison 1990). The Murrumbidgee and the Googong Reservoir populations have been exposed to the virus and it is highly likely that the Queanbeyan River population has also been exposed through the movement of infected adult trout between the Reservoir and the River (ACT Government 1999d).Carp, Goldfish or Mosquitofish ( Gambusia holbrooki ) are implicated as the source of the introduced tapeworm  Bothriocephalus acheilognathi , which has been recorded in native fish species (ACT Government 1999d; Dove et al. 1997). This tapeworm causes widespread mortality in juvenile fish overseas (ACT Government 1999d). Investigations into the interactions between Macquarie Perch and the introduced fish species that share its range are critical to understanding the degree of threat to Macquarie Perch populations (ACT Government 1999d). Parasite and disease analysis of introduced fishes occurring within the distributional range of Macquarie Perch is desirable to assess and evaluate the risk of the transfer of these parasites and pathogens to Macquarie Perch.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66632'),('66633','Maccullochella peelii','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Percichthyidae','The Murray Cod is the largest freshwater fish in Australia. The species has been measured at up to 1.8 m in length and over 100 kg in weight although, acccording to McDowall (1996), it has been most commonly weighed at about 10 kg. The Murray Cod has a broad head with a rounded snout and a concave profile. It has a large mouth with the lower jaw approximately equal in length with the upper jaw or slightly protruding. The species is predomiNAtly light olive to dark green in colour with mottled patterning and white to cream-coloured undersides. The pectoral (side) fins are large and rounded, and the soft dorsal (lower back), anal and caudal (tail) fins usually have distinct white, sometimes red, edges. The caudal fin is rounded and has 65–81 scales in the lateral line (Whitley 1980).','The Murray Cod utilises a diverse range of habitats from clear rocky streams, such as those found in the upper western slopes of NSW (including the ACT), to slow-flowing, turbid lowland rivers and billabongs (McDowall 1996).Murray Cod are frequently found in the main channels of rivers and larger tributaries. The species is, therefore, considered a main-channel specialist. Murray Cod tend to occur in floodplain channels and anabranches when they are inundated (Koehn 1997, 2006; Koehn & Harrington 2005 cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010), but the species\' use of these floodplain habitats appears limited (Koehn & Harrington 2006; Koehn & Harrington 2005, and King & Koehn n.d. cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). Juveniles less than one year old have been found in main river channels where it appears they settle at a late larval (newly born) stage (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010).Preferred microhabitat consists of complex structural features in streams such as large rocks, snags (pieces of large submerged woody debris), overhanging stream banks and vegetation, tree stumps, logs, branches and other woody structures. Such structures reduce or influence stream flows and provide Murray Cod with shelter from fast-flowing water (Koehn 2009). They also serve as predatory ambush points for foraging, particularly during the day (Kaminskas pers. comm. 2015; Schultz 2006).Riparian vegetation, for example River Red Gum ( Eucalyptus camaldulensis ) woodland in the lowland river systems of the Murray-Darling Basin, not only provides an ongoing supply of structural habitat for the Murray Cod in the form of coarse woody debris or snags, but aids stream bank stability and protects riparian soils from water and wind erosion (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010).Koehn & Nicol (2014) conducted a Murray Cod radio tracking study along a 40 km reach of the Murray River, downstream of Lake Mulwala. The Murray River in this region is described as a large, lowland river situated on low-gradient riverine plains, with low energy, and is characterised by meandering bends. The Murray Cod was found to be strongly associated with structural woody habitat (>68% cover), deeper (>2.4 m), slower water (<0.2 m s -1 ) closer to the river bank. Murray Cod and Trout Cod were found in deeper and faster water, and deeper in the water column, than the other species that were tracked, Golden Perch ( Macquaria ambigua ) and the introduced Common Carp ( Cyprinus carpio ).Although annual rainfall and river flows in the northern Murray-Darling Basin can be highly variable, they are typically higher in summer and lower in winter (Kaminskas pers. comm. 2015; MDBA 2015c). Conversely, rainfall and flows in the southern parts of the Basin are generally high in winter and spring, and low in summer and autumn (Kaminskas pers. comm. 2015; King et al. 2012; Close 1990, and Thoms et al. 2000 cited in Koehn & Nicol 2014).','The Murray Cod is considered the apex predator of the river systems of the Murray-Darling Basin and will aggressively attack any fish entering its territory (Ye et al. 2000). The species has been described as demersal (inhabits at or close to the bed of the waterbody) (Koehn 2009b cited in Koehn & Nicol 2014). However, Murray Cod are known to actively hunt throughout the water column from sunset to sunrise (Koehn n.d. cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010; Schultz 2006). At times, Murray Cod are voracious feeders (McDowall 1996).The species\' diet changes with age with the typical adult diet consisting of spiny crayfish, yabbies and shrimps (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). It has also been known to feed on other Cod species ( Maccullochella  spp.), Golden Perch, Redfin Perch ( Perca fluviatilis ) (introduced), Bony Bream ( Nematalosa erebi ), Eel-tailed Catfish ( Tandanus tandanus ), Western Carp Gudgeon ( Hypseleotris klunzingeri ), Common Carp, Goldfish ( Carassius auratus auratus ) (introduced). Less common animals found in the diet include ducks, cormorants, grebes, tortoises, water dragons, snakes, mice, frogs and mussels (Rowland 1988 cited in Kearney & Kildea 2001).Upon hatching, larvae are 5–8 mm long and within 8–10 days are able to feed on zooplankton. After reaching a length of 15–20 mm, they begin to feed on aquatic insects (Kearney & Kildea 2001; Native Fish Australia 2007).','Historic threatsCommercial fishingCommercial overfishing was one of the primary causes of the historic decline of the Murray Cod (Reid et al. 1997 and Rowland 1989, 2005 cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010; TSSC 2003i). Commercial fisheries were based mainly in the Murray and Murrumbidgee Rivers (Kearney & Kildea 2001; Dakin & Kesteven 1938, Kailola et al. 1993, Reid et al. 1997; and Rowland 1985, 1989 & 2005 cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010; Ye et al. 2000). Catches from commercial fishing of Murray Cod underwent a dramatic decline in the 20th century. Total catch peaked in the early 1900s, but by the 1930s had declined to unprofitable levels for large fishing operations: a number of smaller companies continued operating (Pollard & Scott 1966, and Whitley 1937, cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). A smaller peak in the total commercial fishery occurred in the 1950s with almost 300 tonnes per year caught in NSW and SA, followed by a sharp decline in the commercial catch and a major decline in abundance of cod caught between 1955 and 1964 in NSW and SA (Reynolds 1976 and Rowland 2005 cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). Commercial fishing continued for another 40 years, but the catch declined to less than 10 tonnes per year in NSW in the 1990s. The commercial fishing industry continued in various capacities until concern about declining native fish stocks led to the closure of all commercial fisheries by 2003 (Koehn 2005; National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). While commercial fishing of wild Murray Cod in the Murray-Darling Basin ceased in NSW in 2001, Victoria in 2002 and SA in 2003, its adverse effect on the population status of the species continues (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010).The Murray Cod is classified as a permitted by-product species in the commercial Lakes and Coorong Fishery in SA (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010; Ye et al. 2014). However, a temporary closure prohibiting harvesting of the species in the region was implemented in 2010 under the South Australian Fisheries Management Act 2007 and remains in effect as at 2015 (Ye et al. 2014). Less than 300 kg per year catches of Murray Cod from the Lakes and Coorong Fishery were recorded for the years 2005–2010 (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010).The Queensland section of the Murray-Darling Basin has never supported a commercial Murray Cod fishery (Ye et al. 2014).Current threatsHabitat removal, modification and degradationIn previous decades, de-snagging occurred extensively to assist navigation, improve water flow, mitigate floods and protect infrastructure, for example bridges, from damage due to debris jams during flooding events (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). Millions of snags have been removed from the Murray-Darling Basin during large-scale de-snagging operations (MDBA 2015b; TSSC 2003i). While de-snagging rarely occurs today, the removal of snags from dry flood channels still occurs. The cumulative effects of such actions are most likely substantial and the widespread effects of de-snagging may still adversely affect Murray Cod populations.Actions, such as vegetation clearing or the grazing of livestock in the riparian environment, will lead to the loss or degradation of local Murray Cod habitat either directly or indirectly, including the covering of hard substrates or the infilling of refuge pools through sedimentation of substrates in the waterway.Barriers to movementThere are more than 3600 structures in waterways in the Murray-Darling Basin that act as barriers to the movements of native fish species. Structures, such as dams, weirs, locks, roads, bridges, culverts, levee banks and areas of unsuitable habitat, such as cold waters or fast-flowing or turbulent waters, are increasingly fragmenting or isolating habitats and populations, and restricting Murray Cod spawning migrations, the downstream dispersal of larvae and interfering with genetic exchange. This has the potential to reduce local genetic variability through genetic drift and threatens the genetic integrity of the species (Kearney & Kildea 2001; National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010).Altered river flow regimesIn the Murray-Darling Basin, water catchments are regulated to provide water to rural farming communities, primarily for crop irrigation during the warmer months of the year. River regulation, through the construction and operation of dams, weirs, channels, pumps and other infrastructure, has resulted in the alteration of river flow regimes, including the reduction of flow rates and volumes, seasonal variations in flows, including flood events, and long periods of low flows or the absence of flows (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). The reduction in Murray Cod larval recruitment is attributable to the alteration of natural flow regimes in the waterways in which the species naturally occurs (Rowland 1998). Low flows during the spring spawning season may limit the downstream drift and recruitment of larvae into the local population.Conversely, sudden releases of large amounts of water from impoundments, which coincide with spawning and the hatching and early development of larvae, can result in larvae being flushed from nests before they are sufficiently developed to undertake the journey downstream (Kaminskas pers. comm. 2015). Larvae entrained in such high flows can also be diverted into irrigation channels, which are largely devoid of habitat suitable for the species and where water is progressively drawn down for irrigation over the summer months, or physically pumped with irrigation water onto adjacent agricultural lands (Humphries 2013; Koehn 2005; National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). Low flows may also restrict the migratory movements of adult Murray Cod (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010).The regulation of flows in a river catchment reduces the frequency, duration and extent of flooding in the catchment. Less frequent flooding, especially during droughts, allows large quantities of organic material, such as leaf litter, to accumulate on river banks and floodplains. When post-drought flooding flushes and concentrates large amounts of accumulated organic material into waterways, anabranches and swamps, what is commonly known as blackwater forms in those waterbodies. Blackwater contains high levels of dissolved organic carbon that can be rapidly consumed by microorganisms, sometimes leading to extremely hypoxic (low dissolved oxygen) or anoxic (devoid of oxygen) conditions in the aquatic ecosystem. This, in turn, is likely to cause the stress, suffocation and death of animals in that ecosystem. This process is more pronounced during summer when air and water temperatures are relatively high. Blackwater events and resultant fish kills have been recorded in the Murray-Darling Basin. Although blackwater events occur naturally, such occurences are exacerbated by river regulation (DSEWPaC 2012; King et al. 2012).Reduced water qualityReduced water quality in Murray Cod habitat is characterised by substantial reductions in water temperature, increased turbidity (concentration of sediments suspended in water), increased concentrations of nutrients and environmental contamiNAts, increased salinity and decreased concentrations of dissolved oxygen.Cold water pollution (or temperature depression) is an artificial decrease in the temperature of water in a natural river. Cold water pollution commonly occurs downstream of a deep impoundment (or dam) when dense cold water, which forms towards the bottom of the impoundment through thermal stratification, is released through outlets located towards the base of the dam wall. Water released from impoundments is commonly 10 °C colder than that of natural river systems, but can be up to 17 °C colder (NSW CWPIG 2012). Cold water releases have been known to lower the overall temperature of the water in rivers downstream of impoundments by up to 15 °C. While cold water pollution can extend 200–400 km downstream of an impoundment on individual days, the greatest effects tend to occur 100–150 km downstream (Astles 2001).Cold water pollution typically occurs in spring and summer, which is coincidental with the late winter–spring upstream migration and spring–early summer spawning. Spawning may be aborted or success greatly reduced as a result (Koehn cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). Cold water pollution is considered to significantly degrade riverine habitat for the Murray Cod to the extent that many hundreds of kilometres are now largely unsuitable or that the species survives in affected areas at sub-optimal temperature levels. Cooler waters downstream from dams may also slow the growth of Murray Cod (TSSC 2003i).Reduced water quality in Murray Cod habitat may be directly or indirectly caused by the removal or alteration of structural habitat features, such as rocks or large woody debris, land clearing or other land uses which result in the influx of sediment, nutrients or chemical contamiNAts in the aquatic environment, or river regulation (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). Reductions in water quality may be exacerbated by extreme environmental events, such as wildfires or droughts.Surface water runoff can carry dissolved nutrients into Murray Cod habitat from various land uses in the local catchment. Sufficient increases in nutrients, particularly phosphates and nitrates which are found in agricultural fertilisers and sewage (phosphates are also major constituents of some detergents), in a waterbody can lead to eutrophication (or hypertrophication) occurring in the waterbody. Eutrophication, commonly known as an algal bloom, is a large rapid increase in the quantity of phytoplankton, especially blue-green algae (Cyanophyta), in the waterbody and can result in the death of aquatic fauna, including the Murray Cod. When an algal bloom occurs, the decay of the phytoplankton consumes oxygen dissolved in the water potentially leading to hypoxic (low dissolved oxygen) or anoxic (devoid of oxygen) conditions in the aquatic ecosystem. This, in turn, is likely to cause the stress, suffocation and death of animals in that ecosystem (MDBA 2015).Increased salinity in the Murray-Darling Basin is a major problem causing extensive degradation in some areas. Salinity gradients can cause stratification in river pools resulting in deoxygenated, saline bottom layers (Anderson & Morison 1989). High salinity levels, as well as high turbidity, may cause adverse physiological or behavioural effects on fish. While adults of many native fish species have at least a short-term tolerance to moderate to high salinity levels, early life history stages (e.g. eggs, larvae) are more sensitive to elevated salinity levels, and the long-term effects of high salinity levels on all life stages are unknown. Salinities above 0.34 g/L may result in significant impacts on Murray Cod (Chotipuntu 2003 cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). Elevated salinity levels may also affect food sources such as invertebrates, algae and macrophytes, consequently affecting habitat complexity and quality (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010).Recreational fishingThe National Recreational and Indigenous Fishing Survey conducted in 2000–2001 estimated that about 483 000 Murray Cod were caught annually by recreational anglers throughout south-eastern Australia during that period, with approximately 78% of these fish released. This survey did not report Murray Cod harvest data for the ACT (Henry & Lyle 2003 cited in Ye et al. 2014).Considerable fishing pressure in some sections of the Murray River is likely to be impacting on population structure of Murray Cod (Nicol et al. 2005 cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). The removal of a substantial number of sexually mature individuals, paticularly from a small or isolated Murray Cod population, is likely to adversely affect its structure and may not be sustainable for some populations, leading to population instability or crashes. There is a concern that the minimum size limit of 50 cm (total body length) in all states does not allow Murray Cod to reach breeding age and breed at least once before being at risk of capture by anglers and being removed from the population (Nicol et al. 2005 cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010).There is a growing trend amongst anglers to practice catch-and-release, however the overall impact of this practice across the species\' distribution, positive or negative, is not well known. High release rates from anglers indicate compliance with size requirements. While many anglers do observe the fishing regulations and release undersize fish, anglers may expose Murray Cod to high air and water temperatures causing them stress, or can remove or damage their protective skin mucous lining or scales by subjecting them to prolonged or excessive, rough handling, such as being handled with dry hands or placed on hot, dry or rough surfaces. When the protective skin mucus or scales are removed or damaged, Murray Cod are susceptible to infections with various pathogens or parasites (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010).QueenslandThe Murray Cod supports a considerable recreational fishery throughout the northern Murray–Darling Basin in Queensland. The Murray Cod is mostly targeted by recreational anglers within the Dumaresq, Macintyre, Moonie, Condamine, Balonne and Warrego Rivers and their tributaries, however the species is also occasionally reported from the Paroo River (Brooks n.d. and Taylor et al. 2010 cited in Ye et al. 2014). The National Recreational and Indigenous Fishing Survey conducted during 2000–2001 estimated that only 158 Murray Cod were harvested by anglers Queensland (Henry & Lyle 2003). However, data from a more recent study in the Border Rivers region of Queensland suggested that harvesting of Murray Cod remains high with most fish being removed from the population within a couple of years of reaching legal size (Butler et al. n.d. cited in Ye et al. 2014).New South WalesAn expanding recreational fishery was probably responsible for a decline of cod numbers in central and northern NSW rivers in the 1970s and 1980s (Rowland 2005 cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). The Murray Cod recreational fishery in NSW continues to grow. The National Recreational and Indigenous Fishing Survey estimated that 93 973 Murray Cod were harvested by anglers in NSW during 2000–2001 (Henry & Lyle 2003). A survey undertaken in 2012–2013 across 76 km of the Murrumbidgee River estimated annual catch of Murray Cod within the reach to be as high as 32 000 with only 5% of these being retained (Forbes cited in Ye et al. 2014). These results suggest that targeting of the species by the recreational fishing industry remains high, and that the practice of catch-and-release may be increasing. There is insufficient information available to confidently quantify the fishing pressure on Murray Cod in NSW (Ye et al. 2014).VictoriaThe National Recreational and Indigenous Fishing Survey estimated that 11 943 Murray Cod were harvested by Victorian anglers during 2000–2001, equating to 27 469 kg of biomass. According to the recreational angler surveys conducted on selected river reaches in Victoria, including the Goulburn, Ovens, Loddon and Murray Rivers, in 2006–2008, the total Murray Cod catch in those areas selected was estimated at more than 98 000 fish. Approximately 6500 of these fish, which were larger than the legal minimum legal length, were retained (Fulton 2011 cited in Ye et al. 2014). Voluntary release rates of 14–32% of fish larger than the minimum size limit were observed in the Goulburn and Murray Rivers. Insufficient information is available to confidently classify the fishing pressure on Murray Cod in Victoria (Ye et al. 2014).South AustraliaThe National Recreational and Indigenous Fishing Survey estimated that 2278 Murray Cod were harvested by anglers in SA during 2000–2001 (Henry & Lyle 2003). The most recent South Australian Recreational Fishing Survey conducted in 2007–2008 estimated that 507 Murray Cod (around 2.1 tonnes) were harvested from the lower River Murray (Jones cited in Ye et al. 2014). No Murray Cod were reported as caught in the Lower Lakes region. There was little change in the total number of fish caught since the above-mentioned 2000–2001 survey (Henry & Lyle 2003 cited in Ye et al. 2014), but release rates have increased from 16% in 2000–2001 to 73% in 2007–2008. The 2007–2008 figures should be considered only as indicative because the precision levels of all estimates were low (for example, numbers ± 971) as a result of low numbers of participants reporting Murray Cod catch, as well as low numbers of Murray Cod harvested (Ye et al. 2014).Illegal fishingAccording to Kearney and Kildea (2001), substantial illegal fishing of Murray Cod has been recorded. Illegal practices have been reported to be very effective, often targeting fish during times of spawning migration, and illegal catch may in some cases have exceeded the total commercial catch and potentially the total recreational catch. Certain fishing methods and equipment, which enable anglers to harvest larger Murray Cod or with increased efficiency, such as unattended set-lines, selectively remove reproducing adults and may have a substantial impact on population viability (Nicol et al. 2005 cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). In South Australia and NSW, fishery officers have reported hundreds of illegal traps each year (Lintermans et al. 2005). However, the extent or impact of illegal harvesting has not been estimated quantitatively (Kearney & Kildea 2001).Inappropriate stock enhancement programmesThe artificial propagation and stocking of threatened native fish species in Australia has been criticised for two main reasons. Firstly, artificial propagation and stocking of threatened native fish species has been viewed as a panacea for declining populations. While it is a relatively easy management option, it may mask the more fundamental, difficult and costly management issues, including habitat restoration and mainteNAce, threat abatement and policing exploitation of the fishery by recreational anglers (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). Secondly, research have indicated that inadequately managed stock enhancement programmes may constitute a serious threat to the genetic integrity of the wild (natural) Murray Cod populations that they intend to enhance (TSSC 2003i).Genetic diversity is the raw material for evolution and a loss of diversity reduces the ability of populations to adapt in response to environmental change. Inappropriate stocking may adversely affect species and populations through loss of genetic diversity, loss of genetic identity, introgression and by reducing effective population size (Frankham et al. 2000 cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). Genetic studies have demonstrated that some hatchery-bred Murray Cod populations were not genetically representative of the receiving wild populations or lacked the genetic diversity of wild populations (Bearlin & Tikel 2003; Rourke et al. 2009). Where hatchery-bred Murray Cod fingerlings, which have limited genetic diversity or lack the genetic composition of the local wild population into which those fingerlings are to be released, the effective population size and genetic diversity and integrity of that local wild population is likely to be reduced, thereby reducing its reproductive fitness and adaptability to drastic environmental changes (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010; Rourke et al. 2010; Rourke et al. 2011; Ryman & Laikre 1991; TSSC 2003i).The stocking of fish species can also result in the introduction or spread of harmful fish diseases if best-practice hatchery management and stocking procedures are not carried out (Kearney & Kildea 2001; National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010).Introduced speciesThere are 11 species of introduced fish in the Murray-Darling Basin. The most common of these are the highly invasive (ISSG 2015) Eastern Mosquito-fish ( Gambusia holbrooki ), Common Carp (Carp), Redfin/English Perch ( Perca fluviatilis ), Brown Trout ( Salmo trutta ) and Rainbow Trout ( Oncorhynchus mykiss ) (Trout species), and the Goldfish ( Carassius auratus auratus ). The less common introduced species in the Basin are the Atlantic Salmon ( Salmo salar ), Brook Char/Trout ( Salvelinus fontinalis ), Oriental Weatherloach ( Misgurnus anguillicaudatus ), Common Roach ( Rutilus rutilus ) and the Tench ( Tinca tinca ) (MDBC 2004).The impacts of introduced fish species on the Murray Cod include the predation of juveniles, competition for food and habitat resources, habitat alteration, and the spread of parasites and infectious diseases (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010; TSSC 2011bm). Redfin Perch, the Trout species and Atlantic Salmon are known to prey on small native fish (TSSC 2011bm), which include juvenile Murray Cod.According to Lintermans (2004a), human-assisted mechanisms for the introduction of native and non-native freshwater fish species, which occur in the Murray-Darling Basin and other parts of Australia, include:deliberate legal or illegal stockingcontamiNAts from fish stockingdeliberate introductions for pest controlbait bucket introductionstransfers on commercial fishing gearescapes from aquaculture facilities, ponds and damstransfers via water diversionsthe discarding of aquarium fishdeliberate releases for cultural ceremonies, andcontamiNAts of ballast water in coastal and international shipping.According to Lake (1967c), Langtry (originally cited in Cadwallader 1977), and Roberts and Sainty (1996), Redfin Perch were abundant in the Murray, Murrumbidgee and Lachlan River systems during the period from the late 1940s–1960s (Rowland 2005). The establishment of the species in the Canberra region originally occurred as a result of a legal stocking by a fisheries agency in 1959. The species was further dispersed by deliberate illegal stockings more than 20 years later, and through subsequent escapes from stocked locations during high flows, and releases as bait-fish (Lintermans et al. 1990a,b cited in Lintermans 2004a). Redfin Perch in the Canberra region were often detected as contamiNAts of trout stocking for recreational purposes (Lintermans et al. 1990b cited in Lintermans 2004a), although the species failed to establish from such inadvertent stockings (Lintermans 2004a).Langtry (Cadwallader 1977 cited in Rowland 2005) found that the diet of the Redfin Perch was identical to that of the Murray Cod and the Golden Perch ( Macquaria ambigua ). Small fishes are a major part of the diet of larger Redfin Perch (Lake 1967c cited in Rowland 2005). Larvae and juveniles of the species feed on zooplankton, crustaceans and insect larvae. Given that Redfin Perch spawn in early spring when temperatures are about 12 °C, usually in late August in southern NSW waters (Lake 1967c cited in Rowland 2005), offspring tends to hatch and develop earlier than do Murray Cod larvae. Therefore, Redfin Perch larvae and juveniles have an opportunity to prey on, and possibly compete for food with, Murray Cod larvae and juveniles, particularly if food resources are limited (Rowland 2005). Catch data on fishes taken from the Kerang Lakes, Victoria, between 1919 and 1949 demonstrated that when Redfin Perch was abundant, native fish were scarce and vice versa (Cadwallader 1977 cited in Rowland 2005). It is, therefore, plausible that Redfin Perch contributed to the dramatic decline of Murray Cod in the southern parts of the Murray-Darling River system between the mid 1950s and 1960s (Rowland 2005).Carp make up an estimated 60–90% of the total fish biomass at many sites within the Murray-Darling Basin, with densities as high as one fish per square metre of river surface area (MDBC 2004). The establishment of Carp in the Australian Capital Territory (ACT) in the mid-1970s is thought to have occurred through contaminated fish stockings (Lintermans 2002 cited in Lintermans 2004a). Murray Cod may well predate on young Carp. However, at high densities, Carp may reduce aquatic vegetation through their feeding habitats, thereby reducing habitat for native fish species, and increase the turbidity of the water (Koehn 2005; National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). Although there is no scientific evidence to support the claim that Carp are affecting Murray Cod numbers (Koehn et al. 2000 cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010), there is some correlation between high numbers of alien fish species, especially Carp and Redfin Perch, and low numbers of native fish species, including the Murray Cod (Rowland 2005 cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). Likewise, increasing Murray Cod numbers in NSW have corresponded to low numbers of Carp and Redfin Perch (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010).Water mould infectionMurray Cod are susceptible to fatal infections by  Saprolegnia  species of parasitic water moulds (oomycetes) when their protective scales or mucous lining are removed or damaged.  Saprolegnia  infections are lethal to the host fish (Kaminskas pers. comm. 2015; National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010).Potential threatsDiseases and pathogensThe occurrence and impact of diseases on the Murray Cod is not well known. Diseases and pathogens of concern for the Murray Cod include waterborne Epizootic Haematopoietic Necrosis (EHN) virus, Viral Encephalopathy and Retinopathy, Goldfish Ulcer Disease, Asian Fish Tapeworm ( Bothriocephalus acheilognathis ) and Parasitic Copepod Anchorworm (Anchorworm) ( Lernaea cyprinacea ) (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010).Anchorworm is an introduced parasite that burrows into the fins of infected fish, or in finely-scaled species, into the skin itself. Carp and Trout species are effective vectors of Anchorworm. Fish scientists and recreational anglers have noted heavy infestations of Anchorworm in native fish, particularly the Murray Cod and Macquarie Perch ( Macquaria australasica ). Ebner (2006) (cited in TSSC 2011bm) documented juvenile Murray cod killed by a heavy Anchorworm infestation.Carp, Trout species and Eastern Mosquito-fish may also carry other introduced parasites such as Asian Fish Tapeworm (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010; TSSC 2011bm). Asian Fish Tapeworm infestations also have the potential to cause significant mortality for native fish species, including the Murray Cod.Ectoparasitic protozoans including  Chilodonella  species,  Ichthyophthirius  species,  Myxosoma  species and  Trichodina  species are widespread and can be problematic in fish culture conditions (Ashburner 1978, Ashburner & Ehl 1973, Langdon 1989, Langdon et al. 1986 & 1987, and Rowland & Ingram 1991 cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010), but their occurrence or impact in the wild is unknown (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010). Ingram and Rimmer (1992) (cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010) noted that an infestation of  Chilodonella  species killed adult Trout Cod held at a hatchery. Douglas and colleagues (1994) (cited in National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010) suggested the  Chilodonella  genus to be a threat to wild populations. There is the potential to introduce disease to wild populations through the release of hatchery-bred fish.The Redfin Perch and farmed Trout species are known to be infected with, and carry, waterborne EHN virus. Research has indicated that, while Murray Cod have been shown to be susceptible to infection with EHN virus injected into their abdominal cavity during laboratory trials, the species appears to have a resistance to infection when exposed in water (Whittington et al. 2011).Climate changeClimate change is likely to adversely affect aquatic ecosystems in the Murray-Darling Basin. Climate models predict an overall reduction in rainfall, less winter/spring rainfall, possibly increased summer rainfall, more frequent and increased duration of dry periods, and an increase in the extent and frequency of extreme rainfall events. Potential increases in temperatures (both minimum and maximum) would increase evaporation rates, especially from the broad water surfaces of lakes and impoundments, and the rate of evapotranspiration in plant commmunities in the Basin. The overall consequence of predicted climatic change would be less water in the river systems and a reduction in the area of habitat available to the Murray Cod. It is predicted that fish kills will increase due to algal blooms and blackwater events during dry periods and fish populations will be under more pressure from recreational fishing (National Murray Cod Recovery Team 2010).With regards to fire regimes and biodiversity, climate change is likely to significantly affect the sclerophyll-dominated forests, woodlands and grasslands of south-eastern Australia. In these forests, a projected increase in very high to extreme forest-fire weather conditions, as a consequence of climate change, is likely to increase fire frequency and area burnt (Williams et al. 2009). A consequence of this could be increased flows of surface runoff carrrying sediments and nutrients into the waterways of the Murray-Darling Basin, thereby degrading and reducing the availability of habitat for the Murray Cod.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66633'),('66642','Potorous gilbertii','Critically Endangered','Mammalia','Potoroidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66642'),('66645','Potorous tridactylus tridactylus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Potoroidae','The Long-nosed Potoroo (SE Mainland) is a medium sized marsupial of the order Diprotodontia. There is considerable variation between sizes in males and females. Males and females have a body length (excluding the tail) between 287–410 mm and 259–378 mm respectively. Tail lengths range between 204–262 mm (males) and 198–254 mm (females) with males (740–1640g) being typically heavier than females (660–1350g). The Long-nosed Potoroo (SE Mainland) can be identified by a brown to grey upper body and paler underbody. They have a long nose that tapers with a small patch of skin extending from the snout to the nose. The length of the feet is shorter than their head length. They are smaller than the Long-footed Potoroo ( Potorous longipes ) (Van Dyck & Strahan 2008).','Victorian HabitatSeebeck (1981) provides a detailed study of the Victorian habitats of the Long-nosed Potoroo (SE Mainland) in each of the six populations.South-western regionThe Long-nosed Potoroo (SE Mainland) has been observed in open forests and the ecotones between them. Most sites were dominated by either  Eucalyptus obliqua  or  E. baxteri . There were also  E. ovata  and  E. viminalis  however these were less common. The average tree height was approximately 20 m, however, at poorer sites the trees only reached 5 m. The soils were highly acidic clay soils with a thin layer of sand.Grampians regionThe Long-nosed Potoroos (SE Mainland) habitat in this region is dominated by heath-woodland with an abundance of  Eucalyptus oblique  and  E. aromaphloia .  E. baxteri  was present in some places. The tree height ranged from 10–15 m with a 2 m tall shrub layer consisting of  Acacia  spp.,  Banksia marginata  and  Leptospermum juniperinum . The soils in this region have a leached sandy profile and are highly acidic.Otways regionIn this region its habitat is dominated by stringybark eucalypts,  Eucalyptus oblique  or  E. baxteri . Near watercourses or poorly drained areas,  E. ovata  and  E. viminalis  were commonly found. The habitat was characterized by a dense low shrub layer of  Acacia verticillata  and  Banksia marginata . The region had acidic sandy or sandy loam soils overlaying a variety of sub-soils.Western Port regionMost Long-nosed Potoroos (SE Mainland) in the region have been found in areas of heath-woodland or open forest. These sites are developed, relatively dry, well drained old dunes to heavier soils in low-lying areas. The regions are often flooded during the winter. Most sites contained  Eucalyptus obliqua  on higher sites or  E. obliqua  and  E. viminalis  in wetter areas. The trees ranged from 7–13 m tall.Wilsons Promontory regionMost specimens of the Long-nosed Potoroo (SE Mainland) have been collected in areas of heath-woodland grading into heath. The domiNAt tree species are the  Eucalyptus obliqua  and  E. baxteri.   E. radiata  is sometime present. The tree height ranges from 5–15 m with an open or sparse canopy. The soils are sandy loams overlying leached sand soils or brown gradational soils.East Gippsland regionThe Long-nosed Potoroo (SE Mainland) is found in both open forest and woodland and the ecotone in-between. It is found in areas containing  Eucalyptus sieberi, E. globoidea, E. muellerana, E. baxteri  and  E. cypellocarpa . Tree height varies from 20–40 m. The soils in the region are generally acidic soils and leached sand.NSW and QueenslandThe Long-nosed Potoroo (SE Mainland) is sparsely distributed along the coast and Great Dividing Range of south-east Queensland through NSW (Van Dyck & Strahan 2008). There is limited information about the species habitat in Queensland and NSW. There is no consistent pattern to the habitat of the Long-nosed Potoroo (SE Mainland); it can be found in wet eucalypt forests (Seebeck 1995b) to coastal heaths and scrubs (Mason 1997). The main factors would appear to be access to some form of dense vegetation for shelter (Bennett 1987) and the presence of an abundant supply of fungi for food (Claridge et al. 1992).','Like all Potoroos, fungi are the major component of the diet. The Long-nosed Potoroo (SE Mainland) is known to consume vascular plant components including the flower, fruit, seed, leaf, stem, root and bulb. It feeds on both hypogeous and epigeous components of fungal fruit bodies. The Long-nosed Potoroo (SE Mainland) is also known to feed on invertebrates. Rabbits also feed on fungi. There is no evidence to suggest that grazing competition from rabbits is affecting Potoroo numbers (Seekbeck et al. 2007). Specific feeding studies A study at Naringal in south-western Victoria found that there was considerable seasonal variation in diet, with fungi being the primary component in winter, seeds a secondary component and arthropods and plant parts of lesser importance. In summer arthropods, fungi and vascular plants were approximately equal in importance (Bennett & Baxter 1989). In a study in East Gippsland, Victoria, the spores of 33 different fungal species were identified in the faeces of the Long-nosed Potoroo (SE Mainland). Experiments confirmed that spores carried in the faeces were viable and that Potoroos are probably an important agent in maintaining the fungal-plant symbiosis (Claridge et al. 1992, 1993).Feeding behaviour of the Tasmanian subspecies was observed by Vernes and Jarman (2014). It was found the truffles are dug up using a synchronous forepaw movement, picked up with the mouth or forepaws and cleaned of debris before being consumed (Vernes & Jarman 2014). Truffles were usually dug up within 2.4 seconds and if unsuccessful at recovering a truffle, digging occurred for 4.8 seconds. Potoroos were successful at recovering a truffle in 76% of digging attempts, and once they had located a cache of buried truffles, achieved a rate of recovery of ~2.4 truffles per minute (Vernes & Jarman 2014).','Present threatsGeographical separation and isolation is identified as the main threat to the Long-nosed Potoroo (SE Mainland). Isolated populations face inherent difficulties in breeding. Seebeck and colleagues (2007) identify the following reasons behind the isolation:predation by European Red Foxes ( Vulpes vulpes ) and Feral Cats ( Felis catus )residential and industrial developmentnatural disasters.Historical background to present threatsOf the 11 rat-kangaroo species identified at the time of European settlement, two are extinct. A further two are located only on offshore islands and the distribution of all other species is reduced. Early farmers viewed the Potoroos as a pest, responsible for raiding gardens and crop fields. Farmers used a variety of methods to resolve the problem (Seebeck et al. 2007), including:Baiting: the use of poisoned pollard and sulphur was particularly successful. Poisoning was used near newly found cotton settlements. Reports indicate \'scores of thousands\' were killed in this way.Shooting: the Pasture Protection Boards of NSW paid bounties for Potoroos. From 1880–1920 an estimated three million rat-kangaroos were killed for bounties.Despite the baiting and shooting of the Potoroos, a detailed analysis of bounty records revealed a decline in payments made from 1908–1910. Despite this, no correlation between the reduction in payments and an increase in sheep numbers, or improvement in crop pastures could be found. This lead to the conclusion that despite baiting and shooting, the decline in Potoroos was due to introduced predators (i.e. cats and foxes). Indeed cats and foxes were initially introduced by farmers to control the number native wildlife deemed as \'pests.\' Foxes were able to spread throughout the entire NSW in 10–15 years. By 1918, all animals of open habitat were all but extinct due to fox predation (Seebeck et al. 2007).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66645'),('66646','Petrogale xanthopus xanthopus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Macropodidae','The Yellow-footed Rock-wallaby (SA and NSW) is brightly coloured with a white cheek stripe and orange ears. It is fawn-grey above with a white side-stripe, and a brown and white hip-stripe. Its forearms, hindlegs and feet are a rich orange to bright yellow colour. This subspecies grows to 65 cm and can weigh up to 11 kg. It has an orange-brown tail with horizontal brown bars or stripes, which grows to 70 cm long (Cronin 1991; Sharman et al. 1998).','The Yellow-footed Rock-wallaby inhabits rocky outcrops in semi-arid country, ranging from sandstones, limestones and conglomerates in the Flinders Ranges, to granites in the Gawler Ranges and Olary Hills (Copley & Alexander 1997). Some colonies are found in association with permanent fresh water, often around soaks at the edge of rock faces, while other colonies appear to exist without a reliable water supply. However, there is evidence to suggest all colonies require some form of permanent water supply up to 5 km distant (Lim et al. 1992). Suitable habitat often includes a greater variety of plant species than on the surrounding arid plains (Sharman et al. 1998). Analysis of habitat in the Flinders Ranges suggests that Yellow-footed Rock-wallabies favour cliff-lines with a southerly aspect, as these provide shelter from the sun and thus support more abundant vegetation. In contrast, many NSW colonies are found at east or northeast facing sites (Lim et al. 1992).','In a detailed study at Middle Gorge, South Australia, the Yellow-footed Rock-wallaby was found to be an opportunistic feeder, eating grasses, forbs and browse, according to seasonal availability (Lim et al. 1987; Sharman et al. 1998). In NSW, forbs were preferred foods with browse becoming more important during drought (Dawson & Ellis 1979).Captive-bred animals released into the wild at Aroona Dam, northern Flinders Ranges, ate mostly grasses and forbs prior to their release, but within a month had increased their intake of browse plants (Lapidge 2000).','The Yellow-footed Rock-wallaby was subject to intensive hunting by fur traders in the past (AWC 2007a). Hunting and pastoral development contributed to the early decline of the species (Dickman et al. 1993). Hundreds of skins from this species were exported annually from Adelaide to London late last century. This period of intense hunting led to significant reduction in numbers in some areas, particularly the Flinders Ranges (Sharman et al. 1998).Habitat destruction (AWC 2007a, b) is another threat both in the past and continuing today. There has been considerable alteration to vegetation throughout the species\' range due to grazing and browsing by domestic stock and feral herbivores, as well as the removal of timber for the mining industry and fencing (Sharman et al. 1998).Predation by feral cats and foxes is a considerable threat, as is competition from introduced herbivores, primarily rabbits, sheep and goats (AWC 2007a; Dovey et al. 1997; Sharman et al. 1998).Goats have a significant overlap in diet with rock wallabies, particularly during drought (Dawson & Ellis 1994). This affects the species\' ability to find food, which is reduced through incidences of drought and competition from feral species. During a moderate drought in NSW in 1982-83, numbers of Yellow-footed Rock-wallabies dropped by 60%. After the drought, numbers recovered in areas where goats were controlled, but numbers remained depressed in areas with no goat control (Sharman et al. 1998).Of 23 dead wallabies examined in the Flinders Ranges between 1980 and 1984, three were identified as definite fox kills, two as possible fox kills and one as a possible dingo kill (Hornsby 1997).Yellow-footed Rock-wallabies are also prey for Wedge-tailed Eagles, which have been observed swooping on a colony as the wallabies ran across a rock face (Sharman et al. 1998). Studies in NSW indicate that rock wallabies only comprise a very small part of the eagles\' diet, suggesting they are taken opportunistically and do not represent a major dietary component (Sharp & Norton 1995).In addition, small populations are suceptible to genetic risks such as inbreeding and catastrophic events such as severe storms, wildfire and disease (Dickman et al. 1993).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66646'),('66647','Petrogale lateralis lateralis','Endangered','Mammalia','Macropodidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66647'),('66649','Petrogale lateralis MacDonnell Ranges race','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Macropodidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66649'),('66650','Petrogale lateralis West Kimberley race','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Macropodidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66650'),('66651','Perameles gunnii gunnii','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Peramelidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66651'),('66659','Bettongia lesueur lesueur','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Potoroidae','The Burrowing Bettong (Shark Bay) is a small, thickset grey marsupial with short, rounded ears. The species body length is 36 cm long, while it has a wide tail which grows to 30 cm long (Strahan 1998).','On Bernier Island and Dorre Island Burrowing Bettong (Shark Bay) were trapped mainly in  Triodia  grasslands on the sandplains, with lesser numbers in heath and scrub vegetation (Short & Turner 1999). Vegetation types on Heirisson Prong are similar to those on the islands (Short et al. 1995).','Burrowing Bettong (Shark Bay) have been reported digging into turtle nests on beaches on islands (Reinhold & Thomas 2007).','Wedge-tailed Eagles are a major predator of small mammals in the Shark Bay region, but as they take prey in proportion to abundance, and as Hare Wallabies far outnumber Burrowing Bettong (Shark Bay) on Bernier Island and Dorre Island, this predator is not a major threat (Richards & Short 1998).Feral cats and foxes are considered a major threat to the species (Short et al. 1995). A study of the prey eaten by these predators at Heirisson Prong indicated that cats pose the biggest threat to the species as evident by the abundance of Burrowing Bettong (Shark Bay) found in stomach analysis (Risbey et al. 1999).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66659'),('66661','Lagorchestes conspicillatus conspicillatus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Macropodidae','The Spectacled Hare-wallaby (Barrow Island) is a stocky marsupial with distinctive bright orange rings around its eyes. It has brown fur above and white fur below. Individuals grow to 47 cm long and weigh up to 4.5 kg. It has a sparsely-haired tail which grows to 49 cm long. The species is generally solitary, though small groups of up to three have been seen feeding together (Cronin 1991; Strahan 1998).','Barrow Island is a small limestone island dominated by  Triodia  grasslands. Spectacled Hare-wallabies (Barrow Island) occur in all vegetation types found on the island sheltering under  Triodia  tussocks from heat and predators. The shelters are sometimes referred to as \'squats\', such as those used by European Hares (ABC 2010; Short & Turner 1991).','The subspecies is a nocturnal browser foraging on herbs, grass and fruits, and rarely drinking. Water is metabolized from food, supplemented by dew on early morning foliage. Spectacled Hare-wallabies have the most efficient kidneys of any mammal, with a urine production and water turnover equaling only 5.3% of total body water per day. They also have a nasal moisture retention mechanism, which recycles breath moisture to the stomach. A sphincter muscle structure removes any excess moisture from faecal material. Their two-toned fur allows reflective or heat absorbent capacity according to need (Wildlife Australia undated).','The high population density and large population size, together with the relatively safe status of the island, does not imply high security as a single isolated population is highly vulnerable to novel influences or catastrophic events. Reintroduction of a population to Hermite Island has been suggested as a high priority for protection of the species (Maxwell et al. 1996).Threats to the habitat include disturbance by oilfield activities especially gravel extraction and road construction, fire and the possibility of imported invasive species (Butler 1987). Cats and rats are implicated in the disappearance of the species from Hermite Island (Maxwell et al. 1996).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66661'),('66662','Lagorchestes hirsutus bernieri','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Macropodidae','The Rufous Hare-Wallaby (Bernier Island) is a small macropod (1.5–2 kg, 30–40 cm tall) that is rufous coloured (grey-brown-orange) (Johnson & Burbidge 2008). The average tail length is 27 cm (Strahan 1998). Longer hair occurs towards the back and below (Johnson & Burbidge 2008). Larger than the mainland subspecies, the Bernier Island subspecies has a shorter tail (Johnson & Burbidge 2008).','This Rufous Hare-wallaby (Bernier Island) occurs in all habitat types on Bernier Island, including dunes, heath, grassland and low scrub in proportion to their availability (Short & Turner 1992). DomiNAt plant species in heath include  Scaevola crassifolia ,  Thryptomene baeckeacea  and  Melaleuca cardiophylla ; in grassland plants include  Triodia plurinervata ; and in low scrub,  Pileanthus limacis ,  Diplolaena dampieri ,  Pimelea microcephala ,  Acacia rostellifera  and Wirewood ( Acacia coriacea ) (Short et al. 1997).','The Rufous Hare-wallaby (Bernier Island) is a herbivore and eats forbs, perennial grasses, grass seed heads, seeds, bulbs of sedges and some dicotyledonous plants, such as  Neobassia astrocarpa  and  Frankenia  sp. (as  Lagorchestes hirsutus  unnamed subsp.) (Pearson 1989).','Potential threats include a major fire event, disease, development and the accidental introduction of feral predators (Richards 2007a). There are no existing feral predators on Bernier Island, although the Domestic Cat ( Felis catus ) as present in the early 1900s (Friend 1990). If the Rufous Hare-wallaby (Bernier Island) is restocked on other islands or the mainland, predation by the Domestic Cat and the Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) are likely to be a major concern.The low levels of genetic variation in the subspecies (Eldridge et al. 2004) could worsen as a result of threats associated with genetic bottlenecks.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66662'),('66663','Lagorchestes hirsutus dorreae','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Macropodidae','The Rufous Hare-Wallaby (Dorre Island) is a grey-brown marsupial with a dark grey head and long, soft fur. Males of this subspecies grow to 36 cm and females grow to 39 cm. The average tail length is 27 cm (Strahan 1998).','The Rufous Hare-wallaby (Dorre Island) occurs in all habitat types on Bernier Island, including dunes, heath, grassland and low scrub (Short & Turner 1992). DomiNAt plant species in grassland includes  Triodia plurinervata , with emergent  Alyogyne cuneiformis ,  Melaleuca cardiophylla  and Port Jackson Mallee ( Eucalyptus obtusiflora ); on dune swales there is tall scrub, up to 2 m, of  Hakea oleifolia , Wirewood ( Acacia coriacea ), Rock Fig ( Ficus platypoda ), Australian Sandalwood ( Santalum spicatum ), Rice-flower ( Pimelea microcephala ) and  Diplolaena dampieri ; and in heath  Scaevola crassifolia  and Ribbed Thryptomene ( Thryptomene micrantha ) (Short & Turner 1992).','The Rufous Hare-wallaby (Dorre Island) is a herbivore and eats forbs, perennial grasses, grass seed heads, seeds, bulbs of sedges and some dicotyledonous plants, such as  Neobassia astrocarpa  and  Frankenia  sp. (as  Lagorchestes hirsutus  unnamed subsp.) (Pearson 1989).','Potential threats include a major fire event, disease, development and the accidental introduction of feral predators (Richards 2007a). If the Rufous Hare-wallaby (Dorre Island) is restocked on other islands or the mainland, predation by the Domestic Cat ( Felis catus ) and the Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) are likely to be a major concern.The low levels of genetic variation in the subspecies (Eldridge et al. 2004) could worsen as a result of threats associated with genetic bottlenecks.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66663'),('66664','Lagostrophus fasciatus fasciatus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Macropodidae','The Banded Hare-wallaby is grey marsupial with dark bands across its lower back. It grows up to 45 cm in length with a tail length of 20 cm. This marsupial weighs between 1.3 and 2.1 kg (Strahan 1998), but males may weigh up to 2.5 kg and females up to 3.0 kg (Richards 2012a).','The Banded Hare-wallaby occurs in all types of habitat on the islands including dunes, grassland and heathland. However, higher densities occur in areas of thicker vegetation (Short et al. 1997). Individuals shelter under dense thickets of Dune Wattle ( Acacia ligulata ), Wirewood ( A. coriacea ) and Bullock Bush ( Alectryon oleifolius ) on sandplains and  Diplolaena dampieri  and Bullock Bush on dunes (Woinarski et al. 2014). Beneath these shrubs it forms runways and shelters (Prince & Richards 2008). Several individuals may be found sheltering in one patch of shrub (Richards 2012a), but adults of each sex appear to live in well-defined individual home ranges or territories (Woinarski et al. 2014).Habitat features critical to the survival of the Banded Hare-wallaby include areas of dense heath and shrub thickets to avoid predators. Sites that might have suitable habitat include: Faure Island, Peron Peninsula and Edel Land in Shark Bay, and conservation reserves in the south coastal region of WA (Richards 2012a). However, the Banded Hare-wallabies are unlikely to persist at sites where introduced predators are present (Hardman & Moro 2006 cited in Richards 2012a).','Banded hare-wallabies are herbivorous, consuming grasses, malvaceous and leguminous shrubs and other dicotyledonous plants (Prince 1995). In captivity at the Peron Captive Breeding Centre, Banded Hare-wallabies have been observed browsing on  Acacia sclerosperma ,  A. tetragonophylla ,  A. ramulosa , and  A. ligulata  (C. Sims, pers. comm. cited in Richards 2012a). They will eat leaves (live and dead), bark, flowers and seed-pods of many of these species (Richards 2012a). Feeding occurs at night in open areas (Woinarski et al. 2014).','All three island populations of the Banded Hare-wallaby are subject to the following threats:Climate change leading to less rainfall (particularly winter rainfall) and increased risk of fire (Richards 2012a): subpopulations are already under stress during drought, however, lower rainfall is predicted by climate models for south-west WA (Cleugh et al. 2011 cited in Woinarski et al. 2014).Predation by Red Foxes ( Vulpes vulpes ) and feral Cats ( Felis catus ): if these predators were introduced to a population it would likely cause extirpation; reintroduction failed at Dirk Hartog Island and Peron Peninsula due to feral Cat predation (Woinarski et al. 2014)Inappropriate fire regimes, particularly a major fire event (Richards 2012a)Disease (Richards 2012a).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66664'),('66665','Isoodon auratus auratus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Peramelidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66665'),('66666','Isoodon auratus barrowensis','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Peramelidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66666'),('66667','Isoodon obesulus nauticus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Peramelidae','The Southern Brown Bandicoot (Nuyts Archipelago) is a solidly built, rabbit-sized, nocturnal marsupial with small rounded ears. It has soft underfur and coarse guard hairs. The back is brownish-grey, flecked with yellow-brown and the belly is pale (Cronin 1991). The short pointed tail is white with a dark base, and its elongated head has small eyes (Cronin 2000). The short forelimbs have strong, curved claws on long feet (Cronin 2000). The hind feet are long with a very large, strongly-clawed fourth toe, while the second and third toes are fused (Cronin 2000). The skull of the Southern Brown Bandicoot (Nuyts Archipelago) resembles that of a young female  Isoodon obesulus  (Jones 1924). Males weigh 450–1000 g and females weigh 400–750 g (Copley et al. 1990).','The Southern Brown Bandicoot (Nuyts Archipelago) is found in low open chenopod shrublands with numerous Short-tailed Shearwater ( Ardenna tenuirostris ) burrows and grassy limestone ridges with low open Nitre Bush ( Nitraria schoberi ) shrublands (Maxwell et al. 1996).The presence of Short-tailed Shearwater burrows is strongly correlated with Southern Brown Bandicoot (Nuyts Archipelago) presence, as the former is known to shelter in the former\'s burrows (Copley et al. 1990).','The Southern Brown Bandicoot ( Isoodon obesulus ) is omnivorous. Its diet consists of insects, fungi, plant root nodules, bulbs, fruit, seeds and other plant material (DEW 2007c).','The spread of the introduced Crystalline Iceplant ( Mesembryanthemum crystallinum)  through the subspecies range is of concern (TSSC 2012bk). The Crystalline Iceplant inhibits the growth of native plants by accumulating salt in the soil and leaving behind large amounts of dry plant matter. There is concern that the plant may become domiNAt across the Nuyts Archipelago, to the exclusion of native perennial shrubs. Birds of prey and snakes are the major major predators of the Nuyts Archipelago subspecies of Southern Brown Bandicoot (Nuyts Archipelago) (Copley et al. 1990). Introduced predators such as the Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ), the Dog ( Canis lupus familiaris ) and the Cat ( Felis catus ) are not recorded from the Franklin and St Francis Islands, but would pose a major threat if introduced (Kemper 1990). The Southern Brown Bandicoot (Nuyts Archipelago) population on Franklin Island is not known to be in decline. However, the subspecies has probably declined in areas cleared for cropping on St Francis Island (Maxwell et al. 1996). Further habitat loss, cropping, grazing and weed invasion are potential threats to the subspecies.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66667'),('66669','Litoria verreauxii alpina','Vulnerable','Amphibia','Hylidae','The Alpine Tree Frog is a subspecies of the broadly distributed  Litoria verreauxii .  The Alpine Tree Frog is distinguished by the presence of dorsal green or olive markings, extensive dorsal warting, and by its greater size than  Litoria verreauxii  (NSW SC 2002). Adult frogs grow 25 to 40 mm (ARC 2005).','The Alpine Tree Frog occurs mainly in woodland, heath, grassland and herb field at montane, subalpine and alpine altitudes. Breeding populations occur on plains or open valleys where there are stream side pools, fens and bogs (Gillespie et al. 1995) but may also be associated with artificial waterbodies such as small dams and reservoirs (Osborne et al. 1999). During the non-breeding season individuals may be found amongst litter, under logs, beneath flat stones in stream beds or in rocky areas near streams (Gillespie et al. 1995).','NA','The timing and rapid nature of the Alpine Tree Frogs\' decline, which coincided with the disappearance of several other frog species in this region (e.g  Pseudophryne  spp. and  Philoria frosti , Osborne et al. 1999), is likely to be due to an outbreak of Chytridiomycosis (Hunter et al. 2009). Declines have been more prevalent where the subspecies co-occurs with the common eastern froglet ( Crinia signifera ) (Hunter et al. 2009).Stochastic (chance) events may lead to the extinction of the Alpine Tree Frog at the seven remaining breeding locations in the Kosciuszko National Park. The two man-made ponds are susceptible to pollution by run-off from nearby busy roads. The five natural ponds are subject to drying during drought years. Moreover, all breeding locations are vulnerable to trampling by feral horses and livestock (NSW SC 2002).Inappropriate fire regimes have also impact the species, although the Alpine Tree Frog persisted at Mt Bullfight Nature Conservation Reserve and the Dargo Plains following fire in 2009 (Howard et al. 2011).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66669'),('66670','Pseudophryne pengilleyi','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Myobatrachidae','The Northern Coroboree Frog\'s ventral surface is boldly marked with black, yellow and white blotches. A large flat femoral gland is present on each hind limb, and the inner metatarsal tubercle is low and round. Adults reach a length of between 25–30 mm (Cogger 2000).','The Northern Coroboree Frog is restricted to montane and subalpine woodland, heathland and grassland above 850 m above sea level (Osborne 1991). The species breeds in pools and seepages in  Sphagnum  bogs and wet heath at higher altitudes, and wet sod-tussock grassland and seepage lines in montane forest at lower altitudes (Osborne 1990b; Pengilley 1966). It shows a strong tendency to breed in ephemeral water bodies that are dry during the non-breeding season (Osborne 1990).Non-breeding habitat (foraging and shelter) is adjacent to breeding sites and includes forest, sub-alpine woodland and tall heath (Pengilley 1966). Sheltering sites include dense litter, logs and rocks (Pengilley 1966).The Northern Coroboree Frog occurs in the Alpine Sphagnum Bogs and Associated Fens ecological community, which is listed as Endangered under the EPBC Act.','NA','The Northern Coroboree Frog is one of a number of Australian alpine amphibian species, including Alpine Tree Frog ( Litoria verreauxii alpina ), Southern Corroboree Frog ( Pseudophryne corroboree ) and Baw Baw Frog ( Philoria frosti ), which have experienced pronounced population declines for unknown reasons. It is likely that declines will continue through the 2010s (Hunter 2013). There is no single aspect of the field biology of these species which stands out as a feature in common that may help explain the declines (Osborne et al. 1999). Osborne and colleagues (1999) reviewed some of the possible factors contributing to population declines at high altitudes including long term weather patterns and pathogens such as the Chytrid fungus (Berger et al. 1999).Chytridiomycosis affects the Northern Corroboree Frog throughout its range (Hunter et al. 2010). This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (AGDEH 2006o). Chytrid fungus has been detected in some museum specimens of the species (Osborne 2001 pers. comm.). The spread of this diease is possibly facilitated by the Common Eastern Froglet ( Crinia signifera ) (Hunter et al. 2009).Climate change is predicted to decrease winter and spring precipitation for the Australian Alps (Hennessey et al. 2003) that may lower spring water tables and result in pools drying earlier (Hunter 2013). Although droughts are a common in south-east Australia, climate change may increase the severity and frequency of these events (Hunter 2013).Invasive exotic plant species occur at a number of breeding sites in the Fiery Ranges and northern Brindabella Ranges (Osborne 1990b). Blackberry ( Rubus fruticosus ) can completely smother and shade breeding habitat rendering it unsuitable for frogs (Osborne 1991). Infestations that may have caused localised extinction occur at Bondo SF, Micalong SF, Wee Jasper SF and Kosciuszko NP (Hunter 2013).The Pig ( Sus scrofa ), the Horse ( Equus equus ), the Sambar Deer ( Cervus unicolour ) and the Fallow Deer ( Dama dama ) have been observed damaging habitat. Ultimately, trampling and grazing by these species cause wetland incision that alters drainage patterns and vegetation structure (Costin et al. 1959; Hunter 2013; McDougall 1989; Whinam & Chilcott 2002).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66670'),('66671','Ninox natalis','Vulnerable','Aves','Strigidae','The Christmas Island Hawk-Owl is about the size of a common pigeon (26 to 29 cm) but with a barred breast. It has an unmistakeable boo-book call. Unlike other raptors, including many owls, there is little difference in size between males and females with females being only slightly larger than the male. The Hawk-Owl is a small owl weighing approximately 140 to 210 g (Hill & Lill 1998b).','The Hawk-Owl mainly inhabits dense rainforest on both plateau and coastal terraces of Christmas Island (Higgins 1999). On the plateau, it is found in tall closed evergreen forest with irregular canopy and numerous emergent trees, including  Syzigium, Planchonella  and  HerNAdia  up to 40 m tall, and with an understorey of thickets consisting of Pandanus Palms  Pandanus spp.  (Gibson-Hill 1947; Hill 1996a; Hill & Lill 1998a).On coastal terraces this species inhabits deciduous forests with canopy up to 30 m.  It occurs in highly disturbed (formerly cleared) areas, with secondary growth of native and introduced trees, including  Macaranga, Claoxylon, Leucaena  and  Muntingia , forming low (less than 10 m) closed forest; or in low herb lands with dense growths of ferns (Gibson-Hill 1947; Hill 1996a; Hill & Lill 1998a).The species was once recorded in roadside shrubs next to disturbed secondary forest; and once in low weed-infested herb lands (Gibson-Hill 1947; Hill 1996; Hill & Lill 1998a). The Hawk-Owl generally avoids areas that have been cleared or are being rehabilitated (Hill 1996a; Hill & Lill 1998a). Hawk-Owls choose to roost in the bottom third of the canopy of trees with particularly deep crowns, in areas with fewer low understorey and more mid-level understorey trees, suggesting a preference for sheltered, concealed, roost sites with easy escape routes below them  (Hill & Lill 1998a).The Hawk-Owls require undisturbed habitat for breeding (Kent & Boles 1984), although at least two breeding records are close to settled areas (Hill 1996a). This species has been recorded breeding in hollows in  Syzigium nervosum  within primary forests.  Breeding does not occur in secondary growth because trees there are not old enough to have developed hollows (Hill 1996a). This species roosts in both closed forest and secondary growth with dense understorey, usually in middle layers of vegetation, 5-15 m above ground (Hill 1996a; Hill & Lill 1998a). However, this species has also been recorded roosting in rainforest canopy (Phillips et al. 1991). Owls select roost sites that are sheltered from above which provides them with protection from heavy rain and sun (Hill & Lill 1998a). All four nests recorded for this species, three in marginal rainforest and one in primary rainforest, have been in tree hollows in  Syzygium nervosum .  Syzygium nervosum  is, therefore, a very important tree species for Christmas Island Hawk-Owls and if its abundance was to change in the future, this might lead to a shortage of nest sites (Hill & Young 1995).','The Hawk-Owl feeds mainly on large insects and sometimes on small vertebrates (Higgins 1999). It is nocturnal, feeding mainly in the understorey of primary forest, or in secondary vegetation along roadsides (Hill & Lill 1998b), and in disturbed areas around human settlements (Kent & Boles 1984). In forest, this species forages mainly by perch-hunting.  It searches for prey while moving from one perch to another. When prey is located, the Hawk-Owl usually swoops onto the outer foliage or trunk of shrubs or small trees, sally-strikes prey, then flies back to a new perch. Prey is snatched from heights of 2 to 7 m (Hill & Lill 1998b; Olsen & Stokes 1989; Phillips et al. 1991). It is likely that the Hawk-Owl hunts in the upper layers of the forest as it is better lit than the dark understory, indicating that light levels maybe important in determining the feeding success of the species (Hill & Lill 1998b).The Hawk-Owl is also seen hunting along roadsides, repeatedly flying from perch to perch (30-100 m), and spending long periods watching from each perch (approximately 15 minutes) inspecting road for prey (Hill & Lill 1998b). It also sallies for insects attracted to street lights around settlements, particularly during August to September (Olsen & Stokes 1989).An analysis of regurgitated pellets, stomach samples and faeces showed the owls to be primarily insectivorous, eating a wide variety of medium to large insects, especially  Orthoptera ,  Lepidoptera  and  Coleoptera .  The Hawk-Owl is also known to eat the gryllacridid cricket,  Gryllacris rufovaria , the only member of this family of tree crickets recorded on Christmas island.  The Hawk-Owl supplements this diet with vertebrates of which introduced Black Rats,  Rattus rattus  were the most important, as well as native and introduced geckos and white-eye  Zosterops natalis  (Hill & Lill 1998b).','The greatest current threat to the Hawk-Owl is from the introduced Yellow Crazy Ant  Anoplolepis gracilipes . These ants may prey directly on nestlings and, by killing the domiNAt life-form, the Red Crab  Gecaroidea natalis , and by encouraging scale insects which in turn cause tree dieback, may alter the whole ecology of the island (O\'Dowd et al. 1999).After spreading slowly, this pest occupied approximately 15-18% of the island in 1999 (D. Slip pers. comm., in Garnett & Crowley 2000) and affected some 2500 hectares, 25% of the total forest area. Although aerial baiting between 2001 and 2003 was successful in reducing numbers of Crazy Ants dramatically (DEH 2003), there are still about 400 ha of infested forest that will need continued management (D. Slip 2003, pers. comm.).Forest clearance, which is no longer permitted, has destroyed 25% of the species\' habitat (Garnett & Crowley 2000).There is a small risk of avian disease, for which the exotic Java Sparrow  Lonchura oryzivora  and Tree Sparrow  Passer montanus  could act as reservoirs (Hill 1997b).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66671'),('66675','Chlamydogobius squamigenus','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Gobiidae','The Edgbaston Goby is a freshwater fish growing to around 6 cm (Unmack 2003b).','Known only from freshwater springs and pools at Edgbaston Station and freshwater bores and drains on Crossmoor Station (Larson 1995). Ivantsoff  et al . (1991), in describing a new species of blue-eye (Red-finned Blue-eye,  Scaturiginichthys vermeilipinnis ), indicated that the Edgbaston Goby shared its habitat, which consists of small, clear, very shallow, clay bottomed pools, with grass tussocks growing in the water and an unidentified red leafed plant. The exact number of springs and pools that this species inhabits is unknown (Larson 1995).','The diet of this species in the wild is unknown, but other desert gobies are known to be omnivorous (Unmack & Wager in prep.)','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66675'),('66676','Milyeringa veritas','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Eleotridae','The Blind Gudgeon is a small fish growing to 4.5 cm, generally white, but sometimes slightly pink in colour (Allen 1989).','This species is known only from the underground waters which lie beneath the narrow coastal plain of the Cape Range Peninsula in WA (Allen 1982; Humphreys & Blyth 1994) in water temperatures which ranged from 27°C to 30°C in May and Aug. (Mees 1962). This species has been found in waters ranging from fresh to seawater and has been sampled from caves at water depths up to 33 m, from wells and from bores in which the water table was up to 50 m below the ground surface (Humphreys 1999). This species is one of only two vertebrate animals known from Australasia that are restricted to either caves or groundwater (the other is the blind cave eel  Ophisternon candidum ) (Humphreys & Blyth 1994).','This species primarily feeds opportunistically on invertebrates (terrestrial isopod crustaceans, cockroaches and ants) accidentally introduced into the aquatic system, but also feed on  Stygiocaris  shrimps and the aquatic larvae of terrestrial species (caddis larvae). Food items depend in part on their availability. Most of the individuals of this species inhabit areas where there are no surface wells or rockholes to access terrestrial insects as a food source. In these places, the main food items would be aquatic shrimps (Humphreys & Feinberg 1995). The gut contents of specimens collected in 1989 contained detrital matter and the remains of flies (Humphreys & Adams 1991).','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66676'),('66678','Ophisternon candidum','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Synbranchidae','The Blind Cave Eel is a pure white fish growing to 40 cm, with an eel-like body, no eyes, and a thin rayless membrane around the tip of the tail (Allen 1989a). The Blind Cave Eel is the world\'s longest cavefish and one of only two vertebrate animals known from Australia that are restricted to subterranean waters (Humphreys 2001).','The Blind Cave Eel inhabits subterranean caves, fissures (Allen 1982) and wells (Humphreys 1999) and is one of only two vertebrate animals known from Australasia that are restricted to either caves or groundwater - the other is the Blind Gudgeon ( Milyeringa veritas ) (Humphreys & Blyth 1994). The Blind Cave Eel inhabits the surface of, and burrows into, the faecal ooze characteristic of crustacean-rich habitats (Humphreys & Feinberg 1995). The caves have a rich stygofaunal community that contains a number of eco-geographical relicts and phyletic relics with tethyan affinities (Allen 2000 pers. comm.). The waters in the caves are markedly stratified, (Humphreys 1999a; Seymour et al. 2007), ranging from freshwater at the surface to full seawater salinity at depth. While affected by marine tides, the waters lack surface connection to the sea (termed anchialine ecosystems: Humphreys 1999a). The fish traverse this range of salinity levels that occur in these systems (Humphreys et al. 2006).','The Blind Cave Eel feeds opportunistically on minute (less than 2 mm total length)  Stygiocaris  shrimps and the shrimp  Halosbaena tulki  at Tantabiddy Well. Analyses of stomach contents demonstrate that the larvae of terrestrial insects (dragonflies and flies) and juveniles or adults of other arthropods (slaters) also make up the eel\'s diet. All the prey items identified are bottom dwellers or sink to the bottom when they fall into the water (Humphreys & Feinberg 1995).','The main identified threats to the Blind Cave Eel include sedimentation from mining (quarrying of limestone) and construction (roads and urban development at Exmouth); canal development; water abstraction; point source pollution from sewage, landfill and rubbish dumping; and diffuse pollution from urban development (Humphreys 2001). Open sites may serve to permit the invasion by feral fish, especially guppies ( Poecilia  sp.) (Plath et al. 2007). As the major food source of the Blind Cave Eel (i.e. shrimps) is also endemic, threats to the shrimps will threaten the Blind Cave Eel (Humphreys & Feinberg 1995).  A number of access sites on the Cape Range Peninsula have been lost over time from the combined effects of infilling, drying and siltation. A number of other sites are close to planned developments, near urban areas or are in unmanaged military areas (Humphreys 1999; Wager & Jackson 1993). All populations of Blind Cave Eels on the Cape Range Peninsula need protection from any form of habitat degradation to preserve their limited genetic diversity (Humphreys 1999).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66678'),('66680','Rhincodon typus','Vulnerable','Chondrichthyes','Rhincodontidae','The Whale Shark is a large filter-feeding shark characterised by a streamlined body with a flattened, broad head. It has a very large and wide mouth, positioned at the front of the head, with approximately 300 minute teeth in each jaw (Last & Stevens 1994). The first dorsal fin is much larger than the second. These sharks are greyish, bluish or brownish above, with a distinctive checkered pattern of creamy white spots between pale vertical and horizontal stripes (Martins & Knickle 2004).  The Whale Shark has three prominent ridges along its flanks and a spiracle (small round hole) behind each eye (Last & Stevens 1994; Taylor 1994). This species has five large gill-slits, which are modified to function as filtering screens as well as to extract oxygen from the water (Last & Stevens 1994; Taylor 1994).','The Whale Shark is an oceanic and coastal, tropical to warm-temperate pelagic shark. It is often seen far offshore, but also comes close inshore and sometimes enters lagoons of coral atolls. The Whale Shark is generally encountered close to or at the surface, as single individuals or occasionally in schools or aggregations of up to hundreds of sharks (Compagno 1984). Whale Sharks are generally found in areas where the surface temperature is 21–25 °C, preferably with cold water of 17 °C or less upwelling into it, and salinity of 34 to 34.5 parts per thousand (ppt) (Pogonoski et al. 2002). In Ningaloo Marine Park waters (Western Australia), sightings are most common in water temperatures around 27 °C (DEH 2005o). Sharks can reach maximum depths that are close to or greater than depths reported for other large fish that are found in the open sea, such as Blue Sharks ( Prionace glauca ) and Bigeye Thresher Sharks ( Alopias superciliosus ) (Carey & Scharold 1990; Nakano et al. 2003).Research conducted in 2003 on Whale Sharks aggregating at Ningaloo Reef found that this species routinely moved between the sea surface and depth. Sharks spent at least 40% of their time in the upper 15 m of the water column and at least 50% of their time at depths equal to or less than 30 m. In general, daytime depths were greater than those at night (Wilson et al. 2006).Deeper dives were recorded in the open ocean and overall sharks spent about 1% of their time at depths greater than 300 m. The deepest recorded dive was 980 m, which was the measurement limit of tags used in 2004. Most of these deep dives occurred during the day. One shark recorded a constant depth of 980 m in water temperature of 2.2 °C for at least 12 hours (Wilson et al. 2006).Temperature records gathered during research in 2003 (Wilson et al. 2006) indicated that Whale Sharks spent at least 90% of their time in water temperatures of 23–28 °C, but experienced a water temperature range of 4.2–28.7 °C (Wilson et al. 2006).Off the outer North West Shelf, Whale Sharks spend much of their time swimming near the seafloor, and can make dives to around 1000 m. Wilson and colleagues (2006) suggest that Whale Sharks are able to tolerate the colder temperatures associated with the deep ocean due to insulation provided by their body mass.  The dives into deeper water are thought to primarily be for prey, such as krill, lantern fish, squid and jellyfish (DEWHA 2008b).','The Whale Shark is a suction filter feeder (Compagno 1984). It feeds on a variety of planktonic and nektonic prey, including small crustaceans, small schooling fishes such as sardines, anchovies and mackerel and, to a lesser extent, on small tuna and squid (Compagno 1984; Last & Stevens 1994). Whale Sharks at Ningaloo Reef have been observed feeding on swarms of the tropical krill ( Pseudeuphausia latifrons ) (Norman 1999; Taylor 1994). Two Whale Shark faecal samples from Ningaloo Reef contained eyes, legs, and fragments of exoskeleton from crustacean prey, namely  Pseudeuphausia latifrons , suggesting that Whale Sharks aggregate seasonally off Ningaloo Reef to predomiNAtly feed on this tropical krill (Norman 1999, Wilson & Newbound 2001 cited in DEH 2005o). At Christmas Island, the Whale Sharks have been observed feeding on localised concentrations of mysids ( Anisomysis spinata ) and Christmas Island Red Crabs ( Gecarcoidea natalis ) (Norman 1999). In 2008 DNA sampling of a Whale Shark faecal sample revealed the presence of Christmas Island Red Crab larvae (Meekan et al. 2009).Three faecal samples analysed by Norman (1999) revealed exoskeletal remains of zooplankton (specifically calanoid and harpacticoid copepods), crustaceans (specifically larval decapods) and the scales of small fishes.Whale Sharks have been observed feeding passively by swimming forward with mouth agape, and feeding actively by opening their mouths and sucking in prey. Whale Sharks have also been reported hanging vertically in the water while feeding (Colman 1997); often it assumes a vertical position in schools of baitfish and opens its mouth so the baitfish can be sucked in (Compagno 1984). The species feeds at or close to the surface (Compagno 1984).','PredationThere are no known predators of adult Whale Sharks, however, the Blue Shark ( Prionace glauca ), the Blue Marlin ( Makaira nigricons ) and the Killer Whale ( Orcinus orca ) are all predators of juvenile Whale Sharks (Kukuyev 1996 cited in DEH 2005o; O\'Sullivan & Mitchell 2000 cited in Norman 2005; A. Goorah pers. comm. cited in Norman 2005). Although unconfirmed, an attack on a sub-adult Whale Shark photographed in north-western Australia in 2003 is believed to have been inflicted by a Great White Shark ( Carcharodon carcharias ) (R. Mau pers. comm. to B. Norman cited in DEH 2005o).Habitat Modification and DegradationIt is possible that increased levels of noise and pollution resulting from an increase in boat traffic may have a negative impact on the migration patterns normally followed by Whale Sharks, through disturbance to habitat or disturbance to sharks (DEH 2005o).Shipping and BoatingAlthough the Whale Shark\'s skin is thicker and tougher than any other species in the world, the species may be behaviourally vulnerable to boat strike. They spend a significant amount of their time close to the surface of the water (Gunn et al. 1999 in DEH 2005o; Norman 1999) and several sharks bear scars that have probably been caused by boat contact (Norman 2004 cited in DEH 2005o; Stevens 2007 cited in DEWHA 2008b). There have been several reports of Whale Sharks being impaled on the bows of larger ships in other regions (Norman 1999).Commercial FishingIn Taiwan, the Whale Shark is caught commercially by harpoon. Occasionally small individuals are also caught on long-lines or by set nets in coastal waters, except in the shallow seas in the north and north-west of the country. Like most commercially hunted sharks, the Whale Shark population around Taiwan seems to be decreasing. In the 1970s and early 1980s, it was not unusual for fishermen to catch 30–100 Whale Sharks in one season in the Peng Hu area, a group of over 60 islands off the south-west coast of Taiwan. By the late 1980s, some seasons produced less than 10. According to records from An-Ping Harbour (a major landing site for Whale Sharks about 130 km south-east of the Peng-Hu Island), more than 70 individuals were caught in 1992, but only two in 1993 and 14 in 1994. In 1996, Whale Shark meat sold for 400 New Taiwanese Dollars per kg, which is the highest price for the flesh of any commercial shark species. Considering the large quantity of meat obtained from even a small Whale Shark, commercial fishermen will continue targeting it (Joung et al. 1996).In the past, harpoon fisheries have been reported from India, Pakistan, Indonesia and Iraq. A seasonal (April–May) fishery existed in the Philippines, where 90 sharks were taken during the 1996 season (Colman 1997). It is now protected in Philippine waters. The Whale Shark may also be taken in China, and has been captured and utilised in Senegal. It is eaten either fresh or dried and salted, and the oil is used to treat boat hulls in Pakistan (Compagno 1984). Other uses of Whale Shark products are for the manufacture of shoe polish and as a treatment for some skin diseases. The processing of Whale Shark fins and fin rays has been reported in India, at least partly to supply the growing external demand for Whale Shark fins and meat (Hanfee 1998).It is captured in significant numbers by directed (and bycatch) fisheries in South-East Asia, which, if they continue, could lead to significant declines of Whale Shark numbers. Increased protection and bans on fishing would help to alleviate the pressures on its populations. There is some evidence that they may move very long distances (e.g. across the Pacific), so heavy fishing in Asia (and other areas) may directly impact global populations (C. Simpfendorfer 1999, pers. comm. cited in Pogonoski et al. 2002).Recent evidence suggests that in one fishery alone in India as many as 1000 Whale Sharks might have been killed in 1999–2000. However, since mid-2001, the Whale Shark has been protected in Indian waters. Although many countries have protected it, illegal hunting still continues, as there are often inadequate resources to ensure the law is upheld (AMCS 2001).Illegal, unreported and unregulated fishingWhale Sharks may be caught by illegal, unreported and unregulated fishers in the north-west marine region of Australia, however there are no records of this occurring.  In Indonesian waters, Whale Sharks are directly targeted for their fins and meat (White & Cavanagh 2007 cited in DEWHA 2008b).Disturbances of important habitatWhale sharks rely on coral reef habitats around Ningaloo, which attract krill and zooplankton, the sharks\' main prey. Deterioration or destruction of important seasonal coral reef habitat and feeding areas through coral bleaching events, climate change and other anthropogenic distrurbances (for exapmle oil spills), may pose a threat to Whale Sharks (Stewart & Wilson 2005 cited in DEWHA 2008b)During the late 1980s, there was a decline in Whale Shark numbers on Ningaloo Reef which was thought to be associated with the destruction of corals by the coral-eating sea snail,  Drupella cornus  (Taylor 1996). These sea snails mainly targeted the fast growing  Acropora  coral species, which thrive in shallow water and make a major contribution to coral spawning. The reduction in coral spawning is thought to have resulted in less food for krill and zooplankton that Whale Sharks feed on. This resulted in fewer Whale Sharks migrating to Ningaloo to feed (Taylor 1996).TourismWhale Sharks at Ningaloo Reef have generated a significant number of tourism industries including boat and flight tours as well as snorkel and dive tours. These activities have the potential to negatively affect Whale Shark behaviour, habitat and ecology (DEWHA 2008b). Repeated interactions, such as touching by divers and snorkellers, may result in Whale Sharks avoiding some waters, which may include critical habitat (Martin 2007 cited in DEWHA 2008b). Whale Shark tourism around Ningaloo Reef is well managed and hence is not thought to have a significant impact (Davis et al. 1997 cited in DEWHA 2008b).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66680'),('66693','Mogurnda clivicola','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Eleotridae','The Flinders Ranges Mogurnda is a robust freshwater fish growing to a maximum length of 13–15 cm (Brandle 2001; Hammer et al. 2009cu; Unmack 2000), though most individuals only grow to 5–8 cm in length (Hammer et al. 2009cu). The tail fin is rounded, and the species has two separate dorsal (back) fins, a brown to dark blue back surface, and blue and rust-coloured spotting on the sides of the body (Brandle 2001; Hammer et al. 2009cu).','In the Flinders Ranges, the Flinders Ranges Mogurnda utilises bottom and mid-water levels (Ehmann 2009) of small isolated freshwater waterholes in rocky creeks, and spring-fed pools in streams flowing through steep-sided valleys (Allen & Jenkins 1999; Wager & Jackson 1993). Sites have high levels of edging and submerged cover in the form of rocks, snags, leaf litter and bark from surrounding trees (Hammer et al. 2009cu). It is the only fish found in these sites (Unmack 2000).  The Flinders Ranges Mogurnda is reliant on the springs of Weetootla and Nepouie for permanent habitat and utilises other ephemeral (not lasting) areas when rainfall increases surface water flows (Hammer et al. 2009cu; McNeil et al. 2011). Vegetation characteristics of these sites are summarised in the following table (McNeill et al. 2011).SiteAquatic vegetationSurrounding vegetationWeed speciesCommentsWeetootla SpringSpiny Flat-Sedge ( Cyperus gymnocaulos ); other  Cyperus  spp.; Billabong Rush ( Juncus usitatus ), Water Cress ( Rorippa nasturtium-aquacticum ); Narrow-leaved;Cumbungi ( Typha domingensis ).River Red Gum ( Eucalyptus camaldulensis ); Native Orange ( Capparis mitchelli ); Desert Tea-tree ( Melaleuca glomerata ); Elegant Wattle ( Acacia victoriae );  Dodonaea lobulata ; Shrubby Rice-flower ( Pimelea microcephala );  Eremophila  spp.; Desert Chinese Lantern ( Abutilon leucopetalum ); Black Crumbweed ( Chenopodium melanocarpum ); Australian Bindweed ( Convolvulus remotus ); Native Thornapple ( Datura leichhardtii ); Ruby Saltbush ( Enchylaena tormentosa var. tormentosa ); Cockspur Flower ( Plectranthus parviflorus ); Silver Mulla Mulla ( Ptilotus obovatus var. obovatus ); Rock Sida ( Sida petrophila ); Cattlebush ( Trichodesma zeylanicum );  Zygophyllum  spp.Rosy Dock ( Acetosa vesicaria );  Spiked Malvastrum ( Malvastrum americanum ); Black-berry Nightshade ( Solanum nigrum ); Common Sowthistle ( Sonchus oleraceus ).Permanent; no invasive species noted; only five non-significant weed species present; low grazing by kangaroos ( Macropod  spp.); shallow pools, deep pools, riffles and marshes present.Nepouie SpringNarrow-leaved Cumbungi; Spiny Flat-Sedge.River Red Gum; Native Orange; Desert Tea-tree; Rock Sida;  Senna  spp.; Desert Lantern ( Abutilon otocarpum ); Tarvine ( Boerhavia dominii ); Lemon Grass ( Cymbopogon ambiguous ); Native Thornapple; Ruby Saltbush;  Nicotiana velutina ; Silver Mulla Mulla; Tomato Bush ( Solanum quadriloculatum ); Native Spinach ( Tetragonia tetragonoides );  Solanum  spp.Fat-hen ( Chenopodium album ); Spiked Malvastrum.Permanent; no invasive species noted; only two non-significant weeds species; shallow pools, deep pools, riffles and marshes present; low grazing pressure.The possible Barcoo River population inhabits a mud-bottomed, lowland creek where it co-exists with approximately ten other fish species (Unmack 2000). The distribution of this species overlaps with the  Community of native species dependent on  natural discharge of groundwater from the Great Artesian Basin , which is listed as Endangered ecological community under the EPBC Act (Fensham et al. 2010a).','The species is most likely an ambush predator, feeding on aquatic insects and microcrustaceans (Unmack 2000). Whilst the specific diet of the Flinders Ranges Mogurnda is not known, they have been observed consuming Caddisfly (Order Trichoptera) larvae and to take tadpoles added to pools (McNeil et al. 2011). Other members of the genus are opportunistic, consuming worms, tadpoles, shrimp and small fish (including their own species) as well as the introduced species Gambusia ( Gambusia holbrooki ). They are also known to consume algae, pollen and miscellaneous forms of organic matter (Tappin 2011).','The main identified threats to the Flinders Ranges Gudgeon include:Competition with introduced species, such as Gambusia (Hammer et al. 2009cu; McNeill et al. 2011; Unmack 2000).Changes in water quality and/or flow by introduced herbivores, particularly feral Goats ( Capra hircus ) (Hammer et al. 2009cu; McNeill et al. 2011; Unmack 2000).Water extractions - given the small size of the habitat and its reliance on spring flows, any major water extractions in the region (e.g. for mineral exploitation) pose a serious potential threat to the species (Hammer et al. 2009cu).Climate change may result in a reduction in the amount of rain received and an increase in the frequency of large storm disturbances (e.g. floods) which may impact on water availability and the flow of springs (Hammer et al. 2009cu). Whilst arid zone fish species such as the Flinders Ranges Mogurnda are adapted to variable and unpredictable water flows, Morrongiello and colleagues (2011) suggest the rate of climate change impacts may seriously threaten many fish species; especially those with limited ranges, specific habitats or those already close to their physiological tolerance limits.Loss and degradation of habitat through mining. A proposal to mine within the Balcanoona Gorge could have had devastating impacts on the species\' habitat and water supply (Hammer et al. 2009cu; McNeil et al 2011).The commercial collection of the species by aquarists (Unmack 2000). Illegal collecting of the species has been reported, and such removal could inhibit recovery or survival, especially when the population is critically restricted during dry times (Hammer et al. 2009cu).A cancerous disease of unknown cause. Discolouration and melanoma-type skin cancer growths were observed in approximately 20% of fish seen during surveys undertaken by McNeill and colleagues (2011), who suggested it may be attributable to reduced genetic resistance of the small, long-isolated species and/or the environmental impact of increased groundwater contamination from sources such as uranium. Increased ultraviolet radiation is also suggested to cause increased mortality in the species (Hammer et al. 2009cu). Further research, monitoring and associated remedial actions are encouraged to halt the disease (McNeill et al. 2011).The main potential threat to populations of Flinders Ranges Mogurnda is its small, fragmented distribution; especially the Barcoo River population (Unmack 2000). This leaves the species highly vulnerable to stochastic events, such as changes in hydrology and weather patterns.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66693'),('66698','Nannatherina balstoni','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Nannopercidae','Balston\'s Pygmy Perch is a small freshwater fish that grows to a maximum length of around 90 mm (commonly 60 mm). The total length of this species at one year of age (when sexually mature) averages 60 mm for males and 63 mm for females (Morgan et al. 1995). This species is brownish dorsally and silver below, usually with a prominent brown mid-lateral stripe and a series of vertical brown bars on sides giving a cross-hatched pattern (Allen et al. 2002).','Balston\'s Pygmy Perch inhabits acidic, tannin-stained freshwater pools, streams and lakes in peat flats within 30 km of the coast of south-west Western Australia, preferring shallow water, and commonly associated with tall sedge thickets and inundated riparian vegetation (Allen et al. 2002; Morgan et al. 1998).Balston\'s Pygmy Perch is typically found in freshwater with a pH range of 3.0–6.5 and seasonally fluctuating temperatures of 11–30 °C. It is typically found amongst inundated riparian vegetation where it is thought to feed and spawn, though adults are also found in open water. Larvae tend to be confined to shallow water < 10 cm deep amongst the flooded riparian vegetation, and as the larvae increase in size they gradually move to deeper waters (Morgan et al. 1995).The very dry summers characteristic of south-west Western Australia result in many of the pools in which Balston\'s Pygmy Perch occur becoming very low, or even dry, in the later summer and autumn (Berra & Allen 1989). The species does not appear to have any adaptations to withstand desiccation, relying on their ability to recolonise these areas when water flow resumes (Morgan et al. 1995).This species is not currently associated with a threatened ecological community, however, Western Trout Minnow ( Galaxias truttaceus hesperius ), listed as critically endangered under the EPBC Act, occurs in a similar area.','The diet of adult Balston\'s Pygmy Perch (> 25 mm) consists primarily of terrestrial insects (predomiNAtly arachnids, adults of hymenopterans, coleopterans and dipterans) in all seasons (Morgan et al. 1995). Zooplankton (predomiNAtly  Cladocera , but also  Copepoda ,  Ostracoda  and  Diptera  larvae) have been identified as the food source of Balston\'s Pygmy Perch in the larval stage (< 15 mm), while small juveniles (15–25 mm) consumed  Cladocera , but also a wider range of aquatic organisms and some terrestrial fauna, including  Cladocera ,  Ostracoda ,  Diptera  larvae in winter and calanoid  Copepoda  in spring. The species is thought to feed amongst inundated riparian vegetation, and larvae are typically found feeding in very shallow water (< 10 cm), gradually moving into deeper water as they increase in size (Morgan et al. 1998).','Balston\'s Pygmy Perch is now confined to smaller streams within the major river systems of south-west Western Australia (Allen et al. 1994). This range contraction is suspected to be due to the extensive loss of suitable habitat as a result of urban and rural development (Morgan et al. 2002). Changed hydrology conditions (salinity), alteration of drainage systems and the introduction of introduced fish species has also impacted on the distribution and range of this species.SalinitySalinisation is is a primary cause of Balston\'s Pygmy Perch habitat contraction. For example, much of the main channel of Moore River is salt-affected as a result of large scale land clearing in the area. During surveys of 151 sites within the highly salt-affected Blackwood River catchment, Balston\'s Pygmy Perch was recorded at a single location characterised by low salinity levels (Morgan et al. 1998; Morgan et al. 2003). Many of the larger rivers of south-west Australia that encompassed the former range of Balston\'s Pygmy Perch have become salinised and the species is now restricted to small tributaries, headwater streams and lakes that remain fresh and are largely undisturbed. The species has only ever been recorded in fresh water (generally < 2 ppt), suggesting that its salinity tolerance is low.The Margaret River represents one of the few river systems in south-west Australia that has not become salinised due to widescale land clearing (Morgan et al. 2002) and has retained much of the natural riparian and fringing vegetation (Morgan & Beatty 2003). Salinity levels in March 2003 were very low, ranging from 0.2–0.5 ppt (Morgan & Beatty 2003). Balston\'s Pygmy Perch were captured at only two of the eight sites above Canebreak Pool in the upper reaches of the river.Habitat degradationHabitat degradation is likely to have occurred through the construction of water points for fire fighting, road mainteNAce, mineral sand exploration and mining, groundwater extraction, and agricultural and forestry practices in the upper areas of catchments, leading to changes to river inflow, salinisation, siltation and eutrophication (Morgan et al. 1996). The \'fresh\' tributaries of the Moore River are degraded as a result of the incursion into the streams by livestock (rendering many of them eutrophic and silted) and increased temperatures exacerbated by the subsequent loss of riparian vegetation.Altered Drainage SystemsThe majority of the Swan Coastal Plain, between Moore River and Margaret River, is now a network of drains that were constructed to mitigate flooding and allow for uninterrupted agriculture (Morgan & Beatty 2004). Associated agriculture and encroachment of the Perth Metropolitan Area has lead to the contraction of suitable habitat as waters are over drawn or eutrophication occurs in associated rivers.Introduced SpeciesThe introduced Mosquitofish ( Gambusia holbrooki ) is widespread in Western Australia and is a known aggressor of south-west Australia\'s small endemic fishes, often nipping the entire caudal (tail) fin of its prey (Gill et al. 1999; Morgan et al. 1995; Morgan & Beatty 2003). This species represented over 50% of captures in the Blackwood River and has contributed to 93% of the total fish captures in Margaret River (Morgan & Beatty 2003). Mosquitofish have been shown to cause death in Balston\'s Pygmy Perch closest Western Australia relative, the Western Pygmy Perch ( Edelia vittata ) (Gill et al. 1999). Balston\'s Pygmy Perch is a surface feeder, is small in size, has a short life-cycle and occupies a similar niche to Mosquitofish, making this species vulnerable to competition, attack and ultimately population decline (Morgan et al. 1995, Gill et al. 1999). Other feral species throughout much of the range of Balston\'s Pygmy Perch include the piscivorous Redfin Perch ( Perca fluviatilis ), Rainbow Trout ( Oncorhynchus mykiss ) and Brown Trout ( Salmo trutta ) (Morgan et al. 1996).Balston\'s Pygmy Perch has only been captured on two occasions with feral fishes. Mosquitofish was introduced into one of the uppermost upstream pools of the Margaret River in 2003, which had previously been regarded as free from introduced fishes (Morgan et al. 1998; Morgan & Beatty 2003). The infestation of approximately 35 individuals (thought to be the product of a single pregNAt female) was eradicated (Morgan & Beatty 2003).The Department of Fisheries have proposed to introduce three other native fish from the Murray-Darling Basin  into river systems within Western Australia for the purposes of recreational stocking, domestic stocking, and commercial and non-commercial aquaculture (Department of Fisheries 2003). The species that are proposed for introduction include Golden Perch ( Macquaria ambigua ), Murray Cod ( Maccullochella peelii ) and Australian Bass ( Macquaria novemaculeata ). All three species are top-order predators, utilising a diversity of prey species, which includes fish, birds, mammals, amphibians, aquatic and terrestrial insects and crustaceans (Department of Fisheries 2003). Their impact upon native fish species, such as Balston\'s Pygmy Perch, is unknown.The vulnerability of Balston\'s Pygmy Perch to population decline is compounded by their short life-cycle (one-year), low fecundities, single breeding event, low population sizes (predict < 1000 mature individuals per river system), predation from feral species (evidenced by lack of co-occurrence) and an inability to tolerate marginally saline or eutrophic waters (characteristic of the larger rivers and wetlands of south-west Australia, including those on the Swan Coastal Plain) (Morgan 2005d).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66698'),('66699','Liasis olivaceus barroni','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Boidae','The Olive Python (Pilbara subspecies) is a dull olive-brown to pale fawn or rich brown python with a white/cream belly, pale lips finely dotted with pale grey or brown, pitted anterial scales bordering the lips and smooth scales in 55–80 rows at mid-body. The Pilbara Olive Python can grow to 4 m, but has an average size of 2.5 m (Cogger 2000). Females are slightly longer than males (Shine & Slip 1990).','The Olive Python (Pilbara subspecies) prefers escarpments, gorges and water holes in the ranges of the Pilbara region (Pearson 1993; Wilson & Swan 2003). The python recorded at the site of the proposed Pardoo iron ore shipping facility was on a vehicle track adjacent to outcropping rock and nearby gullies (Enesar Consulting 2007). Radio-telemetry has shown that individuals are usually in close proximity to water and rock outcrops that attract suitable sized prey species (Pearson 2003). The Burrup Penninsula population was found to prefer granophyre rock-piles, though occasionally were found in neighbouring spinifex grasslands. These individuals, especially males, travelled large distances, suggesting the species has a large home range (Tutt et al 2002).Microhabitat preferences of the Olive Python (Pilbara subspecies) are under rock piles, on top of rocks or under spinifex (Tutt et al. 2004). Individuals at Pannawonica sheltered in overburden heaps and railway embankments of an iron ore mine, and utilised caves. Individuals at Tom Price utilise man-made water sources, such as sewerage treatment ponds and recreational lakes (Pearson 2003).','The Olive Python (Pilbara subspecies) is adept at swimming, utilising water holes to hunt. Prey is captured by ambush on animal trails or by striking from a submerged position in water holes. The species will also wait in ambush along tracks.The diet includes rock wallabies, euros, fruit bats, ducks, corellas, spinifex pigeons and coucals (Pearson 2003). Reptiles and frogs are also probably taken by smaller Olive Pythons (Pilbara subspecies) (Pearson 2003).In a study of 13 species of Australian pythons, the Olive Python ( Liasis olivaceus ) was found to have preyed upon dragons, skinks, a snake species, birds and mammals. The subspecies  L. olivaceus barroni  was not directly identified in the study of specimens (Shine & Slip 1990).','Threats to the habitat include major fire events, foxes and further development of mining infrastructure.In areas such as the Burrup Peninsula, mining developments may directly affect the habitat of the Olive Python (Pilbara subspecies), alter prey availability to the species and increase deaths through road impacts (Pearson 2003).With a limited range, and restricted habitat, the subspecies may be vulnerable to disturbance through increasing numbers of tourists using the water holes (Pearson 1993). Some individuals have been deliberately killed on roads, near houses and water holes when mistaken for venomous snakes (Pearson 1993).Predation of juveniles by foxes and cats is suspected to be a problem for populations in the coastal Pilbara region. Foxes and cats also prey on the food sources of the Olive Python (Pilbara subspecies) (Pearson 2003).Additional water bodies such as dams and sewage ponds, associated with mining or development, appear to benefit the subspecies (Pearson 2003).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66699'),('66726','Thinornis rubricollis rubricollis','Vulnerable','Aves','Charadriidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66726'),('66727','Tympanocryptis pinguicolla','Endangered','Reptilia','Agamidae','The grassland earless dragon is a small (5-7 g, ~5 cm SVL), pale grey to reddish-brown agamid lizard which lacks an external ear opening and functional ear drum. See the  national recovery plan  for a more detailed description.','The grassland earless dragon is a native grassland specialist inhabiting natural temperate grasslands. This habitat is best described in the endangered ecological community description for  natural temperate grasslands of the Southern Tablelands  (Department of the Environment 2015).  Burrows of the wolf spider ( Lycosa  spp.) and wood cricket ( Cooraboorama canberrae ), embedded surface rocks and tussocks are habitat components critical to this species survival (Langston 1996; McGrath et al. 2015; Osborne et al. 1993a; Stevens et al. 2010). Natural temperate grassland with actual or potential connectivity value is also habitat critical to this species survival (Carlson et al. 2015; Hoehn et al. 2013).','NA','Detailed information on the threats to the species is in the  national recovery plan . Key threats to the species are:habitat degradation, fragmentation and loss caused by agricultural development (cultivation through ploughing or cropping) and urban developmentinappropriate livestock grazing (particularly during drought)rock removal / collectionweed invasion.Other threats include:overgrazing by kangarooscomplete destocking of previously grazed grasslandcreation of harborage sites or structures increasing predation pressure from brown snakes, feral cats, magpies or birds of preyinappropriate fire regimesuse of herbicides and pesticidessoil erosion.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66727'),('66728','Phocoena dioptrica','','Mammalia','Phocoenidae','The Spectacled Porpoise has a typical porpoise-like body shape, but with a large rounded dorsal fin. A two-tone colouration divides the dark blue-black dorsal (bottom) half from the white ventral (top) surface at eye level and along the flank midline, with the white colour extending upwards at the tail stock. The flippers are white, as is the underside of the tail flukes. The upper surface of the flukes and the dorsal fin are black. The lips are black, and there is a dark gape-to-flipper stripe. A line of tubercles, as in other Phocoenidae, are present on the leading (front) edge of the dorsal fin (Evans et al. 2001).','This species appears to prefer subantarctic and Antarctic waters (between 1–8 °C), and continental seas in the cold temperate region influenced by cold currents, such as the Falkland Current off Argentina. Very little biological or habitat information is known for this species. Although the Spectacled Porpoise is believed to be an oceanic species, it has also been recorded in estuarine waters (Culik 2000c; Shirihai 2002). In Australia, Spectacled Porpoise strandings have occurred following below average sea levels associated with an intensifying of the Southern Ocean gyre, bringing a cold current to Tasmania and south-eastern South Australia (Evans et al. 2001).','The extremely small sample size indicates Spectacled Porpoise eat fish and cephalopods including squid and cuttlefish ( Sepia  species: Evans et al. 2001). The sole record of prey remains are of anchovy ( Engraulis  sp.) and small crustaceans (possibly stomatopods) found in the stomach of a six year old male stranded in Chubut, Argentina (Brownell & Clapham 1999, cited in Culik 2000c).','In the past, the Spectacled Porpoise was threatened by incidental capture in tanglenets set for crabs and fishes in Tierra del Fuego. However, these nets are no longer used (Bannister et al. 1996). Current threats to the species include entanglement in driftnets set outside Australian Territorial Waters and in lost or discarded netting, and incidental capture in gillnets set by artisanal (traditional) fishermen on Argentine coast. The extent of capture in artisanal fisheries is unknown, although the fishery has been expanding since 1988 (Bannister et al. 1996). In addition, there has been some exploitation (direct catch) off southern South America (Chile and Argentina), but the effects of this industry are unknown (Jefferson et al. 1993).Potential threats to the Spectacled Porpoise include incidental captures in the expanding fisheries of the Southern Ocean, especially in areas adjacent to subantarctic islands; disturbance and pollution resulting from coastal and offshore oil and mineral exploration (particularly relevant to Argentina); and pollution of preferred habitats, leading to accumulation of toxic substances in body tissues (Klinowska 1991).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66728'),('66734','Hesperocolletes douglasi','Critically Endangered','Insecta','Colletidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66734'),('66752','Dryococelus australis','Critically Endangered','Insecta','Phasmatidae','The Lord Howe Island Phasmid is a large, heavy-bodied and flightless stick-insect. Females have a body length to 12 cm and males to 10.6 cm. Males have longer and thicker antennae, greatly enlarged and spined hind legs and a narrower abdomen which lacks the ovipositor of the female (Gurney 1947; Lea 1916). Adults are a dark, golden-brown colour with a conspicuous cream stripe along the abdomen (Priddel et al. 2003), and have largely nocturnal habits (Pain 2006).  Juvenile animals are bright green (DECC 2005) and active by day (Pain 2006).  Eggs are beige in colour with a raised, reticulate pattern (Priddel et al. 2003).','On Lord Howe Island, the phasmid formerly inhabited forested areas in the trunk hollows of living trees, particularly those made by larvae of the Large Longicorn Beetle ( Agrianome spinicollis ). Particular hollows appeared to be occupied for many years (Lea 1916).On Balls Pyramid there are no trees present, and therefore no tree hollows for the phasmid to occupy. All phasmids have been found on  Melaleuca howeana , the only shrub species present on Balls Pyramid. The single terrace occupied by the phasmid is kept moist by water seeping through a seam in the rock face. The moisture has promoted the establishment and growth of several plant species including a grass ( Sporobolus virginicus ), a sedge ( Cyperus lucidus ) and two herbs ( Achyranthes aspera  and  Tetragonia tetragonioides ), as well as  M. howeana . The insects appear to be sheltering in cavities formed in accumulated debris from these plants. The total area occupied by the shrubs on which the phasmids were found measures about 30 m x 6 m (Priddel et al. 2003).The combination of a large shrub, damp conditions and lush plant growth is extremely unusual on Balls Pyramid, where bare rock or dry soil generally predominates, and examination of air photos has not revealed any other likely patches of habitat (Priddel et al. 2003).','Individuals located on Balls Pyramid have been observed grazing on the new leaf tips of  M. howeana . It is not known what plant species they formerly grazed on Lord Howe Island (Priddel et al. 2003). In adults (Pain 2006), feeding appears to occur at night (Lea 1916; Priddel et al. 2003).','The population is very small and restricted to a tiny patch of apparently suboptimal habitat, and therefore has a high risk of extinction through random, unpredictable events.The habitat occupied by the Lord Howe Island Phasmid is extremely fragile and unstable, and any disturbance (including  in situ  scientific research) could be catastrophic for the species (Priddel et al. 2003).Morning Glory ( Ipomoea cairica ), an invasive vine, poses a threat to  M. howeana , the only known food plant of the phasmid on Balls Pyramid. All Morning Glory plants in the immediate vicinity of the phasmid population were recently carefully removed (Priddel et al. 2003).Balls Pyramid is currently rat-free and the potential introduction of rats to the island is a threat to the phasmid (DECC 2007).Other threats to the Lord Howe Island Phasmid include the potential introduction of non-native invertebrates, such as the Red Imported Fire Ant ( Solenopsis invicta ) and the Yellow Crazy Ant ( Anoplolepsis graciliopes ), and the potential loss of habitat due to climate change (DECC 2007).  The phasmid is also a potential target for illegal poaching by insect collectors (Priddel et al. 2003).Nesting seabirds on Balls Pyramid have been known to incorporate Lord Howe Island Phasmids into their nests (Smithers 1970).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66752'),('66754','Hoplogonus bornemisszai','Critically Endangered','Insecta','Lucanidae','Bornemissza\'s Stag Beetle is a large, flightless stag beetle. Males have an average body length of 24 mm and females 18 mm. This species is a sheen black colour. Bornemissza\'s Stag Beetle is ground-dwelling to a depth of 22–35 cm. The body is divided into three segments with large elongated, clasping mandibles (jaws) protruding from the head. These jaws are significantly smaller in females.  (FPA TAS 2002a; TSSC 2008afe)','Bornemissza\'s Stag Beetle occurs in mature wet or damp eucalypt and mixed forest in north-eastern Tasmania. The species can occur in dry eucalypt forest within close proximity to areas of wet or damp forest or drainage lines (Munks et al. 2004). However, a number of records indicate that the species also occurs in dry eucalypt forest, within close proximity either to areas of wet/damp forest or moist drainage lines. Bryant and Jackson (1999b) and Meggs and colleagues (2003) suggest that the species\' habitat may be specialised (wet, damp, flat and cool forested sites subject to low disturbance).Of the potential habitat for this species, 79% is in unreserved land (64% state forest and 15% private land) and of this approximately 54% has been identified for potential wood production to meet sustainable yield targets. Some 20% of the species\' potential habitat is currently reserved or bound by a coveNAt that precludes forestry activity (Munks et al. 2004).','Larvae feed on well-decayed woody organic material as found in complex old forest. Lucanid larvae are thought to derive much of their nutrition from organic matter that has been modified by fungi (Lawrence 1989). Larvae are either subterranean or live and feed at the interface between decaying logs and the embedding soil. If exposed to the sun by mechanical disturbance they readily desiccate since luncanid larvae cannot close their spiracles against water loss (Lawrence 1989).','The primary threat to Bornemissza\'s Stag Beetle is any activity that opens the forest canopy, or disturbs the soil and litter layer, leading to exposure to sunlight and dehydration (such as forest practices, land clearing, fire or the impacts of climate change). Clearing of habitat is likely to lead to the species becoming more accessible to predators such as the omnivorous Black Currawong ( Strepera Fuliginosa ), which can learn to follow forestry operations (P. McQuillan 2005, pers. comm.).Establishment of plantations, or clearing for agriculture, within the range of Bornemissza\'s Stag Beetle is likely to permanently remove the species\' habitat (Munks et al. 2004). Some parts of the species\' range have been converted to plantation/agricultural land, and areas of forest supporting the species are suitable for conversion to both plantation and pasture/crop usage indicating that this threat is both historical and current. Munks and colleagues (2004) indicate that 79% of the potential habitat of Bornemissza\'s Stag Beetle is in unreserved private land and state forest, and that more than half of the unreserved land has been identified for potential wood production to meet sustainable yield targets.Forestry practices pose the greatest threat to Bornemissza\'s Stag Beetle given that much of its habitat in state forestry areas has been identified as having potential for wood production (Munks et al. 2004). These practices include selected logging, clearfell, burn and sow operations.High intensity burns as part of forestry operations or wildfire are possible serious threats that have potential to destroy habitat. Firewood collection occurs on all tenures and may remove moist woody habitat (TSSC 2008afe).Munks and colleagues (2004) indicate that evidence of Bornemissza\'s Stag Beetle has been found in forest that is regenerating 14 years after forestry practices. These may have survived the clearfell, burn and sow operations due to moist refuges or they may have recolonised the site. However, Munks and colleagues (2004) recommend caution due to the small area sampled, and that there be a review of the effects of forest practices following the long-term study on the related Simpson\'s Stag Beetle .','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66754'),('66756','Leioproctus douglasiellus','Critically Endangered','Insecta','Colletidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66756'),('66760','Lissotes latidens','Endangered','Insecta','Lucanidae','This medium-sized stag beetle is flightless and dull black in colour, 13–18 mm in length. Males have prominent jaws shaped like bull\'s horns (FPA 2002).','The Broad-toothed Stag Beetle occupies wet eucalypt forest dominated by  Eucalyptus obliqua, E. regNAs  and  E. globulus , which may occur either as extensive stands of wet forest or as patches in dry eucalypt forest (Bryant & Jackson 1999b; FPA 2002; TSSC 2002p). This beetle has a preference for forest with a well-developed overstorey and understorey and greater than 10% ground cover of fallen dead wood (Meggs 1999). Both adults and larvae live in the soil, with decaying logs providing shelter from desiccation, predation and habitat disturbance (Bryant & Jackson 1999b; FPA 2002). The larva is found in shallow depressions in the soil underneath decaying logs (Clarke & Spier-Ashcroft 2003; Meggs 1999). Within its range, it does not inhabit dry eucalypt forest or agricultural land (Clarke & Spier-Ashcroft 2003).','The larva of the Broad-toothed Stag Beetle feed on rotting logs on the ground (DPIW 2007a).','The biggest threat facing the Broad-toothed Stag Beetle is habitat loss, predomiNAtly through clearing and forestry practices (DPIW 2007a; TSSC 2002p). Nearly 90% of this species\' potential habitat occurs on private land or in State Forest and appears to be severely fragmented. Proposals in 2003 indicated that 370 ha (9%) of the wet forest within the range of the Broad-toothed Stag Beetle would be converted to eucalypt plantation before 2006 (Clarke & Spier-Ashcroft 2003). After clearfelling, it has been estimated that between 40–50 and 80 years is needed before large-diameter logs become available as habitat for log-dependent invertebrates such as the Broad-toothed Stag Beetle (Bryant & Jackson 1999b; DPIW 2007a; Meggs 1999). Decline is possible in the area of occupancy and extent of occurrence due to the vulnerability of the species to these threats (TSSC 2002p).Ongoing threats include extensive conversion of native forest to plantation forest; frequent or hot burns leading to loss of ground litter layer and decaying logs; and targeted removal of decaying logs, including firewood collection or heaping for burning (DPIW 2007a; TSSC 2002p).Illegial insect collection is another threat to this species (TSSC 2002p), as the beetle is much sought after. Damage to logs as a result of collecting has contributed to a reduction in the species\' food supply, as the logs dried out too rapidly (DPIW 2007a).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66760'),('66762','Marginaster littoralis','Critically Endangered','Asteroidea','Poraniidae','The Derwent River Seastar is a small seastar up to 17 mm across. The species usually has five arms and is a rounded pentagonal shape. It is bluish-greenish-brown on the upper (dorsal) surface, bordered by off-white around the outer edge. The under parts are off-white while the epidermis of the upper surface exhibits brown pigmentation around the base of the spinelets (Bryant & Jackson 1999b; Dartnall 1970; Materia 1994).','The Derwent River Seastar lives in rocky, shallow waters in the Derwent River (Bryant & Jackson 1999b; Dartnall 1970) in the mid-littoral zone in waters between 0–1.5 m depth (Materia 1994). The distribution of this species is not known to overlap with any listed threatened ecological communities or species (M. Wapstra 2007, pers. comm.; TSSC 2009at).','The species is thought to be a particulate feeder/algae grazer because of the morphology and anatomy of the digestive system (the stomach is extensible and surface mucus is abundant) and the fact that only detritus and algal fragments have been identified in the stomachs of observed specimens (Dartnall 1970).','Interspecific competition from introduced seastarsThe main threat to the Derwent River Seastar is interspecific competition and displacement from introduced seastars such as the New Zealand Seastar ( Patiriella regularis ) and the Northern Pacific Seastar ( Asterias amurensis ) (M. Wapstra 2007, pers. comm.).A potential threat from these introduced seastars is genetic swamping (hybridisation). Materia (1994a) suggested that the Derwent River Seastar may have been genetically swamped by the introduced New Zealand seastar. Dartnall (1969a) suggested that the New Zealand Seastar was introduced to Tasmanian waters as a result of the oyster trade between Bluff (South Island, NZ) and Hobart (Tasmania) in the early 1900s.As recently as the 1930s, live oysters were shucked as ships approached the port of Hobart, and waste was thrown into the Derwent River estuary. A number of invertebrate species previously restricted to New Zealand were first recorded in south-east Tasmania around this time, including two seastars, two crabs, five molluscs and a brachiopod species (Dartnall 1969a). Many of these introduced species are now abundant in southern Tasmania, and some have spread to further afield: the New Zealand Seastar for instance, was not recorded in south-east Tasmania in a 1929 survey, but is now the most abundant asteroid in the south-east of the state. The rapid invasion of the species is consistent with its extended planktotrophic phase. A 2003 record from eastern Tasmania indicates that the species has continued to spread (Waters & Roy, 2004).A microscopic examination that compared hybridised specimens with the TMAG specimens of the Derwent River Seastar and the New Zealand Seastar, concluded that there was very little morphological difference between the original two species. No specimens that could be conclusively identified as the Derwent River Seastar were found in a 1993 study, which may indicate the species had been subsumed by hybrids at that time, or that it had been excluded from its former range by morphological varieties of the New Zealand Seastar (Materia 1994a).Habitat modification and destructionAn additional threat is habitat modification and destruction. The recorded range of the Derwent River Seastar is in close proximity to Hobart and consequently the species is impacted by habitat degradation and modification through anthropogenic causes such as urban encroachment and run-off of pollutants. Fluctuations in the amounts of organic run-off leading to eutrophication of the aquatic environment, oil pollution, and domestic and industrial pollution such as plastics, glass and tin have been observed within the species\' range (Materia, 1994) and are suspected to impact the species adversely (TSSC 2009as).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66762'),('66766','Paralucia pyrodiscus lucida','Endangered','Insecta','Lycaenidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66766'),('66769','Placostylus bivaricosus','Endangered','Gastropoda','Bulimulidae','The Lord Howe Flax Snail is a large land snail. It has a pointed, conical shell up to 8 cm long, is medium to dark brown in colour (weathering to white in older specimens) and has a thickened lip in mature adults. The soft body parts are black (New South Wales National Parks and Wildlife Service 2006).','Brazier (1889) noted that the Lord Howe Flax Snail was abundant under cover in shady, damp situations and on scrubby calcarenite (chalky) hillsides, was sparingly represented at higher altitudes and appeared to avoid open areas. Ponder & Chapman (1999) found the species sheltering under leaf litter in forest often, but not exclusively, in the vicinity of Banyan trees ( Ficus columnaris ) and mostly on calcarenite-derived soils and sandy soils. The vegetation at all sites where recent observations have been made is either Kentia Palm ( Howea fosteriana ) closed-forest or Greybark ( Drypetes australasica ) - Blackbutt ( Cryptocarya triplinervis ) closed-forest or a combination of the two (Curtis 1998; Pickard 1983; Ponder & Chapman 1999).','The Lord Howe Flax Snail is believed to feed on the fallen dead leaves of broadleaf trees (Ponder & Chapman 1999).','The main threats to the Lord Howe Flax Snail are the clearing and modification of habitat for development and predation and habitat disturbance by exotic animals (predomiNAtly the Black Rat ( Rattus   rattus ) possibly the Common Blackbird ( Turdus merula ) and the Song Thrush ( Turdus   philomelos ). Other potential threats include herbicide and pesticide use (including the use of snail baits for introduced European snails and slugs), invasion of habitat by exotic weeds, and trampling and habitat disturbance by domestic stock and poultry (NSW National Parks & Wildlife Service 2001a). Habitat clearing Historic habitat clearing would have had a substantial impact on the Lord Howe Flax Snail during establishment of the Settlement area, rural grazing areas and palm plantations (Ponder & Chapman 1999). An assessment of potential habitat for the species indicated that nearly 50% of high quality, potential habitat for the species has been cleared since settlement of the island. The clearing of native forest on Lord Howe Island is now controlled and has largely ceased (Lord Howe Island Board 1986), although it may still be an issue at a smaller scale with respect to development and landscaping works in the Settlement area. Invasive species The Black Rat was accidentally introduced to Lord Howe Island in 1918, and became prolific across the island by 1930 (Billing 1999). Within 25 years of their arrival, the Lord Howe Flax Snail was in noticeable decline (Iredale 1944). The Black Rat preys extensively on this species, particularly on juvenile snails, and are considered a significant threat to its survival (Ponder & Chapman 1999). Predation by the Black Rat on Lord Howe Island was listed as a key threatening process under the  Threatened Species Conservation Act   1995  (NSW) in 2000. New Zealand  Placostylus  species are preyed upon by the introduced Song Thrush and Common Blackbird (Parrish et al. 1995; Sherley et al. 1998), so it is likely that they would also prey upon the Lord Howe species. Both of these bird species had colonised Lord Howe Island by 1953 (Hutton 1991). Local island residents have observed these bird species preying upon the Lord Howe Flax Snail (G. Wilson Lord Howe Island Board 2001, personal communciation). The feral Pig ( Sus scrofa ) and the Goat ( Capra hircus ) were established on Lord Howe Island by 1851 (Pickard 1983). Predation and habitat disturbance by the Pig and habitat disturbance by the Goat were considered serious threats to the species survival (Smithers et al. 1977). However, the Pig has been successfully eradicated from the island and eradication of the Goat commenced in 1999. Other threats Ponder and Chapman (1999) identified habitat disturbance and trampling of snails by domestic cattle, and habitat disturbance and predation of eggs and hatchlings by domestic fowl, as possible localised threats to the Lord Howe Flax Snail. Introduced weeds such as exotic grasses, Asparagus Fern ( Asparagus  spp.), Guava ( Psidium  spp.) and Crofton Weed ( Ageratina adenophora ), are invading some areas of Lord Howe Flax Snail habitat. The potential effect of these species on habitat suitability for the snail is unknown but is likely to be adverse (Ponder & Chapman 1999). The potential effect of herbicides on the Lord Howe Flax Snail is unknown. Snail baits, used by local residents to control the introduced Garden Snail ( Cantareus aspersus ) are likely to be fatal to the species. The Lord Howe Flax Snail does not seal the shell opening (aperture) with a mucous seal during dry conditions, as the introduced Garden Snail does and is, therefore, prone to desiccation (Sherley 1994). Large juveniles and adults may gain some protection from desiccation by pushing the front of their shell shallowly into the soil to cover the aperture (Sherley et al. 1998). The shells of recently deceased Lord Howe Flax Snails were noted in areas where the forest canopy had been damaged by drought or storms, allowing higher light penetration and, therefore, a hotter, drier microclimate (Ponder & Chapman 1999).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66769'),('66773','Tasmanipatus anophthalmus','Endangered','Onychophora (no class)','Peripatopsidae','The Blind Velvet Worm is an invertebrate with a soft, flattened and cylindrical body covered in minute papillae, giving it a velvet-like appearance. The Blind Velvet Worm has 15 pairs of non-jointed legs with well-developed feet and claws and has antennae extending from the head. When at rest it measures 25–35 mm, although when walking it extends to approximately 50 mm in length. The Blind Velvet Worm lacks eyes and, except for the dark brown tips of its claws and jaws, is completely white (Tas. DPIW 2005; TSSC 2009ay, 2009az).','The Blind Velvet Worm is terrestrial and primarily inhabits dry eucalypt forests. As the species\' permeable skin makes it prone to water loss it is restricted to moist micro-habitats, and predomiNAtly occurs deep within the soft rotting centre of decaying eucalypt logs. The species\' prime habitat is forest containing numerous rotting eucalypt logs, where no high-intensity or frequent fires have occurred within at least 20 years (Bryant & Jackson 1999b). The species is most often found along streams, gullies and shaded east and south facing slopes (Mesibov 1997; TSSC 2009az).','The species is nocturnal and predatory, feeding on litter-dwelling invertebrates, which it catches by ejecting streams of sticky fluid from appendages on its head (Tas. DPIW 2005; TSSC 2009az).','The main identified threats to the Blind Velvet Worm include the clearance of native forest for agriculture and conversion of native forest to plantation. Potential threats to the Blind Velvet Worm are too frequent or high intensity burns and firewood collection (Tas. DPIW 2005).A major threat to the Blind Velvet Worm is the clearance of native forest. In areas of non-reserved private property or crown land the conversion of native forest to plantation or clearance for agriculture is a threat to the Blind Velvet Worm (Tas. DPIW 2005). About half of all recorded localities for the species are in state forest. Although these areas may be subject to extensive forestry activities, most Blind Velvet Worm habitat is not ideally suited to conversion to plantation. Moreover, the Tasmanian forestry industry has implemented a policy to manage populations of Blind Velvet Worms in wood production forests. Forestry Tasmania recommend only native forest silviculture, e.g. light selective logging, as the main form of forestry activity within the species\' range. This practice is identified as a minor threat to the species, as it does not lead to a massive reduction in decaying logs (M. Wapstra 2007, pers. comm., cited in TSSC 2009az).Additional threats include inappropriate fire regimes or wildfire. Fire of high frequency or intensity can degrade or eliminate suitable habitat by clearing leaf-litter and drying out suitable logs (Tas. DPIW 2005). The level of threat is currently increased due to the effect of drought on fuel load conditions within the species\' range (M. Wapstra 2007, pers. comm., cited in TSSC 2009az). Firewood collection also poses a threat to the Blind Velvet Worm. Although logs that provide habitat for the species are generally unsuitable for use as firewood, logs in earlier stages of decay may be targeted, thus depleting the recruitment of habitat logs (Tas. DPIW 2005).The Blind Velvet Worm may also be threatened through over-collecting and the destruction of microhabitats by research workers and collectors (Mesibov & Ruhberg 1991).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66773'),('66774','Thersites mitchellae','Critically Endangered','Gastropoda','Camaenidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66774'),('66778','Engaeus orramakunna','Vulnerable','Malacostraca','Parastacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66778'),('66780','Engaeus spinicaudatus','Endangered','Malacostraca','Parastacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66780'),('66781','Engaeus yabbimunna','Vulnerable','Malacostraca','Parastacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66781'),('66796','Hoplogonus simsoni','Vulnerable','Insecta','Lucanidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66796'),('66797','Hoplogonus vanderschoori','Vulnerable','Insecta','Lucanidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66797'),('66798','Idiosoma nigrum','Vulnerable','Arachnida','Idiopidae','The Shield-backed Trapdoor Spider is dark brown to black, large (females up to 30 mm in body length) and with a distinctive thick and hard cuticle on the abdomen. The end of the abdomen is flattened into a shield and the sides are deeply corrugated. The burrows always have a lightweight, leaf litter and silk door, with leaf and twig trip-lines fanning out from the centre of the front of the burrow rim (Gray 2014).','In the Wheatbelt, the Shield-backed Trapdoor Spider typically inhabits clay soils whereas the arid Midwest populations are associated with rocky habitats, primarily in positions with increased moisture retention properties like gullies and drainage lines on southern facing slopes (Anonymous 2010; Ecologia Environment 2009a). The Wheatbelt and coastal Midwest populations are in areas with more consistent annual rainfall than those in the arid Midwest, which is likely to be why the populations in these areas are primarily found in sheltered habitat (Anonymous 2010). In the Wheatbelt, populations are associated with eucalypt woodland and acacia shrubland, and in the arid Midwest they are associated with acacia shrubland (Anonymous 2010).Leaf litter and twigs are extremely important to the species as it provides material for the burrows, reduced soil moisture loss and increased prey availability (Anonymous 2010). The species avoids areas of dense leaf litter as juveniles are unable to dig their initial hole in such areas (Main 1992 cited in ). Areas of lower grazing pressure may suport greater population abundance (Ecologia Environment 2009a).In the Wheatbelt, habitat critical to the species is identified as open York gum ( Eucalyptus loxophleba ), Salmon gum ( E. salmonophloia ) and Wheatbelt Wandoo ( E. capillosa ) woodland, where Jam ( Acacia acuminata ) forms a sparse understorey in heavy clay soils (ACC 2007).In a study at Weld Range, all burrows were found within boundaries of drainage lines underneath predomiNAtly acacia vegetation (Mulga ( Acacia aneura ),  A.  sp. Weld Range, Dead Finish ( A. tetragonophylla ),  A. ramulosa ,  A. craspedocarpa ,  A. paraneura ) and also underneath  Hakea preissii  and  Eremophila glutinosa ). Of 1708 burrows detected, 33% were on slope-foot-plain, 30% on the plain, 27% on slopes and 10% on hilltop-slope-foot (Ecologia Environment 2009a). Burrows were found in soil dominated by clay and rocks (54%), or clay, rock and sand (38%). The average leaf litter of sites ranged between 7-100% with a mean of 59% (Ecologia Environment 2009a).In a study at Blue Hills, 53 burrows were recorded under  A. ramulosa  or  A. caesaneura , in microhabitat ranging from loamy plains to rocky hillslopes (Ecologia Environment 2013). The average leaf litter of sites ranged between 25-98% with a mean of 63% (Ecologia Environment 2013).In a study at Mummaloo, of a 52 quadrat survey the species was detected at 14 locations (Bennelongia 2012). Two records occurred in ecualyptus woodland and twelve occurred in mixed species shrubland. The eucalypt woodland consists of York Gum, Salmon Gum and Gimlet ( E. salubris ) with  Callitris columellaris  usually present and occasionally  Casuarina obesa . The understorey contains 5-60% cover of  Eremophila  spp.,  Acacia  spp. and  Allocasuarina  spp.. The mixed species shrubland consists of  Melaleuca stereophloia ,  Callitris columellaris  and  Casuarina obesa  (of no more than 55% overall cover), and 10-100% cover of shrub species, especially Kimberly\'s Wattle ( Acacia anthochaera ) and  Allocasuarina acutivalvis  subsp.  prinsepiana  (Bennelongia 2012).','The Shield-backed Trapdoor Spider is an opportunistic feeder and feeds primarily on ants, but also includes beetles, cockroaches, millipedes and moths (Clark & Spier-Ashcroft 2003). The species relies on the twigs and leaves they have attached to the rim of their burrow for the detection of prey within the vicinity of their burrow (Anonymous 2010). This reliance on leaf litter means that leaf litter loss through inappropriate fire regimes and management may impact significantly on the species ability to feed (Anonymous 2010).','The Shield-backed Trapdoor Spider is threatened by:Secondary salinisation: the widespread clearing of the Wheatbelt has resulted in the water table rising and an increase in salinisation close to the surface. This results in vegetation changes that directly affect the Shield-backed Trapdoor Spider because of it’s reliance on the vegetation and associated leaf litter for habitat (Anonymous 2010).Grazing: grazing by stock and feral animals affects both the Wheatbelt and Midwest populations largely through the disturbance of leaf litter, vegetation and soil. Work in the Midwest has shown that areas where grazing occurs have fewer emergents and juveniles (Ecologia Environment unpub. data cited in Anonymous 2010).Fragmentation and clearing: the clearing of habitat has resulted in the severe fragmentation of populations in the Wheatbelt. The populations at Karara, Weld Range, Jack Hills and Blue Hills will all be negatively affected by land clearing because of the mining operations (Anonymous 2010; Ecologia Environment 2009a, 2013), which will fragment these significant populations. Dust pollution associated with mining could negatively impact the speciesVibrations: vibrations associated with vehicles and exploration drilling have the potential to affect nearby populations. Recent work at Jack Hills and Weld Range has shown a possible reduction in emergents and juveniles within 50 m of exploration drilling pads (Phoenix Environmental unpub. data cited in Anonymous 2010). Exploration restrictions have been put in place at Weld Range and Jack Hills based on this research.Inappropriate fire: in the Wheatbelt, the combination of fragmentation and intense fire has a high potential to result in local extinctions, with little to no chance of recolonisation (Main 1995). Intense fires can not only remove burrow doors but also remove all the leaf litter, providing no material for reparation work and dramatically affecting the prey population (Anonymous 2010).Lack of litter management in reserves: although the species requires leaf litter to survive, excessive, deep litter canrestrict the establishment of emergent burrows, forcing them further away from vegetation and exposing them to the elements that likely decrease their chances of surviving to adulthood. Similarly deep litter reduces the chances of understorey vegetation growing, reducing the diversity of invertebrates and the health of the habitat and increases the chances of hot, intense fires going through a population (Anonymous 2010).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66798'),('66821','Neopasiphae simplicior','Critically Endangered','Insecta','Colletidae','Neopasiphae simplicior  is a black short-tongued bee that is of a smaller size and has less-modified antennae and legs than other species belonging to the same genus (congeneric).  Males are 7 mm in length, with a wing length of 5 mm (Michener 1965).','Neopasiphae simplicior  has been collected at flowers of;Thread-leaved Goodenia ( Goodenia filiformis ), an erect to ascending, slender perennial herb up to 0.25 m high, occurring on sandy soils and winter-wet depression, flowering between November to JanuarySlender Lobelia ( Lobelia tenuior ), a slender erect annual herb to 0.5 m high, occurring on sand dunes, coastal limestone and low-lying areas, flowering between October to JanuaryAngianthus preissianus , an erect or prostrate annual herb up to 0.16 m high, occurring on sand and clay and favouring saline habitats, winter-wet flats, claypans and granite rocks, flowering between October to DecemberVelleia  sp. (Houston 2000; Western Australian Herbarium undated).The Forrestdale Lake Nature Reserve lies on the Bassandean dunes of the Swan Coastal Plain, vegetated largely by banksia woodlands and low closed forests of swamp paperbarks (CCWA & CALM 2005).Male  Neopasiphae simplicior  roost overnight in flowers of Asteraceae, and in most cases, the flowers are low-growing ephemerals (Houston 2000).Neopasiphae simplicior  occurs in two listed threatened ecological communities, known as Type 8  \'Herb-rich shrublands in clay pans\'  listed in Western Australia as Vulnerable and Type 10a  \'Shrublands on dry clay flats\'  listed in Western Australia as Endangered (CCWA & CALM 2005).Neopasiphae simplicior  is also associated with listed threatened species, including another short-tongued bee  Leioproctus douglasiellus , Carnaby\'s Black Cockatoo ( Calyptorhyncus latirostris ), Purdie\'s Donkey Orchid ( Diuris purdiei ), Glossy-leaved Hammer Orchid ( Drakaea elastica ) and five Priority flora species (one Priority 1;  Acacia lasitocarpa  subsp.  Bracteolata,  and four Priority 4;  Villarsia submersa, Drosera occidentalis, Verticordia lindleyi  subsp . lindleyi  and  Anthotium junciforme ) (Government of Western Australia 2000a).The Forrestdale Lake Nature Reserve is one of the most important conservation areas in south-western Western Australia as a habitat and refuge for water-birds and is representative of wetland areas of the Swan Coastal Plain that are poorly reserved in the Perth Metropolitan area. This site also has important Aboriginal heritage, plant communities representative of the eastern side of the Swan Coastal Plain and natural and cultural values close to urban centres. Forrestdale Lake, along with Thomsons Lake, was included on the List of Wetlands of International Importance known as the Convention on Wetlands in 1990 (CCWA & CALM 2005; Ramsar Secretariat 2009).','Neopasiphae simplicior  may rely upon the flowers of  Goodenia filiformis ,  Lobelia tenuior  and (males only)  Angianthus preissianus  (Houston 2000), which flower between October to January (Western Australian Herbarium undated).','Houston (1994) listed past, current and future threats as including: land clearing of bush-land for housing and rural and industrial uses; draining of winter-wet depressions; and fire.An additional threat to many species of native bees is possible competition with introduced honeybees (Houston 2000). In the past land clearing was likely to be a threat to this species by destroying its habitat, which is considered to be associated with winter-wet depressions. Eighty percent of the wetlands that were once present on the Swan Coastal Plain prior to European settlement have been cleared, filled, drained or developed. Of the wetlands that remain, some have not retained their ecological values due to the concentration of urban and agricultural development in the region. Forrestdale Lake is a Class A Nature Reserve, included in the directory of important wetlands in Australia, it is a conservation category wetland and listed as a Ramsar site, therefore it is unlikely that this area will be cleared in the future. Fire is recognised as a current and future potential threat to wetland values by changing/disturbing the habitat, which may result in the replacement of native vegetation with weeds (Houston 1994; TSSC 2008aej; TSSC 2008afi).A large fire event would be catastrophic for the species if the fire destroyed the entire suitable habitat for this species. A fire management and response plan is being developed for Forrestdale Lake and will include actions and strategies to protect environmentally sensitive areas and pre-suppression activities to reduce the likelihood fire.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66821'),('66844','Bettongia penicillata ogilbyi','Endangered','Mammalia','Potoroidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66844'),('66849','Petrogale lateralis hacketti','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Macropodidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66849'),('66889','Saccolaimus saccolaimus nudicluniatus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Emballonuridae','Appearance The Bare-rumped Sheathtail Bat is a large insectivorous bat that is distinguished from other Australian sheathtail bats (Emballonuridae) by the reddish-brown to dark brown dorsal fur irregularly flecked with white, and the naked rump (Churchill 1998; Menkhorst & Knight 2001). A throat pouch is present in males and is rudimentary in females. The function of the naked rump is unknown. Northern Territory individuals may be slightly larger, darker (almost black) on the dorsal fur compared to the north-eastern Queensland specimens which have more uniformly mid to dark brown dorsal fur irregularly flecked with white (Hall 1995a; McKean et al. 1981; Troughton 1925).','The Bare-rumped Sheathtail Bat occurs mostly in lowland areas, typically in a range of woodland, forest and open environments (Schulz & Thomson 2007; Reardon et al. 2010; Dennis 2012).The habitat adjacent to the roost in the Jerona Fauna Sanctuary at Ayr in north Queensland was in Poplar Gum ( Eucalyptus platyphylla ) woodland, typical of the alluvial plains adjacent to the lower Burdekin and Houghton Rivers, near Townsville (Compton & Johnson 1983). Adjacent to this habitat were woodlands dominated by Carbeen ( E. tessellaris ) and Ghost Gum ( E. papuana ). At Iron Range, Queensland, roosts were located in Darwin Stringybark woodland ( E. tetrodonta ) with Clarkson\'s Bloodwood ( Corymbia clarksoniana ) and Carbeen subdomiNAt. Adjacent to the roost was a narrow strip of gallery forest along a seasonally dry watercourse and less than one kilometre away were large patches of rainforest associated with the Claudie River floodplain (Murphy 2002).  The specimen from Attack Creek, north of Coen, Queensland was collected in riverine vine forest with adjacent open forest/woodland (WildNet database, EPA, Queensland, cited in Schulz & Thomson 2007). In either case it was not known if individuals foraged over some or all of the vegetation communities in the vicinity of the roost. The Kakadu National Park specimens were collected from open  Pandanus  woodland fringing the sedgelands of the South Alligator River (Friend & Braithwaite 1986).The Bare-rumped Sheathtail Bat has been suggested to forage over habitat edges such as the edge of rainforest and in forest clearings (Churchill 1998). There is no information is available on foraging habitat shifts between the dry and wet seasons.The small number of confirmed roosts located in Australia have all been in tree hollows (Churchill 1998; Compton & Johnson 1983).Overseas other subspecies (perhaps distinct species to the form(s) occurring in Australia) commonly roost in caves, overhangs and man-made structures (Churchill 1998; Payne & Francis 1998). However, in Australia no individuals have been found roosting in caves. For example, a survey conducted of about 1000 coastal caves in the Wet Tropics region failed to locate this species (Clague et al. unpublished cited in Coles et al. 1999).Roosting habitatNo studies have been conducted on the roosting ecology of this species and all located roosts are from incidental records (such as, as a result of land clearance). In Australia, all confirmed roosting records are from deep tree hollows in the Poplar Gum, Darwin Woollybutt ( Eucalyptus miniata ) and Darwin Stringybark (Churchill 1998; Compton & Johnson 1983; McKean et al. 1981; Murphy 2002). Hollows in these tree species have also been used as maternity roosts. Such roosts are susceptible to damage by termites and by fire (Churchill 1998; Murphy 2002). Although recorded roosting in caves overseas, a survey of approximately 1000 coastal caves in the Wet Tropics region of north-eastern Queensland failed to locate this species (Clague et al. unpub. cited in Coles et al. 1999).Outside Australia, the Bare-rumped Sheathtail Bat has also been recorded roosting in human-made structures, such as the eaves of houses and in old monuments; between boulders; and in caves (Boonsong & McNeely 1977; Churchill 1998; Hall 1995a).Foraging habitatOnly anecdotal information is available, based on habitat around roosts or from shot specimens. No information is available on foraging habitat shifts between the dry and wet seasons (Schulz & Thomson 2007).  The Bare-rumped Sheathtail Bat has been suggested to forage over habitat edges such as the edges of rainforest and forest clearings (Churchill 1998).Associated and sympatric speciesIt is likely to be associated with other bat species that require woodland with hollow-bearing trees for roosting or foraging purposes. Sympatric bat species may include the Semon\'s Leaf-nosed Bat ( Hipposideros semoni  ), Large-eared Horseshoe Bat ( Rhinolophus philippinensis ), Fawn Leaf-nosed Bat ( H. cervinus ), Tube-nosed Insect Bat ( Murina florium ) and Arnhem Leaf-nosed Bat ( H. inornata ), Papuan Sheathtail Bat ( Saccolaimus mixtus ) (Duncan et al. 1999), Northern Leaf-nosed Bat ( H. stenotis ) and Arnhem Sheathtail Bat ( Taphozous kapalgensis ).','The Bare-rumped Sheathtail Bat is insectivorous (Churchill 1998; Mahoney & Walton 1988), although the type of insects taken has not been documented. The species has a fast, direct flight and is likely to forage primarily for aerial insects over the woodland/forest canopy but may fly lower when foraging over open situations (Bonaccorso 1998; Churchill 1998; Woinarski & Milne 2002). In Sarawak, Churchill (1998) recorded individuals foraging in the early evening along forest edges and around a large clearing.There is no information on temporal feeding patterns and important foraging habitat for this species (Schulz & Thomson 2007).','Because the distribution, habitat preferences and biology of the Bare-rumped Sheathtail Bat are poorly known the identification of known and likely threats facing this species are incomplete.Known past and current threatsHabitat loss The Bare-rumped Sheathtail Bat occurs primarily in tropical eucalypt woodland, and possibly rainforest in the coastal lowlands, of north-eastern Queensland and the Top End of the Northern Territory. Parts of its range have been subjected to extensive habitat clearance for agriculture (some coastal areas south of Townsville and in the Wet Tropics bioregion) and, in some areas, urban development (Cairns and Townsville areas) (Duncan et al. 1999). For example, the Jerona Fauna Sanctuary site, Ayr, Queensland (Compton & Johnson 1983) has been extensively modified by broadscale clearing for agriculture.The small number of confirmed roosts located in Australia have all been in tree hollows. Two of these roosts, at Jerona Fauna Sanctuary and on the outskirts of Darwin in the Northern Territory, were found as a result of land clearing operations (Compton & Johnson 1983; Churchill 1998). Tree hollow availability is likely to be reduced in some areas due to land clearance, such as in the Darwin-Mary River area (Woinarski & Milne 2002).Likely or future  threatsVegetation change Vegetation change due to a variety of factors, such as clearing of understorey vegetation for agriculture and livestock grazing, altered fire regimes, saltwater intrusion and invasion by exotic weed species (such as Mimosa ( Mimosa pigra )) may adversely affect habitat suitability (Duncan et al. 1999; Woinarski & Milne 2002). Such factors may affect recruitment, longevity and growth of roost trees and have an unknown effect on prey resources (Schulz & Thomson 2007).Timber collection and targeted tree removal Timber collection and the targeted removal of hollow-bearing and dead trees along road reserves, in parks (such as old trees deemed to be a potential threat to visitors due to falling branches) and other urban situations may result in the destruction of some roosts (Schulz & Thomson 2007).Competition for hollows In urban and some agricultural areas this species may be adversely impacted by feral birds (such as the Common Myna ( Acridotheres tristis )), native birds that have benefited as a result of urban/agricultural environments (for example, the Rainbow Lorikeet ( Trichoglossus haematodus ) and the Sulphur-crested Cockatoo ( Cacatua galerita )) and introduced insects (for example, feral bees) through competition for tree hollows as roosting and breeding resources (Schulz & Thomson 2007).Disease Diseases such as Australian Bat Lyssavirus (ABLV) have not been recorded for the Bare-rumped Sheathtail Bat, but this may be a function of the lack of specimens presented for examination. In the related Yellow-bellied Sheathtail Bat ( Saccolaimus flaviventris ), five of seven individuals (71.4%) examined in Queensland were found to be ABLV-positive (Barrett 2004).The impact of diseases on the Bare-rumped Sheathtail Bat is unknown. Where there are adverse changes in population structure or dynamics, such as through food shortages, the prevalence of disease may alter and result in a threat to populations of this species (Schulz & Thomson 2007).Climate change The loss of climatic habitat such as tropical forests caused by anthropogenic emissions of greenhouse gases has been identified as a key threatening process under the EPBC Act (DEH 2006q). The narrow bioclimatic habitat range occupied by the Bare-rumped Sheathtail Bat potentially makes it susceptible to climate change (Schulz & Thomson 2007).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66889'),('66973','Pterodroma heraldica','Critically Endangered','Aves','Procellariidae','NA','The Herald Petrel is a marine, pelagic species of tropical and subtropical waters (del Hoyo et al. 1992; Marchant & Higgins 1990).Published sightings of the Herald Petrel off eastern Australia occur from the edge of the continental shelf, 30-36 km offshore, and over water of 250-270 m depth (Izzard & Watson 1980; Marchant & Higgins 1990; McBride & Hobcroft 1984).The species nests on tropical and subtropical islands, atolls, cays and rocky islets (del Hoyo et al. 1992; Marchant & Higgins 1990).In the Australasian region, breeding is only known from Raine Island, Queensland, where the birds nest on the ground on a low sand ridge, under a mat of dense shrubs ( Achyranthes aspera, Abutilon indicum, Amaranthus leptostachys, Sesbania cannabina ), creepers ( Tribulus cistoides ) and grass ( Lepturus repens ) (Garnett & Crowley 2000; King 1984, 1996; King & Reimer 1991).Whilst roosting on Raine Island, adult petrels are absent by day, but return in the mid to late afternoon to roost on the ground under vegetation (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Herald Petrel probably feeds on cephalopods (squid), but its diet is otherwise unknown (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Marchant & Higgins 1990).Herald Petrels usually fly within 20 m of the sea surface, and take food from on or near the surface (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','There is little information available about threats to the Herald Petrel. The small population of Herald Petrels is vulnerable to catastrophe, such as the accidental introduction of predators (Garnett & Crowley 2000). The small population size means the species is at high risk of extinction.Other threats may result from human activity. Guano was harvested from Raine Island early in the 1900s, although the seabird colony is thought to have recovered without any ill-effects (King 1996). Disturbance to nesting birds, egg collection, persecution by fisherman, and accidental entanglement in fishing tackle, especially nets, are additional threats.The predation of eggs and chicks by introduced mammals (e.g. foxes  Canis vulpes , cats  Felis catus , rats  Rattus ) may also be a threat to the species. Furthermore, gulls (Larus) often take the eggs and small chicks of nesting seabirds.Other potential threats to the Herald Petrel are erosion of nesting habitat, due to wind and wave action, storms washing away nests, structural and floristic changes to vegetation, and competition for food from other marine species and commercial fisheries. Pollution (nutrient enrichment, toxic spills, e.g. oil, chemicals), and disease (Blakers et al. 1984; Brothers et al. 1996; Burbidge et al. 1996; Copley 1996; del Hoyo et al. 1992; Garnett & Crowley 2000; King 1996; Marchant & Higgins 1990; Norman et al. 1996) may also pose a risk to the population. It is not clear whether any of these additional seabird threats are applicable to the Herald Petrel.The small colonies on Raine Island, and possibly on other cays in the Coral Sea, may be at risk from genetic inbreeding.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66973'),('66994','Leucocarbo atriceps nivalis','Vulnerable','Aves','Phalacrocoracidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66994'),('66995','Leucocarbo atriceps purpurascens','Vulnerable','Aves','Phalacrocoracidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=66995'),('67030','Chalcophaps indica natalis','Endangered','Aves','Columbidae','The Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) is a small pigeon about 23 to 26 cm long. It has a wingspan of about 43 to 46 cm, and a mass of about 80 to 135 g. It is mostly purplish-brown or red-brown with iridescent dark-green wings, dark brown irides, an orange bill (with a darker base) and red or purple-red legs and feet. The male differs from the female in having a grey crown, white forehead, white stripe above each eye, narrow white line across each shoulder, and dark grey (rather than red-brown) lower back, rump and tail (Higgins & Davies 1996; Johnstone & Storr 2004; Reville 1993).','The Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) occurs in most forested habitats on Christmas Island. It is most common in tall closed evergreen rainforest and open semi-deciduous rainforest, especially on the terraces that surround the central plateau of the island, but is also regularly observed in deciduous scrub, disturbed vegetation such as thickets of weeds and secondary regrowth (including areas dominated by  Muntingia calabura ), and settled areas (on lawns, in gardens and around houses), and on forest tracks (Carter 2000b; Craig 1996; Environment Australia 2002i; Gibson-Hill 1947; Hasbro 2000; James 2007, pers. comm.; James & Retallick 2007; Reville 1993; Stokes 1988; TSSC 2005y).The Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) does not occur in any of the threatened ecological communities that are listed under the  EPBC Act 1999 . It is sympatric with and occurs in similar habitats to the Christmas Island Pipistrelle  Pipistrellus murrayi , which is listed as Critically Endangered under the  EPBC Act 1999 ; Christmas Island Goshawk  Accipiter fasciatus natalis , Island Thrush (Christmas Island)  Turdus poliocephalus erythropleurus  and Christmas Island Shrew  Crocidura attenuata trichura , which are listed as Endangered under the  EPBC Act 1999 ; and Christmas Island Blind Snake  Typhlops exocoeti , Christmas Island Gecko  Lepidodactylus listeri  and Christmas Island Hawk-Owl  Ninox natalis , which are listed as Vulnerable under the  EPBC Act 1999  (James 2007, pers. comm.; James & Retallick 2007).','The Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) feeds on fallen berries and fruit (including the introduced  Carica papaya ) and seeds, and occasionally on grains of rice  Oryza sativa  (Gibson-Hill 1947; Johnstone & Storr 2004). It might also take some invertebrate food, based on the diet of subspecies  C .  i .  chrysochlora  on the Australian mainland (Frith 1982b).The Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) forages on the ground for fruit, berries and seeds (Gibson-Hill 1947; Johnstone & Storr 2004; TSSC 2005y; van Tets & van Tets 1967). Its habit of foraging on the ground exposes the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) to contact with terrestrial predators such as cats  Felis catus , dogs  Canis familiaris  and Yellow Crazy Ants (James 2007, pers. comm.; Stokes 1988; TSSC 2005y), and possibly also to competition for food with Yellow Crazy Ants (TSSC 2005y). It also forages beside roadways and is sometimes killed by collisions with vehicles (James 2007, pers. comm.).','The main threats to the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) in the past were habitat alteration, predation by cats and Black Rats  Rattus rattus , and hunting by humans (Gibson-Hill 1947; Stokes 1988). The combined effects of these processes are speculated to have caused a moderate decline in the population size of the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island). However, the only quantitative evidence that any of these processes have caused a decline in numbers of the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) was obtained by a recent study which found that reporting rates for the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) are lower in disturbed habitats than they are in undisturbed native rainforest (James & Retallick 2007). The incidence of hunting by humans has subsided (Stokes 1988) and evidently ceased (James 2007, pers. comm.). The prevalence of habitat alteration has also subsided (Stokes 1988), but suitable habitat continues to be lost through the clearance of secondary regrowth for mining operations and other purposes (such as urban sprawl and the recent construction of the Immigration Reception and Processing Centre) (James 2007, pers. comm.). The current impact of predation is unknown, but apparently low: the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) remains widespread and common in rainforest (Carter 2000b; Doughty 2003; Hansbro 2000; James & Retallick 2007; Reville 1993) even though cats and Black Rats are abundant in forests across the entire extent of Christmas Island (James 2007, pers. comm.).The major threat to the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) at present is likely to be the introduced Yellow Crazy Ant (Garnett & Crowley 2000; TSSC 2005y). The Yellow Crazy Ant has the potential to impact on the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) in a variety of ways. It is claimed to be capable of making direct attacks on the doves (although healthy birds are claimed to be able to remove ants before serious injury occurs) and of reducing breeding success in ant-infested areas (perhaps through the harassment of nesting adults and/or predation of juvenile birds and nestlings). It could also compete with the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) for food resources (Davis 2002; TSSC 2005y).The Yellow Crazy Ant could also impact on the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) indirectly. One potential mechanism for this could be the elimination of the domiNAt Red Crab  Gecarcoidea natalis  from areas of native rainforest. This is because, in the absence of the Red Crab, the seeds that are normally eaten by the crab germinate and produce a dense layer of seedlings on the normally much more open rainforest floor. This change in the structure of the rainforest makes it more difficult for the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) to seek food on the ground, and might possibly result in long-term changes in the structure and composition, and perhaps suitability, of the rainforest habitat (O\'Dowd et al. 1999; TSSC 2005y). The elimination of the Red Crab might also allow introduced predators such as cats and Black Rats to increase in abundance and in such a situation it is possible that the incidence of predation upon the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) could increase (Garnett & Crowley 2000; TSSC 2005y).Another potential mechanism for the Yellow Crazy Ant to impact on the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) indirectly could be through its mutually-beneficial relationship with scale insects. Populations of scale insects can increase substantially in the presence of the Yellow Crazy Ant, and large populations of scale insects can have detrimental effects on the rainforest canopy. The degradation of the canopy could potentially result in a change in the composition of the rainforest, and this in turn could potentially reduce the suitability of affected rainforest habitats for the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) (O\'Dowd et al. 1999; TSSC 2005y).The Yellow Crazy Ant was introduced to Christmas Island between 1915 and 1934. Its distribution on the island has expanded since its introduction and, prior to the implementation of an island-wide aerial baiting campaign in September 2002, it inhabited 24.4% of the native rainforest on Christmas Island (TSSC 2005y). A study into the impact of the Yellow Crazy Ant on the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) showed that the abundance of the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) is reduced by 80–90% in areas of native rainforest invaded by the Yellow Crazy Ant (Davis 2002).While in 2000 some predicted that the population of the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island) would decline by more than 80% over the following three generations (15 years) because of the expansion of the Yellow Crazy Ant population (Garnett & Crowley 2000), this has not happened. The island-wide aerial baiting campaign, conducted in September 2002, resulted in a reduction of the Yellow Crazy Ant colonies by 98–100% and reduced the activity of the Ants significantly (TSSC 2005y). While successful at slowing the impact of the Yellow Crazy Ant on the Emerald Dove (Christmas Island), the aim of the baiting program was to control, rather than eradicate, the Yellow Crazy Ant population, and the reformation of some small supercolonies, and the formation of some new colonies, have been reported (TSSC 2005y).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67030'),('67033','Probosciger aterrimus macgillivrayi','Vulnerable','Aves','Cacatuidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67033'),('67034','Calyptorhynchus banksii naso','Vulnerable','Aves','Cacatuidae','The Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoo is 55-60 cm in length and 570-870 g in weight (Higgins 1999). Males and females are mostly glossy black with a pair of black central tail feathers, a crest, robust bill and bright red, orange or yellow barring in the tail (Higgins 1999). Males are distinguished by broad red tail panels that are only visible when taking off or alighting (Higgins 1999). They have a dark brown iris, dark grey eye-ring and blackish legs. Females are distinguished by yellow or whitish spots on the feathers of the head and upper wing coverts. Their tail feathers are bright red and orange, grading to yellow on the inner margins, and have variable black horizontal barring. Females have yellow or orange barring on the tips of the feathers of the throat, breast, belly and under-tail coverts and a light grey bill with a dark grey tip (Johnstone & Storr 1998). The juvenile is similar to the adult female but has a white eye-ring (Higgins 1999; Johnstone & Storr 1998). The subspecies voice is a loud cry of \'karee\' or \'krar-raak\' (Johnstone & Storr 1998).','The Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoo inhabits the dense jarrah, karri (Eucalyptus diversicolor) and marri forests receiving more than 600 mm average rainfall annually (Saunders et al. 1985; Saunders & Ingram 1995; Chapman 2008), mainly in the hilly interior (Johnstone et al. 2013a). Although most records are in jarrah-marri forests, the subspecies has been observed in a range of other forest and woodland types, including blackbutt ( E. patens ), wandoo ( E. wandoo ), tuart ( E. gomphocephala ), Albany blackbutt ( E. staeri ), yate ( E. cornuta ) and flooded gum ( E. rudis ) (Abbott 1998a, 1998b). This subspecies is also now seen feeding in more open agricultural areas and in the Perth metropolitan area, where it will also breed (Lee et al. 2013; Chapman 2008).At a study of 128 nest sites, understorey species included balga ( Xanthorrhoea  spp.), kingia ( Kingia australis ) and snottygobble ( Persoonia  spp.), parrot bush ( Banksia sessillis ), holly-leaved mirbelia ( Mirbelia dilatata ), bull banksia ( Banksia grandis ), bullich ( Taxandria  spp.) and sheoak ( Allocasuraina fraseriana ) (Johnstone et al. 2013a).AssociationsThe Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoo sometimes associates with Baudin\'s Cockatoo and Carnaby’s Cockatoo ( Calyptorhynchus banksii naso ) at sites where food is abundant (Higgins 1999; Saunders 1974b), most likely in jarrah-marri forest on the Darling Scarp and plateau. Breeding, foraging and roosting areas also overlap on the southern Swan Coastal Plain and the Perth metropolitan area. Baudin\'s Cockatoo and the Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoo are both listed as Vulnerable under the EPBC Act 1999.The Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoo may forage in several threatened ecological communities:Corymbia calophylla - Kingia australis  woodlands on heavy soils of the Swan Coastal Plain (listed as endangered);Corymbia calophylla - Xanthorrhoea pressii  woodlands and shrublands of the Swan Coastal Plain (listed as endangered;Proteaceae Dominated Kwongkan Shrublands of the southwest coastal floristic province of Western Australia threatened ecological community (listed as endangered).','Ninety percent of the Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoo total diet consists of marri and jarrah seeds (Johnstone & Kirkby 1999), and it depends on both feed trees during breeding periods (Johnstone et al. 2013). Other feed trees include blackbutt, Albany blackbutt ( E. staeri ), forest sheoak ( Allocasuarina torulosa ), snottygobble ( Persoonia  spp.) and karri ( E. diversicolor ). Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoos will also feed on the non-indigenous native spotted gum ( E. maculata ) and introduced species, such as cape lilac, lemon-scented gum ( C. citriodora ), silver princess ( E. caesia ), illyarrie ( E. erythrocorys ) and kaffir plum ( Harpephyllum caffrum ) (Johnstone et el. 2013; Johnstone & Kirkby 1999; Johnstone & Storr 1998). There is also a record of feeding on mountain marri ( C. haematoxylon ) for the first time in 2004 (Chapman 2008). Marri trees with a high fruit yield in one year require at least three years to replenish sufficient resources to fruit successfully again (Cooper et al. 2003; Mawson 1995a).A detailed study of the food and feeding behaviour of the Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoo was conducted at Bungendore Park and Jarrahdale between 1996 and1999 (Johnstone & Kirkby 1999). During the study, the birds fed on marri throughout the year but switched to jarrah and other foods in March and June, when marri fruits were less abundant. The subspecies also appeared to return to individual trees to feed, on a daily basis, until the supply of fruit was exhausted (Johnstone & Kirkby 1999). The production of marri fruit takes about 17 months from bud initiation (Mawson 1995a). In most years, only about 20-50% of marri trees produce a large crop of fruits and a small proportion of the trees produce only male flowers, which fail to fruit (Mawson 1995a). The slow and patchy flowering and seeding of marri trees highlights the need for foraging habitat to consist of a mosaic of tree species and age classes.','Nest hollow shortage Nest hollow shortage is the principal ongoing threat to the Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoo (Garnett et al. 2011), although the extent of the impact is unknown (TSSC 2009s). Trees with hollows large enough for use by the subspecies may need to be at least 209 years old (Johnstone et al. 2013a), and such trees are scarce and many have been preferentially felled (Garnett et al. 2011; Chapman 2008). Only 10% of remNAt vegetation remains in south-west WA and 16.6% of nest trees are lost per decade as the result of wind fall, fire and bulldozing in fire clean-up (Johnstone et al. 2013a). Wildfires can destroy habitat by causing older trees containing hollows to fall, reducing the amount of habitat available and reducing food availability.Competition with other species is also leading to a shortage of suitable hollows. Competitors include Carnaby\'s Cockatoo and Baudin’s Cockatoo, and corellas ( Cacatua  spp.), Wood Ducks ( Cheononetta jubatta ) and, most significantly, feral honey bees ( Apis mellifera ) (Johnstone et al. 2013a), which pose a significant threat to the ability of the subspecies to survive and breed. Feral honey bees have taken over four of 12 nests monitored in Bungendore Park near Bedfordale on the Darling Scarp. Hollow invasion by feral honey bees is likely to increase with the southward movement of bees in response to the predicted warmer climate in south-west WA (Chapman 2008).Some estimates of available nest hollows within suitable habitat (e.g. Abbott 1998b; Whitford & Williams 2002) may have significantly over estimated the actual number of nest trees available (Johnstone et al. 2013a). For instance, jarrah was included in these studies although this species is less commonly used as a nest tree (Johnstone et al. 2013a). Similarly, hollows that look suitable from the ground may be unsuitable when assessed at height, and the Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoo may preferentially use hollows that are in close proximity to each other, rather than hollows throughout the landscape (Johnstone et al. 2013a).Clearing and degradation Habitat loss for agriculture, timber harvesting and mining is the principal cause of historic decline of the subspecies (Johnstone 1997; Mawson & Johnstone 1997). The long-term effects of habitat loss may not be fully realised due to the subspecies\' longevity (Brouwer et al. 2000). In remaining habitat, selective removal of marri for timber, mining and agriculture has resulted in further declines (Garnett & Crowley 2000). The Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoo may be more vulnerable to disturbance from clearing than other black cockatoo species because the subspecies is more sedentary and likely to remain in an area year round (Lee et al. 2013).Traditional forestry practices such as clear felling and 80-year cut rotations restrict the availability of nest hollows (Saunders & Ingram 1995; Chapman 2008). More recent silvicultural practices prescribe that five primary habitat trees and 6–8 secondary habitat trees are retained per hectare during timber harvesting. The establishment of designated fauna habitat zones (excluded from logging) within each logging coupe also aims to increase the number of tree hollows protected in state forest reserves (WA EPA & WA CC 2003). However, not all large trees are suitable for nesting (TSSC 2009s), so adequate consideration must be given to assessing and modifying prescriptions as necessary. Mining continues to impact on large trees, however, and clearing for residential and industrial development is rapidly increasing in many parts of the subspecies’ range, particularly along the Darling Scarp and Swan Coastal Plain (Chapman 2008), including the Perth metropolitan area.More recently, marri and jarrah have experienced declines because of disease (marri canker), drought and extreme heat, leading to further degradation of Forest Red-tailed Black cockatoo habitat (Doherty et al. 2016; Paap et al. 2012).Illegal Shooting Illegal shooting is a historic threat (TSSC 2009s), but there is evidence of shooting throughout the 1990s and 2000s (Abbott 2001a; TSSC 2009s). During the late 1800s and early 1900s, Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoos were shot for food, for sport and to obtain their tail feathers for ornamental and decorative purposes (Abbott 2001a). There are records of this subspecies being shot apparently because they had been snapping off the top of blue gums (Chapman 2008). Reports of WA orchardists shooting the Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoo are received in most years and prosecutions for these actions are undertaken whenever sufficient evidence is available (TSSC 2009s).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67034'),('67041','Platycercus caledonicus brownii','Vulnerable','Aves','Psittacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67041'),('67046','Cyanoramphus cookii','Endangered','Aves','Psittacidae','The Norfolk Island Green Parrot is bright green with a red forehead and forecrown, a red stripe across each eye, a dark blue region on the leading edge of each wing and a small patch of red on either side of the rump. The sexes are similar in appearance, but the female can be distinguished by her smaller size, smaller red forehead and forecrown patches, and a smaller, narrower bill. Juveniles are similar to the adults, but green colouring is duller and red colouring is less extensive (Forshaw 1981; Higgins 1999).','The Norfolk Island Green Parrot primarily occurs in remNAt Norfolk Island Pine ( Araucaria heterophylla ) tall closed rainforest, as well as in other native vegetation, eucalypt plantations and adjacent to native forest in orchards and gardens (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hicks & Greenwood 1989; Higgins 1999).Norfolk Island National Park encompasses 465 ha (12% of Norfolk Island land). This national park has been classified into five habitats: weed infested native forest (161 ha, 35%); dense African Olive ( Olea europaea  subsp.  cuspidata ) forest (129 ha, 28%); native forest (97 ha, 21%); dense Red Guava ( Psidium cattleianum  var.  cattleianum ) forest (41 ha, 9%); and plantation forest (32 ha, 7%). Native vegetation consists of palm forest, hardwood forest and Norfolk Island Pine forest.Nesting and roosting habitat The Norfolk Island Green Parrot usually nests in a hollow or cavity in the limb, trunk or stump of living or dead trees, especially in larger native trees, including Ironwood ( Nestegis apetala ), Bloodwood ( Corymbia  spp./ Eucalyptus  spp.),  Cordyline and Norfolk Island Pine, but now also using tree ferns; nests are typically within 2 m of the ground (Garnett et al. 2011; Hicks & Greenwood 1989; Higgins 1999; Lane et al. 1998).The Norfolk Island Green Parrot generally roosts in concealed areas, including holes in trees, and thick vegetation such as epiphytes, tussocks, sedges and ferns. It often roosts in nesting sites (Higgins 1999). Inexperienced fledglings often roost in exposed sites (Higgins 1999).The Norfolk Island Green Parrot perches in trees when in forest, but may perch on the ground in open habitats, or when feeding on the ground (Higgins 1999; Lane et al. 1998).','Adult Norfolk Island Green Parrots primarily eat seeds, fruits, flowers and leaves of native and introduced trees and shrubs, including Norfolk Island Pine, Ironwood, Norfolk Island Palm ( Rhopalostylis bauerri ), Bloodwood,  Cordyline  and White Oak ( Lagunaria patersonia ) (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Higgins 1999). They are reported to prefer the blossum and seeds of Bloodwood and Wild Maple ( Elaeodendron curtipendulum ), but also eat seeds, fruits and bark of introduced species including Wild Tobacco ( Solanum mauritianum ), Red Guava, African Olive, Peach ( Prunus persica ) and Lantana ( Lantana camara ) (Forshaw & Cooper 1978; Lane et al. 1998).Norfolk Island Green Parrots forage in all vegetation strata, depending on the location of seasonally available food items (Higgins 1999). Adults prefer to feed in the canopy in forested areas. However, for three to five weeks after fledging, juveniles feed extensively on the ground eating fallen seeds of African Olive, Norfolk Island Pine and Red Guava (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Higgins 1999; Lane et al. 1998). During the summer months birds have been observed largely feeding in the canopy of trees, whilst in the winter months a large proportion of foraging time appears to be on the ground (A. Smith 2014 pers. obs.). They will also feed in modified habitat, disturbed habitat and on exotic plants (fruit trees), especially where native vegetation has been removed (Forshaw & Cooper 1989; Higgins 1999).','Current ThreatsClearance of Habitat The clearance of suitable forest habitat, particularly hollow-bearing trees such as Ironwood, to provide timber and land for agriculture and pine plantations was a major factor in the decline of the Norfolk Island Green Parrot (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hicks & Greenwood 1989; Higgins 1999; Hill 2002; Lane et al. 1998; R. Ward 2007, pers. comm.). The widespread clearance of endemic forest has now ceased on Norfolk Island (Garnett et al. 2011), and most of the remaining habitat is protected through its inclusion in Norfolk Island National Park or through the listing of vegetation under local government legislation. However, patches of forest continue to be cleared on private land: this threat is being addressed through agreements between conservation bodies and landholders to conserve endemic forest (Hill 2002).Predation Predation of eggs, nestlings and free-flying birds by introduced predators, especially Black Rats and Cats, was a primary factor in the decline of the Norfolk Island Green Parrot, and is the major current threat (DNP 2010; A. Smith 2014 pers. comm.). Predation is a source of breeding failure, and might also be a factor in the imbalanced sex ratio observed in the population. Adult females are more susceptible to predation than adult males because they incubate the eggs alone (and thus spend more time on the nest) and are very reluctant to depart their nests when approached (Hicks & Preece 1991; Hill 2002; Lane et al. 1998). The threat from predation has been alleviated to some degree by a program, begun in 1988 and reinitiated in 2013, to modify natural nesting hollows to prevent rats from gaining entry (Hill 2002; Smith 2014).Competition for Nesting Sites The Norfolk Island Green Parrot faces competition for nesting sites (tree hollows) from the introduced Crimson Rosella, Common Starling and Honeybee (DNP 2010).The presence of nest material of the Common Starling can deter parrot pairs from using a tree hollow. Many nests attributed to the starling have been recorded in hollows that were previously used by the Norfolk Island Green Parrot (Hill 2002).The Honeybee has been observed to usurp nesting sites of the Norfolk Island Green Parrot (Greenwood 1993; Hill 2002) and to kill and injure parrots in the captive population (Yorkston 1995). The Honeybee is now systematically removed from near parrot nesting sites in Norfolk Island National Park (A. Smith 2014 pers. comm.).Disease Psittacine Beak and Feather Disease (BFDV) was confirmed in both the wild and captive populations of the Norfolk Island Green Parrot in 1995 (Stevenson et al. 1995). It is a potentially fatal disease that is probably carried by all members of the Norfolk Island Green Parrot population. The disease appears to be benign unless the carrier is exposed to physical stress (Hill 2002; Yorkston 1995). An outbreak of the disease in the captive population in 1995 caused the death of two individuals (Yorkston 1995). Its effect on the wild population has not been determined.Sampling is currently underway to determine the presence of BFDV in Green Parrots and Crimson Rosellas; this involves screening of samples to identify the viral DNA as well as determining its closest match. It is possible that more than one BFDV genotype is present on Norfolk Island (L. Ortiz-Catedral 2014 pers. comm.).Habitat Degradation The habitat of the Norfolk Island Green Parrot is being degraded by natural processes, invasive weeds and introduced animals (Hill 2002). The main habitat of the species, Norfolk Island National Park, is heavily infested with introduced plants and weeds (Gilmour & Helman 1989b; Schodde et al. 1983). Some of these plants provide an abundant source of food for the Norfolk Island Green Parrot (Davidson 1997; Hicks & Preece 1991; Motte & Hall 1988) but none are considered to form hollows suitable for breeding (Lane et al. 1998). This threat is being addressed by a program to remove weeds from Norfolk Island National Park and replant native species used by the parrot for nesting (Hill 2002).Low Genetic Diversity The current Norfolk Island Green Parrot population descended from a small number of breeding pairs (Hill 2002; Lane et al. 1998). The population may therefore express low genetic variability and as a consequence be vulnerable to inbreeding depression, a condition in which breeding between closely related individuals can reduce the health and resilience of offspring.Residual Impacts of Past Clearing Although the clearance of endemic forest has ceased on Norfolk Island (Garnett et al. 2011), the small area of suitable forest habitat that remains limits the potential for the population to recover (Lane et al. 1998). This issue is being addressed by a program to restore suitable habitat in Norfolk Island National Park (DNP 2010).Past ThreatsPersecution The Norfolk Island Green Parrot was formerly shot and trapped by Norfolk Island residents because of its tendency to feed upon and damage crops and garden plants (Hicks & Greenwood 1989). Shooting and trapping may have been a factor in the historical decline of the species (Hill 2002), but are now prohibited under federal law.Reduced Productivity due to Imbalanced Sex Ratio In the 1990s, censuses showed that the Norfolk Island Green Parrot population was mainly comprised of male birds, with the sex ratio ranging from 2.9 males to one female, to 5.4 males to one female, in the five years for which data were collected. The imbalanced sex ratio, which is believed to have resulted from a higher mortality rate amongst females than males, restricted the productivity of the population by limiting the potential number of breeding pairs and increasing competition between males, the latter resulting in the failure of some nesting attempts because of the harassment of the breeding pair by unpaired males (Lane et al. 1998). An apparent sex bias has also been observed in hatchlings (A. Smith 2014 pers. obs.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67046'),('67051','Tyto novaehollandiae castanops (Tasmanian population)','Vulnerable','Aves','Tytonidae','The Masked Owl (Tasmanian) is the second largest nocturnal raptor in Australia (Young 2006) and weighs up to 1260 grams and has a wingspan of up to 128 cm, and body length of 47–51 cm.','The Masked Owl (Tasmanian) inhabits a diverse range of forests and woodlands including agricultural and forest mosaics (TSSC 2010x). Forests with relatively open understoreys, particularly when these habitats adjoin areas of open or cleared land, are particularly favoured (Bell et al. 1997; Debus 1993; Higgins 1999).','The Masked Owl (Tasmanian) is a nocturnal predator feeding predominately on introduced rodents and Rabbits ( Oryctolagus cuniculus ) on agricultural land, and on arboreal marsupials, terrestrial mammals and native birds in less disturbed habitats. Eastern Barred Bandicoots ( Perameles gunnii gunnii ) have been found to be an important species in the diet, along with Swamp Rats ( Rattus lutreolus ) and Tasmanian Pademelons ( Thylogale billardierii ), which may be up to four times the size of an adult owl (Young 2006). The subspecies\' diet can vary greatly between sites, and individuals can switch between prey items depending on availability and prey size (Green 1982a; Green & Rainbird 1985; Mooney 1992a, 1993).','Habitat clearing and fragmentationThe subspecies’ preferred habitat has been extensively cleared since European settlement (Bell 2008 pers. comm. cited in TSSC 2010x).Between 1996 and 2009, approximately 142 000 hectares of native forest in Tasmania was converted to monoculture plantation or agriculture (FPA 2009 cited in TSSC 2010x). This has resulted in the loss of nesting habitat (large tree hollows) and the degradation and alteration of foraging habitat for the subspecies (Tas. DPIPWE 2009).The loss of paddock trees during plantation establishment and the clearing of large hollow bearing trees for fixed irrigation systems on cleared land, is removing nesting habitat from large areas of agricultural land in Tasmania, where there is also little to no recruitment of younger trees (Tas. DPIPWE 2009). Additionally, although the species utilises fragmented open spaces for foraging, there is an associated higher mortality rate with these landscapes (Young 2006).Residential development, particularly along the east and north coasts of Tasmania, has resulted in the loss of nesting habitat and the degradation of foraging habitat (Tas. DPIPWE 2009).Rural tree declineTree loss from dieback (Kirkpatrick et al. 2000; Neyland 1996) is causing a continuing loss of nesting habitat for the subspecies. Most nest trees used by this subspecies in Tasmania are estimated to be in excess of 150 years old (Mooney 1997). In recent decades, the rate of loss of these trees through natural attrition and dieback has been very high, with little recruitment of young trees. It is unlikely that any of the nest trees which die, either through natural attrition or dieback, are retained for habitat (Tas. DPIPWE 2009).Secondary poisoningThe subspecies can be susceptible to secondary poisoning if it consumes the flesh of another animal that has ingested a poison. In particular, the subspecies is susceptible to secondary poisoning from brodifacoum-based rodenticides (Higgins 1999), sodium monofluroacetate (1080) and Pindone (NSW DEC 2006).Collision mortalityThe subspecies’ habit of frequenting forest and woodland edges, and cleared land and paddocks, puts the subspecies at greater risk of collisions with artificial structures (e.g. powerlines) and vehicles (Bell & Mooney 2002).Competition for tree hollowsThe continuing loss of nesting habitat may result in increasing competition for large tree hollows between this subspecies and other hollow-dependent species (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Bell 2008 pers. comm. cited in TSSC 2010x).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67051'),('67065','Amytornis barbatus barbatus','Endangered','Aves','Maluridae','The Grey Grasswren (Bulloo) is a small bird about 18 to 21 cm long. It has a wingspan of about 17 to 21 cm and a mass of about 15 to 21 g (Hardy 2002; Higgins et al. 2001). The adults are brown with white streaking on the upperbody, and mainly white on the underbody, but with some black streaks on the breast, and a pale red-brown tinge to the flanks and thighs. They have a distinctive pattern on the head, which consists of a white face; black marks around the eyes, and on the throat, ears and cheeks; and black and white streaks across the top of the head. They have a grey-black to black bill, dark brown irides, and dark grey-brown to grey-black legs and feet. Adult males and females appear similar, but the females can be distinguished by the narrower black markings on the face, and the slightly less extensive and slightly fainter streaks on the breast (Higgins et al. 2001).','The Grey Grasswren (Bulloo) occurs on periodically-inundated swampy floodplains in the Bulloo River drainage basin. It inhabits patches of dense vegetation that are comprised of thickets of  Muehlenbeckia cunninghamii , 1.0 to 2.5 m tall, with clumps of  Eragrostis   australasica , about 1 or 2 m tall, and/or clumps of  Atriplex   nummularia  (Favaloro & McEvey 1968; Hardy 2002; Higgins et al. 2001; McAllan & Cooper 1995; Robinson 1973; Rowley & Russell 1997; Schodde 1982). It also sometimes occurs in areas of  Halosarcia pergranulata  that lie adjacent to more typical habitat (McAllan & Cooper 1995).The Grey Grasswren (Bulloo) congregates in high densities in small and isolated patches of habitat that persist and provide refuge during drought conditions (Hardy 2002; Schodde 1982).The Grey Grasswren (Bulloo) does not occur in any of the threatened ecological communities listed under the  EPBC Act   1999 . It is not known to associate with any other threatened species or subspecies listed under the  EPBC Act 1999 .','The diet of the Gray Grasswren (Bulloo) consists of seeds and insects (including ants and beetles) (Favaloro & McEvey 1968; Robinson 1973).The Grey Grasswren (Bulloo) gleans (pecks) food items from the ground (in open areas of short grass) and in shrubs (Chapman 1996; Robinson 1973; Schodde 1982).','The only current accepted threat to the Grey Grasswren (Bulloo) is the degradation and loss of its habitat. The known sources of habitat loss and degradation are grazing and trampling by cattle  Bos , grazing by rabbits  Oryctolagus cuniculus , and rooting (digging) by feral pigs  Sus scrofa . The application of unsuitable fire regimes might also have an adverse effect on Grey Grasswren (Bulloo) habitat. The impact of all of these processes is (or is likely to be) more severe during dry conditions (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hardy 2002, 2006, pers. comm.; McAllan & Cooper 1995; TSSC 2005u). The threat posed by cattle grazing may be less severe than is believed, given that the Bulloo region has been subjected to grazing for more than a century (Garnett 1993), and cattle densities are likely to be lower now than they were in the past (Palmer 1994). There is some possibility that the habitat could come under pressure in future from the spread of invasive and noxious weeds (such as  Parthenium  and  Prosopis ) (TSSC 2005u), or the diversion of water from the Bulloo River. However, there are no current plans for water to be diverted from the Bulloo River, or for any other detrimental land use to occur (Garnett 1993; Garnett & Crowley 2000).Another potential threat to the Grey Grasswren (Bulloo) is predation by feral cats  Felis catus  and foxes  Vulpes vulpes . The extent of predation is unknown; it is thought to occur (TSSC 2005u), but one study found that, although cats were numerous in the Bulloo River region, there was no evidence that they were preying upon the Grey Grasswren (Bulloo) (Hardy 2002).Drought exacerbates the extent of habitat loss and degradation (Hardy 2002; TSSC 2005u) and, because the birds congregate in high densities in small patches of habitat during dry conditions (Hardy 2002, 2006, pers. comm.; Schodde 1982), drought also renders the Grey Grasswren (Bulloo) more vulnerable to potentially catastrophic events such as fire (TSSC 2005u).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67065'),('67071','Hylacola pyrrhopygia parkeri','Endangered','Aves','Acanthizidae','The Chestnut-rumped Heathwren is a small bird about 13 to 16 cm long. It has a wingspan of about 16 to 19 cm, and a mass of about 13 to 20 g (Higgins & Peter 2002). The adults are mainly brown or brownish-grey on the upperbody, and mainly white (in males) or buff (in females) with brown streaks on the underbody. Both sexes have a chestnut patch on the rump; a grey tip to the tail; a narrow off-white (in males) or buff (in females) stripe above each eye; reddish-brown, brownish-yellow or cream irides; and pink or pinkish-brown legs and feet. Immature birds can not be distinguished from the adults, but juveniles can be separated on the basis of their unstreaked and pale buff to cream underbody, and the less prominent markings on the face (Higgins & Peter 2002).','There is little published information available on the habitat of the Chestnut-rumped Heathwren (Mount Lofty Ranges). It occurs in dense heathland and undergrowth in  Eucalyptus  forests and woodlands, and is most commonly found in rocky areas (such as those that occur on hillsides) (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Paton & Paton 1980; Possingham et al. 2004; Rix 1939; SAOA 1947). The vegetation in these areas consists of a mixture of dense shrubs (such as  Banksia ,  Hakea  and  Leptospermum ), grass trees  Xanthorrhoea  and ferns  Pteridium , beneath a canopy of  Eucalyptus  trees (including  E .  obliqua  and  E .  odorata ) and (in at least some sites) scattered  Allocasuarina  trees (Rix 1939). The Chestnut-rumped Heathwren (Mount Lofty Ranges) was once recorded in a patch of shrubs ( Banksia  and  Olearia ) and grass trees  Xanthorrhoea  that had been cut (but not burnt) approximately 12 months earlier (Rix 1942).There are historical records of the Chestnut-rumped Heathwren (Mount Lofty Ranges) in swampland in the Mount Compass region (Ragless 1958; SAOA 1923). The Chestnut-rumped Heathwren (Mount Lofty Ranges) has been recorded at Square Waterhole, one of the Swamps of the Fleurieu Peninsula that are listed as Critically Endangered under the  EPBC Act 1999 .The Chestnut-rumped Heathwren (Mount Lofty Ranges) often occurs in dry-heathland habitat that is also inhabited by the Southern Emu-wren (Fleurieu Peninsula)  Stipiturus malachurus intermedius  (Pickett 2007), which is listed as Endangered under the  EPBC Act 1999 .','The diet of the Chestnut-rumped Heathwren (Mount Lofty Ranges) consists of insects (including beetles and ants) and the seeds of grasses and sedges (Lea & Gray 1935).The foraging behaviour of the Chestnut-rumped Heathwren is poorly known. It is said to fly between shrubs when foraging, rather than moving across the ground, because of the density of the vegetation in the Mount Lofty Ranges (Rix 1939). However, it has been observed moving across the ground at some sites (Pickett 2007) and the description of foraging behaviour provided by Rix (1939) is somewhat at odds with the foraging behaviour of the nominate subspecies  H .  p .  pyrrhopygia , which forages on the ground beneath dense vegetation, or in low shrubs, or very occasionally in low trees (Eddy 1959; Emison et al. 1987).','The current major threat to the Chestnut-rumped Heathwren (Mount Lofty Ranges) is the loss and degradation of its habitat. The sources (or potential sources) of habitat loss and degradation are the expansion of residential development in rural areas, the invasion of habitats by woody weeds, wildfire, changing fire regimes, and possibly grazing (Garnett & Crowley 2000; TSSC 2005bk).The Mount Lofty Ranges were subject to extensive land clearance in the past and today only about 10% of the native vegetation remains intact. Broad-scale land clearance ceased in the mid-1980s (Paton et al. 1994), but incremental loss and degradation is still occurring due to the expansion of residential zones in rural areas (Garnett & Crowley 2000; TSSC 2005bk). Furthermore, the increase in rural development in some areas might exacerbate some forms of habitat degradation, such as weed invasion, and might also expose the Chestnut-rumped Heathwren (Mount Lofty Ranges) to increased levels of disturbance or predation by domestic and feral animals (TSSC 2005bk).Because of the extensive past clearance of native vegetation, the remaining habitat of the Chestnut-rumped Heathwren (Mount Lofty Ranges) is present in small and isolated fragments that are subject to habitat degradation (due to weed invasion, wildfire and grazing). Furthermore, the fragmented nature of the habitat may provide a barrier to dispersal, and thus increase the risk of local extinction due to catastrophic events (such as wildfire or drought) or inbreeding depression (Garnett & Crowley 2000; TSSC 2005bk).The potential for extensive wildfire to impact on the Chestnut-rumped Heathwren (Mount Lofty Ranges) and its habitat was demonstrated during the Ash Wednesday fires of February 1983. These fires burnt out 33 000 ha of native vegetation in the Mount Lofty Ranges and eliminated the Heathwren from several formerly-occupied areas. However, the Chestnut-rumped Heathwren (Mount Lofty Ranges) has since re-colonised some of these former sites (including Cox Scrub Conservation Park) (Paton et al. 1994). The ability to re-colonise burnt areas suggests that wildfire might be a less significant threat than first thought (Garnett & Crowley 2000), although if the Heathwren exhibits a preference for vegetation that has recently been burnt, it is possible that unsuitable fire regimes may have an adverse effect on the long-term survival of the subspecies (TSSC 2005bk).The Chestnut-rumped Heathwren (Mount Lofty Ranges) is thought to nest on or close to the ground, making it vulnerable to nest predation and trampling (Pickett 2007b, pers. comm.).It is possible that the cumulative effects of the threats listed above may cause the extinction of the Chestnut-rumped Heathwren in the foreseeable future (Ford & Howe 1980; Possingham & Field 2000).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67071'),('67080','Acanthiza iredalei rosinae','Vulnerable','Aves','Pardalotidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67080'),('67089','Epthianura crocea tunneyi','Endangered','Aves','Meliphagidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67089'),('67090','Epthianura crocea macgregori','Critically Endangered','Aves','Meliphagidae','The Yellow Chat (Dawson) is about 11 cm in length and has a mass of about 9 g (Higgins et al. 2001). When breeding, the adult male plumage is mainly yellow-olive above, with dusky streaking, a rich golden-yellow head and rump, and white edges to the feathers of the wings. The breeding adult male plumage is lemon yellow below, with a distinct black crescent or bar across the breast. Adult females in breeding plumage are broadly similar to adult males (in breeding plumage), but lack the distinct black mark on the breast and are generally bright yellow rather than golden-yellow in colour (Houston et al. 2004a; Jaensch et al. 2004a; Schodde & Mason 1999).','The Yellow Chat (Dawson) inhabits marine plain wetlands that are subject to extensive seasonal inundation and varying degrees of both fresh and saltwater (tidal) influence (Barnard 1913; Houston et al. 2004a, 2004b; Jaensch et al. 2004a). The Yellow Chat (Dawson) typically occupies portions of the marine plain that have a network of shallow drainage channels and depressions supporting a mosaic of vegetation that consists of grassland dominated by  Sporobolus virginicus  and/or  Paspalum distichum , dense beds of rush (e.g.  Schoenoplectus litoralis ) or sedge (e.g.  Cyperus alopecuroides ), patches of Samphire ( Halosarcia  spp.), and areas of bare or sparsely-vegetated mud and/or shallow water. These areas are generally without trees, but Grey Mangrove ( Avicennia marina ) and  Ceriops tagal  do occur at some occupied sites in tidal areas (Houston et al. 2004a, 2004b; Jaensch et al. 2004a).The Yellow Chat (Dawson) utilises different areas of the wetland mosaic for different purposes. It breeds, shelters and forages in grasslands and dense beds of rush and sedge, but it also forages in more open habitats nearby, especially more sparse grasslands and Samphire vegetation (Houston et al. 2004a, 2004b; Jaensch et al. 2004a). The subspecies is also known to persist in this habitat during periods of drought (W. Houston 2007, pers. comm.).The Yellow Chat (Dawson) is not known to associate with any other threatened species or subspecies listed under the EPBC Act. Several birds listed as migratory under the EPBC Act occur in the same area, including the Australian Painted Snipe ( Rostratula australis ), Latham\'s Snipe ( Gallinago hardwickii ), Marsh Sandpiper ( Tringa stagnatalis ), Common Greenshank ( T. nebularia ), Red-necked Stint ( Calidris ruficollis ), Sharp-tailed Sandpiper ( Calidris acuminate ) and Pacific Golden Plover ( Pluvialis fulva ), regularly occur within or adjacent to known or potential habitat of the Yellow Chat (Dawson) (Houston et al. 2006; Jaensch et al. 2004b).','The Yellow Chat (Dawson) feeds on insects, such as moths, damselflies, caterpillars and mosquito larvae, and other invertebrates, such as spiders (Houston et al. 2004a, 2004b; Jaensch et al. 2004a). Its tongue has a brush-like tip that is characteristic of honeyeaters (Higgins et al. 2001; Parker 1973b), which suggests that it could also feed on nectar.The Yellow Chat (Dawson) gleans invertebrates from the ground (on bare mud or mud with flattened or sparse grass); from the surface of shallow water; from the basal stems of rushes, grasses and Samphire plants; and occasionally from low shrubs (Houston et al. 2004a, 2004b; Jaensch et al, 2004a). It also sallies for flying insects from perches in tall rushes (Houston et al. 2004a).','The loss or degradation of its habitat has been identified as a threat to the Yellow Chat (Dawson). The potential causes of loss and degradation are grazing and associated trampling and/or digging by mammalian herbivores, invasion by exotic pasture grasses, alteration of natural water flows, expansion of industrial operations and wildfire (Houston & McCabe 1996; Houston et al. 2004a, 2006).GrazingThere is evidence that grazing and associated trampling and/or digging by feral Pigs ( Sus scrofa ) is damaging habitat occupied by the Yellow Chat (Dawson) on Curtis Island (Houston et al. 2004a) and, to a lesser degree, on Torilla Plain and Fiztroy River Delta (Houston & Melzer 2006, Houston et al. 2006). Habitat occupied by the Yellow Chat (Dawson) at Torilla Plain is subject to grazing and trampling by Cattle ( Bos taurus ), but it has been suggested that the current intensity of grazing on Torilla Plain might be beneficial to the Yellow Chat (Dawson) because it may limit the spread of invasive grasses into chat habitat (Houston & McCabe 1996; Jaensch et al. 2004b), and that the current intensity of Cattle grazing on Curtis Island might be beneficial to the Yellow Chat (Dawson) because it could potentially open up dense grasslands and thus render them more suitable to the subspecies (Houston et al. 2004a).It has also been speculated that an increase in the intensity of Cattle grazing could damage rush-beds and thus have a detrimental affect on the Yellow Chat (Dawson) (Houston et al. 2004a, 2006). This situation may have developed on Curtis Island, where a recent substantial decline in the local population of the Yellow Chat (Dawson) has coincided with a severe drought, magnifying the impact of grazing pressure and resulting in a reduction in the cover of sedges (W. Houston 2007, pers. comm.).Invasive pasture grassesThe habitat of the Yellow Chat (Dawson) is at risk of being invaded by exotic pasture grasses such as  Brachiaria mutica  and  Hymenachne amplexicaulis . These grasses could potentially have an adverse affect on the Yellow Chat (Dawson) by replacing native plants such as  Paspalum distichum  or  Cyperus alopecuroides , which are domiNAt species in some habitat occupied by the chat. However, the high levels of soil salinity that are typical of Yellow Chat (Dawson) habitat probably reduce the potential for invasion. Furthermore, it has been speculated that the current intensity of cattle grazing also might help to limit the spread of exotic pasture grasses into Yellow Chat (Dawson) habitat (Houston & McCabe 1996; Houston et al. 2004a; Jaensch et al. 2004a). The only occupied site at which the vegetation has been substantially altered by invasive exotic grasses is on the central Torilla Plain, where  B. mutica  has become a domiNAt component of the vegetation and has apparently replaced the native species  P .  distichum . However, as the Torilla Plain supports a large proportion of the total Yellow Chat (Dawson) population (W. Houston 2007, pers. comm.), it appears that the impact of  B .  mutica , at least at this site, is minimal (Houston & Melzer 2008).Alteration of water flowsThe construction of dams and other structures that alter the flow of water into and/or through areas occupied by the Yellow Chat (Dawson) could have an adverse affect on the subspecies. The construction of dams, ponded pastures or embankments upstream of occupied sites, or the construction of sea walls (levees) or channel block banks landward of occupied sites, could reduce the amount of freshwater that reaches and inundates such sites. The reduction in the amount of freshwater inflow at these sites can reduce the area of suitable habitat (Houston et al. 2004a; J. McCabe 2002, pers. comm.; P. O\'Neill 2002, pers. comm.). For example, tidal exclusion works have reduced the cover of perennial vegetation on Torilla Plain (Jaensch et al. 2004a) and also may have had an adverse impact on some suitable habitat on Fitzroy River Delta (J. McCabe 2002, pers. comm.; P. O\'Neill 2002, pers. comm.).A reduction in the amount of freshwater inflow might also impede successful reproduction. There is evidence to suggest that breeding is initiated by heavy rainfall and subsequent inundation. Successful reproduction could be dependent on the growth of wetland vegetation and consequent expansion of insect populations during periods of inundation to provide a source of abundant food for adults and their young (Houston et al. 2004a, 2004b, 2006).There is evidence to suggest that habitat located upstream or landward of the structures described above could actually benefit from the increased retention of freshwater in some circumstances (W. Houston 2007, pers. comm.). However, in sites where substantial levee banks are present, the increased retention of freshwater can cause large pools to form and thus reduce the complexity of the network of drainage channels that are normally used by the Yellow Chat (Dawson) (W. Houston 2007, pers. comm.).It is unlikely that levees or other structures will be constructed in future in areas occupied by the Yellow Chat (Dawson) because the construction of barriers such as extensive levee banks or sea walls in tidal areas is illegal in Queensland following the introduction of the ponded pastures policy (Qld DNRM 2003).WildfireThe habitat of the Yellow Chat (Dawson) is prone to wildfire (P. O\'Neill 2002, pers. comm.), but wildfire is considered to pose only a minor threat to this subspecies (Houston et al. 2004a).Other ThreatsHouston and Melzer (2008) identify a number of other potential, but as yet poorly understood, threats to the Yellow Chat (Dawson), including:increased groundwater salinisation from salt mining activities and consequent change in vegetation composition and structuresiltation of existing channels as a result of current management regimes (grazing, clearing in catchment, changes in flow regime) or industrial expansionunmanaged public access or uncontrolled ecotourism and possible trampling of sedges and disturbance to birdsprolonged floods, impacting on breeding successpotential consequences associated with climate change (e.g. prolonged drought, accelerated sea level rise, increased storm surge or reduced average regional rainfall). Rises in sea level associated with climate change would raise the importance of corridors between areas of existing and potential Yellow Chat (Dawson) habitatpredation by feral animals including cats. Cats are present at both Torilla Plain and Curtis Island and represent a potential threat. The large percentage of young recruits into the sub-population observed at Torilla Plain in May 2005 indicates that the threat from cats is currently low.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67090'),('67092','Melanodryas cucullata melvillensis','Critically Endangered','Aves','Petroicidae','The Hooded Robin (Tiwi Islands) is a small woodland bird with black head, white belly and black and white wings, tail and back. It typically perches quietly on low branches and pounces on prey on the ground (DIPE 2006). While not strongly differentiated in morphology from Hooded Robins on the Australian mainland (Schodde & Mason 1999), the Hooded Robin (Tiwi Islands) is generally smaller in body size with a proportionally longer bill (Higgins & Peter 2002b).','The Hooded Robin (Tiwi Islands) occurs in eucalypt tall open forests and  Acacia  shrublands (the latter locally known as treeless plains) (Fensham & Woinarski 1992; Northern Territory Parks & Wildlife Commission 2006; Woinarski et al. 2003b). The eucalypt tall open forests are dominated by  Corymbia nesophila , Darwin Woollybutt ( Eucalyptus miniata ) and Darwin Stringybark ( E. tetrodonta ). Together, these ecosystems comprise the two most extensive vegetation types on the Tiwi Islands. In both cases, the Hooded Robin (Tiwi Islands) is likely to occur in areas without a dense, tall grassy understorey, as is the case with other Hooded Robin subspp. on mainland Australia (Higgins & Peter 2002b; Woinarski & Fisher 1995). The species is generally regarded as sedentary and is unlikely to vary habitat for different stages of its life history (Higgins & Peter 2002b).The Hooded Robin (Tiwi Islands) is not associated with any listed threatened ecological community. However, the following species, which are listed under the EPBC Act, occur in potential habitat: Red Goshawk ( Erythrotriorchis radiatus , Vulnerable), Partridge Pigeon (eastern) ( Geophaps smithii smithii , Vulnerable), Masked Owl (Tiwi Islands) ( Tyto novaehollandiae melvillensis , Endangered), Butler\'s Dunnart ( Sminthopsis butleri , Vulnerable),  Typhonium jonesi  (Endangered) and  T. mirabile  (Endangered) (DIPE 2006).The following species, which are listed as threatened under Northern Territory legislation, occur in potential habitat:  Calochilus caeruleus ,  Cycas armstrongii , Dodd\'s Azure Butterfly ( Ogyris iphis doddi ), Northern Grassdart Butterfly ( Taractrocera ilia ilia ), Water Rat ( Hydromys chrysogaster ) and the Northern Brush-tailed Phascogale ( Phascogale tapoatafa pirata ) (Woinarski et al. 2003a, 2003b).','There is no feeding information available for the Hooded Robin (Tiwi Islands). For subspecies on mainland Australia, the diet comprises a wide range of invertebrates, mostly taken from the ground (Fitri & Ford 2003a; Higgins & Peter 2002b). There is no substantial information on seasonal variability in invertebrate availability on the Tiwi Islands.The typical foraging behaviour of Hooded Robins is by quietly perching on tree branches, or trunks, and then suddenly pouncing to take prey on the ground (Fitri & Ford 2003a; Higgins & Peter 2002b). This foraging behaviour is most efficient when there is relatively sparse low stratum vegetative (in contrast to the dense, tall grasses that are typical in savanna woodlands in northern Australia).Invasion by exotic pasture grasses which are taller, denser and produce greater vegetative biomass (Rossiter et al. 2003) will reduce foraging success for the Hooded Robin (Tiwi Islands). Fire clears dense grassy vegetation, thus too infrequent fire will decrease the foraging value of sites. However, frequent extensive and intense fire is likely to reduce the availability of suitable foraging perches (Northern Territory Parks & Wildlife Commission 2006).','No specific data on threats to the Hooded Robin (Tiwi Islands) has been collected. The following factors constitute likely threats to the subspecies:Changed fire-regimeThe most likely threatening factor affecting the Hooded Robin (Tiwi Islands) is changed fire regime (Northern Territory Parks & Wildlife Commission 2006). Northern savannas are difficult feeding environments for birds that pounce on the ground to feed, such as Hodded Robins. For much of the year, these environments are characterised by a dense and tall grass layer that obscures lower ground cover and constrains the movement of perch and pounce insectivorous birds. On the northern Australian mainland, Hooded Robins (in this case  Melanodryas cucullata picata ) are far more abundant in closed thickets of Lancewood ( Acacia shirleyi ) that offer a dense dry litter layer and little or no grass, rather than eucalypt open woodlands that are characterised by a tall dense grass layer (Woinarski & Fisher 1995).It is likely that the Hooded Robin (Tiwi Islands) persisted on the Tiwi Islands because Aboriginal groups used fine-scale fires to create a mosaic of burnt and unburnt patches. On the islands, the territory of the subspecies is likely to include unburnt patches, which provide cover and thus security from predation, and burnt patches, providing prime foraging areas (similar to the habit of Partridge Pigeons at Kakadu National Park) (Fraser et al. 2003).Tiwi Islanders now have a predomiNAtly sedentary lifestyle and most people live at one of three main towns. Traditional fire management on the islands has declined and the fire regime is now characterised by a far less regulated regime. The fire regime is now less frequent with events occurring later in the dry season and with larger burnt patches (Woinarski et al. 2003c). This change has been exacerbated by the invasion of exotic pasture grasses on the islands (Fensham & Cowie 1998; Woinarski et al. 2003a), which typically produce greater fuel loads (Rossiter et al. 2003). Foraging is likely to be disadvantaged by lack of fire (as fire creates feeding patches in the understorey), but frequent intense fire is likely to reduce the availability of suitable foraging perches (Northern Territory Parks & WIldlife Commission 2006).Plantation forestryThe declining trend for the Hooded Robin (Tiwi Islands) may be exacerbated by a plantation forestry program on Melville Island. The transformation of tall eucalypt open forest to short-rotation plantations may destroy the foraging and breeding habitats of the Hooded Robin (Tiwi Islands) (Woinarski et al. 2003c).OtherOver much of their range elsewhere, Hooded Robins have declined or become locally extinct, possibly due to vegetation loss and change, increased predation rates or lower abundance of some invertebrate prey (Fitri & Ford 2003b; Higgins & Peter 2002b; Reid 1999; Robinson & Traill 1996; Saunders 1989). There are some feral cats on the Tiwi Isands that may have had some impact, but cat numbers do not appear high, and probably are not a primary factor in decline (Northern Territory Parks & Wildlife Commission 2006).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67092'),('67099','Cinclosoma punctatum anachoreta','Critically Endangered','Aves','Psophodidae','The Spotted Quail-thrush (Mount Lofty Ranges) is about 24 to 30 cm long. It has a wingspan of about 32 to 40 cm, and a mass of about 85 to 145 g. The adult male and the adult female are both olive-brown above with bold black streaks, and white below with a grey breast, yellow-brown flanks and bold black streaks and spots along the sides of the body. The sexes differ markedly in appearance in adult and immature plumages, but are alike in juvenile plumage. The differences between the sexes in adult and immature plumages are numerous and complex, but essentially consist of a more complex and intensely coloured pattern of markings in the male (Higgins & Peter 2002).','There is little published information on the habitat of the Spotted Quail-thrush (Mount Lofty Ranges). Based on the few details available, it occurs in sclerophyll woodlands that are dominated by  Eucalyptus  trees (especially  E .  fasciculosa  and peppermints) and have sparse understorey vegetation, and in heathlands (Clarke 1967; Cleland 1924; Close 1972; Schodde 1954; Terrill & Rix 1950). It has been recorded in a valley (Schodde 1954), in a gorge and across a ridge (Close 1972) which suggests that, like the other subspecies of the Spotted Quail-thrush (Ford 1983; Green 1995), it probably exhibits a preference for woodlands on stony slopes and ridges.','The diet of the Spotted Quail-thrush (Mount Lofty Ranges) consists of insects (including grasshoppers and beetles) and the seeds of grasses, sedges, legumes and other plants (including species of  Acacia  and  Avena ) (Lea & Gray 1935). The bones of a small unidentified vertebrate have been recorded amongst the stomach contents of the nominate subspecies,  C .  p .  punctatus  (Lea & Gray 1935), and it is possible that the Spotted Quail-thrush (Mount Lofty Ranges) may also take similar items. The foraging behaviour of the Spotted Quail-thrush (Mount Lofty Ranges) has not been recorded. However, the other subspecies of the Spotted Quail-thrush forage on the ground, by turning over pieces of litter (such as bark, leaves and small sticks), and by picking food items from grass stems and other low vegetation (Fletcher 1909; Green 1995; Hyem 1953). It is likely that the Spotted Quail-thrush (Mount Lofty Ranges) forages in a similar manner.','The decline and probable extinction of the Spotted Quail-thrush (Mount Lofty Ranges) has mainly been attributed to the loss, fragmentation and degradation of its habitat (Close 1972; Ford & Howe 1980; Garnett & Crowley 2000). This has primarily been caused by habitat clearance (only about 10% of native vegetation remains intact in the Mount Lofty Ranges) (Close 1972; Ford & Howe 1980). However, wildfires (especially the severe Ash Wednesday fires of 1983) are also likely to have eliminated at least some birds and areas of habitat; and the close proximity of human settlement to the Mount Lofty Ranges may have caused nearby Spotted Quail-thrush (Mount Lofty Ranges) habitat to become degraded, and may also have exposed the Spotted Quail-thrush (Mount Lofty Ranges) to increased levels of predation by feral cats and foxes, and increased levels of disturbance by dogs and humans (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Paton 2002, pers. comm.). It is probable that the invasion of its habitat by noxious weeds also contributed to the decline of the Spotted Quail-thrush (Mount Lofty Ranges) (Paton 2002, pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67099'),('67113','Strepera fuliginosa colei','Vulnerable','Aves','Artamidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67113'),('67121','Zoothera lunulata halmaturina','Vulnerable','Aves','Muscicapidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67121'),('67122','Turdus poliocephalus erythropleurus','Endangered','Aves','Muscicapidae','The Island Thrush (Christmas Island) is 21 to 22 cm long. It has a wingspan of about 34 cm, and a mass of 44 to 68 g (Johnstone & Storr 2004; Higgins et al. 2006a; Voous 1964). It has brown to dark-grey upperparts, a white chin and throat, a grey-brown to grey breast, dull orange flanks, and a belly that is dull orange on the sides and white in the centre. It has dark brown irides, a prominent ring of yellow to orange-yellow skin around each eye, a yellow to orange bill, and yellow to orange-yellow legs and feet. The male and female are almost identical, but they do vary slightly in the colour of the bill. Juvenile birds can be distinguished from the adults, with the most obvious difference being a series of streaks and spots that cover part of the upperparts, and most of the underparts, of juvenile birds (Higgins et al. 2006a; Johnstone & Storr 2004). Immature birds are very similar to the adults, but retain some aspects of the juvenile plumage (Higgins et al. 2006a).','The Island Thrush (Christmas Island) is common in most habitats on Christmas Island, including tall closed evergreen rainforest, open semi-deciduous rainforest, secondary regrowth, thickets of weeds and semi-deciduous vines, settled areas (where it forages on lawns and nests on buildings), and on the Christmas Island golf course (Carter 2000b; Commonwealth of Australia 2002; Doughty 2003; Gibson-Hill 1947; James 2007, pers. comm.; James & Retallick 2007; Johnstone & Storr 2004; Reville 1993; Stokes 1988; van Tets & van Tets 1967). It is most common in tall closed evergreen rainforest and open semi-deciduous rainforest on the coastal and higher terraces and plateau of Christmas Island (Commonwealth of Australia 2002; Gibson-Hill 1947; James & Retallick 2007). It is least common in disturbed habitats (such as urban areas, regrowth and post-mining wasteland) and in suboptimal endemic vegetation such as thickets of  Pandanus  and patches of low vegetation in coastal areas (James & Retallick 2007; Stokes 1988). The Island Thrush (Christmas Island) does not occur in any of the threatened ecological communities that are listed under the  EPBC Act 1999 . It is sympatric with and occupies the same habitats as the listed Christmas Island Pipistrelle  Pipistrellus murrayi , Christmas Island Goshawk  Accipiter fasciatus natalis , Emerald Dove (Christmas Island)  Chalcophaps indica natalis , Christmas Island Shrew  Crocidura attenuata trichura ; Christmas Island Blind Snake  Typhlops exocoeti , Christmas Island Gecko  Lepidodactylus listeri  and Christmas Island Hawk-Owl  Ninox natalis  (James 2007, pers. comm.; James & Retallick 2007).','The Island Thrush (Christmas Island) feeds mainly on seeds and invertebrates (including insects and their larvae, earthworms and millipedes) (Carter 2000b; Gibson-Hill 1947; Gray 1981; James 2007, pers. comm.; Johnstone & Storr 2004). It is also known to eat House Geckos  Hemidactylus virgatus  (James 2007, pers. comm.).The Island Thrush (Christmas Island) forages on the ground amongst leaf litter, picks at the bark of dead trees and fallen timber, and occasionally seeks food in the canopy (Gibson-Hill 1947; Johnstone & Storr 2004). It also forages on lawns, in clearings (van Tets & van Tets 1967) and on the Christmas Island golf course (Carter 2000b; James 2007, pers. comm.), and on rare occasions collects geckos from pergolas (James 2007, pers. comm.). Its tendency to forage on the ground exposes the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) to contact with terrestrial predators such as cats  Felis catus , Black Rats  Rattus rattus  and Yellow Crazy Ants (Stokes 1988; TSSC 2005ap), and possibly also to competition for food resources with Yellow Crazy Ants (TSSC 2005ap).','The threats to the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) in the past were habitat alteration, predation by cats  Felis catus  and Black Rats  Rattus rattus , and hunting by humans (Gibson-Hill 1947; Stokes 1988). These processes are thought to have caused a moderate decline in the population size of the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) (Stokes 1988). However, the only quantitative evidence that any of these processes have caused a decline in numbers of the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) was obtained by a recent study which found that population densities are approximately 20% lower in disturbed habitats than they are in undisturbed native rainforest (James & Retallick 2007). The incidence of hunting by humans has now subsided (Stokes 1988) and evidently ceased (James 2007, pers. comm.). The threat from habitat alteration has declined with the formation of Christmas Island National Park, but suitable habitat continues to be lost through the clearance of vegetation for mining operations, urban expansion, road widening and other construction projects (James 2007, pers. comm.). The current impact of predation is unknown, but apparently low as the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) population appears to be widespread and secure (Carter 1994, 2000b; Craig 1996; Doughty 2003; Hansbro 2000; James & Retallick 2007; Johnstone & Storr 2004; Reville 1993; Stokes 1988) even though cats and Black Rats are abundant on Christmas Island (James 2007, pers. comm.).  Some mortality currently occurs as a result of collisions with vehicles, but this has not been quantified (James 2007, pers. comm.).The current major threat to the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) is the introduced Yellow Crazy Ant (Garnett & Crowley 2000; TSSC 2005ap). There is insufficient evidence to indicate that the Yellow Crazy Ant has caused a decline in the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) population, but it has the potential to impact on the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) in a variety of ways. It can attack the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) directly (although healthy individuals seem able to remove ants before serious injury occurs) and reduce its breeding success in ant-infested areas (in one study none of 33 breeding attempts observed in infested areas were successful). It could also compete with the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) for food (Davis 2002; TSSC 2005ap).The Yellow Crazy Ant could also impact on the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) indirectly. One potential mechanism for this could be the elimination of the domiNAt Red Crab  Gecarcoidea natalis  from areas of native rainforest. This is because, in the absence of the Red Crab, the seeds that are normally eaten by the crab germinate and produce a dense layer of seedlings on the normally much more open rainforest floor. This change in the structure of the rainforest makes it more difficult for the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) to seek food on the ground, and could possibly result in long-term changes in the structure and composition, and perhaps suitability, of the rainforest habitat (O\'Dowd et al. 1999; TSSC 2005ap). The elimination of the Red Crab might also allow introduced predators such as Black Rats (which are known to have caused the extinction of the Island Thrush on other islands) and cats to increase in abundance in which instance predation pressure on the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) could increase (Garnett & Crowley 2000; TSSC 2005ap).The Yellow Crazy Ant could also impact on the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) indirectly through its mutually-beneficial relationship with scale insects. Populations of scale insects can increase greatly in the presence of the Yellow Crazy Ant, and large populations of scale insects can have detrimental effects on the rainforest canopy. The degradation of the canopy could result in a change in the composition of the rainforest, and this in turn could reduce the suitability of the rainforest for the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) (O\'Dowd et al. 1999; TSSC 2005ap).The Yellow Crazy Ant was introduced to Christmas Island between 1915 and 1934. Its distribution on the island expanded after its introduction and, prior to the implementation of an island-wide aerial baiting campaign in September 2002, it occupied 24.4% of the native rainforest on Christmas Island (TSSC 2005ap). The potential for the the Yellow Crazy Ant to impact on the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) has been demonstrated by a study which showed that the abundance of juvenile Island Thrushes (Christmas Island) is reduced by 84%, and breeding success is reduced to nil, in areas of rainforest that have been invaded by the Yellow Crazy Ant. Furthermore, the same study also found that some behaviours exhibited by the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) are altered in areas of rainforest that are infested with ants. This appears to be because the habit of the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) to perch in low vegetation and forage on the ground, where densities of the Yellow Crazy Ant are greatest, makes the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) susceptible to harassment or attack by the Yellow Crazy Ant (Davis 2002; TSSC 2005ap).In 2000 it was speculated that Island Thrush (Christmas Island) numbers would decline by more than 80% over three generations (12 years) in the face of the rapidly expanding Yellow Crazy Ant population (Garnett & Crowley 2000). This outcome has been averted, at least in the short term, by the implementation of an island-wide aerial baiting campaign in September 2002 that reduced the activity of Yellow Crazy Ant colonies by 98 to 100% and, consequently, greatly reduced the potential of the Yellow Crazy Ant to impact on the Island Thrush (Christmas Island) and its habitat (TSSC 2005ap). However, the aim of the baiting program was to control, rather than eradicate, the Yellow Crazy Ant population, and the reformation of some small supercolonies, and the formation of some new colonies, has been reported (TSSC 2005ap).The extinction of other subspecies of the Island Thrush on Lord Howe Island and Norfolk Island suggests that the Island Thrush (including, probably, the Christmas Island subspecies) is susceptible to extinction and that its status should therefore be monitored.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67122'),('67197','Elseya lavarackorum','Endangered','Reptilia','Chelidae','The Gulf Snapping Turtle is a brown to dark brown turtle growing to 35 cm.  Part of a group of snapping turtles in the  Elseya  genus, known as the  E. dentata  complex, the Gulf Snapping Turtle differs from other members by its undulating (rather than straight) \'seam\' between the humeral and pectoral shields, the second and third shields on its \'plastron\' (the lower half of the bottom shell). The species has a white underbelly (Cogger 2000; Queensland DERM 2008).','The species inhabits large rivers and their associated overflow lagoons and oxbow lakes (Cogger 2000). The Gulf Snapping turtle is found in deeper permanent pools most often with muddy, sandy or rocky bottoms. The species is also found in the middle reaches of rivers, upstream of saline regions and downstream of escarpments, including plunge pools. Steep rocky gorges, and river reaches with intact river banks seem to be preferred habitats for Gulf Snapping Turtles (Thomson et al. 1997).Turtles will bask on exposed rocks and logs and commonly float with just their head breaking the surface of the water (Queensland DERM 2008).','The Gulf Snapping Turtle is a mainly herbivorous feeder, consuming leaves, fruits, flowers, bark and  Pandanus  roots. It is suspected that juveniles may take more animal species or insects as they are readily trapped using meat as bait (Woinarski 2006h). Figs are also said to be an important food source for the species (Crowley & Ziembicki 2009).','Stock degradation of river banks would be considered the major threat to the Gulf Snapping Turtle, affecting water quality, food sources and nesting sites (Clark 2010; Woinarski 2006h).The Gulf Snapping Turtle is potentially affected by land clearance or actions that have adverse effects on riparian forests, because this species relies on riparian trees for most of its dietary intake, like a related species  E. dentata sensu  (Kennett & Tory 1996). Individuals have been recorded caught in fishing nets and nest sites are raided by feral pigs ( Sus scrofa ), along with native species such as monitors ( Varanus  sp.) and rats ( Hydromys chrysogaster ) (Clark 2010; Woinarski 2006h).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67197'),('67220','Engaeus martigener','Endangered','Malacostraca','Parastacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67220'),('67458','Adclarkia dawsonensis','Critically Endangered','Gastropoda','Camaenidae','The boggomoss snail is a medium-sized snail characterised by a relatively thin, semi-transparent shell. The shell is almost flat with a slightly elevated spire and very small central depression. Shell diameter is between 21 and 26 mm, shell height is between 14 and 16 mm. Shell colour is light-brown to horn with a slight yellowish-green tinge (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).','The boggomoss snail appears to have a narrow preference for both macrohabitat and microhabitat. The snail needs a moist environment and cannot live in open country. The preferred habitat is the floodplain of the Dawson River in places where there is good canopy cover, a moist environment, fallen logs and deep leaf litter. This habitat once formed as an extensive archipelago of suitable patches connected by riparian vegetation, but most of the snail’s habitat has been cleared for farming and little original vegetation remains (Clarke and Spier-Ashcroft 2003, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).Broad habitat types in which the species has been found are (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017):Riparian woodlands dominated by Queensland blue gum  Eucalyptus tereticornis , Carnarvon fan palm  Livistona nitida  and Coolibah  Eucalyptus coolabahRiparian forest associations within regional ecosystem 11.3.25 on the Dawson River which support Queensland blue gum or river red gum  Eucalyptus camaldulensis  with Carnarvon fan palm  Livistona nitida  as a co-domiNAt species in the canopy or a domiNAt sub-canopy speciesMonospecific stands of Carnarvon fan palm on the Dawson River, including minor anabranch systemsOpen forest of Queensland blue gum fringing ephemeral wetlands on the Dawson River floodplainArtesian springs (mound springs or boggomoss springs) with a canopy of Queensland blue gum  Eucalyptus tereticornis  and a mid-storey of sandpaper figs  Ficus opposita  at Mt Rose Station. Most of the artesian springs within the Dawson River valley are not suitable for the boggomoss snail, which has been recorded from only three boggomoss springs on alluvial flats on Mt Rose Station.Within the broad habitat types the species has been found in five regional ecosystems (REs) as described under the Queensland Vegetation Management Framework (AMEC 2014; BAAM 2009; JKR Ecological 2010; SKM 2009; Stanisic 2008, all cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017):RE 11.3.3— Eucalyptus coolabah  woodland on alluvial plainsRE 11.3.4— Eucalyptus tereticornis  and/or  Eucalyptus  spp. tall woodland on alluvial plains (snails have been found in this RE type at Mt Rose only)RE 11.3.25— Eucalyptus tereticornis  or  E. camaldulensis  woodland fringing drainage linesRE 11.3.27—freshwater wetlandsRe 11.3.36— Eucalyptus crebra  and/or  E. populnea  and/or  E. melanophloia  on alluvial plains (only recorded at Southend by JKR Ecological 2010).All of these REs have a biodiversity status \'of concern\'. An RE is listed as \'of concern\' under the Queensland  Vegetation Management Act 1999  if remNAt vegetation is 10–30% of its pre-clearing extent across the bioregion or more than 30% of its pre-clearing extent remains and the remNAt extent is less than 10 000ha (Queensland Government 2017, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).The Boggomoss Springs are included as a wetland system listed in the Directory of Important Wetlands.The boggomoss snail microhabitat has a critical requirement for deep, moist litter and fallen timber which provides food, shelter and egg-laying sites. The microhabitat preferences are considered as follows (AMEC 2014; BAAM 2009; JKR Ecological 2010; SKM 2009; Stanisic 2008, all cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017):Partially buried logs in moist situations at all known sitesAccumulated leaf litter under Queensland blue gum at all known sitesAccumulated litter (including fronds) at the base of Carnarvon palm in the riparian forests of the Dawson RiverDeep accumulated leaf litter among the canes of sandpaper figs on the boggomosses of Mt Rose Station. Boggomosses are a series of small, raised peat bogs that form when water from aquifers of the Great Artesian Basin is pushed to the surface through mound springs (Fensham 1998).Habitat critical to the survival of the speciesMost of the native vegetation in the Dawson Valley has been cleared for farming (Clarke and Spier-Ashcroft 2003, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017) and within the little remaining native vegetation the boggomoss snail is dependent on oases refugia of moist habitat (Bishop 1981; Stanisic 2008, coth cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017). The continued existence of the snail in very small suitable areas of remNAt vegetation appears to indicate that its viability can be maintained in small allotments (1-3 ha) (Stanisic 2008, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).Habitat critical to the survival of the boggomoss snail includes (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017):the current area of occupancypotential suitable habitat to which the species could be dispersed to or be translocatednewly discovered locations that extend the current area of occupancy.The surveys undertaken between 2009 and 2013 provided valuable data on the species’ distribution and areas of habitat. However, the surveys did not use a consistent methodology to assess each habitat. The snail’s habitat should be formally assessed using a consistent methodology to clearly define habitat critical to the survival of the species. Defining and mapping habitat critical to the survival of the snail and potential habitat are included as recovery actions (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).','NA','FloodingWhile flooding can positively affect snails through dispersal of snails to suitable downstream habitat, it can also negatively affect the snails in three ways: through direct mortality; through transportation in flood waters to unsuitable habitat; and through the removal from its habitat of the leaf litter, logs and other ground cover essential to its survival. The threat of flooding is considered to have increased due to the human-related impacts of land clearing that have occurred in the region. This is due to the fact that removal of vegetation increases runoff which can increase flooding (The State of Queensland 2011, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017). In 2010 and 2011 two major flood events occurred (EcoSM 2012; JKR Ecological 2010, both cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017). These floods are significant in a historical context, with only two larger events on record, both from pre-1900 (1870 and 1890) (EcoSM 2012, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017). Surveys undertaken following these major flooding events determined the flooding had a negative impact on the quality of habitat; at many sites microhabitats were limited or had been stripped due to flooding impacts. In addition, flooding resulted in inundation of sites for several weeks. The significant reduction in the number of snails found at some sites compared to previous surveys is thought to have been a consequence of the flooding (EcoSM 2012, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).There was, however, some evidence that the snail can survive in the riparian and floodplain zones of the Dawson River. For example, the snail was found in an area that had recently been inundated by four metres of flood water, where there was abundant flood debris (JKR Ecological 2010, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017). Reporting on a later survey, AMEC (2014, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017) noted that in spite of the flooding in 2010 and 2011 there was evidence of successful breeding or recruitment at some sites. As such the impact of flooding may not be the same for each of the snail’s habitats. Furthermore, little is known about the ability of the snail to withstand inundation at different ages. The threat of flooding should be investigated for each snail location to determine the location\'s susceptibility to flooding impacts. Genetic studies of the boggomoss snail population would also clarify the role of flooding in the dispersal of snails. While flooding cannot be managed directly, actions that reduce snail mortality and increase the distribution and resilience of the boggomoss snail population should reduce the negative effects of flooding (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).Inappropriate fire regimesInappropriate fire regimes are a major threat to the viability of land snail populations (Stanisic and Ponder 2004). Fire can incinerate and dehydrate snails, and can indirectly affect them through the destruction of microhabitat (e.g. litter and logs) (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).The snail’s preferred habitat can support high fuel loads (e.g. accumulated palm leaves and introduced grasses), resulting in intense fires that can destroy habitat. Introduced grasses, specifically buffel grass,  Cenchrus ciliaris , and Guinea grass,  Megathyrsus maximus , are known to be fuel for hot and frequent fires. The boggomoss remNAts are small which makes them vulnerable to fire, particularly hot fires (Clarke and Spier-Ashcroft 2003, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017). Nothing is known about current fire management practices within the habitat of the snail. Although evidence of fires has been present during surveys it is not known if these were planned burns or naturally occurring fires. Snails have been found at sites that showed evidence of fire in the past (e.g. BAAM 2009; SKM 2009, both cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017). This could mean that snails are able to tolerate some fire in their habitat or that they can quickly recolonise sites after fire but there is currently no evidence to support either scenario conclusively. As such the snail’s level of fire tolerance has not been established. Avoidance of fire in the snail’s habitat is recommended until the snail’s level of fire tolerance has been established (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).All snails found to date have been in habitats with dead logs on the ground. The Isla Delusion reserves are open to the public for the purpose of camping, which includes lighting fires, and could pose an increased risk of fire affecting habitat (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).Clearing of vegetationPast clearing of vegetation for agriculture and pastoralism has had a significant impact on the snail. Clearing remains a threat, particularly for new infrastructure traversing riparian vegetation such as access tracks, power lines or linear infrastructure associated with coal seam gas production-pipeline crossings. Clearing may also occur associated with the mainteNAce of existing infrastructure such as roads, easements, tracks, firebreaks or fence lines. Most of the snail’s known habitat area is covered by granted mining leases. While mining is not currently being undertaken, mining and exploration activities could pose a serious threat to the snail through vegetation clearing and disturbance, habitat alteration, and hydrological modification (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).Firewood collectionThe collection of fallen timber at Isla Delusion reserve by campers to use for lighting fires is a threat to the snail as it degrades its habitat and can lead to the direct mortality of snails through burning if present on the timber (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).Changes to hydrologyChanges to hydrology from a structure such as a dam or weir could have significant consequences for the boggomoss snail. Impoundment of water from the building of a dam or weir could cause inundation of the snail’s habitat if the habitat is upstream of the structure (Stanisic pers. comm. 2015, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017). In addition, the change in river flows downstream is likely to dry the riparian vegetation community on which the boggomoss snail relies.WeedsWeeds have the potential to alter both the lower shrub layer and consequent litter as well as contributing to an increased fuel load. Significant weeds include buffel grass,  Cenchrus ciliaris , and Guinea grass,  Megathyrus maximus . Other weed threats within the species\' habitat need to be identified (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).Inappropriate grazing regimesHabitat degradation can result from inappropriate grazing regimes which cause soil compaction and loss of snails from trampling. All sites except Mt Rose are at threat from grazing. Through a local agreement between Queensland Parks and Wildlife Service and the landowner in 2009, the boggomoss on Mt Rose Station was fenced to exclude cattle. However, this has resulted in higher fuel loads through the growth of grasses and a greater risk of wildfire. Currently there is insufficient knowledge about the relative impacts of cattle and fire. For example, low stocking rates would reduce fuel loads (weeds and pasture grasses) and might not be detrimental to snail habitat. It is also likely that there will be site-specific issues. For example, sites with multiple large logs may be less accessible to cattle, and therefore light grazing may not pose a threat, and some of the dense fan palm forest sites, particularly the wetter ones, develop little grass and are less likely to suffer from grazing pressure (Stanisic pers. comm. 2014, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).Feral pigsUsing their muscular, mobile snout and forefeet, feral pigs effectively root up the ground searching for food, including snails (Choquenot et al. 1996, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017). Rooting by feral pigs has been observed in boggomoss snail habitat (AMEC 2014, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017) resulting in habitat degradation and likely direct mortality by predation.Predation by feral house mice and cane toadsLarge numbers of damaged shells have been found during surveys at Mt Rose suggesting that predation by mammals—most likely house mice and native rats which were trapped at the same time—may be significant at this site. However it was not known if the predation was pre or post mortality (AMEC 2014, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017). There is little information on the threat of feral house mice at other sites. Land snails are eaten by cane toads,  Bufo marinus , including camaenid snails in laboratory experiments (Pearson et al. 2009, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017). Cane toads occur in the Dawson River catchment and may prey on boggomoss snails. Due to the boggomoss snail\'s restricted geographic distribution, low vagility (ability to move) and \'slow\' life-history (slow growth, late maturation and low reproductive rates) cane toads may threaten populations (Pearson et al. 2009, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).Climate changeIt is acknowledged that climate change may influence long-term sustainability of the snail. A report on climate change for the East Coast NRM regions of Australia, which includes the area where the boggomoss snail is found, predicts with high confidence that there will be higher temperatures, hotter and more frequent hot days, increased intensity of heavy rainfall, increased evaporation rates, and harsher fire-weather climate in the region (Dowdy et al. 2015, cited in Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017). While there is no information specifically identifying impacts of climate change on the boggomoss snail, these climate change predictions for the region are likely to mean that the threats of fire, flooding, and changes to hydrology will increase (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).No actions have been developed that directly address climate change. Recovery actions that address other threats to the snail should increase its resilience to climate change (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).Areas under threatAll areas where the species occurs are considered under threat from flooding, inappropriate fire regimes, changes to hydrology (either from inundation or altered flow regimes), inappropriate grazing regimes, feral pigs, weeds, cane toads and clearing of vegetation. Further to that, Isla Delusion has camping reserves where lighting fires is allowed, increasing the risk of fire impacting negatively on the snail and its habitat as well as the collection of wood for lighting fires. It is also the only site where there is a public road through snail habitat. The Mt Rose site has been fenced to exclude cattle. However, this has resulted in higher fuel loads through the growth of grasses and has potentially increased the risk at the site from fire. Mt Rose is the only site where damaged shells have been found showing signs of predation by rodents (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).Populations under threatThe species is considered to occur as a single population. Therefore the whole population is considered under threat given the small total habitat area, and lack of formal habitat protection. Further scientific study will assist in determining if the population is recoverable to sustainable levels (Queensland Department of Environment and Heritage Protection 2017).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67458'),('67620','Neoceratodus forsteri','Vulnerable','Sarcopterygii','Ceratodontidae','The Australian Lungfish (herein referred to as the \'Lungfish\') is a long, heavy-bodied freshwater fish. The species has five pairs of gills and its fins resemble flippers. Adult Lungfish can weigh up to 48 kg and grow to around 2 m (Environment Australia 2003ab; Grigg 1975), but commonly reach 1.3 m. In the Burnett River, the mean length was 906 ± 199 mm, and the mean weight 7573 ± 4563 g (Brooks & Kind 2002). Adult Lungfish are dark brown or olive brown on the back and pink on the belly (Kemp 2016, pers. comm.), with some whitish colour on the belly and underside of the head. Lungfish in Lake Samsonvale are less pink and more yellow on the belly, probably owing to the fact that the environment is so depauperate that the lungfish are unhealthy (Kemp 2016, pers. comm.).','The Australian Lungfish requires still or slow-flowing, shallow, vegetated pools with clear or turbid water in which to spawn and feed (Allen 1989a; Merrick & Schmida 1984). The species is restricted to areas of permanent water (Brooks & Kind 2002) and cannot live in saline waters or migrate through sea water (Arthington 2009). Emergent or submerged vegetation are essential for successful deposition of eggs and for providing refuges for juveniles (Kemp 2014). Burnett River and tributaries The Burnett River extends around 420 km from its source to the sea. Brooks & Kind (2002) reported that Lungfish were \'often\' found in freshwater reaches of the Burnett River up to 310 km inland from the river mouth, and less frequently found upstream of this point. At sites between 50 and 350 km upstream, the abundance of Lungfish was negatively correlated with the distance from the mouth of the river (fewer lungfish further away from the sea), except for the relatively small population in Ben Anderson Barrage pond near the river mouth. Based on the catch rate per unit effort, Brooks and Kind (2002) concluded that Lungfish were less likely found in impoundments than in flowing stretches of the Burnett River. In the lower Burnett River, Ben Anderson Barrage pool is the closest water storage to the sea (26 km away). It usually consists of 41 km of impounded slow-flowing water surrounded by steep banks (Kind 2002). Bingera Weir is 42.5 km from the sea, so it is usually inundated by Ben Anderson Barrage pond. When it is not submerged, it impounds 19 km of the river above Ben Anderson Barrage. There is a section of the river upstream of Ben Anderson Barrage pond consisting of 7 km of flowing water with shallow runs up to 32 m wide, and riffles around 4m wide, up to Ned Churchward Weir (formerly called Walla Weir). Ned Churchward Weir (74.5 km from the river mouth) impounds water 34.5 km upstream to a point 109 km from the mouth of the Burnett River. Within the Ben Anderson Barrage pond, there were more Lungfish in the headwater section, where there were shallow areas and more complex habitat (Berghuis & Broadfoot 2004a; Brooks & Kind 2002). The central Burnett River area contains three irrigation storages that are impassable to lungfish in normal flow conditions (John Goleby Weir, Jones Weir and Claude Wharton Weir). Unimpounded sections of the river include many shallow pools and runs with a width of less than 10m, containing submerged logs and branches (Brooks & Kind 2002). Rocks are more common in the Burnett River than the Mary River, and are used as shelter by the Lungfish (Kind 2002). Between Claude Wharton Weir (202.4 km from the river mouth) and the Burnett River Dam (131 km from the river mouth, with an impoundment extending to a point 176 km from the river mouth) is a section of flowing river, riffles, shallow runs and pools within the Goodnight Scrub, which approaches the natural state of the river (Kind 2002; Sinclair Knight Mertz 2001). Mary River and tributaries The Mary River flows for around 250 km from its source in the Conondale Range to the sea. In the Mary River, Kind (2002) found that shallow pools, runs and riffles were common, and there were few waterfalls. Areas where Lungfish were studied consisted of 67% pools, 21% runs, 11% riffles and glides, and 1% backwaters. The average pool depth is 1.8m, the average run depth 1.2 m, and the average stream width less than 30 m. In pools where adult Lungfish were studied, macrophytes (water plants that are large enough to be seen with the unaided eye) covered 37 to 55% of the habitat (mean 47%), around 40% was open water, and the rest was stream bank vegetation (including grass growing into the water), rocks, eroded banks and woody debris. The substrate was typically sandy. Macrophytes were most abundant at depths of 0.9 to 2.1m. Yabba Creek is regulated by water releases from Borumba Dam (31.1 km from the junction with the main channel of the Mary River) and Imbil Weir (10.9 km from the junction). The average depth of Yabba Creek is 1.7 m and there is abundant overhanging vegetation, submerged macrophytes and rocky cover. Lungfish in the Mary River catchment were also less abundant in the impounded waters than further upstream. TiNAa Creek is 140 km long. It flows into the Mary River downstream of the Mary River Barrage. The lower section is regulated by Tallegalla Weir (37.5 km from the junction), Teddington Weir (15.8 km from junction), and TiNAa Barrage (1.5 km from the junction). The average depth of TiNAa Creek is 1.7 m, and it is generally less than 10 m wide. It comprises a series of pools, runs and riffles, and there is abundant overhanging vegetation and submerged woody debris, but little macrophyte vegetation in the water (Kind 2002). Coondoo Creek is 70 km long, and flows into TiNAa Creek 75 km from its junction with the main channel of the Mary River. Adult Lungfish in the Mary River are associated with overhanging riparian (riverside) vegetation, woody debris in the water, and dense macrophyte beds. They shelter in complex, shaded habitat. They most prefer habitat with overhanging vegetation and macrophytes in relation to their availability, and often use habitat with woody debris, although adults are not as reliant on submerged branches as some other Australian freshwater fish. The species avoids open water, and very seldom uses rocky habitat and eroded banks, which are uncommon in the Mary River. Lungfish are usually inactive when located in overhanging riperian vegetation and woody debris, especially during the day. They occur in water that is 1.86 m ± 0.61m deep on average, and in deeper water in winter than in summer (2.07 ± 1m m versus 1.81 ± 0.82 m). They use shallower water in the spawning season than at other times (1.77 ± 0.95 m), and slightly deeper water during the day than at night. Adult lungfish use water depths of 2 to 3 metres. Two macrophytes, Vallisneria ( Vallisneria gigantea ) and Hydrilla ( Hydrilla vertillata ) were used by all Lungfish radio-tracked in the Mary River, but Kind (2002) did not find any adult Lungfish using the macrophytes Baby Tears ( Bacopa monniera ), Nitella ( Nitella  sp.), water milfoils ( Myriophyllum  spp.), or hornwort ( Ceratophyllum demersum ). In relation to their availability, Lungfish preferred some species of macrophytes over others; they preferentially used two species that form very dense submerged banks and occur in a range of water depths; dense water weed ( E. densa ) and Hydrilla. They also prefer multi-species mixtures of floating and submerged macrophytes, and two species with floating leaves; Water Primrose ( Ludwigia peploides ) and Waterlilies ( Nymphoides  sp.) (Kind 2002). Brisbane River The upper reaches of the Brisbane River consist of two water storages, the Somerset and Wivenhoe dams (Kemp 1987). Below these dams, the river forms wide, slow-flowing permanent reaches with a maximum depth of around 4.5 m, and occasional shallow riffles. The riverbed consists mainly of sand, gravel and rocks, and the water is clear to turbid (after rain), with a nearly neutral pH (8). Red Bottle-brush ( Callistemon saligna ) and She-oak ( Casuarina  sp.) trees overhang the banks, and their root masses grow in the water, contributing to spawning and shelter habitat for Lungfish. Aquatic macrophytes are abundant (Kemp 1987). Enoggera Reservoir Enoggera Reservoir is a permanent body of water around 60 ha in area and 18 m deep. It is filled by springs in the D\'Aguillar Ranges and drains into Enoggera Creek, which drains into the Brisbane River estuary. The bottom of the dam is mainly mud, covered with detritus from water lilies and Eucalyptus leaves. The water is clear, but stained brown by tannins from decomposing leaves, and slightly acidic (pH 5). It has steeply sloping sides with Para grass ( Brachiaria mutica ) growing out from the edges to a water depth of around 2 m, forming a dense floating mat along with some aquatic macrophytes. Macrophytes are generally absent from the reservoir except at the edges. Water hyacinth ( Eichornia crassipes ) has been controlled in the Reservoir since 1974 (Kemp 1987). Kemp (1987) noted that Enoggera Reservoir was a poor environment for the Lungfish. In 2016, \"a few surviving lungfish had been reported in Enoggera Creek below the reservoir (Kemp 2016',' pers. comm.).  Habitat requirements for juvenile and immature Lungfish With one exception (a juvenile caught in 1 m of clear water',' Kind et al. 2005)',' juvenile Lungfish have always been found in dense cover such as beds of macrophytes in water 500 mm deep or less. The chosen habitat of juveniles has been well known since the work of Semon (1899) and Bancroft (1924'),('678','Apus pacificus','','Aves','Apodidae','The Fork-tailed Swift is a medium to large member of the Apodidae Family. It has a length of 18–21 cm, a wingspan of 40–42 cm and weighs around 30–40 g. It is a medium-sized Swift, with a slim body with long scythe-shaped wings that taper to finely pointed tips. It is characterized by a long and deeply forked tail. It is smaller and slimmer than the White-throated Needletail,  Hirundapus caudacutus , with much narrower wings and a longer, more deeply forked tail. It is much bigger than Swiftlets with much longer wings and a lower forked tail. The Fork-tailed Swift is mainly blackish with a white band across the rump. There is also a white patch on the chin and throat. The body, tail and upperwings are black-brown and they have a faint pale scaling to the saddle and white scalloping to the underbody. The sexes are alike with no seasonal variation, juveniles are also indistinguishable in the field (Higgins 1999).','The Fork-tailed Swift is almost exclusively aerial, flying from less then 1 m to at least 300 m above ground and probably much higher.In Australia, they mostly occur over inland plains but sometimes above foothills or in coastal areas. They often occur over cliffs and beaches and also over islands and sometimes well out to sea. They also occur over settled areas, including towns, urban areas and cities. They mostly occur over dry or open habitats, including riparian woodland and tea-tree swamps, low scrub, heathland or saltmarsh. They are also found at treeless grassland and sandplains covered with spinifex, open farmland and inland and coastal sand-dunes. The sometimes occur above rainforests, wet sclerophyll forest or open forest or plantations of pines (Higgins 1999). They forage aerially, up to hundreds of metres above ground, but also less then 1 m above open areas or over water. They often occur in areas of updraughts, especially around cliffs. They are said to search along edges of low-pressure systems, which assist flight. Low-flying Swifts are said to be precursors of unsettled weather, possibly because insect prey fly at a lower altitude when the air is humid and when the air density is low (Cameron 1952). They sometimes feed aerially among tree-tops in open forest (Higgins 1999). They probably roost aerially, but are occasionally observed to land (Higgins 1999). They were once recorded roosting in trees, using a bare exposed branch emergent above the foliage (Newell 1930). Sometimes they loaf in the air, by allowing strong winds to support them (Boehm 1939). There have been rare records of loafing elsewhere including Swifts briefly resting on ground (Campbell 1900) and alighting on wire netting of a tennis court (Wheeler 1959). Once, one was seen attempting to land on the wall of a lighthouse (Scarff 1990).','The species food items within Australia are not well known, however, the Fork-tailed Swift is known to be insectivorous. Studies have recorded the Swift eating small bees, wasps, termites and moths.The Fork-tailed Swift is an aerial eater, flying anywhere from 1 m to 300 m above the ground to forage. They forage along the edge of low pressure systems and for that reason are considered a precursor to unsettled weather. The low pressure system helps to lift prey, such as insects, from the ground and assists in flight. Feeding flight is characterized by circular flight patterns throughout areas of high prey concentration. They feed in flocks ranging from 10 to 1000 birds (Higgins 1999).','There are no significant threats to the Fork-tailed Swift in Australia. Potential threats include habitat destruction and predation by feral animals. Due to the wide range of the species the potential impacts are thought to be negligible (Birdlife International 2009b).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=678'),('67812','Balaenoptera bonaerensis','','Mammalia','Balaenopteridae','The Antarctic Minke Whale is more robust than the other large rorquals (large baleen whales). The rostrum of the Antarctic Minke Whale is very narrow and pointed, with a single ridge on the head (Perrin & Brownell 2002). The dorsal fin is tall and falcate (sickle-shaped) and positioned relatively far forward on the posterior third of the body (Perrin & Brownell 2002).','Antarctic Minke Whales appear to occupy primarily offshore and pelagic habitats within cold temperate to Antarctic waters between 21° S and 65° S (Bannister et al. 1996; Thiele & Gill 1999). On the winter breeding grounds, Antarctic Minke Whales appear to occupy pelagic waters exceeding 600 m depth (Zerbini et al. 1997). During the summer, they head for higher latitudes to feed. Antarctic Minke Whales occur well into the sea ice, with winter records extending 350 km south of the ice-edge (Thiele & Gill 1999). During winter, eight of nine Antarctic Minke Whale sightings occurred in ice heavier than 8/10 in concentration (Thiele & Gill 1999).A survey conducted in 1996 found that Antarctic Minke Whales are unevenly distributed in the Australian Antarctic Territories. They were found more frequently west of 120° E where they were concentrated south of, and at, the Southern Boundary of the Antarctic Circumpolar Current (Thiele et al. 2000). Between 120° E and 150° E Antarctic Minke Whales were almost exclusively sighted in a thin band of colder Antarctic Coastal Current water near the ice edge (Thiele et al. 2000). This uneven distribution was ascribed to a southward intrusion of warmer water east of 100° E during the survey period, leading to a reduction in the abundance of krill in these areas and consequently to lower Antarctic Minke Whale abundance (Thiele et al. 2000).','Mature Antarctic Minke Whales feed primarily on the Antarctic Krill ( Euphausia superba ), although some smaller krill species ( E. spinifera  and  E. crystallorophias ) and occasional copedods are also consumed (Ohsumi et al. 1970; Stewart & Leatherwood 1985). They do not appear to feed much whilst in the breeding grounds of lower latitudes (<20% off South Africa: Best 1982; <3% off Brazil: Williamson 1975), although when they do feed their diet remains krillbased (Best 1982). The distribution of newly weaned calves is unknown, but likely to be in lower latitudes. As the Antarctic Krill is not present in lower latitudes, this species is unlikely to be an important part of the diet of weaned calves. Rather, weaned calves probably feed on copepods, small euphausiids or fish (Best 1982). The summer distribution of immature Minke Whales north of 40° S (and particularly north of 30° S) in the south-western Indian Ocean also supports this hypothesis (Gambell et al. 1975).Observations of feeding Antarctic Minke Whales have not been reported in detail. Euphausiids (krill) are pelagic and tend to occur in the upper layers of Antarctic waters (Thomas & Green 1988), suggesting that Antarctic Minke Whales do not require deep diving to forage.','Globally, whaling activities have been the biggest threat to Antarctic Minke Whales. Coastal whaling operations caught hundreds of Antarctic Minke Whales off South Africa and South America from the mid-1960s (Best 1982; Williamson 1975), although none were caught from Australian land stations (Bannister et al. 1996). In the Southern Ocean, the Antarctic Minke Whales were largely ignored in the early days of modern industrialised whaling because of their small size, but as the larger rorquals (baleen whales) were successively depleted, attention of the whalers turned to the Antarctic Minke Whale (Perrin & Brownell 2002). Antarctic Minke Whales, therefore, only became a major commercial target in the Antarctic from the early 1970s. After 1979, the IWC only allowed Minke Whales to be taken by factory-ship whaling operations, resulting in annual catches ranging to about 8000 in the Antarctic (Horwood 1990). As of the 1985–86 Antarctic season, all commercial whaling was banned under an IWC moratorium (Perrin & Brownell 2002). However, takes of approximately 400 Antarctic Minke Whales are permitted per year under a scientific whaling permit.Potential future threats could include a resumption of commercial whaling, as well as direct disturbance from seismic and/or defence operations, collision with large vessels, and entanglement in fishing gear (Bannister et al. 1996).Pollution, including increasing amounts of plastic debris at sea, oil spills and dumping of industrial wastes into waterways and the sea, leading to bio-accumulation of toxic substances in body tissues, could be considered an increasing threat to the Antarctic Minke Whale, particularly on the breeding grounds in lower latitudes (Aguilar et al. 2002).The prey of the Antarctic Minke Whale, which is predominently euphausiids (krill), are harvested in the Antarctic (Martenson et al. 1994). However, the krill fishery is controlled by the Commission for the Conservation of Antarctic Marine Living Resources (CCAMLR) under its ecosystem-based approach to fisheries management, which should prevent over-fishing and potential competition with Antarctic Minke Whales for krill resources.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=67812'),('68','Zyzomys pedunculatus','Critically Endangered','Mammalia','Muridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=68'),('68050','Isoodon obesulus obesulus','Endangered','Mammalia','Peramelidae','The Southern Brown Bandicoot ( Isoodon obesulus ) is a medium sized ground dwelling marsupial with a long tapering snout, a naked nose, a compact body and a short tail. Males weigh between 500–1850 g and females 400–1200 g (Van Dyck & Strahan 2008). They have an average body length of 33 cm for males and 30 cm for females, with an average tail length of 11.3 and 12.4 cm for females and males respectively (Van Dyck & Strahan 2008).','Southern Brown Bandicoots (eastern) are known to inhabit a variety of habitats including heathland, shrubland, sedgeland, heathy open forest and woodland and are usually associated with infertile, sandy and well drained soils, but can be found in a range of soil types (Coates et al. 2008; Menkhorst and Seebeck 1990; NSW DEC 2006; Paull 1993). Within these vegetation communities they typically inhabit areas of dense ground cover. Species experts define suitable habitat for Southern Brown Bandicoots (eastern) to be any patches of native or exotic vegetation, within their distribution, which contains understorey vegetation structure with 50–80% average foliage density in the 0.2–1 m height range. In areas where native habitats have been degraded or diminished, exotic vegetation, such as Blackberry (Rubus spp.), can and often does, provide important habitat (DSEWPaC 2011g).Vegetation structure appears to be more influential than floristics in determining Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) abundance (Brown & Main 2010). In particular, the density of ground layer vegetation appears to be important - sites with greater vegetation density in the ground layer are generally preferred (Claridge & Barry 2000; Claridge et al. 1991; Lobert 1985; Lobert 1990; Opie 1980; Paull 1993; Paull 1999; Wilson 2004).For a modeling exercise, Paull and colleagues (2013) identified the following optimal and suboptimal habitat types:DomiNAt speciesStructureSuitabilityTallest stratumBanksia  spp.heathlandOptimalCasuarina  spp.low woodland, low open woodlandOptimalEucalyptus  spp.tall open forest, open forest, low open forest, woodland, open woodland, low woodland, low open woodland, open scrub tall shrubland, tall open shrublandOptimalMelaleuca  spp.low woodland, low open woodlandOptimalAcacia  spp.low open woodlandSuboptimalMixed or otherlow woodland, low open woodland, tall shrubland, tall open shrubland, heathland, open heathlandSuboptimalLower stratumlow shrubs <2 mOptimallow trees <10 mSuboptimaltall shrubs >2 mSuboptimalFire managementMany of the habitats occupied by Southern Brown Bandicoots (eastern) are prone to fire (Braithwaite 1983; Lobert 1990). Early investigations on habitat requirements conducted within the Royal Botanical Gardens in Cranbourne Victoria (RBGC) by Braithwaite and Gullen (1978) and by Stoddart and Braithwaite (1979) found Southern Brown Bandicoots (eastern) to prefer dry heath of a younger successional stage. However, subsequent studies by Opie (1980) and Lobert (1985), again at RBGC, indicated preferences for vegetation at mature successional stages. Menkhorst and Seebeck (1990) concluded that the ecological management of habitat to maintain a mosaic of different successional stages of vegetation created by controlled fires best serves their conservation.Hope (2012) found that, after a low intensity fire, post-fire population\'s were stable for up to five months. Other studies have shown the negative impact of high intensity fire (Thompson et al. 1989) and there is evidence of local extinction following low intensity fire, possibly in response to feral predators or habitat loss (Hope pers. obs. cited in Hope 2012). There was a slight shift to non-combustible refuge sites post-fire. Animals were observed foraging in burnt areas, although it is unknown whether this was due to site fidelity, territoriality or supply of resources.NestingSouthern Brown Bandicoots (eastern) use dense, low vegetation for nest and shelter sites (Lobert & Lee 1990; Paull 1993; Stodart 1977; Wilson 2004), construct leaf/grass nests in depressions within this vegetation (Paull 1993; Paull 1995) and possibly also dig burrows (Long 2009, cited in Brown & Bain 2010). In south-eastern South Australia and near Sydney, Grass Tree ( Xanthorrhoea  spp.) was found to be particularly important for Southern Brown Bandicoots (eastern), with animals establishing their nests within the `skirts\' of dead foliage that reach the ground (Paull 1995; Wilson 2004).Coarse woody debris is also important, as logs may offer shelter and nesting sites (Claridge 1988). Southern Brown Bandicoots (eastern) in northern Sydney have also demonstrated opportunistic use of spaces under rocks and burrows created by other animals (Ecotone Ecological Consultants 2003, cited in Brown & Main 2010). The subspecies may dig its own burrows to avoid extreme weather conditions and fire (Long 2009, cited in Brown & Main 2010).','The Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) is omnivorous, opportunistically exploiting a wide variety of food resources such as invertebrates (mainly insects but also earthworms and other invertebrates), plant material and fungi (Stoddart and Braithwaite 1979, Lee & Cockburn 1985). In south-eastern NSW, Claridge and colleagues (1991) found that sympatric populations of Southern Brown Bandicoots (eastern) and Long-nosed Bandicoots,  Perameles nasuta , had very similar diets, feeding mainly on ants, beetle larvae and plant material. Seeds and the fruit-bodies of hypogeous fungi were also consumed on a seasonal basis. There was some partitioning of the fungal species eaten (NSW DEC 2006). Opie (1980) and Lobert (1985) reported that Southern Brown Bandicoots (eastern) in southern Victoria mainly fed on a range of invertebrates during summer and autumn while during winter and spring the fruit-bodies of hypogenous (underground fruiting) fungi were favoured. The availability of free water does not influence habitat use since Southern Brown Bandicoots may occur large distances from suitable sources (Moloney 1982). Instead, Southern Brown Bandicoots (eastern) obtain sufficient water from dew and dietary items such as fungal fruit-bodies (Lobert 1985). Water in food may completely account for the total daily water needs of the species (Nagy et al. 1991).Southern Brown Bandicoots obtain food by searching and probing the litter and ground vegetation, or by digging in the soil (Gordon 1974; Stodart 1966). Food in the soil is located by smell (Moloney 1982).The foraging activity of the Southern Brown Bandicoot is indicated by the presence of characteristic scratch marks in the soil, often conical in shape and several centimetres deep. These forage diggings cannot be distinguished from those made by other bandicoot species such as the Long-nosed Bandicoot (NSW DEC 2006). The holes are dug with the forefeet, and are usually large enough to accommodate the animal\'s snout when it is searching for food (Stodart 1983). A single animal may dig multiple holes in a small area if food is locally concentrated resulting in the soil litter cover being severely pock-marked (NSW DEC 2006).','The major threats to the Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) are habitat loss or modification, fragmentation, inappropriate fire regimes and extensive wildfires, introduced predators, and isolation of populations (Claridge & Barry 2000; NSW DEC 2006; TSSC 2001d)Introduced predatorsThe subspecies is preyed upon by European Red Foxes ( Vulpes vulpes ) and Wild Dogs ( Canis lupus familiaris ), and presumably by Feral and domestic cats ( Felis catus ) (Claridge et al. 1991; Paull 1999). Analysis of hair from predator scats has shown the Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) to be a regular prey item of introduced predators, especially dogs and foxes, in many areas (Brown & Main 2010). Evidence indicates that the impact of fox predation on Southern Brown Bandicoots (various sub-species) is serious in many locations while the significance of cat predation is not known (Brown & Main 2010). The absence of the foxes in Tasmania is thought to be a factor contributing to the widespread distribution and abundance of the species, while in South Australia the presence of this introduced predator coincided with the disappearance of bandicoots from several areas (Hornsby 1984). There is also some evidence to suggest that foxes affect the sex ratio of Southern Brown Bandicoot populations, with female animals being more susceptible to predation than male animals (Dickman 1988b). The Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) has demonstrated changes in foraging behaviour in response to fox predation (Coates 2008).  Small terrestrial mammals, such as the Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern), may often be restricted to sites that offer protection from predation through high levels of ground cover (Caughley 1994, cited in Brown & Bain 2010).  Coates (2008) found that when fox control reduced predation pressure, Southern Brown Bandicoots (eastern) used new sites with sparser vegetation cover.Activities that reduce or modify habitat structure, such as frequent prescribed burning and weed management, may expose Southern Brown Bandicoots (eastern), which rely on dense ground cover, to increased predation (Brown & Bain 2010).  Predation is also likely to be exacerbated in areas where natural habitat is fragmented.  The proximity of cleared areas could lead to increased fox densities in remNAt habitat, and greater levels of predation of dispersing individuals because of reduced cover (Brown & Main 2010).Predation by the European Red Fox and Feral Cats are listed as a key threatening process for the Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) under the EPBC Act and the  Threatened Species Conservation Act 1995 (NSW) .Natural predators of the Southern Brown Bandicoot include quolls, snakes and a variety of diurnal and nocturnal raptors (Heinsohn 1966; Lobert 1985).Habitat loss and modificationThe clearance of native habitat for urban, agricultural and pastoral use has been implicated in the local extinction of populations of the Southern Brown Bandicoot across several states, including Victoria (Seebeck 1977; Menkhorst & Seebeck 1990), Tasmania (Moloney 1982) and South Australia (Aitken 1983). Habitat may also be made unsuitable through the loss of key habitat elements such as the modification or removal of the lower vegetation strata through inappropriate fire regimes or stock grazing (Brown & Main 2010). Wide scale clearing of native vegetation in the Bega Valley (in southern NSW) in the early part of this century led to massive decline in the number of bandicoots, although there is some question over whether these were Southern Brown or Long-nosed Bandicoots (Lunney & Leary 1988).Weed invasion can also degrade Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) habitat complexity (Brown & Main 2010).Dieback, caused by the plant pathogen  Phytophthora cinnamomi , can alter the structural and floristic composition of habitats.  This root-rot fungus causes disease and death in a variety of native plants, and therefore can affect the Southern Brown Bandicoot by destroying its shelter and food resources (Environment Australia 2001m; Haby & Long 2005).  Dieback is listed as a key threatening process for the Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) under the EPBC Act. Grazing and trampling by domestic stock can also degrade bandicoot habitat (Brown 1989, cited in Brown & Main 2010; Haby & Long 2005).FragmentationIsolation has negative effects on the distribution and occurrence of many species, due primarily to animals being restricted or prevented from dispersing between isolates (Bennett 1999, cited in Brown & Main 2010). Population modelling has indicated that the probability of extinction for a single population in continuous habitat is much less than for the multiple isolated populations of the same total size in a fragmented landscape (Reed 2004, cited in Brown & Main 2010).A study in south-western Victoria found that fragmentation of forest habitat was one important reason for the decline and local extinctions of the local mammal fauna, including the Southern Brown Bandicoot being absent from smaller patches (Bennett 1990).  Similar regional declines have been documented in south-eastern NSW (Lunney & Leary 1988).Connectivity is likely to be an important factor in the subspecies\' survival in fragmented and isolated habitats.  Relatively small areas of habitat, such as linear strips along drains, roads and rail reserves, may be important in providing connectivity between larger habitat patches (Brown & Main 2010). For example, Southern Brown Bandicoots (eastern) use such habitat in the Western Port region of Victoria (Coates et al. 2008).Fire regimesThe effects of wildfire on the species,  Isoodon obesulus , are poorly known, although anecdotal information suggests that the species may respond positively to such disturbance in some instances. In Tasmania, populations of the subspecies ( I. o. affinus ) recovered well after wildfire (Hemsley 1967). Similarly, at Nadgee Nature Reserve in southern NSW, bandicoots ( I. obesulus  and/or  Perameles nasuta ) were seen to increase in numbers four to five years after a severe wildfire and then decrease (Catling & Newsome 1981). In the same general area, following a repeat fire of similar intensity, bandicoots did not reach peak abundance until 14–15 years post disturbance (P. Catling n.d., pers. comm. cited in NSW DEC 2006). To some extent, the rapidity with which bandicoots recover post fire may depend on how quickly ground vegetation re-establishes. In some cases ground cover does not develop quickly enough, leading to the decline of populations. For example in the Mount Lofty Ranges in South Australia, wildfire caused a long term reduction in the area of dense ground cover and localised extinctions of the Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) populations (Anon. 1989 cited in NSW DEC 2006; Thompson et al. 1989).Braithwaite (1983) has hypothesised that the decrease in frequency of fire following European occupation of south-eastern Australia has led to an overall decline in the distribution and abundance of the species. This hypothesis contrasts with the recent listing of frequent fire as a threatening process for the Southern Brown Bandicoot under the  Threatened Species Conservation Act 1995 (NSW).  The view put forward by Braithwaite stems largely from observations made by Stoddart and Braithwaite (1979) at a single Victorian site, where animals were found to preferentially occupy young regenerating heathland. Research on the distribution and habitat preferences of the Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) in South Australia, conducted by Paull (1995), supports the observations of Stoddart and Braithwaite (1979), in so far as animals were more likely to be found in areas with recent (5–7 year) evidence of fire. However, this seral stage of habitat was by far the most commonly represented across study sites, and bandicoots were also present in very recently burnt (1–2 year) and long unburnt (> 20 year) habitats. Although it appears that the species may be favoured by the careful and strategic use of prescribed fire, more information is required on the scale, intensity and timing of burning for conservation of the subspecies.Logging regimesIn south-eastern NSW, suitable habitat for the Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) is subject to intensive (integrated) logging practices. There have been no long term studies examining the effects of such practices on the species. Richards and colleagues (1990) considered that in the short term the species was potentially at risk immediately following logging through loss of ground cover and increased predation. Significantly, Claridge and colleagues (1991) noted anomalies in a population of the species in Yambulla State Forest, in unlogged patches of forest adjacent to recently logged areas. At the time of their study, the population mostly comprised old male animals and there was no indication of breeding activity among the only female sampled. This was in contrast to observations of a range of sex and age classes of animals from the same population made by the (then) Forestry Commission of NSW prior to logging. Later trapping at the same sites failed to record the presence of the subspecies (Mills 1999), although animals have recently been detected elsewhere in Yambulla State Forest by State Forests NSW. Other observations indicate that the Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) is capable of successfully recolonising previously logged forest, leading some authors to suggest lack of deleterious impact (Fanning & Mills 1989; Fanning & Rice 1989). Green (1982) reported the Tasmanian subspecies reinhabiting five year old regrowth forest. Significantly though, introduced predators were largely absent.Road killThere are several road kill records of the Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) within Ku-ring-gai Chase National Park, immediately north of Sydney, and a smaller number from elsewhere in the southern part of the state. This indicates that where roads intersects suitable habitat, animals may be harmed by vehicular traffic when moving around their home ranges. The level of road kill of the subspecies elsewhere throughout the greater Northern Sydney Metropolitan Area is unknown since relevant mortality registers have not been kept (NSW DEC 2006).Risks faced by small populationsSmall populations are typically at greater risk of extinction than larger ones because they are more susceptible to unpredictable events or changes to factors that influence population dynamics. In small populations this can cause irreversible changes to age structure and sex ratios of populations, which in turn can severely limit a population\'s ability to recover from a catastrophic event.For example, habitat for the Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) within Garigal National Park (NSW) is small in area, highly fragmented, fire prone and within close proximity to residential development. When these attributes are taken together, the remaining habitat is potentially threatened by repeated habitat modification in the form of hazard reduction burning and/or wildfire, or erosion caused by land clearing. This population is also under threat from predation from the European Red Fox (NSW DEC 2006). In addition, animals within this population are showing signs of inbreeding depression (Johnston et al. 2002). Due to all of these factors, the Garigal National Park population is considered at high risk of extinction.Studies on the genetic diversity of the Southern Brown Bandicoot (eastern) indicate low levels of mitochondrial DNA variability and divergence in Sydney, south-eastern NSW, East Gippsland and Mt Gambier (Zenger et al. 2005).  The study also revealed a small effective population size of female bandicoots, most likely a consequence of large scale population contraction and recent population bottlenecks in some areas.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=68050'),('682','Hirundapus caudacutus','Vulnerable','Aves','Apodidae','The White-throated Needletail is a large (20 cm in length and approximately 115–120 g in weight) swift with a thickset, cigar-shaped body, stubby tail and long pointed wings. Sexes are alike, with no seasonal variation, and juveniles are separable with good visibility. The adults have a dark-olive head and neck, with an iridescent gloss on the crown; the mantle and the back are paler, greyish; and the upperwings are blackish, sometimes with a greenish gloss, with a contrasting white patch at the base of the trailing edge; the uppertail is black with a greenish gloss. The face is dark-olive with a narrow, white band across the forehead and lores and a white patch on the chin and throat. The underparts are generally dark-olive except for a U-shaped band across the rear flanks, the vent and the undertail coverts, and the undertail is black with a greenish gloss. The underwing is black brown with glossy grey-brown flight feathers. The bill is black, the eyes black-brown and the legs and feet are dark grey, sometimes with a pinkish tinge.','In Australia, the White-throated Needletail is almost exclusively aerial, from heights of less than 1 m up to more than 1000 m above the ground (Coventry 1989; Tarburton 1993; Watson 1955). Because they are aerial, it has been stated that conventional habitat descriptions are inapplicable (Cramp 1985), but there are, nevertheless, certain preferences exhibited by the species. Although they occur over most types of habitat, they are probably recorded most often above wooded areas, including open forest and rainforest, and may also fly between trees or in clearings, below the canopy, but they are less commonly recorded flying above woodland (Higgins 1999). They also commonly occur over heathland (Cooper 1971; Learmonth 1951; McFarland 1988), but less often over treeless areas, such as grassland or swamps (Cooper 1971; Gosper 1981; Learmonth 1951). When flying above farmland, they are more often recorded above partly cleared pasture, plantations or remNAt vegetation at the edge of paddocks (Emison & Porter 1978; Friend 1982; Tarburton 1993). In coastal areas, they are sometimes seen flying over sandy beaches or mudflats (Cooper 1971; Crompton 1936; Davis 1965), and often around coastal cliffs and other areas with prominent updraughts, such as ridges and sand-dunes (Cooper 1971; Dawson et al. 1991; Loyn 1980; Mitchell et al. 1996; Schulz & Kristensen 1994). They are sometimes recorded above islands well out to sea (Brandis et al. 1992; Cooper 1971; Warham 1957).Feeding habitatIn Australia, White-throated Needletails almost always forage aerially, at heights up to \'cloud level\', above a wide variety of habitats ranging from heavily treed forests to open habitats, such as farmland, heathland or mudflats (Learmonth 1951; McDonald 1938; Tarburton 1993; Templeton 1991), though they sometimes forage much closer to the ground in open habitats, once as low as about 15 cm in a coastal saltworks (Watson 1955). They sometimes forage over recently disturbed areas, such as forest that has been recently cleared or burnt, or above paddocks as they are being ploughed or slashed (Blakers et al. 1984; Bravery 1971). They often forage in areas of updraughts, such as ridges, cliffs or sand-dunes (Legge 1927; Loyn 1985a; Mitchell et al. 1996), or in the smoke of bushfires (McCulloch 1966), or in whirlwinds (Le Souëf & Campbell 1902). They often forage along the edges of low pressure systems, which both lift their food sources and assist with their flight, and it is said that they follow these systems across Australia (Boehm 1939). They seldom alight on the ground or vertical substrates to catch insects (Carlyle 1982; McCaskill 1943; Quested 1980).Roosting habitatThe species has been recorded roosting in trees in forests and woodlands, both among dense foliage in the canopy or in hollows (Corben et al. 1982; Day 1993; Quested 1982; Tarburton 1993), though the number of references to Needletails roosting in trees possibly over-emphasizes such occurrences (Higgins 1999). It has been suggested that they also sometimes roost aerially (Currie 1928; Dove 1919; Schulz & Kristensen 1994), and it was formerly erroneously thought that the species did not alight while in Australia (Pescott 1983).Breeding habitatThe species breeds in wooded lowlands and sparsely vegetated hills, as well as mountains covered with coniferous forests (Chantler 1999; Dement\'ev & Gladkov 1951).White-throated Needletails may take refuge during extreme conditions. Many birds were seen perching on the trunks of trees during a bushfire (Currie 1916; Currie 1928); during cold weather, one was found roosting during the day in the hollow branch of a eucalypt (Pettigrew & Wilson 1985) and some were seen sheltering in stunted scrub during bad weather on the high plains (Paterson 1930). They may also alight on the trunks or branches of trees during hot or inclement weather (Davies 1982; Littler 1910a; Loyn 1980; Whackett 1989; Wheeler 1959); and there is a record of Needletails resting on a lawn under sprinklers during hot weather (Davies 1982).The species does not rely on a listed threatened ecological community.','During the non-breeding season in Australia, the White-throated Needletail has been recorded eating a wide variety of insects, including beetles, cicadas, flying ants, bees, wasps, flies, termites, moths, locusts and grasshoppers (Cameron 1968; Dove 1918; Lea 1938; Madden 1982; McKeown 1944; Rose 1997a; Tarburton 1993; Tryon 1908).In Australia, White-throated Needletails almost always forage aerially, at heights up to \'cloud level\', though usually much lower (Cameron 1968; Davis 1965; Tarburton 1993). They often forage in areas of updraughts, such as ridges, cliffs or sand-dunes (Legge 1927; Loyn 1980; Mitchell et al. 1996), or in the smoke of bushfires (McCulloch 1966), or occasionally in whirlwinds (Le Souëf & Campbell 1902); and Needletails often forage along the edges of low pressure systems, which both lift their food sources, and assist with their flight (Boehm 1939). They do not pursue individual insects, but repeatedly dive through swarms of insects, taking prey which is almost in a direct line of flight, and then regain their original height before diving again, circling through prey-rich sites (Cameron 1968). They seldom alight on the ground or other substrates to catch insects (Carlyle 1982; McCaskill 1943; Quested 1980), and have also very occasionally been seen foraging by launching into the air from trees in pursuit of flying insects (McCaskill 1943; Quested 1980), or clinging to flowers on eucalypts, searching for insects (Wheeler 1956).','There appear to be few threats to the populations of White-throated Needletails.Australia  When in Australia, there is the constant threat of collision with overhead wires (Cameron & Hinchey 1981; Campbell 1930; Le Souëf 1917; Wheeler 1965a), windows (Slater 1964) and lighthouses (Draffan et al. 1983; Stokes 1983), though, as this affects only a few individuals, it is not a threat to the species overall.Elsewhere  On the species\' breeding grounds it was formerly hunted with nets placed near their breeding cliffs, and by using a decoy bird (Le Souëf 1907).The biological characteristic of the species which may poses a threat to its survival is that it regularly flies for thousands of kilometres over some of the most densely populated areas of the world, where the huge human population places enormous pressure on natural resources.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=682'),('68442','Pristis zijsron','Vulnerable','Chondrichthyes','Pristidae','Green Sawfish is a species of large ray from the family Pristidae. Green Sawfish have a shark-like body, a flattened head and an elongated snout or rostrum, which is studded with 24–28 pairs of unevenly-spaced rostral teeth. This tooth-studded rostrum is commonly described as the \'saw\'. The first dorsal fin origin is slightly behind the pelvic fin origin and the lower lobe of the caudal fin is much shorter than half the length of the upper lobe. Green Sawfish are greenish brown or olive in colour on their upper surfaces and pale to white on their undersides. Mature adult Green Sawfish can grow to 5 m in length in Australian waters (Last & Stevens 1994; TSSC 2008ny, 2008nz).','The Green Sawfish inhabits muddy bottom habitats and enters estuaries (Allen 1997; Stead 1963). It has been recorded in inshore marine waters, estuaries, river mouths, embankments and along sandy and muddy beaches (Peverell et al. 2004; Stevens et al. 2005; Thorburn et al. 2004). Stead (1963) reported that this species was frequently found in shallow water. Its habitat is heavily fished and often subject to pollution, habitat loss and degradation from coastal, riverine and catchment developments. Green Sawfish have been recorded in very shallow water (<1 m) to offshore trawl grounds in over 70 m of water (Stevens et al. 2005).Smaller specimens (<2.5 m in length) are more common in foreshore and offshore coastal waters (Thorburn et al. 2004), as well as estuaries and river mouths at slightly reduced salinities, but do not venture into freshwater. Larger individuals (>2.5 m in length) are found in both inshore and offshore waters. Their apparent preference for shallow inshore waters as nursery areas increases the likelihood of interaction with inshore gillnets (Stevens et al. 2005).During surveying for the  Status of Freshwater and Estuarine Elasmobranchs in Northern Australia  (Thorburn et al. 2004) three Green Sawfish were captured. Two were encountered over sand, while the other over fine silt. All sites at which the species was present were subject to tidal influence with high flow, and captures occurred in waters of 1.2–3 m depth. All three sites had sparse coverings of detritus and snags. Water chemistry at the sites where the Green Sawfish were encountered ranged from 34.2–35.1 ppt (Thorburn et al. 2004).Information on the short term habitat usage of a 3.5 m female Green Sawfish tracked in Port Musgrave, Queensland was obtained by Peverell and Pillans (2004). Over 27 hours, the sawfish moved 28.7 km at an average speed of 28.4 m/min and was at all times within 200 m of the shoreline in very shallow water. Average water depth was 0.69 m. During the day, the sawfish was in slightly deeper water (0.84 m) compared to the night (0.48 m) indicating a diurnal shift in water depth. The preference for shallow water shown by the sawfish in this study and the fact that it moved parallel to the shoreline suggests they may occupy a relatively small area of available habitat that is concentrated in a narrow strip of water adjacent to the shoreline (Stevens et al. 2005).  In Queensland, the Green Sawfish has been found in the same areas as Freshwater Sawfish and Speartooth Shark ( Glyphis glyphis ) within Port Musgrave (Peverell n.d., pers. comm., cited in Stevens et al. 2005). In the Gulf of Carpentaria, the Green Sawfish has been recorded in the same areas as Freshwater Sawfish. It has been recorded in the Van Diemen Gulf area with Freshwater Sawfish, Speartooth Shark and Northern River Shark ( Glyphis garricki ). Within Joseph Bonaparte Gulf, it has been recorded with the Northern River Shark and the Freshwater Sawfish (Stevens et al. 2005).','Sawfishes generally feed on shoaling fish such as mullet, which are stunned by sideswipes of the snout. Molluscs and small crustaceans are swept out of the sand and mud by the saw (Allen 1982; Cliff & Wilson 1994). In addition the Green Sawfish actively pursue schools of baitfish and prawns (Poganoski et al. 2002). One Green Sawfish, captured in a prawn trawl targeting BaNAa Prawns ( Penaeus merguiensis ) in Joseph Bonaparte Gulf, had a BaNAa Prawn and two 8 cm  Leiognathus bindus  in its stomach (Stevens et al. 2005). Peverell and Pillans (2004) observed a 3.5 m female Green Sawfish slashing its rostrum from side to side in shallow water. Herrings ( Nematalosa come ) and Anchovy ( Thryssa hamiltonii ) were observed jumping out of the water during these episodes, presumably to escape from the sawfish (Stevens et al. 2005).','Fishing pressureThe toothed rostrum of sawfish, combined with their active hunting behaviour, makes them highly susceptible to capture in all fisheries that utilise nets. Gillnet and trawl fisheries operate throughout the range of Green Sawfish and pose the greatest threat to the species in Australia (Stevens et al. 2005).Bycatch, or incidental capture, of Green Sawfish is known to occur in both the Pilbara Trawl Fishery and the Northern Prawn Fishery. Studies of shark and ray bycatch in the Northern Prawn Fishery have identified the Green Sawfish as a species that is particularly susceptible to capture, based on the species\' behaviour and habitat preferences. An estimated 73 Green Sawfish of unrecorded size are caught as bycatch in the fishery annually (Stobutzki et al. 2002). In 2005, the Pilbara Fish Trawl Fishery in Western Australia reported that 16 Green Sawfish were caught, of which 6 died. In 2006, 26 Green Sawfish were caught with 7 fatalities. Anecdotal reports suggest that most of these animals are killed before landing to prevent them from inflicting damage to the crew and equipment on board with their flailing rostrums (Stevens et al. 2005).Green Sawfish are also caught as bycatch in various gillnet fisheries in estuaries and inshore areas in north-western and northern Australia, particularly in the Gulf of Carpentaria (Stevens et al. 2005). The mortality of the species following interactions with this fishery is unknown.The increased demand for shark and shark products will place additional pressure on sawfish populations in remote areas. This is not restricted to the Australian shark fishery, but includes impacts by the escalating foreign shark fishing presence in the Gulf of Carpentaria and elsewhere in the north. Salini (n.d., pers. comm., CSIRO Marine Research, cited in Stevens et al. 2005) has Coastwatch data on illegal shark fishing vessels from 2001–04 which shows a significant increase in illegal shark fishing very close to Australia. The arrest of 27 foreign vessels during this period, is clear evidence of this increase in shark fishing effort (Stevens et al. 2005).The species is also caught by amateur fishers who sometimes kill the animals and remove the rostrum as a curio. Information on catch rates and post release mortality following capture by recreational fishers is unknown (TSSC 2008ny). In Australia, sawfish are known as a target sport fish and landings of sawfish have been recorded in recreational fishing competitions (Peverell 2005).Recreational catch of sawfish is very difficult to quantify, the emphasis necessarily focusing on available anecdotal evidence. Rostra mounted on the walls of fishers\' homes and in public establishments are testament to a long history of catch in northern Australia, extending into the fairly recent period of history before fishing licences and gear restrictions were introduced in Australia\'s north. An attempt was made to gather any available data and/or rostra dimensions from fishing clubs where sawfish are known to occur, and data sourced from previous research on recreational fisheries. Records in museum collections are often originally from the recreational sector (Stevens et al. 2005).Shark finningThe Green Sawfish is targeted as a high value species in the shark fin trade. This trade has been identified as a primary threat to the species globally. Shark fins (including sawfish fins) exported to Asia can be worth $100-250/kg (Stevens et al. 2005). The fins of a large adult Green Sawfish are reported to be worth up to $2500. Shark finning is known to occur both legally and illegally in Australian waters. A secondary targeted threat to the Green Sawfish is the opportunistic trade in sawfish rostrums, which are used in traditional Asian medicines and sold as curios in Australia and overseas (TSSC 2008ny).Habitat degradationWhile there is little  quantitative data, the number of sawfish appears to have declined drastically along the east coast of Australia over the last 40–60 years, with Green Sawfish now virtually extinct in NSW and south-east Queensland (Stevens et al. 2005). The disappearance of Green Sawfish from areas adjacent to dense human habitation suggests the species is sensitive to human disturbance. Habitat alteration and destruction caused by coastal development is likely to have a negative impact on the species, in particular disturbance to the inshore soft bottom areas they require for feeding and breeding (NSW DPI 2005; Stevens et al. 2005).Australian Indigenous harvestingThe Australian Indigenous harvest of Green Sawfish is currently unknown, however it has been suggested that sawfish play a significant cultural and spiritual relevance to Indigenous Australians around the Gulf of Carpentaria (Peverell 2005).Truelove (2003) provides information on the traditional utilisation of pristids, noting that they may represent a valuable, traditional source of food. Pristids have very high cultural and religious importance to some communities and there may be cultural restrictions on who can take them, limited to particular times and places. Some communities may use pristids as food for ceremonial purposes. Pristid rostra are used for ceremonial purposes by Indigenous peoples (Environment Australia 1998, cited in Stevens et al. 2005) and there are anecdotal reports that Indigenous peoples in the Weipa and Karumba area are buying sawfish rostra from commercial fishers. The rostra are then painted and the end product put onto the tourist market in Cairns (Truelove 2003).Reproduction constraintsGreen Sawfish are long lived, produce few young and mature late in life (Walker 1998). The low fecundity and late maturation of Green Sawfish render the species highly susceptible to anthropogenic mortality and limits the ability of the species to recover from other listed threats (Stevens et al. 2005; Stobutzki el al. 2002).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=68442'),('68444','Centrophorus harrissoni','Conservation Dependent','Chondrichthyes','Squalidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=68444'),('68447','Pristis clavata','Vulnerable','Chondrichthyes','Pristidae','The Dwarf Sawfish is a small, robust, shark-like ray which is mostly greenish-brown on the dorsal surface and white underneath, with paler fins. Early recorded specimens were significantly smaller than other sawfish species, around 140 cm in length, hence the common name of Dwarf Sawfish; however, recently specimens have been recorded with total lengths up to 318 cm (Stevens et al. 2008). The head is flattened with a broad rostrum (snout or bill) bearing 18–22 pairs of evenly spaced, lateral teeth. These rostral teeth are slender, with a groove developing along the rear margin of the tooth in adults (Thorburn et al. 2007a). The nostrils are broad with large nasal flaps and are located behind the eyes. The pectoral fins are triangular with broad bases and the dorsal fins are tall and pointed, with the first dorsal fin positioned over or just forward of the pelvic fin origin. There is no distinct lower lobe of the tail fin and the margin of the tail fin is almost straight (Larson et al. 2006; Last & Stevens 1994).','The Dwarf Sawfish usually inhabits shallow (2–3 m) coastal waters and estuarine habitats. Unlike the Freshwater Sawfish ( P. microdon ), the Dwarf Sawfish does not utilise any purely freshwater areas, as the species\' range is restricted to brackish and salt water (Thorburn et al. 2007a). A study in north-western Western Australia found that estuarine habitats are used as nursery areas by Dwarf Sawfish, with immature juveniles remaining in these areas up until three years of age (Thorburn et al. 2007a). Adults are known to seasonally migrate back into inshore waters (Peverell 2007), although it is unclear how far offshore the adults travel, as captures in offshore surveys are very uncommon.Thorburn and colleagues (2004a) captured 19 Dwarf Sawfish in their survey across northern Australia in 2002.  All individuals were caught over fine substrates (mainly silt) in sections of the river channels almost completely devoid of instream structure. Excluding one specimen caught in the Victoria River (9.7 ppt), all dwarf sawfish were taken from saltwater (up to 41.1 ppt) at lower estuarine sites with high turbidity (where measured) and low dissolved oxygen. Capture sites ranged in depth from 0.7 to 7 m and water temperatures were between 25 and 32 °C. All Dwarf Sawfish were captured on silt/sand flats with low algal and macrophyte cover, low detrital levels and minimal large woody debris (Thorburn et al. 2004a). The Dwarf Sawfish was encountered during sampling for Northern River Shark ( Glyphis garricki ) in Western Australia (Thorburn et al. 2004). Peverell (2005) and Stevens and colleagues (2008) suggests that the Dwarf Sawfish is also likely to be encountered in similar areas to the Green Sawfish ( P. zijsron ) and the Freshwater Sawfish ( P. microdon ).','As with other sawfish species, the Dwarf Sawfish uses its rostrum to stun schooling fish by sideswiping or threshing while swimming through a school (Larson et al. 2006). The main prey species is Popeye Mullet ( Rhinomugil nasutus ) (Thorburn et al. 2007b).','Susceptibility to fishing pressureThe toothed rostrum, active hunting behaviour, and their dependence on inshore and estuarine areas for breeding and juvenile habitat, makes the Dwarf Sawfish highly susceptible to capture in fisheries using nets. Estuarine and nearshore gillnet fisheries, such as those targeting Barramundi ( Lates calcarifer ) and King Salmon ( Eleutheronema tetradactylum ) capture sawfish of all species as bycatch. Records of the Dwarf Sawfish in commercial fishery bycatch have been almost exclusively from inshore net fishing activities (Giles et al. n.d., unpublished report, cited in Salini et al. 2007).The species\' numbers may have been significantly reduced as a result of bycatch through commercial fishing in Australia (Pogonoski et al. 2002). The Northern Territory government assessed the eligibility of the Dwarf Sawfish for listing as threatened under  Territory Parks and Wildlife Conservation Act 2000  in 2006. Under this assessment it was estimated that the Dwarf Sawfish had declined in Northern Territory waters by more than 30% within the last three generations of the species, based on potential levels of exploitation (Larson et al. 2006). This estimation was based on data describing the susceptibility of the species to various fishing practices in coastal and estuarine habitats, as described in Peverell and colleagues (2004).Researchers studying the Dwarf Sawfish in the Gulf of Carpentaria have noted that survey catches of this species are lowest in areas where commercial fishing is concentrated. Population numbers are considered healthier in more remote areas, although total numbers of the species still appear to be low, as Dwarf Sawfish are encountered infrequently in surveys, and there is a high rate of recapture of tagged specimens (S.C. Peverell 2008, pers. comm., cited in TSSC 2009bm).Recreational fishers are known to have collected sawfish rostra as souvenirs, but the extent of this activity is currently unquantified (Thorburn et al. 2004). Information on catch rates and post-release mortality following capture by recreational fishers is also unknown.If the distribution of the Dwarf Sawfish does, or did once, extend outside Australia, the extra-limital populations are likely to have been subject to far more intensive fishing than the population in Australian waters. An assessment for the IUCN in 2006 inferred that if the species occurred outside Australian waters then it is likely to be nearing extirpation in those waters (Cook et al. 2006).Indigenous harvestThe Australian Indigenous harvest of all sawfish species, including the Dwarf Sawfish, is generally unquantified (Thorburn et al. 2004).Habitat disturbance and degradationHabitat disturbance and degradation of coastal areas adjacent to coastal development has been identified as a threat to other sawfish species. However, this is currently considered a lesser threat to the Dwarf Sawfish, as its remote habitat has been subject to low levels of disturbance due to the relatively low levels of development in the areas of northern Australia where the species is found (Peverell 2005).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=68447'),('68448','Anoxypristis cuspidata','','Chondrichthyes','Pristidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=68448'),('68449','Epinephelus daemelii','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Serranidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=68449'),('68453','Galeorhinus galeus','Conservation Dependent','Chondrichthyes','Triakidae','The School Shark is a moderately slender, bronze-grey shark with a very large sub-terminal lobe on the caudal fin (giving it a double-tailed appearance); a small second dorsal fin; relatively long snout; very small anterior nasal flaps; and sub-triangular teeth with oblique cusps and lateral cusplets (Last & Stevens 1994; Stevens 2005).','The School Shark is most abundant in cold to temperate continental seas, from the surfline and very shallow water to well offshore (Compagno et al. 2005). It is primarily a deep water demersal (bottom-dwelling) species, although individuals have been recorded undertaking daily vertical migrations, remaining at depths of around 500 metres during the day and moving up to around 100 metres at night (McLoughlin 2007). Females and juveniles utilise inshore coastal areas around Victoria, Tasmania and parts of South Australia for nursery areas (Pogonoski et al. 2002).','Adult School Sharks are predatory and feed mainly on teleost (ray-finned) fish and bottom-associated species, but may also feed on pelagic species (Stevens 2005). Squid and octopus, as well as other cephalopods are also important constituents of their diet. The diet of juvenile School Shark may include a higher proportion of crustaceans, annelids and gastropods (Stevens 2005).','The current mature biomass of the School Shark has been estimated to be below 20% of the pre-fishing level (Walker et al. 2005).Australian fishing pressureThe main threat identified for school shark is fishing pressure. Fishing for the School Shark in Australia began in 1927 in eastern Bass Strait using hooks, with catches reaching 400 t/year to 500 t/year by the mid 1930s (AFMA 2009d). The fishery continued to grow throughout the 1940s, spreading to eastern South Australia and Tasmania as demand for both meat and shark liver oil grew. Demand for shark liver oil fell in the 1950s and catches declined until demand for meat grew again in the 1960s (AFMA 2009d).Gillnets were introduced to the fishery in 1964 and catches grew rapidly, peaking in 1969 at over 2500 t/year. The landing of large School Shark was banned in 1972 due to concerns about mercury levels which saw a large shift in effort to Gummy Shark. Once the mercury ban was lifted catches of School Shark again increased, mainly based on catches from Tasmania and South Australia (AFMA 2009d). Targeted fishing does not currently affect the School Shark, however this species is taken as Gummy Shark bycatch in Australian fisheries (Stevens 2005).Global fishing pressureThe School Shark has long been the target of directed fisheries in most parts of its range. School Shark are harvested for meat, liver oil (squalene) and fins (Stevens 2005). An intensive fishery operating in California between 1937–1945 took over 24 million tonnes of School Shark, resulting in a rapid population crash and closure of the fishery (Stevens 2005). In the Southwest Atlantic, School Shark have suffered intense declines yet continue to be fished. In the Brazilian and Uruguayan Fisheries, the catch per unit energy rate of the School Shark has declined to almost zero (Walker et al. 2005).Nursery areasThe School Shark population in southern Australia appears to have been affected by historic fishing pressure and ongoing habitat degradation to inshore nursery areas (TSSC 2009b). Some pupping areas in southern Australia have been closed to targeted shark fishing (including all large mesh netting), however degraded habitat is restricting recruitment and recovery.Declines in abundance of neonatal and juvenile School Sharks have been documented in inshore and coastal waters off Victoria and southern Tasmania, although the causes for the decline are difficult to conclusively identify (TSSC 2009b).The condition of, and threats to, School Shark nursery grounds have not been assessed across the species\' Australian distribution, making it difficult to determine the extent of the impact of nursery habitat degradation on the species as a whole (TSSC 2009b).Fishing at nursery sitesFisheries (commercial and recreational) operating in and around nursery areas threaten the School Shark populations by intercepting gravid females during their pupping migration, and by increasing mortality of juveniles (Stevens 2005).Intensive fishing of juvenile School Sharks in Port Phillip Bay in the 1940s (60 000 juveniles were caught annually between 1943 and 1945) caused rapid localised declines (Stevens 2005). Since the 1950s, only small numbers of School Shark have been caught anywhere in Port Phillip Bay. However, it must be noted that stock collapse in Port Phillip Bay may be the result of heavy industry development, especially near Geelong. Nevertheless, declines in abundance of juveniles in two Tasmanian nursery areas was attributed to intensified fishing of juveniles in inshore areas such as Port Phillip Bay. A continuation of this nursery area survey during the 1990s showed a substantial further reduction in abundance of School Shark pups and small juveniles in Tasmanian and Victorian embayments and estuaries (Olsen 1959; Stevens 2005; Walker et al. 2005).Overfishing of nursery grounds in Argentina are expected to cause stock collapse within the next 5–10 years if the current intensity levels continue (Walker et al. 2005).Nursery degradationNursery degradation is limiting the recruitment and recovery of the School Shark (AFMA 2009d). Since nursery areas are often located in inshore bays and estuaries they are vulnerable to the effects of habitat destruction (for example, loss of seagrass habitat), coastal development and pollution (sediment and chemical run-off) caused by increasing human populations in coastal areas (Stevens 2005). Moreover, changes to coastal habitats, such as the draining of swamps and the clearing of mangroves, is reducing the value of some pupping sites for the School Shark.The Geelong Arm in the western region of Port Phillip Bay was identified as an important nursery area for the species, and this area has been subject to pollution from heavy industrial activity (Walker 1998).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=68453'),('68455','Hoplostethus atlanticus','Conservation Dependent','Actinopterygii','Trachichthyidae','The Orange Roughy is a deep-bodied bright red demersal fish with large, rough scales (Stevens 2003). It fades to a pale orange after death (Yearsley et al. 1999). The Orange Roughy can grow to at least 60 cm but is more commonly between 35 and 45 cm in length (Yearsley et al. 1999). The maximum recorded weight is 3.6 kg but it usually weighs between 0.8 and 1.5 kg (Lack et al. 2003; Yearsley et al. 1999). The Orange Roughy is characterised by a dorsal fin with six spines, the last spine being the longest with 15 to 18 soft rays (flexible, branched and segmented structures that support the fish\'s fin). It has 19 to 25 weak scutes (bony plates or enlarged, ridged scales) along the belly and an anal fin with three spines and between 10 and 11 rays (Yearsley et al. 1999).  It has a milky white, boneless fillet (Australian Museum 2006; Lack et al. 2003). The fillet is deep, lengthy, tapers sharply and is slightly convex on the top (Yearsley et al. 1999). Orange Roughy flesh is sold after deep-skinning to remove both the skin and layer of oil. The oil is very distinctive, made up of high proportions of wax esters and monounsaturated fatty acids (95%). The oil contains very low levels of polyunsaturated fatty acids (PUFA), approximately 1%, hence contains low levels of omega-3 PUFA (Yearsley et al. 1999). The flesh contains 5.46% total lipids, 93% wax esters and low levels of cholesterol and phospholipids (de Koning 2005).','The Orange Roughy lives in cold, deep waters in the Atlantic, Pacific and Indian Oceans. They are most commonly found on the continental slope between 500 and 1400 m (Gomon et al. 2008), but have also been found at depths as shallow as 180 m and as deep as 1800 m (DEW 2007a). The species has also been described as predomiNAtly occurring over steep continental middle and lower slopes, oceanic ridges, and deep water corals (Bruce et al. 2002; UNEP 2004). They are generally found in water with temperatures between 4 to 7ºC (Lack et al. 2003). The Orange Roughy is found in spawning and feeding aggregations on and around remote seamounts, most notably the South Tasman Rise, Cascade Plateau and Lord Howe Rise (Kailola et al. 1993). Seamounts are mountains found undersea, often of volcanic origin which vary in height and size. Some may only rise 100 m from the seafloor whilst others are greater than 3000 m without breaking the surface of the ocean. It has been estimated that there are more than 100 000 seamounts throughout the world\'s oceans although only 200 have so far been studied in detail (UNEP 2006). Seamounts are areas of high productivity and endemism. They interact with the oceans around them, making them important hotspots for feeding, breeding and spawning of many deep-sea and open ocean species (UNEP 2006).The Orange Roughy is found in spawning and feeding aggregations on and around seamounts.  Seamounts are mountains found undersea, often of volcanic origin which vary in height and size. Some may only rise 100 m from the seafloor whilst others are greater than 3000 m without breaking the surface of the ocean. It has been estimated that there are more than 100 000 seamounts throughout the world\'s oceans although only 200 have so far been studied in detail (UNEP 2006). Seamounts are areas of high productivity and endemism. They interact with the oceans around them, making them important hotspots for feeding, breeding and spawning of many deep-sea and open ocean species (UNEP 2006).','The Orange Roughy is mainly an opportunistic feeder of mesopelagic and benthopelagic prawns, fish and squids. They occasionally feed on mysids, amphipods and euphausiids (Lack et al. 2003). Juvenile Orange Roughy mainly feed on mesopelagic and benthopelagic prawns whereas adults mainly feed on mesopelagic fish and squid. Daily food consumption rates have been estimated to be 0.91% body weight for juveniles and 1.15% body weight for adults (Bulman & Koslow 1992).The Orange Roughy forms dense feeding aggregations which are targeted by the fishing industry during the non-spawning season (Bruce et al. 2002).','Commercial trawling:The Orange Roughy\'s biological characteristics result in the species having very low resilience to fishing as the likelihood of being caught prior to reproduction is much higher in comparison to other fish species (DEW 2007a). Commercial trawling has been identified as a key threat to Orange Roughy populations (DEW 2007a; Pogonoski et al. 2002). Commercial trawling has a negative impact on Orange Roughy populations by directly reducing stock numbers and potentially reducing population numbers through degradation of habitats (Edgar et al. 2005; Pogonoski et al. 2002).Species interaction:Although little is known about the trophic (food chain) interactions of Orange Roughy, it is likely that any reductions in Orange Roughy biomass will have impacts on the species on which they feed and which feed on them (Bruce et al. 2002). Surveys in New Zealand have shown declines in a number of species associated with the Orange Roughy, either directly through by-catch or indirectly through trophic or habitat interactions (Clark et al. 2000 as cited in DEWHA 2008a). It is unknown what the implications and extent are of Orange Roughy being caught as by-catch in fisheries targeting other species occurring in similar habitats (DEWHA 2008a).Habitat damage:Commercial bottom trawling on seamounts severely affects benthic fauna either through physical damage or through by-catch. One of the main by-catch species caught during commercial trawling are cold water corals; the loss of these corals leads to habitat degradation (UNEP Press release 2004). Due to the importance of seamounts to the spawning of Orange Roughy, it has been hypothesised that habitat damage from commercial trawling may affect recruitment of Orange Roughy (DEWHA 2008a). The  Orange Roughy Conservation Programme  includes a prohibition on targeted fishing in known aggregation areas over seamounts to minimise the potential for habitat destruction and disturbance (AFMA 2006).Other:Other threats that may affect deep water corals and the fish that associate with them are impacts from oil and gas exploration, laying down of cables and telecommunications links and waste disposal (UNEP press release 2004).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=68455'),('68751','Carcharias taurus (east coast population)','Critically Endangered','Chondrichthyes','Carcharhinidae','The Grey Nurse Shark is one of four species belonging to the family Odontaspididae (Pollard et al. 1996). The species has a large, rather stout body and is coloured grey to grey-brown dorsally, with a paler off-white underbelly (Last & Stevens 1994). Reddish or brownish spots may occur on the caudal fin and posterior half of the body, particularly in juveniles (Last & Stevens 1994; Pollard et al. 1996). The species has a conical snout, long awl-like teeth in both jaws (with single lateral cusplets), similarly sized first and second dorsal fins and an asymmetrical caudal fin (Last & Stevens 1994; Pollard et al. 1996). Grey Nurse Sharks grow to at least 360 cm in length (Last & Stevens 1994). The Grey Nurse Shark is a slow, but strong, swimmer and is thought to be more active at night (Pollard et al. 1996).','Grey nurse sharks are found primarily in warm temperate (from subtropical to cool temperate) inshore waters around rocky reefs and islands, in or near deep sandy-bottomed gutters or rocky caves, and occasionally in the surf zone and shallow bays. They are often observed hovering motionless just above the seabed (Pollard et al. 1996). They have been recorded at varying depths down to 230 m on the continental shelf, but are most commonly found between 15–40 m (Otway & Parker 2000). They generally occur either alone or in small to medium sized groups, usually of fewer than 20 sharks (Pollard et al. 1996). When observed alone they are thought to be moving between aggregation sites (Environment Australia 2002).Critical habitats and key aggregation sites exist adjacent to the region in New South Wales and southern Queensland state waters, as well as several in Commonwealth waters at the Cod Grounds and Solitary islands. These regular aggregation sites may play an important role in pupping and/or mating activities (Bansemer & Bennett 2008).','The diet of the adult Grey Nurse Shark consists of a wide range of fish, other sharks and rays, squids, crabs and lobsters (Compagno 1984). In Australia it is likely that the Grey Nurse Shark diet consists of species such as pilchards (Genus:  Sardinops ), jewfish (Genus:  Glaucosoma ), tailor (Genus:  Pomatomus ), bonito (Genus:  Sarda ), moray eels (Family: Muraenidae), wrasses (Family: Labridae), sea mullet (Genus:  Mugil ), flatheads (Family: Platycephalidae), Yellowtail Kingfish ( Seriola lalandi ), small sharks, squid and crustaceans (N. Otway n.d., pers. comm., cited in Environment Australia 2002a). Observations also suggest that schools of Grey Nurse Sharks can feed cooperatively by concentrating schooling prey before feeding on them (Compagno 1984; Ireland 1984). It is important to note that many of the species that comprise the Grey Nurse Shark diet are also harvested by commercial, recreational and spearfishing interests (Environment Australia 2002a).','Commercial Fishing  Commercial fisheries that impact or potentially impact on Grey Nurse Sharks (east coast population) include (Environment Australia 2002a): JurisdictionFisheryNSWOcean Trap and LineNSWOcean Fish TrawlNSWOcean Prawn TrawlQueenslandEast Coast TrawlQueenslandQueensland Line FisheriesEastern Tuna and Billfish Fishery Recreational Fishing  Shark Finning  Shark Control Activities  Ecotourism  Shark Deterrent Devices  Aquarium Trade Commercial aquaria holdings of Grey Nurse Sharks in Australia include (Environment Australia 2002a): AquariumMalesFemalesTotalUnderwater World, Queensland347Underwater World, Western Australia178Melbourne Aquarium, Victoria123Sydney Aquarium, NSW235Manly Oceanworld, NSW347Total102030','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=68751'),('68752','Carcharias taurus (west coast population)','Vulnerable','Chondrichthyes','Carcharhinidae','The Grey Nurse Shark is one of four species belonging to the family Odontaspididae (Pollard et al. 1996). The species has a large, rather stout body and is coloured grey to grey-brown dorsally, with a paler off-white underbelly (Last & Stevens 1994). Reddish or brownish spots may occur on the caudal fin and posterior half of the body, particularly in juveniles (Last & Stevens 1994; Pollard et al. 1996). The species has a conical snout, long awl-like teeth in both jaws (with single lateral cusplets), similarly sized first and second dorsal fins and an asymmetrical caudal fin (Last & Stevens 1994; Pollard et al. 1996). Grey Nurse Sharks grow to at least 360 cm in length (Last & Stevens 1994). The Grey Nurse Shark is a slow, but strong, swimmer and is thought to be more active at night (Pollard et al. 1996).','Grey Nurse Sharks are often observed hovering motionless just above the seabed, in or near deep sandy-bottomed gutters or rocky caves, and in the vicinity of inshore rocky reefs and islands (Pollard et al. 1996). The species has been recorded at varying depths, but is generally found between 15–40 m (Otway & Parker 2000). Grey Nurse Sharks have also been recorded in the surf zone, around coral reefs, and to depths of around 200 m on the continental shelf (Pollard et al. 1996). They generally occur either alone or in small to medium sized groups, usually of fewer than 20 sharks (Pollard et al. 1996). Grey Nurse Sharks that are observed alone are thought to be moving between aggregation sites (Environment Australia 2002a).','The diet of the adult Grey Nurse Shark consists of a wide range of fish, other sharks and rays, squids, crabs and lobsters (Compagno 1984). In Australia it is likely that the Grey Nurse Shark diet consists of species such as pilchards (Genus:  Sardinops  ), jewfish (Genus:  Glaucosoma ), tailor (Genus:  Pomatomus ), bonito (Genus:  Sarda ), moray eels (Family: Muraenidae), wrasses (Family: Labridae), sea mullet (Genus:  Mugil ), flatheads (Family: Platycephalidae), Yellowtail Kingfish ( Seriola lalandi ), small sharks, squid and crustaceans (N. Otway n.d., pers. comm., cited in Environment Australia 2002a). Observations also suggest that schools of Grey Nurse Sharks can feed cooperatively by concentrating schooling prey before feeding on them (Compagno 1984; Ireland 1984). It is important to note that many of the species that comprise the Grey Nurse Shark diet are also harvested by commercial, recreational and spearfishing interests (Environment Australia 2002a).','Commercial FishingThe Grey Nurse Shark (west coast population) is caught incidentally in droplines, commercial demersal nets and other line fishing gear. The demersal gillnet fishery that operates between Steep Point and the South Australian border is the cause of significant numbers of deaths of Grey Nurse Sharks (west coast population) from incidental bycatch in the southwest marine region (Chidlow et al. 2006; DEWHA 2008a; Pollard et al. 2003). Between 1989–1997, from 70 to 105 Grey Nurse Shark (west coast population) catches were recorded annually in the demersal gillnet fishery (Pollard et al. 2003).Grey Nurse Sharks were utilised for their fins and for the high quality leather that could be produced from their skin (Roughley 1955). Grey Nurse Shark meat has been utilised fresh, frozen, smoked, dried and salted for human consumption (Compagno 1984).In spite of legislative protection Grey Nurse Sharks are still under threat from incidental catch in some commercial fisheries. Professional fishers once avoided the rocky habitats where Grey Nurse Sharks congregate but with improved technology (such as Geographical Positioning Systems) they are able to navigate more accurately and fish closer to these areas. There are very few records of Grey Nurse Sharks being caught in Commonwealth managed fisheries (Environment Australia 2002a).Commercial fisheries that impact, or potentially impact, on Grey Nurse Sharks (west coast population) (Environment Australia 2002a):JurisdictionFisheryWestern AustraliaNorthern Shark FisheryWestern AustraliaWest Coast Demersal Gillnet and Demersal Longline FisheryWestern AustraliaSouthern Demersal Gillnet and Demersal Longline FisheryThe Grey Nurse Shark (west coast population) is caught as a bycatch in Western Australian commercial shark fisheries. Between 1985 and 2000, 52.3 t (live wet weight) of Grey Nurse Sharks (west coast population) were caught in the Joint Authority Demersal Gillnet and Demersal Longline Fishery and the West Coast Demersal Gillnet and Demersal Longline Fishery (R. McAuley n.d., pers. comm., cited in Environment Australia 2002a). In addition it is estimated that 6.6 t of Grey Nurse Sharks (west coast population) were taken as bycatch in the Western Australia Northern Shark Fishery in 1996 (Stevens 1999). This northern Western Australia data may not be entirely accurate as there are some problems with identifying vessels licensed to operate in this fishery and there is likely to be some misidentification of the species (R. McAuley n.d., pers. comm., cited in Environment Australia 2002a). Even though the species became protected in Western Australia in 1997, it is most likely still caught as bycatch in commercial shark fisheries (Environment Australia 2002a).Shark FinningThe high market value for shark fins is leading to a level of catch of sharks worldwide that may be unsustainable. As such, the practice of shark finning, where the fins are removed and the carcass discarded, poses a threat to Grey Nurse Sharks (Environment Australia 2002a).The Department of Fisheries has implemented a ban where fishers in Western Australia waters are required to land whole sharks at port before the fins can be removed. An interim ban on the at sea finning of sharks has been implemented in all Commonwealth tuna long line fisheries (Environment Australia 2002a).There are, however, commercial fisheries in Australia that take shark fins as by-product. Shark finning is poorly documented in Australian fisheries and several fisheries in Australia target sharks. Approximately 92 t of dried shark fin was exported from Australian fisheries in 1998–99, valued at about $5.5 million. In 1998–99, approximately 7700 t of landed shark catch was reported from target shark fisheries. It is estimated that 55.6 t of the 92 t of export dried shark fin in 1998–99 were derived from target and non-target shark fisheries where the trunk is retained. The majority of this shark fin is from the Southern Shark Fishery, managed by the Commonwealth, and from the Western Australia\'s target shark fisheries (DAFF 2001).Recreational FishingIncidental catch from game fishing may be a potential threat for Grey Nurse Sharks although they are not favoured by game fishers as they are considered to be poor fights in comparison to other shark species. The impact of incidental catch by game fishers on Grey Nurse Shark populations remains unknown but is thought to be minimal in the south-west marine bioregion (DEWHA 2008a; Pollard et al. 2003).As late as the 1980s, Grey Nurse Sharks were perceived by the public as man-eaters, mainly due to their fierce appearance (Taronga Zoo 1996). This misunderstanding led to many Grey Nurse Sharks (east coast population) being killed in the 1950s and 1960s by the intensive fishing efforts of spearfishers using powerheads (Ireland 1984). One of the possible explanations for Grey Nurse Sharks being more abundant in Western Australia waters is that they were never subject to the spearfishing pressure during the 1950s and 60s that the Grey Nurse Shark (east coast population) encountered. Many spearfishers and divers have been involved in conservation activities including the protection of Grey Nurse Sharks and survey work on the species (Environment Australia 2002a).The Grey Nurse Shark (west coast population) is also threatened by commercial fishing practices. Hook wounds to Grey Nurse Sharks can puncture the stomach, pericardial cavity, and oesophagus causing infections and death. A hooked shark, upon release, may swim away seemingly unharmed, only to die several days later from internal bleeding or peritonitis. The stress of capture may cause changes in the physiology of a shark including bradycardia, blood acidosis, hyperglycaemia and muscle rigidity (Environment Australia 2002a).Autopsies have been carried out on 10 Grey Nurse Sharks that have been accidentally caught or killed. Six of these sharks had hooks inside them. As these hooks were not visible upon the initial, external examination, this suggests that the number of grey nurse sharks with embedded hooks seen during the underwater surveys is probably a significant underestimate of the total number of grey nurse sharks potentially being injured by fish hooks. (NSW Fisheries 2003; Otway & Parker 2000).EcoTourismIn Western Australia, there is a small tourism industry associated with diving with Grey Nurse Sharks (west coast population). This industry is currently not perceived as a threat to this species, but it remains uncertain whether frequent disturbance may displace Grey Nurse Sharks (west coast population) from important habitats (DEWHA 2008a).Ecotourism activities relevant to the Grey Nurse Shark include scuba diving and shark viewing operations. Interactions between snorkel and scuba divers and Grey Nurse Sharks were once relatively common. However, these interactions are now rare (Pollard et al. 1996).The Grey Nurse Shark has become a big attraction to scuba divers and increasing pressure has been placed on operators to take divers to places where they can encounter these sharks (Otway & Parker 2000). It is possible that poorly managed shark viewing operations at popular sites may deter site-attached populations from residing in the area. There have been reports of scuba divers disturbing Grey Nurse Sharks, either accidentally or deliberately (Pollard et al 1996).If divers continue to keep their distance whilst diving with these sharks it is unlikely that scuba diving will have any detrimental effects on the shark\'s survival (Otway & Parker 2000). Divers are often in the best situations to observe Grey Nurse Sharks and show genuine interest in surveys, education and conservation of the species. Regular viewing trips, when properly managed, offer a good opportunity for data collection on these and other sharks (Bruce 1995).While ecotourism is not currently perceived as a major threat to the Grey Nurse Shark, growth in this industry is expected and preventative actions taken now may reduce any impacts in the future. These actions may include a range of options such as seasonal closures of these activities in marine protected areas, or the development and uptake of a code of conduct for commercial operators and dive clubs (DEWHA 2008a; Environment Australia 2002a).Shark Deterrent DevicesSharks show the greatest sensitivity to electrical stimuli in the animal kingdom. Further information is thus needed on the effect of shark deterrent devices on Grey Nurse Sharks. Devices such as the \'Shark Pod\' (or Protective Oceanic Device) emit an electrical field that repels sharks. The Shark Pod repels sharks at close quarters by creating an electrical field around the scuba diver that totally disrupts the shark\'s ampullae of Lorenzini. The ampullae of Lorenzini are the natural electrical detectors situated along a shark\'s face that are used to detect minute electronic signals emitted by potential prey (Taylor 1997). It is not known what effect these types of shark deterrent devices may have on Grey Nurse Sharks.There is a report of a diver using a Shark Pod device in the shark gutter at the Tollgate Islands off Batemans Bay (N. Otway n.d., pers. comm., cited in Environment Australia 2002a). The Grey Nurse Sharks (east coast population) were disturbed by the shark deterrent device and left the gutter that they normally inhabited. These Grey Nurse Sharks (east coast population) did not return until several days later. This type of impact needs to be prevented, and shark deterrent devices should not be used at known Grey Nurse Shark aggregation sites (Environment Australia 2002a).Aquarium TradeGrey Nurse Sharks are a good species for captive display due to their size, slow movement, relatively docile nature and slow metabolic rate. They are popular with the public due to their size and fierce appearance. As early as the 1950s Grey Nurse Sharks that were retrieved alive would sometimes be sold to aquariums for display purposes (Edwards 1997; Fisheries Department of Western Australia 1996).There are 30 Grey Nurse Sharks in commercial aquaria in Australia. These aquaria are also involved in Grey Nurse Shark captive breeding programs, survey work and educational programs. Aquariums have been actively involved in research activities on Grey Nurse Sharks including behavioural and breeding studies (Environment Australia 2002a).Commercial aquaria holdings of Grey Nurse Sharks in Australia (Environment Australia 2002a):AquariumMalesFemalesTotalUnderwater World, Western Australia178Underwater World, Queensland347Melbourne Aquarium, Victoria123Sydney Aquarium, NSW235Manly Oceanworld, NSW347Total102030','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=68752'),('69374','Seriolella brama','Conservation Dependent','Actinopterygii','Centrolophidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=69374'),('69402','Thunnus maccoyii','Conservation Dependent','Actinopterygii','Scombridae','The Southern Bluefin Tuna is one of 13 species of tuna in the Family Scombridae. The Southern Bluefin Tuna is a long and muscular fish, with a fusiform and rounded body that is nearly circular in cross section. They are dark blue to black on the dorsal surface and silvery white on the lower sides and belly. They have colourless transverse lines alternating with rows of colorless dots and small scales covering the skin. There are two dorsal fins, the first dorsal fin is yellow or bluish, the anal fin and the finlets are dusky yellow edged with black. Keels are present near the tail and are coloured yellow in adults (Carpenter & Niem 2001).','NA','The Southern Bluefin Tuna is described as a high-level apex predator and an opportunistic feeder, preying on a wide variety of fishes, crustaceans, cephalopods, salps, and other marine animals. As larvae, the species mainly consumes microcrustacea and macrozooplanktonic crustacea, and some cannibalism does occur (Caton 1991). As juveniles, a large proportion of the Southern Bluefin Tuna\'s diet consists of sardines (Ward et al. 2006). Smaller adult Southern Bluefin Tuna feed mainly on crustaceans, and larger adults on fish in deeper, colder waters (Caton 1991; Davis & Farley 2001).','Commercial fishingCommercial fishing is the major threat to the Southern Bluefin Tuna (TSSC 2010aw). The species has undergone very severe reduction in numbers as a result of heavy fishing pressure throughout its range. The Scientific Committee of the Commission for the Conservation of Southern Bluefin Tuna (CCSBT) completed a revised stock assessment of Southern Bluefin Tuna in 2009 (CCSBT 2009). This assessment estimated that the spawning stock biomass of the species was at around 5% or less of unfished levels. The stock assessment also indicated a general decline in recruitment since about 1970, coincident with declining spawning stock sizes. There were four particularly poor recruitment years from 1999–2002, and indications of some further poor recruitment after 2004, which will lead to a further decline in spawning stock biomass (CCSBT 2009a). On the basis of these findings of the stock assessment, the CCSBT recommended the immediate implementation of measures to reduce catch quotas (CCSBT 2009a).The Southern Bluefin Tuna is one of the most highly valued fish species for sashimi, especially in Japan. The high price paid for the fish encourages targeted fishing, even when stock levels and catch rates are very low (Phillips et al. 2009). It is targeted by fishing fleets from a number of nations, both on the high seas and in the Exclusive Economic Zones of Australia, New Zealand, Indonesia and South Africa (Phillips et al. 2009). Though reasonably fecund, the single known spawning area of the species and the long maturity period means juveniles, most targeted by fishing, are vulnerable to over exploitation (NSW DPI FSC n.d.).HistoricCommercial fishing for the species began off south-eastern Australia in the 1930s. The species was heavily fished in the 1950s and 1960s, predomiNAtly by Japanese vessels, with the annual global catch peaking at over 81 000 tonnes in the early 1960s (Phillips et al. 2009). There have been continuous stock declines since the 1950s with a very low stock level recorded in the mid 1990s. Further declines were recorded in 2002 and there has been no evidence of stock rebuilding in 2009 (TSSC 2010aw).Ongoing fishing pressureJuvenile Southern Bluefin Tuna (20 kg, 2–4 year old fish) are targeted in the Great Australian Bight by Australian purse seine fishers that corral fish which are fed in grow-out pontoons until a harvestable weight is reached. This method targets surface schooling fish and can remain profitable even if low catch rates render pelagic longlining commercially non viable. Fish are caught from December to May, kept and fed for approximately three months or till a marketable size which may be up to eight months. Management issues related to this method include diet and disease associated with penning (Glencross et al 2002; Munday et al. 1997; Phillips et al. 2009). In 2007–08, 99.6% of Australian Southern Bluefin Tuna were harvested using nets and grow-out pontoons (Phillips et al. 2009).Outside of the Great Australian Bight, Southern Bluefin Tuna are harvested as bycatch by pelagic longliners. Longliners harvest fish from all age classes, from three year old juveniles to adults over 12 years old (Phillips et al. 2009). In 2007–08, this catch constituted 0.4% of the total Australian Southern Bluefin Tuna harvest (Phillips et al. 2009).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=69402'),('720','Psephotus chrysopterygius','Endangered','Aves','Psittacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=720'),('738','Polytelis swainsonii','Vulnerable','Aves','Psittacidae','The Superb Parrot is a medium-sized (length: 40 cm; weight: 130–160 g) parrot with bright green plumage and a long tail. The males and females are dimorphic. Males are generally bright green, though slightly paler and yellowish below, with a blueish wash on the crown and nape, a bright-yellow face and bright red band across the throat, slightly darker green tail, and a blue leading edge to the upperwing. The bill is brownish red, the eyes red; and the legs and feet are grey. Females are paler than males, being generally dull green with a blueish-green wash to the face, grading to greyish green on the upper throat, a pale pinkish patch on the lower throat, and a dull yellow-green underbody with pink-red thighs. The bill is brownish red, the eyes crimson and the legs and feet grey. Juveniles are generally similar to adult females except without any blueish wash to the face or pink wash to the throat (Higgins 1999).','The Superb Parrot mainly inhabits forests and woodlands dominated by eucalypts, especially River Red Gums ( Eucalyptus camaldulensis ) and box eucalypts such as Yellow Box ( Eucalyptus melliodora ) or Grey Box ( E. microcarpa ). The species also seasonally occurs in box-pine ( Callitris ) and Boree ( Acacia pendula ) woodlands (Webster 1998).The Superb Parrot uses a number of habitats for different activities. Superb Parrots breed in either River Red Gum forests and woodlands or box woodlands (Webster 1998). In the Riverina Region of NSW and adjacent areas of Victoria, the Superb Parrot usually breeds in forests dominated by large mature River Red Gums, typically close to watercourses, though nests are also occasionally located in Blakely\'s Red Gum ( E. blakelyi ), Grey Box ( E. microcarpa ), Red Box ( E. polyanthemos ) and Inland Red Box ( E. intertexta ) (Webster 1988). In the South-west Slope Region of NSW, Superb Parrots breed in box-gum forests and woodlands dominated by River Red Gum, Blakely\'s Red Gum, Apple Box ( E. bridgesiana ), Grey Box, White Box ( E. albens ) and Red Box (Webster 1998).There is a positive correlation between the locations of Superb Parrot nest sites and the occurrence of extensive tracts of suitable foraging habitat (Webster 1988). In the Murray-Riverina, nest sites are usually located no further than 10 km from foraging habitat, and in the South-west Slope Region, breeding and foraging habitats may coincide at some sites, and are no further than 10 km away at other sites (Webster 1988, 1998).In the Riverina Region of NSW and adjacent areas of Victoria, the Superb Parrot forages in box eucalypt woodland, particularly that dominated by Yellow Box or Grey Box, and occasionally Black Box ( E. largiflorens ). In the South-west Slope Region, the species forages in box-gum woodlands dominated by White Box, Yellow Box and Blakely\'s Red Gum, and also in crops of wheat ( Triticum aestivum ) or oats ( Avena sativa ) (Webster 1988). Outside the breeding season, some Superb Parrots forage in scattered Boree woodlands or box-pine woodlands between the Murrumbidgee and Murray Rivers (Webster 1998).Because the Superb Parrots often use different habitats for different activities, the timing of their occurrence in each habitat may vary with the time of year. Between mid-January and early April, Superb Parrots do not use the River Red Gum breeding habitats on the Edward and Murrumbidgee Rivers, and their whereabouts at this time is unknown (Webster 1988). Between April and August, they inhabit forests and woodlands dominated by River Red Gum, box-gum, White Cypress Pine ( Callitris glaucophylla ) and Boree (Webster 1998).The Superb Parrot inhabits listed threatened habitats such as grassy Yellow Box-Red Gum woodlands listed as Endangered under the  Nature Conservation Act 1980  (ACT Government 1999c) and White Box-Yellow Box-Blakely\'s Red Gum Grassy Woodland and Derived Native Grassland listed as Critically Endangered under the EPBC Act (NSW NPWS 2002c). These habitats are also home to several other threatened species of birds, including the Bush Stone-curlew ( Burhinus grallarius ), Swift Parrot ( Lathamus discolor ), Brown Treecreeper ( Climacteris picumnus ), Painted Honeyeater ( Grantiella picta ), Regent Honeyeater ( Xanthomyza Phrygia ) and Hooded Robin ( Melanodryas cucullata ) (ACT Government 1999c; Tzaros 2005a). Some threatened mammals such as the Squirrel Glider ( Petaurus norfolcensis ) and Brush-tailed Phascogale ( Phascogale tapoatafa ), also inhabit similar hollows in large trees (Gibbons & Lindenmayer 2002).','The Superb Parrot forages on many different species of plants, most of which occur in woodlands dominated by gum and box eucalypts, and, in some areas, in woodlands dominated by Boree, native pine,  Callitris , or box-native pine associations (Higgins 1999; Webster 1988). When foraging on the ground, Superb Parrots often eat the seeds of plants such as the native Ringed Wallaby-grass ( Danthonia caespitosa ), barley-grasses ( Critesion ), as well as cereal crops including wheat, oats and canola ( Brassica napus ); and spilt grain (Christie 2004; Webster 1988; Webster & Ahern 1992). They also eat the seed-pods of many understorey species of wattles such as Gold-dust Wattle ( Acacia acinacea ), Silver Wattle ( A. dealbata ) and Deane\'s Wattle ( A. deanei ) and cultivated Cootamundra Wattle ( A. baileyana ) (Christie 2004; Webster 1988, 1991). When foraging in the forest canopy, Superb Parrots eat the flowers and fruits of eucalypts, especially in spring and summer (Christie 2004; Frith & Calaby 1953; Webster 1988), the berries of mistletoe, such as Box Mistletoe ( Amyema miquelii ) and Grey Mistletoe ( A. quandang ) (Webster 1998), and, in winter,  lerps from the foliage of eucalypts (Webster 1998).The Superb Parrot feeds mainly on the ground (Frith & Calaby 1953), with one study recording that of all foraging observations, 55% were of Parrots foraging on the ground (Webster 1988). Superb Parrots will also forage on spilt grain along roadsides, resulting in large numbers of collisions with vehicles (Klapste 1977; Taylor & COG 1992; Vestjens 1973; Webster & Ahern 1992). Early in the 20th century, many Superb Parrots were killed by eating poisoned seeds intended for the control of other ground-feeding fauna, mainly rabbits and Galahs (Egger 1911; Le Souëf 1921, 1923, 1924).','Habitat Clearing and DegradationThe most significant threat to the Superb Parrot is widespread clearing, degradation and fragmentation of box woodland throughout the species\' range, especially breeding and foraging habitats, and corridors of vegetation used for regular movements (Webster 1988). The specific combination of nesting and foraging habitat required by this species means that degradation or destruction of either habitat renders the area unsuitable for breeding. Along the Murray River between Tocumwal and Yarrawonga, box woodland (the key foraging habitat for the Superb Parrot) has been cleared from areas within 10 km of breeding sites in River Red Gum forests, and nesting no longer occurs in this area. Further removal of box woodland is likely to result in a reduction in the number of breeding sites, and increased fragmentation of the species\' breeding range (Webster 1998). In the South-west Slope Region, clearing of box woodland has been extensive, and suitable habitat for the Superb Parrot now exists only in wooded roadside reserves, travelling stock routes and camping reserves, and other small remNAt patches of woodland, many of which are on freehold land (Christie 2004; Webster 1998). It is notable that, in the South-west Slope Region and around Goolgowi, the foraging habitat also serves as breeding habitat (Webster 1998). Although box woodlands within the breeding range are not generally regarded as valuable for sawlogs, they are extensively harvested for fencing timber and firewood (ACT Government 1999c; Christie 2004; Webster 1998).In addition to breeding and foraging habitat, the Superb Parrot is threatened by clearing of wooded corridors that the species relies on when moving locally to find food, and when moving between breeding and non-breeding habitats (Christie 2004; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Webster 1988; Webster & Ahern 1992). The expansion of urban areas of Canberra has also resulted in the clearing of large tracts of forest and woodland, formerly suitable for breeding (ACT Government 1999c; Davey 1997; Taylor & COG 1992).The felling of nest trees in both the Riverina and South-west Slope Regions is another major threat to the Superb Parrot. Hardwood timber harvesting of River Red Gum forests reduces the number of older trees, thus slowing the process of development of suitable nest hollows. Between 1890 and 1970, many large River Red Gums which may have been nest trees were felled, and many others were ring-barked (Webster 1998).Fire may also cause the degradation of breeding and foraging habitats (ACT Government 1999c; Webster & Ahern 1992).GrazingGrazing by stock can reduce the amount of food available to Superb Parrots, especially at critical times (ACT Government 1999c; Webster 1998). For example, in Gulpa Island State Forest, the fruit of the Dwarf Cherry ( Exocarpos strictus ) provides an important source of food for Superb Parrot fledglings. During dry years, grass-cover within the forest is patchy, so that Dwarf Cherry shrubs are grazed heavily by stock, which may, in turn, influence the survival of Parrot fledgelings (Webster 1998). Grazing may also cause repeated disturbance to Parrots during foraging on the ground (Webster 1998).Hydrological ChangesThe exploitation and regulation of water in watercourses throughout the range of the Superb Parrot directly affects the health of both the breeding and foraging habitats. Intensification of irrigation within the Murrumbidgee and Murray River valleys is resulting in the decline of remNAt woodlands through rising water tables, placing remNAt stands of trees under stress (Porteners 1993). This loss of trees is especially important in areas used as feeding sites during both the breeding and non-breeding seasons.In addition, highly regulated waterflows in the Edward River threaten trees used for nesting by the Superb Parrot. River Red Gums can only withstand continuous flooding for about three years before they begin to show signs of stress, and the continuous high flows in the Edward River do not allow the forest to dry out, leading to a significant decline in the health of nest trees (Webster 1998).Competition for nest sitesCompetition for nest hollows may become a limiting factor for the species (ACT Government 1999c; Christie 2004; Webster 1998). Introduced species such as Common Starling ( Sturnus vulgaris ), Common Myna ( Acridotheres tristis ) and Honey Bees ( Apis mellifera ) are competitors for nest hollows (ACT Government 1999c; Christie 2004), and native competitors, such as the Galah ( Eolophus roseicapilla ), Long-billed Corella ( Cacatua tenuirostris ) and Little Corella ( C. sanguinea ) have greatly increased their populations in recent years (Webster 1998), leading to increased competition for a declining number of nest hollows. The availability of food, however, is considered a more important factor in some areas in limiting the size of the population of the Superb Parrot (Leslie 2005).PoisoningSuperb Parrots are also adversely affected by insecticides sprayed onto crops to control insect pests (ACT Government 1999c; Webster & Ahern 1992). Early in the 20th century great numbers were killed by poisoned grain intended for the eradication of Galahs and rabbits (Egger 1911; Le Souëf 1921, 1923, 1924). They are also said to have destroyed crops of early settlers (White 1912) and may have been shot while doing so (Higgins 1999).OtherOther factors affecting the survival of Superb Parrots in the wild include: trapping of Superb Parrots, and the removal of their eggs or chicks from nests (Taylor & COG 1992; Webster 1998; Webster & Ahern 1992); disturbance from recreational activities (Webster & Ahern 1992); and being killed by collisions with vehicles while foraging on roads, especially during harvesting season, when Superb Parrots congregate on roadsides to feed on spilt grain (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Klapste 1977; Taylor & COG 1992; Vestjens 1973; Webster & Ahern 1992). These factors, however, have a much less severe affect on the population than habitat loss (ACT Government 1999c; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Webster 1998).Beak and Feather DiseaseThe wild population of the Superb Parrot may also be subject to disease. Beak and Feather Disease is an infectious affliction suffered by parrots, caused by the Beak and Feather Disease circovirus. This common disease apparently originated in Australia. It is capable of causing very high death rates in nestlings, and the potential effects of the disease on parrot populations vary from inconsequential to devastating, depending on environmental conditions, and the general health and immunity of the parrots. Lesions suggesting Beak and Feather Disease virus have been identified in Superb Parrots. It can be introduced to threatened populations of parrots via the movements of common species carrying the disease (DEH 2005q).The Superb Parrot is potentially vulnerable to the effects of droughts (Webster & Ahern 1992).The main biological characteristic of the Superb Parrot which threatens its survival is its special requirement for specific breeding habitat (River Red Gum forests) and specific foraging habitat (box woodland) to be located no more than 10 km from each other. The species\' survival has been threatened by the clearance of both habitats (Garnett & Crowley 2000).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=738'),('744','Lathamus discolor','Critically Endangered','Aves','Psittacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=744'),('747','Neophema chrysogaster','Critically Endangered','Aves','Psittacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=747'),('75183','Dasyurus maculatus maculatus (Tasmanian population)','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','The Spotted-tailed Quoll (Tasmanian population) is a medium sized carnivourous marsupial and member of the Dasyuriade family. It is one of Australia\'s largest extant marsupial carnivores with males weighing between 2.6 kg and 4.6 kg and females between 1.5 kg and 2.2 kg. In extreme cases males have been recorded at 7 kg and females at 4 kg. Males are longer than females, growing to about 1.3 m in length, with females growing up to 85 cm (Bryant & Jackson 1999b). The northern subspecies,  Dasyurus maculatus   gracilis  is considerably smaller than the southern subspecies  Dasyurus maculatus maculatus.  They are both characterized by a thick neck, strong head and rounded nose. They have thick, short fur which is golden to dark chocolate brown on the back and a pale cream on the underside. The Spotted-tailed Quoll (Tasmanian population) has distinct white spots of varying size over the back, head and along the tail. They are agile both on the ground and when climbing. Their ability to climb is assisted by the ridges present in the pads of all their feet. The species is easily distinguished from other Quolls by its large and predominately spotted tail, from which it derives its name (Long & Nelson 2010a).','The Spotted-tailed Quoll (Tasmanian population) is a forest dependent species that occupies a large range of habitats. The species habitat is characterized by high annual rainfall and predictable rain patterns. The southern subspecies has been recorded in rainforests, wet and dry sclerophyll forest, coastal heathland, scrub and dunes, woodland, heathy woodland, swamp forest, mangroves, on beaches and sometimes in grassland or pastoral areas adjacent to forests. High densities of the species have been recorded in both dry and wet forests (Andrew 2005; Jones & Barmuta 2000).The species has an extensive home range, from several hundred to several thousand hectares. They are known to use multiple dens and change dens every 1–4 days. Den sites have been recorded at a variety of locations including rock crevices, hollow logs, hollow tree buttresses, tree hollows, windrows, clumps of vegetation, caves, boulder tumbles, under buildings, and in the dens of rabbits and wombats. Maternal den sites are similar to those mentioned above. Female Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) are known to dig burrows when a suitable substrate is available (Long & Nelson 2010a).A study of Spotted-tailed Quolls in south-eastern Australia (mainland population) revealed that prey density and den availability are the two main factors in the use of habitat. These results are likely to apply to the Tasmanian population in which suitable prey habitat is associated with predictable rainfall patterns and warm mean annual temperatures. Habitat critical to both subspecies of the Spotted-tailed Quoll contain adequate denning resources in large forest areas. This provides the species with a high density of mammalian prey (Long & Nelson 2010a).','Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) are carnivourous and hunt primarily on the ground, although arboreal behavior has been observed. Their diet consists primarily of mammals, particularly medium sized mammals; however, birds, reptiles and invertebrates are also eaten. The relative proportion of each component of the diet varies with the species\' sex, age, location and prey availability. Much of the species\' arboreal mammalian prey relies on tree hollows and shelter for breeding. As such forestry practices influence the abundance and availability of prey species. Logging and fire events are also likely to alter prey abundance. In Tasmania, predation on domestic poultry is also commonly reported, as well as scavenging of road kill fauna. These behaviors have subjected the species to persecution and may contribute to the species decline (Belcher 1995, 2000b; Belcher et al. 2007; Dawson et al. 2007; Glen & Dickman 2006b; Jarman et al. 2007).','The Tasmanian population of the Spotted-tailed Quoll is distributed throughout the entire island. Unlike its mainland relatives, declining population trends have not yet been quantified. The high rate of land clearing and habitat loss across the species\' core range, however, suggests a declining population. The  Draft Spotted-tailed Quoll Recovery Plan  (Long & Nelson 2010a) identifies the following key threatening processes for the species:Habitat loss and modificationHabitat loss and modification is widely accepted as the greatest threat to the Spotted-tailed Quolls (Belcher 2004; Jones et al. 2003; Mansergh 1984; Watt 1993). In Tasmania, an estimated 50% of the species core habitat has been removed by logging or for agricultural purposes. Of the remaining 50%, over half has been subjected to logging in the past 20 years. This is particularly noticeable in the north and northwestern regions of the state where habitat clearing for eucalypt and pine plantations accelerated significantly in the 1980s (Kirkpatrick & Jenkin 1996).Habitat clearing in Tasmania mirrors that of the mainland. In south-east Queensland over 70% of the species habitat has been cleared, mostly within the past 20 years. In Victoria, prior to European settlement, 74% of the state was forest and dense woodlands; today this has been reduced to 33% (Mansergh 1984). Urban development in coastal regions of NSW has also cleared the species local habitat and placed added pressure on the species (Andrew 2005).FragmentationIn many areas the habitat currently available to the Spotted-tailed Quoll is fragmented resulting in isolated populations (Mansergh 1984; Watt 1993). This results in inherent breeding complications, including difficulty in locating breeding partners and a lack of genetic diversity. The species naturally occurs in low population densities meaning isolated populations have inherent breeding difficulties. Furthermore the species breeds only once a year, placing further pressure on breeding adults. Isolated populations also lack the genetic diversity of non-isolated populations (Backhouse 2003; Firestone 2003; Watt 1993). Isolated populations are also subject to stochastic events (i.e. bush fires, floods) and more likely to become extinct due to such events (Long & Nelson 2010a).Timber harvestingRecent Population Viability Analysis modelling predicted major declines in the population of Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) in north-east Tasmania and a high risk of extinction. The model was based on a range of projected logging regimes. Furthermore surveys have indicated that only male Spotted-tailed Quolls and non-breeding females are located in recently logged forests (Long & Nelson 2010a). This indicates the need for proper habitat reservation and management within the state to ensure sustainable breeding populations are maintained.  Research suggests that forestry practices that remove or reduce prey or critical habitat (including trees with hollows, hollow logs and complex vegetation structure) may render the habitat unsuitable for the Spotted-tailed Quoll (Tasmanian population) (Watt 1993). Considering the long time periods required to produce hollows in trees and logs, the lack of availability of den sites is likely to place pressure on the species, particularly in the breeding season (Andrew 2005).Poison baitingThe use of 1080 (sodium fluroacetate) to control populations of Red Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ), wild dogs ( Canis lupus familiaris  and  Canis lupus dingo ) and the European Rabbit ( Oryctolagus cuniculus ) occurs extensively in the Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) range. Laboratory measurements indicate the lethal dose per individual that will kill 50% of the population (known as LD 50 ) is 1.85 mg/kg of body weight. The standard quantity of 1080 in baits varies from 3–6 mg, with a 3 mg dose sufficient to kill a juvenile Spotted-tailed Quoll (Long & Nelson 2010a).A single Spotted-tailed Quoll (Tasmanian population) has been observed taking bait from multiple bait stations placed 400–600 m apart. As the species is highly mobile, the removal of multiple baits is possible even from widespread bait stations. Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) are able to consume 700 g of food a day, making it possible for two baits to be consumed daily. To date however, little is known about the long-term health, survival or fecundity of Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) that ingest sub-lethal doses of 1080. Captive and field trials have shown that Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) will consume non-poisoned Foxoff baits (Belcher 1998; Murray 1998; Murray et al. 2000). Simulated aerial bating using non-poisoned baits found that 6 of 10 and 8 of 17 Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) took up the bait. In Tasmania meat baits are required to be buried 10 cm below the ground to minimise the take from native species. Field trials have found that Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) will take up bait buried at 10 cm but rarely anything deeper than this (Körtner et al. 2003).Studies on the impact of baiting on wild dogs and foxes revealed a surprisingly low number of Spotted-tailed Quoll deaths that could be attributed to the uptake of the bait. This is despite the fact the Spotted-tailed Quolls consumed a relatively large number of the baits. Possible reasons for the small number of deaths include: lack of bait palatability (Körtner et al. 2003), low bait uptake or failure to encounter baits (Claridge & Mills 2007; Körtner & Watson 2005), innate bait avoidance in populations exposed to regular baiting (Körtner & Watson 2005), partial consumption of baits and regurgitation or vomiting the bait before absorbing a lethal amount of 1080 (Claridge & Mills 2007; Körtner & Watson 2005; Körtner 2007).Overall the impact of 1080 baiting on the Spotted-tailed Quoll populations through field trials indicate they are probably not as susceptible to fatal poisoning as laboratory measurements indicate. This is further supported by large and healthy populations of Spotted-tailed Quolls within regions undergoing intensive baiting regimes. More research is needed to determine the impact of 1080 baiting on smaller populations (Claridge & Mills 2007; Körtner 2007).Competition and predation from introduced carnivoresIncidences in which the Spotted-tailed Quolls have been killed by feral cats ( Felis catus ), dogs ( Canis lupus familiaris ) and foxes have been reported; however the frequency of such attacks is not well known (Watt 1993). It is believed that predatory interactions between Quolls and feral animals are suppressing Quoll populations.Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) and introduced carnivores share diet and habitat. For this reason it is believed that there are also competitive pressures placed on the Quolls (Burnett 2001; Glen & Dickman 2008). Cats were introduced into Australia from the mid to late eighteenth century, however, no major declines in Quoll populations occurred until the nineteenth century. This coincides with the arrival of foxes and rabbits. This explains the relative abundance of Spotted-tailed Quolls in Tasmania as compared to the mainland, as foxes were not found in Tasmania until recently. In NSW, foxes were absent from four major populations of Spotted-tailed Quolls, however, in some regions there have been extensive spatial overlaps between foxes and Quolls. Similar results have been found in Queensland, indicating more research is needed into the interaction between Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) and feral predators (Long & Nelson 2010a).Recent research in Tasmania has revealed ecological and evolutionary evidence for interspecific competition among the surviving marsupial carnivores of Tasmania (Spotted-tailed Quoll (Tasmanian population), Eastern Quoll and Tasmania Devil). This is believed to contribute to the species natural rarity in the state (Jones 1997; Jones & Barmuta 1998). The impacts of introduced carnivores are likely to be magnified when combined with other threatening processes. Areas supporting fox populations are known to have severe habitat degradation, impacting the Spotted-tailed Quoll (Tasmanian population) (Burnett 1993).Deliberate killingDue to the Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) attacks on poultry runs, it is often persecuted by landholders. In extreme cases, landholders have reported killing up to 20 Quolls a year in Tasmania. Public perception of the species in certain areas is poor with some landowners threatening to kill Quolls regardless of whether they are threatening livestock (Burnett 1993; Watt 1993). This attitude is a likely result of misinformation in the public. A survey conducted in southern Queensland found that nearly half of all respondents believed the Spotted-tailed Quoll was an introduced feral animal. The impact of this persecution is not well known in Tasmania, however the demise of the species on King Island was attributed to human persecution (Green & McGarvie 1971). The clearing and continued fragmentation of Spotted-tailed Quoll (Tasmanian population) habitat is likely to increase the incidence of human encounters with Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) and potentially the incidence of persecution (Long & Nelson 2010a).Road mortalityIt is estimated that one to two Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) are killed daily on the main road between Hobart and the north-west of the state. Juvenile males are most likely as risk due to their extensive ranging behaviour. While the full impact of road mortality is not well known, other carnivorous marsupials have been significantly impacted (Long & Nelson 2010a). For this reason it is believed to be a significant factor in the decline of some Spotted-tailed Quoll populations (Oakwood 2000).Wildfire and prescription burningThe impacts on the Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) of wildfires and prescription burning are not well known in Tasmania (Gibbons & Lindenmayer 2002). The anticipated impacts are likely to be a reduction in prey and habitat; specimens found occupying a region one year after a major fire in NSW were in poor condition. Recent research also indicates that fire may be beneficial to Spotted-tailed Quolls (Tasmanian population) as they hasten the formation of tree hollows used by the species and its prey (Gibbons & Lindenmayer 2002).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=75183'),('75184','Dasyurus maculatus maculatus (SE mainland population)','Endangered','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','The Spot-tailed Quoll is a nocturnal, cat-sized, carnivorous marsupial with reddish-brown fur. It has distinctive white spots over its back and tail (Cronin 1991; Edgar & Belcher 2008).','The Spot-tailed Quoll has a preference for mature wet forest habitat (Belcher 2000b; Green & Scarborough 1990; Watt 1993), especially in areas with rainfall 600 mm/year (Edgar & Belcher 2008; Mansergh 1984). Unlogged forest or forest that has been less disturbed by timber harvesting is also preferable (Catling et al. 1998, 2000). This subspecies has been recorded from a wide range of habitats, including:temperate and subtropical rainforests in mountain areaswet schlerophyll forestlowland forestsopen and closed eucalypt woodlandsinland riparian and River Red Gum ( Eucalyptus camaldulensis ) forestsdry \'rainshadow\' woodlandsub-alpine woodlandscoastal heathlandsoccasional sightings from open country, grazing lands, rocky outcrops and other treeless areas (Edgar & Belcher 2008; Green & Scarborough 1990; Jones & Mansergh 1995a; Maxwell et al. 1996; NSW NPWS 1999; Reside 1997 cited in Dawson 2005; Rose 1996 cited in Dawson 2005).Belcher (2000b) observed that Spot-tailed Quolls at Suggan Buggan used escarpment and gully habitats. Possum, rat and antechinus scats were observed on the cliffs, rock ledges and outcrops along the escarpment suggesting that it was a prey-rich habitat. The gullies utilised by Spot-tailed Quolls featured an abundance of Rabbits ( Oryctolagus cuniculus ) and possums (Belcher 2000b).Habitat requirementsThe Spot-tailed Quoll is predomiNAtly nocturnal and rests during the day in dens (Jones et al. 2001). Habitat requirements include suitable den sites such as hollow logs, tree hollows, rock outcrops or caves (NPWS 1999at). Individuals also require an abundance of food, such as birds and small mammals, and large areas of relatively intact vegetation through which to forage (NSW NPWS 1999at). This subspecies is moderately arboreal and approximately 11% of travelling is done in trees (Jones 1995 cited in Jones et al. 2001).','DietSpot-tailed Quolls are predators of mainly medium-sized mammals (500–5000 g) (Edgar & Belcher 2008). The main prey items include: Ringtail Possum ( Pseudocheirus pererinus ), Common Brushtail Possum ( Trichosurus vulpecula ), Mountain Brushtail Possum ( Trichosurus caninus ), Greater Gilder ( Petauroides volans ) and Rabbit (Alexander 1980 cited in Dawson 2005; Belcher 1995, 2000b). Additionally, the subspecies consume insects, lizards, crayfish, poultry, birds, small mammals, frogs, fish, plant material and refuse that has been discarded by humans (Dawson 2005; Jones et al. 2001).Seasons and different habitats provide different primary feeding resources (Dawson et al. 2007). In tall wet forests of the escarpment ranges of southern NSW, Greater Gliders occur at high densities and are the main prey item of the subspecies (Belcher 2000b). In a dry rainshadow woodland habitat of the Kosciusko NP found Common Brushtail Possums to be the most utilised prey, with largomorphs (Rabbits and Hares ( Lepus europaeus )) becoming increasingly utilised following wildfire in the area (Dawson et. al 2007).Feeding behaviourThe Spot-tailed Quoll is adept at climbing high into trees and can capture possums, tree-roosting domestic Chickens ( Gallus gallus domesticus ) and sleeping birds at night (Fleay 1940; Jones 1995 cited in Jones et al. 2001). Spot-tailed Quolls have been recorded in tree hollows hunting Great Gliders (Belcher 2000b).','Habitat loss and degradation The loss, fragmentation, disturbance and degradation of habitat through clearing of native vegetation, timber harvesting and other forest management practices are probably the greatest threats to the Spot-tailed Quoll. The results of these actions include reduced prey abundance (such as Greater Gliders), greater Red Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) incursion, changed fire regimes (ACT Government 2005; Belcher et al. 2007; Catling & Burt 1995; Catling et al. 1998; Long & Nelson 2004).Predation Predation from Red Foxes, Dingos ( Canis lupus dingo ) and Domestic Dogs ( Canis lupus familiaris ), are current threats to quolls (Körtner & Gresser 2002; Murray & Poore 2004). The impacts of introduced predators on the Spot-tailed Quoll are likely to be magnified if they occur in conjunction with other threatening processes (Burnett 1993 cited in Long & Nelson 2004).Given the dietary and habitat overlap between the Spot-tailed Quoll and introduced carnivores, particularly the Cats ( Felis catus ) and foxes (Belcher 1994; Burnett 2001; Dickman 1996; Taylor 1986), competitive effects may also be occurring (Long & Nelson 2004).Timber harvesting, forest management activities and land clearing may increase Red Fox accessibility into forests. These activities are likely to have increased the distribution and abundance of Red Foxes in south-east NSW and led to the reduction in medium-sized ground-dwelling mammals of the area (Catling & Burt 1995; Catling et al. 1998). Less disturbed forests in north-east NSW have less Red Foxes and greater quoll occurrence (Catling et al. 2000; Backhouse 2003; Körtner & Gresser 2002; Maxwell et al. 1996).Fire Fire has a positive and negative impact on the habitat of Spot-tailed Quoll. The availability of prey and refugia may be limited in the short-term following fire, but in the longer term, fire may accelerate the formation of tree hollows used by this subspecies and their prey (ACT Government 2005; Long & Nelson 2004).Long-term post-fire mortality of the species is likely to be influenced by habitat patchiness, timber harvesting and the availability of prey and refuges to provide protection from predators. The reduced availability of prey may affect the fecundity of Spot-tailed Quolls and exacerbate competitive interactions with other predators (Long & Nelson 2004).Direct killing Spot-tailed Quolls have been killed by landholders in response to poultry coop raids (Long & Nelson 2004).Road mortality The large home ranges of the Spot-tailed Quoll, particularly males, makes them susceptible to road mortality in forested areas fragmented by roads, and a tendency to scavenge road-killed carcasses may increase this threat (Dawson 2005; Green & Scarborough 1990; Nelson 2004; Jones 2000 cited in Long & Nelson 2004; Jones et al. 2003; Long & Nelson 2004).Poisoning by Cane Toads   There is only anecdotal evidence indicating that Cane Toads ( Bufo marinus ) threaten Spot-tailed Quoll populations. The Chuditch ( Dasyurus geoffroii ) and Northern Quoll ( Dasyurus hallucatus ) are both known to be killed by the poison secreted by Cane Toads (Covacevich & Archer 1975 cited Long & Nelson 2004). Dramatic declines in Northern Quoll populations are attributed to Cane Toads (Oakwood 2004 cited in Long & Nelson 2004).1080 baiting Red Foxes, wild Dingos and wild dogs are the targets of pest-control programs in Australia, many of which involve the distribution of sodium monofluroacetate (1080) baits (Fleming et al. 2001; Glen & Dickman 2003a, 2003b; Saunders et al. 1995). Various studies have recorded the removal of baits by non-target animals and particular concern has been given to the possible effects of 1080 baiting on the Spot-tailed Quoll (Glen & Dickman 2003a, 2003b). Although Spot-tailed Quolls are more tolerant to 1080 than canids, the 6 mg dose of 1080 in fresh dog baits and 3 mg dose in fox baits is potentially fatal, particularly for smaller individuals, such as females and juveniles (Körtner & Watson 2005).Trail Baiting   Trail baiting involves laying bait along trails that foxes and dogs use. The removal of non-toxic baits was monitored during a simulated trail-baiting programme for foxes and wild dogs in the central tablelands of NSW in 2000–01 (Glen & Dickman 2003b). This study showed that Spot-tailed Quolls have the ability to locate and remove non-toxic baits buried at a depth of 7 cm, either beneath the ground surface or in a mound. The study also showed that individual quolls can remove baits from several bait stations on the same night. For instance, one individual was recorded removing baits from at least three, possibly four, consecutive bait stations on the same night (Glen & Dickman 2003b). Although some Spot-tailed Quolls may survive the dose of 1080 contained in a single Foxoff ® bait (3 mg of 1080) (McIlroy 1981), the chances of survival after consuming two or more baits is greatly reduced (Glen & Dickman 2003b). However, while Spot-tailed Quolls take non-toxic meat baits, Spot-tailed Quolls may avoid eating baits containing 1080 based on smell or taste and/or vomit or regurgitate baits before absorbing a lethal dose (McIlroy 2007). Subsequent reviews and practices have indicated that baits placed in areas where dogs and foxes are likely to travel (e.g. along tracks), and spaced at least 200 m apart, are less likely to pose a threat to non-target animals such as quolls (especially when baits are buried to a depth of 10 cm or deeper) (APMVA 2008).Trail-baiting trials were conducted on the eastern escarpment of the New England Tablelands (NSW) during 2000–01 (Körtner & Gresser 2002). The trials, which used Foxoff ®  baits, involved recording bait visits and bait takes by radio-collared Spot-tailed Quolls. Quoll deaths due to 1080-poisoning were not recorded because of a lack of bait consumption. Spot-tailed Quolls regularly visited bait stations and removed baits which were then discarded. Körtner & Gresser (2002) suggested that this occurred because quolls found the Foxoff ® baits unpalatable, either because of 1080 or because of the matrix of the bait itself (Körtner & Gresser 2002).Aerial Baiting   A 1999 study (Murray & Poore 2004) was conducted in Tallaganda SF (SF No. 577) and the northern section of Badjas SF (SF No. 567). The results provided evidence that Spot-tailed Quolls are capable of locating and consuming non-toxic meat baits deployed from aircraft as part of a wild dog control programme (Murray & Poore 2004).A 2003–04 study was conducted by Claridge and colleagues (2006) within the catchments of the Jacobs River and Ingebirah Creek, in the Byadbo Wilderness Area of Kosciuszko NP reaffirmed the findings of Murray and Poore (2004), that Spot-tailed Quolls are able to encounter and consume non-toxic meat baits (Claridge et al. 2006).The impact of aerial poison baiting on Spot-tailed Quolls as been inferred from population studies where local declines were observed in the presence of a baiting activity (Belcher 2003). According to Claridge and colleagues (2006), \'the overwhelming limitation of such studies is that causation [of the negative impact of 1080 on quolls] has not been demonstrated, but alluded to\'.A further study by Claridge and Mills (2007) of 1080 aerial deployed baits found no short-term impact on Spot-tailed Quolls.Three aerial baiting trials have been conducted in NSW by the Department of Environment and Conservation during 2004–05, and in Queensland in 2002–05. Mortality among quoll populations was much lower than that predicted by previous non-toxic aerial bait uptake trials (NSW DEC 2005c).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=75184'),('75529','Balaena glacialis australis','','Mammalia','Balaenidae','The southern right whale is a large baleen whale with a less streamlined shape than balaenopterids like the humpback whale ( Megaptera novaeangliae ). They grow to a maximum length of 17.5 m and weight of 80 t, with mature females often slightly larger than males (Bannister et al. 1996). The mean length of sexually mature females off the South African coast was calculated as 13.85 m (Best & Ruther 1992) and off Argentina as 13.66 m (Whitehead & Payne 1981). Mature females in Soviet catches from the Southern Ocean averaged 14.34 m (Tormosov et al. 1998). Southern Right Whales are about 5.5 m long and 1000-1500 kg at birth and physical maturity is reached at a length of 16 m (Bannister et al. 1996). Age at physical maturity is unknown (Bannister et al. 1996).','Feeding HabitatThe feeding habitat of the southern right whale is very poorly known and there have been no dedicated studies in feeding areas. Based on sightings information, most feeding areas are thought to be in deeper offshore waters ranging from sub-Antarctic areas to locations south of 60° S (Bannister et al. 1997, 1999; Goodall & Galeazzi 1986; Ohsumi & Kasamatsu 1986; Tormosov et al. 1998) in areas probably associated with climatic and environmental conditions generating high productivity. A single coastal feeding area has been identified off the west coast of Africa where upwelling and thermocline development is apparent, and oceanographic conditions are thought to provide suitable feeding conditions (Best et al. 2002).Breeding HabitatDifferential use of habitat by calving and non-calving whales has been noted off Australia (Burnell & Bryden 1997), South Africa (Best 1981) and Argentina (Payne 1986), perhaps implying habitat selection within calving grounds.The southern right whale prefers near-shore, shallow water depths and being in close proximity to other individuals whilst on calving grounds in Australian waters (Pirzl 2008). In breeding areas, non-calving whales are highly social whilst calving whales remain apart from robust socialising groups (Pirzl 2008). Habitat selection and habitat use on Australian calving grounds is influenced by breeding status and/or the type of calving ground, in addition to other environmental factors such as swell height (Pirzl 2008).The southern right whale is constrained in their ability to colonise unused areas of potentially suitable habitat due to a high degree of site fidelity (individuals returning to the same breeding site each year). This combined with previous exploitation history suggesting extirpation of migratory traditions to these sites (Carroll et al. 2015; Pirzl 2008).Migratory HabitatMigratory habitat parameters are unknown.','Knowledge of southern right whale prey items has been gained primarily from stomach contents data collected from the until recently unreported Soviet whaling in the Southern Ocean during the 1950s-1970s (Tormosov et al. 1998). The southern right whale was found to feed on both euphausids and copepods, with a latitudinal variation in diet (Matthews 1938b; Tormosov et al. 1998). The predomiNAt prey item north of 40° S was copepods, but these were replaced by krill south of 50° S (Tormosov et al. 1998). South of Australia, observations of suspected feeding behaviour suggested that the species also feeds on amphipod crustaceans (Bannister et al. 1997). The northern right whale is known to consume the larval  Munida gregaria  (Cummings 1985a), larval cirripedes (barnacles) (Mayo & Marx 1990) and copepods of the genus  Calanaus  and  Pseduocalanaus  (Murison & Gaskin 1989).Data from sightings and a satellite telemetry study show that feeding grounds of the southern right whale probably lies between about 32° S and 65° S (Bannister et al. 1997; Best et al. 2002; Goodall & Galeazzi 1986; Ohsumi & Kasamatsu 1986; Tormosov et al. 1998). They are generally thought to be in offshore waters, however a coastal feeding area on the west African coast has recently been identified using satellite telemetry (Best et al. 2002).Feeding is thought to occur principally during the austral summer, but most likely extends into spring and autumn. This information is based on a direct observation of southern right whale feeding (Bannister et al. 1997) and the seasonality of stomach contents sampled from Soviet whaling ships (Tormosov et al. 1998). As might be expected from the prey distribution, foraging is not generally observed on winter breeding grounds, although opportunistic feeding has been reported at Peninsula Valdes, Argentina (Thomas 1987). Whether feeding occurs elsewhere in winter is unknown.Most observations of the southern right whale feeding have been made in the northern hemisphere. When skim feeding, the northern right whale swims at the surface of the water with its mouth open, capturing prey items against the baleen (Mayo & Marx 1990). Foraging dives are relatively shallow in comparison to some other cetacean species and have been reported from tag data as an average of 7.9 m to a maximum of 85.3 m (Winn et al. 1995), with a more recent study showing consistent dives to a depth of 80-175 m (Baumgartner & Mate 2003). The depth of foraging dives are associated with the distribution and concentration of zooplankton and stratification of the water column (Baumgartner & Mate 2003; Baumgartner et al. 2003b; Winn et al. 1995).Feeding areas for the northern right whale coincide with oceanographic fronts along which prey concentrate (Baumgartner et al. 2003a; Murison & Gaskin 1989). There is evidence from aerial surveys that Northern Right Whales preferentially select areas of highest prey concentration and will alter swim direction to remain within those areas (Watkins & Schevill 1979). It is possible that they target slower moving copepods in preference to faster moving euphausids (Murison & Gaskin 1989).It seems likely that the general form of foraging behaviour of the southern right whale would be similar to the northern right whale, although strategies may vary where different prey items are targeted or where the oceanographic conditions influencing prey aggregation are different.','The  Conservation Management Plan for the Southern Right Whale - 2011-2021  (DSEWPaC 2012) (a recovery plan under the EPBC Act) has identified a number of threats facing the southern right whale within Australian waters.Known threats affecting the southern right whale in Australian waters are:A. Entanglement  - Entanglement can harm or kill individual whales, and can reduce the fitness of an individual by restricting mobility and impairing breathing, swimming or feeding ability. Entanglement causes physical damage, e.g. nets and lines cutting through the skin and blubber thus exposing the animal to infection and amputation or death. Entanglements in Australian waters primarily come from commercial fishery equipment and marine debris.B. Vessel Disturbance  - Vessel disturbance can occur in the form of collisions or by disrupting the behaviour of animals. The southern right whale appears to be the primary whale species involved in vessel collisions in the southern hemisphere. They accounted for 50 % of whale mortalities resulting from vessel collisions in a rapid assessment of data on vessel collisions with cetaceans in the southern hemisphere. Vessel collision can lead to mortality or significant injury. Chronic disturbance leading to increased energetic costs or disruption of critical social behaviours as individual animals try to avoid vessels may result from activities such as boat-based whale watching, particularly from recreational boats.Threats potentially affecting the Australian population of the southern right whale are:C. Whaling  - The impacts of commercial hunting on the species have been well documented. While currently banned under the IWC moratorium on commercial whaling and due to classification by the IWC of all southern right whale populations as Protected Stocks, the potential for other countries to recommence commercial whaling exists and pressure may well increase as the population recovers.D. Climate Variability and Change  - There is evidence that climate variability affects reproductive output in the species. Much is unknown about the impact of climate change on the food webs on which the southern right whale relies. However, research to date suggests detrimental impacts on reproductive output from warming events are possible. Changes to climate and oceanographic processes may also lead to decreased productivity and different patterns of prey distribution and availability.E. Noise Interference  - Loud noises or long exposure may lead to avoidance of important habitat areas, interruption to communication and, in some situations, physical damage, including permanent or temporary hearing loss. Potential forms of harmful noise interference in Australian waters include seismic surveys, other industrial activities such as drilling, pile driving, blasting and dredging, defence activities, vessel noise, and aircraft operating at low altitude.F. Habitat Modification  - Habitat modification through the development of infrastructure such as ports, marinas, aquaculture facilities, and ocean/marine energy production facilities could lead to the physical displacement of the southern right whale from their preferred habitats or disruption to normal behaviour. Animals may also encounter chemical pollution in the form of sewage and industrial discharges, run off from onshore activities, and accidental spills. In their feeding grounds they are most at risk from bioaccumulation of human-made chemicals such as organochlorines.G. Overharvesting of Prey  - Depletion of prey through over-harvesting may be a potential future threat. Changes to climate and oceanographic processes may also lead to decreased productivity and different patterns of prey distribution and availability.Risk Assessment of ThreatsDue to the smaller size of the south-east subpopulation of the southern right whale the risk posed by these threats can be greater than for the south-west subpopulation. Table 1 below outlines the level of risk associated with each threat for the two subpopulations (taken from the  Conservation Management Plan for the Southern Right Whale  (a recovery plan under the EPBC Act) (DSEWPaC 2012). These ratings were determined assuming existing mitigation measures are implemented.Table 1 - Level of risk posed by threats to the south-east and south-west southern right whale subpopulations.ThreatRisk to south-east Australian subpopulationRisk to south-west Australian subpopulationClimate variability and changeVery HighVery HighSeismic surveysVery HighVery HighWhalingHighHighCommercial fisheries or aquaculture equipmentHighModerateChronic industrial noiseHighModerateInfrastructure/coastal developmentHighModerateVessel collisionsHighModerateAcute industrial noiseHighModerateWhale watchingModerateModerateShipping noiseModerateModerateMarine debrisModerateModerateAircraft noiseModerateModerateOverharvesting of preyModerateModerateChronic chemical pollutionLowLowAcute chemical dischargeLowLow','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=75529'),('758','Polytelis alexandrae','Vulnerable','Aves','Psittacidae','The Princess Parrot is a slim, medium-sized parrot that grows to 40 to 45 cm in length, and has a weight of 90 to 120 g (Higgins 1999). It is colourful bird that has blue-grey colouring on the top of the head; pink on the chin and throat; dull olive-green on the hind-neck and upper part of the back; yellow-green patches on the shoulders; bright green, with a black band on the trailing edge, on the underside of the wings; violet on the lower back and rump; dull olive-green, with violet wash, on the breast and belly; bright green on the flanks; green, violet and pink on the thighs; and olive-green on top, and black (with a pink strip) on the underside of the long and tapered tail. The adults have an orange to red-pink bill, bright orange-red irides, and grey legs and feet. There are some slight differences between the sexes, for example, the female is generally duller, and has a much shorter tail, than the male (Higgins 1999).','The Princess Parrot inhabits sand dunes and sand flats in the arid zone of western and central Australia. It occurs in open savanna woodlands and shrublands that usually consist of scattered stands of  Eucalyptus  (including  E .  gongylocarpa ,  E .  chippendalei  and mallee species),  Casuarina  or  Allocasuarina  trees; an understorey of shrubs such as  Acacia  (especially  A .  aneura ),  Cassia ,  Eremophila ,  Grevillea ,  Hakea  and  Senna ; and a ground cover dominated by  Triodia  species (Allen 1987; Baxter & Henderson 2000; Carter 1993b; Ford & Sedgwick 1967; Forshaw & Cooper 2002; Garnett 1993; Johnstone & Storr 1998; Parker 1971; Pianka & Pianka 1970). It also frequents  Eucalyptus  or  Allocasuarina  trees in riverine or littoral areas (Carter 1993b; Forshaw & Cooper 2002; North 1912). The Princess Parrot is not known to occur in any of the threatened ecological communities listed under the  EPBC Act 1999 . It does not associate with any other threatened species listed under the  EPBC Act 1999 .','The diet of the Princess Parrot consists of seeds and some flowers, nectar and leaves. It feeds on the seeds of grasses (including  Triodia irritans ,  T .  mitchelli ,  Danthonia bipartita  and  Rhynchelytrum repens ) and other plants (including  Acacia aneura ,  Hakea lorea,   Portulaca   oleracea ,  Stenopetalum anfractum  and  Calandrinia ) (Allen 1987; Carter 1993b; Eylmann 1911; Finlayson 1933; Forshaw & Cooper 2002; Garnett 1993; Johnstone & Storr 1998; Keartland 1905; North 1912). It takes nectar and/or flowers from  Crotolaria cunninghamii ,  Grevillea wickhamii ,  Hakea suberea  and  Allocasuarina , and leaves from  Codonocarpus   cotinifolius  (Carter 1993; Johnstone & Storr 1998; Eylmann 1911). The Princess Parrot forages on and near the ground, and amongst the foliage and flowers of shrubs and trees (Carter 1993b; Forshaw & Cooper 2002; Garnett 1993). It forages in the morning, and sometimes in the afternoon before dusk (Carter 1993b).','There is no evidence to link any threatening process to the Princess Parrot. It is possible that the Princess Parrot may have been adversely affected by the same changes in habitat that caused the extinction of many mammal species in central Australia during the 20th century (Burbidge & McKenzie 1989); its habitat may have been degraded, and the availability of its food reduced, by the introduction of new and unsuitable fire regimes, and herbivores such as sheep, rabbits and camels (Garnett & Crowley 2000). It has also been suggested that an increase in the availability of water in areas subjected to grazing by domestic stock may have allowed other more water-dependent parrots to expand their range into the arid zone, and that if this had occurred, the invasive species could be competing with the Princess Parrot for resources, perhaps to the detriment of the Princess Parrot population (Carter 1993; Garnett 1993).Other potential threats are Psittacine Beak and Feather disease (or Psittacine Circoviral), and the poaching of eggs or young from nests. Psittacine Beak and Feather disease is an infectious and potentially fatal disease that is common in Australian parrots, and that may be capable of having catastrophic effects on some parrot populations. Symptoms of the disease have been recorded in the Princess Parrot (DEH 2005q), but it is not known if the disease is having any effect on mortality rates or population size.There is evidence of some recent poaching of eggs or young from Princess Parrot nests in the Great Sandy Desert (Higgins 1999). The abundance of the species in captivity (Garnett 1993) suggests that there should be little demand for wild stock, and incidences of poaching may therefore be rare. However, because the population size is not well known, and could potentially be small (and therefore more vulnerable to a reduction in breeding success), poaching may be a potential threat.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=758'),('76155','Bidyanus bidyanus','Critically Endangered','Actinopterygii','Terapontidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=76155'),('76339','Rexea solandri (eastern Australian population)','Conservation Dependent','Actinopterygii','Gempylidae','Eastern Gemfish are long, slender and silvery fish with a form similar to mackerel (family Scombridae) or Barracouta ( Thyrsites atun ). The mouth of a Gemfish is long and wide with a protruding lower jaw and large fang-like teeth at the front. The species has a forked lateral line, with one branch running along the upper sides of the body, with the second branch diverging downward below the fifth dorsal fin spine, then running along the side of the body. Gemfish are sexually dimorphic, with females being larger than males: females may grow to 116 cm, males may grow to 106 cm. This species reaches a maximum weight of 15 kg, although they are typically substantially smaller than this (Morison et al. 2007; Tilzey 2000 cited in Pogonoski et al. 2002).','Eastern Gemfish are mesopelagic and inhabit deeper continental shelf habitats and upper slope waters from 100 m to 700 m (down to 1254 m), but are generally found in waters about 250 to 500 m deep. This species is generally caught close to the sea floor, but the fish are likely to move into mid-water at times (Kailola et al. 1993; Pogonoski et al. 2002). Larvae occur in shallow to very shallow waters (Pogonoski et al. 2002).','The Eastern Gemfish is a carnivorous species, mainly feeding on fish such as Macrouridae (whiptails) and Deepwater Cardinalfish ( Apogonops anomalus ), as well as Royal Red Prawns ( Haliporoides sibogae ) and squid (Ommastrephidae) (Kailola et al. 1993). Feeding occurs near the ocean floor (TSSC 2009c).','A stock assessment for the Eastern Gemfish was undertaken by CSIRO in 2007 (Little et al. 2008). This assessment found that the biomass of the spawning population in 2007–08 was likely to be 14% of the unexploited spawning biomass of this species. The Eastern Gemfish is considered to be historically overfished, although it is uncertain whether overfishing is still continuing (Morison et al. 2007).Fishing pressureEastern Gemfish are fished primarily in the CTS and by NSW dropliners. The Eastern Gemfish fishery commenced in the early 1970s, increased rapidly and peaked at around 6000 t/year in 1978–1980 (Rowling & Makin 2001). Catches remained above 2000 t/year throughout the 1980s. Concerns about the level of recruitment led to a zero target limit between 1993 and 1996 for trawl fisheries. The fishery was re-opened in 1997 after suggestions that the cohorts spawned in 1990 and 1991 were strong, and by 1997 had entered the mature population (Rowling & Makin 2001). However, despite a total allowable catch of 1000 t for the 1997 season, the landed catch amounted to 300 t. Eastern Gemfish trawl catches in the CTS totalled 214 t in 1998 and about 200 t in 1999 (Punt et al. 2000 cited in Pogonoski et al. 2002). Dropline catches totalled 179 t between 1997 and 1999 (Fletcher & McVea 2000 cited in Pogonoski et al. 2002).The main threat to Eastern Gemfish has been identified as historic and ongoing fishing pressure. Eastern Gemfish became an important component of the winter fishery in the CTS during the late 1970s, with a peak catch of 6000 t taken in 1980 (Pogonoski et al. 2002). Fishing effort actively targeted the pre-spawning migration, when large aggregations of the species were predictable. Catches fluctuated during the early 1980s, but the stock experienced recruitment collapse in the late 1980s. The cause of this collapse is unknown, as at the time it occurred the spawning biomass was around 40% of unexploited levels, which was considered to be relatively high.Eastern Gemfish are particularly vulnerable to fishing pressure during their annual spawning migration between June and August as the majority of the mature population is mobilised in a very narrow band over the continental shelf (Pogonoski et al. 2002). The predictability of this mass migration makes the Eastern Gemfish particularly vulnerable to targeted fishing (TSSC 2009c).NSW fishing pressureSome limited take of Eastern Gemfish occurs in NSW waters, which includes the Eastern Gemfish spawning ground offshore of Crowdy Head on the NSW central coast. Commercial fishers managed by NSW are restricted to a 50 kg limit of Eastern Gemfish per trip in NSW waters, while NSW vessels operating in Commonwealth waters south of Barrenjoey Point in Sydney are not permitted to land any Eastern Gemfish. Recreational vessels in NSW waters are restricted to 10 whole Eastern Gemfish on board per day, with no take permitted south of Barrenjoey Point (FSC 2008). The NSW Fisheries Scientific Committee considered the conservation status of Eastern Gemfish in 2008 and concluded that it was not eligible for listing as an endangered species (FSC 2006; 2008).Recruitment depressionA potential key threat to Eastern Gemfish is ongoing recruitment depression, or breeding failure. Eastern Gemfish stocks have exhibited poor recruitment since the 1980s, with low numbers of young fish joining the mature population. However, previous spawning seasons (in the 1970s), which were considered highly successful, may have been uncharacteristically successful (AFMA 2009e).It is suggested that the recruitment depression exhibited by the Eastern Gemfish may be a \"regime shift\"\" and although this trend may be fishing related it may also be environmentally driven. This threat to the capacity of Eastern Gemfish to recover from historic overfishing is poorly understood and is likely to be ongoing. The life cycle of the species',' at which the disruptive processes are operating'),('769','Calyptorhynchus baudinii','Endangered','Aves','Cacatuidae','Baudin\'s Cockatoo is a large cockatoo that measures 50–57 cm in length, with a wingspan of approximately 110 cm, and a mass of 560–770 g. It is mostly dull black in colour, with pale whitish margins on the feathers, large, rounded patches (white to yellowish-white in the female and dusky-white to brownish-white in the male) on the ear coverts, and rectangular white panels in the tail. It has a large bill (with a very elongated upper mandible) that is coloured black in the male and whitish-grey with a black tip in the female; a dark brown iris that is surrounded by a reddish-pink eye-ring in the male and a grey eye-ring in the female; a short, rounded, erectile crest; and grey feet (Higgins 1999; Johnstone & Storr 1998). Juvenile birds are like the adults in appearance, but the bill of the juvenile male is like that of the adult female. The bill of the juvenile male begins to darken after the second year (Johnstone & Storr 1998).','Baudin\'s Cockatoo mainly occurs in eucalypt forests, especially jarrah, marri and karri forest. The species is less frequently in woodlands of wandoo ( E. wandoo ), blackbutt ( Eucalyptus patens ), flooded gum ( Eucalyptus rudis ), yate ( Eucalyptus cornuta ), partly cleared farmlands and urban areas, including roadside trees and house gardens (Johnstone & Kirkby 2008). This cockatoo forages at all levels of the forest, from the canopy to the ground, often feeding in the understorey on proteaceous trees and shrubs, especially banksias, and in orchards (both in trees and on dropped or fallen fruit on the ground) (Johnstone & Kirkby 2008).Breeding habitat Baudin\'s Cockatoo breeds in the jarrah, marri and karri forests of the far south-west in areas averaging more than 750 mm of rainfall annually. Breeding generally occurs in woodland or forest, but may also occur in former woodland or forest now present as isolated trees. Areas of breeding are also known from the southern Swan Coastal Plain, the south coast region and the southern wheatbelt region around Kojonup. The northernmost breeding record is for Lowden, near Donnybrook (Johnstone & Storr 2008). Nesting occurs in hollows in live or dead trees of karri, marri, wandoo and tuart ( Eucalyptus gomphocephala ) (DSEWPaC 2012p). During the breeding season feeding primarily occurs in native vegetation, particularly marri (DSEWPaC 2012p).Foraging habitat During the non-breeding season, the range of Baudin\'s Cockatoo is determined by the distribution of marri (Saunders 1979). In the northern jarrah forest, marri tends to be more common in lower parts of the landscape (Biggs et al. 2011). Outside the breeding season, the species feeds on banksia and hakea species, and  Erodium botrys  (wild geranium), as well as  Dryandra  species. Baudin’s Cockatoo also feeds on invertebrate larvae and in fruit orchards (mostly apple and pear, but also persimmon) (Chapman 2008).Roosting habitat Night roosting generally occurs in or near riparian environments or other permanent water sources. Roost trees include jarrah, marri, flooded gum, blackbutt, tuart, and introduced eucalypts, such as blue gum ( E. globulus ) and lemon scented gum ( Corymbia citriodora ), though any large tree may be suitable (DSEWPaC 2012p). Preferred roosts are emergent eucalypts in areas with a dense canopy close to permanent sources of water that provide the birds with protection from weather conditions (Johnstone & Kirkby 2008).Associations Baudin\'s Cockatoo sometimes associates with Carnaby\'s Cockatoo and the Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoo ( Calyptorhynchus banksii naso ) at sites where food is abundant (Higgins 1999; Saunders 1974b), most likely in jarrah-marri forest on the Darling plateau. Breeding, foraging and roosting areas also overlap on the southern Swan Coastal Plain. Carnaby\'s Cockatoo is listed as Endangered and the Forest Red-tailed Black Cockatoo is listed as Vulnerable under the EPBC Act 1999.Baudin’s Cockatoo may forage in several threatened ecological communities:Banksia woodland of the Swan Coastal Plain, which is being assessed for listing under the EPBC Act 1999;Corymbia calophylla - Kingia australis  woodlands on heavy soils of the Swan Coastal Plain (listed as endangered);Corymbia calophylla - Xanthorrhoea pressii  woodlands and shrublands of the Swan Coastal Plain (listed as endangered;Proteaceae Dominated Kwongkan Shrublands of the southwest coastal floristic province of Western Australia threatened ecological community (listed as endangered).','Overall, marri ( Corymbia calophylla ) is the primary food source with the birds using its seeds, flowers, nectar and buds (Johnstone & Kirby 2008); jarrah is a secondary source. For instance, seeds of marri were found in 89% of birds (n=58) collected in forest at Mundaring (Saunders 1974b); and of 34 foraging groups observed throughout the range of the species, 31 (91%) were seen feeding in marri (Saunders 1979). In years when the marri fails to flower or flowers poorly, damage by this cockatoo to cultivated fruits is most severe (Johnstone & Kirby 2008).Baudin\'s Cockatoo has been observed feeding on a wide range of foods including the seeds of marri, jarrah, western sheoak ( Allocasuarina fraseriana ), bull banksia  (Banksia grandis ), mountain banksia ( B. quercifolia ), river banksia ( B. littoralis ), holly-leaved banksia ( B. ilicifolia ),  B. sessilis ,  B. squarrosa , cut-leaf banksia ( B. praemorsa ),  Hakea erinacea ,  H. prostrata ,  H. stenocarpa ,  H. trifurcata ,  H. lasianthoides ,  H. ruscifolia ,  H. lissocarpha ,  H. varia ,  H. cristata ,  H. marginata , Wilson\'s grevillea ( Grevillea wilsonii ), balga grass tree ( Xanthorrhoea preissii ),  Kingia australis , reedia ( Reedia spathacea ),  Erodium  spp. (including  E. botrys ),  Jacaranda  spp.,  Macadamia  spp., pecan ( Carya illinoinensis ), apples ( Malus  spp.), pears ( Pyrus  spp.), persimmons ( Diospyros  spp.) and  Quercus  spp.Baudin’s Cockatoo will also feed on nectar, buds and flowers of marri, lemon-scented gum ( Eucalyptus citriodora ), jarrah, wandoo,  Eucalyptus  spp., bull banksia,  Banksia sessilis , porcupine banksia ( B. lindleyana ),  B. squarrosa ,  Darwinia citriodora  and  Callistemon  spp. (Johnstone & Kirby 2008). They also take insect larvae and insects (including beetle, wasp and moth larvae) from under bark, and in the wood of live and dead trees, from galls and from flower spikes of  Xanthorrhoea ; the pith of tall kangaroo paw ( Anigozanthos flavidus ); the juice of ripe persimmons; and the growing tips of pines (Johnstone & Kirby 2008).When feeding in marri, Baudin\'s Cockatoo removes seeds from their capsules by inserting its upper mandible into the capsule, and then hooking and pulling the seed out (Cooper 2000; Saunders 1974b). Seeds are taken from apples and pears by splitting open the fruit (Higgins 1999). Bark and dead wood are stripped from trees (e.g. jarrah, marri) in search of insect larvae (Higgins 1999; Johnstone & Storr 1998; Saunders 1974b). It occasionally forages on the ground, searching among and feeding on  Erodium , taking seed from fallen fruits or gumnuts, and extracting insect larvae from beneath the bark of fallen trees (Saunders 1979).','Nest hollow shortage A shortage of nest hollows is a principal threat, as suitable hollows are considered scarce, only forming in trees that are at least 130-220 years of age, many of which have been preferentially felled (Abbott & Whitford 2002 cited in Garnett et al. 2011; Chapman 2008). Nest hollows are likely to continue to be lost to mining (Chapman 2008) and fire (Garnett et al. 2011). Fires caused by lightning or arson, and sometimes planned fires, cause older trees containing hollows to fall, and also temporarily reduce food availability (DSEWPaC 2011 cited in Garnett et al. 2011). Competition for hollows is also severe with other cockatoos, including Carnaby\'s Cockatoo and Corellas ( Cacatua  spp.), Wood Duck ( Cheononetta jubatta ) and feral introduced European honey bees ( Apis mellifera ) (Johnstone & Kirkby 2008).Clearing and degradation Suitable habitat was cleared for agriculture, timber harvesting, wood chipping and mining throughout much of the species range, and it is estimated that the species no longer occupies 25% of suitable habitat that has been cleared (Mawson & Johnstone 1997). There is an ongoing decline in population densities due to the selective removal of large marri trees, from which the species obtains most of its food (Garnett & Crowley 2000).Production forest operations were previously detrimental as harvest rotation policies did not allow trees to grow to an adequate maturity or, consequently, allow hollows to develop (Saunders et al. 1985; Saunders & Ingram 1995). However, old growth forests have now been excluded from production forestry (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Conservation Commission of Western Australia 2004) and large marri trees are retained within Jarrah Forest coupes (DEC 2012). Mining continues to impact on large trees, however.More recently, marri and jarrah have experienced declines because of disease (marri canker), drought and extreme heat, leading to further degradation of Forest Red-tailed Black cockatoo habitat (Doherty et al. 2016; Paap et al. 2012).Illegal shooting Baudin\'s Cockatoo sometimes feeds on and does damage to cultivated fruit (e.g. apples, pears) in orchards (Halse 1986; Long 1985). In one study, 9% of 70 000 apples were damaged in two months by the species (Halse 1986). To prevent such damage, the species was subject to shooting under an Open Season Notice from the 1950s until 1989, when the notice was revoked (Mawson & Johnstone 1997). Few figures are available on the impact of these shootings, but in the Bridgetown district, from 1960 to 1965, bounty payments were made on 164 birds, and at Manjimup, 824 birds were shot in 1984 alone (Halse 1986; Higgins 1999).Baudin\'s Cockatoo has been protected since 1996 (Mawson & Johnstone 1997), but illegal shooting is still occuring (Garnett & Crowley 2000). The impact of ongoing illegal shooting upon the current population is not known (Garnett & Crowley 2000), but the species\' low annual reproductive rate is likely to increases the impact (Storr 1991).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=769'),('77','Pseudomys shortridgei','Endangered','Mammalia','Muridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=77'),('77037','Rostratula australis','Endangered','Aves','Rostratulidae','The Australian Painted Snipe is a stocky wading bird around 220–250 mm in length with a long pinkish bill. The adult female, more colourful than the male, has a chestnut-coloured head, with white around the eye and a white crown stripe, and metallic green back and wings, barred with black and chestnut. There is a pale stripe extending from the shoulder into a V down its upper back. The adult male is similar to the female, but is smaller and duller with buff spots on the wings and without any chestnut colouring on the head, nape or throat (D. Ingwersen 2007, pers. comm.; NSW NPWS 2006).','The Australian Painted Snipe generally inhabits shallow terrestrial freshwater (occasionally brackish) wetlands, including temporary and permanent lakes, swamps and claypans. They also use inundated or waterlogged grassland or saltmarsh, dams, rice crops, sewage farms and bore drains. Typical sites include those with rank emergent tussocks of grass, sedges, rushes or reeds, or samphire; often with scattered clumps of lignum  Muehlenbeckia  or canegrass or sometimes tea-tree ( Melaleuca ). The Australian Painted Snipe sometimes utilises areas that are lined with trees, or that have some scattered fallen or washed-up timber (Marchant & Higgins 1993). Australian Painted Snipe breeding habitat requirements may be quite specific: shallow wetlands with areas of bare wet mud and both upper and canopy cover nearby. Nest records are all, or nearly all, from or near small islands in freshwater wetlands (D. Rogers 2002, pers. comm.), provided that these islands are a combination of very shallow water, exposed mud, dense low cover and sometimes some tall dense cover (Rogers et al. 2005).The Australian Painted Snipe has also been recorded nesting in and near swamps, canegrass swamps, flooded areas including samphire, grazing land, among cumbungi, sedges, grasses, salt water couch ( Paspalum ), saltbush ( Halosarcia ) and grass, also in ground cover of water-buttons and grasses, at the base of tussocks and under low saltbush (Marchant & Higgins 1993). One nest has been found in the centre of a cow-pat in a clump of long grass (Marchant & Higgins 1993).The nest is usually placed in a scrape in the ground (Pringle 1987), and either has scant lining or is a shallow bowl-shaped nest of dry grass or other plant material (Marchant & Higgins 1993). The closely related  Rostratula benghalensis  nests on the ground, sometimes on low hummocks or mounds, normally concealed in thick marshy vegetation. They sometimes nest in more open aquatic environments e.g. on a dense mat of floating water weed. Nests are usually lined with leaves and stems, and are occasionally built up with interwoven plant material, but infrequently bare (del Hoyo et al. 1996). The Australian Painted Snipe can use modified habitats, such as low-lying woodlands converted to grazing pasture, sewage farms, dams, bores and irrigation schemes (Marchant & Higgins 1993), however they do not necessarily breed in such habitats (D. Rogers 2002, pers. comm.).The Australian Painted Snipe loafs on the ground under clumps of lignum, tea-tree and similar dense bushes (Marchant & Higgins 1993). This species has been recorded foraging under clumps of tea-trees (Leach et al. 1987) but most records are from daytime roost sites and the foraging habitat requirements of this species are not well understood and may be quite specific (D. Rogers 2002, pers. comm.). This species requires suitable wetland areas even in drought conditions. The species can move to suitable habitat if necessary (Marchant & Higgins 1993).The Australian Painted Snipe is not known to associate with any other species or subspecies of fauna or flora that are listed as threatened under the EPBC Act.','The Australian Painted Snipe eats vegetation, seeds, insects, worms and molluscs, crustaceans and other invertebrates (Marchant & Higgins 1993). This species is mainly crepuscular (active at dawn and dusk), preferring to sit quietly under cover of grass, reeds or other dense cover during day, becoming more active at dawn, dusk and during night. They generally remain in dense cover when feeding, although may forage over nearby mudflats and other open areas such as ploughed land or grassland (Marchant & Higgins 1993). The species may have quite specific foraging habitat requirements, but these are not well understood and further study is required (D. Rogers 2002, pers. comm.).','Loss and degradation of habitatThe primary factor in the decline of the Australian Painted Snipe has probably been a loss and alteration of wetland habitat. The two major sources of this have been the drainage of wetlands and the diversion of water to agriculture and reservoirs, the latter process reducing flooding and precluding the formation of temporary shallow wetlands (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Rogers et al. 2005; Watkins 1993). It is estimated that since European settlement approximately 50% of wetlands in Australia have been converted for other uses. In some regions of the country the degree of loss has been even greater. For example, 89% of wetlands in south-eastern South Australia have been eliminated, and 75% of wetlands on the Swan Coastal Plain in Western Australia have drained or been filled (Environment Australia 1997). The substantial decline in the reporting rate of the snipe in the Murray-Darling Basin coincided with major changes in the management of water resources there, including the diversion of large volumes of water to irrigated agriculture (Lane & Rogers 2000). It is estimated that about 70% of water in the Murray-Darling system is now allocated to agriculture, and movements of water are regulated by a complex network of weirs, catchments and channels. The net result of these developments has been (Kingsford 2000; Lane & Rogers 2000; Rogers et al. 2005; White 1997):a decline in water quality because of increased nutrient and saline contentthe alteration of many formerly suitable temporary wetlands through collection of saline irrigation waste-water or changes to water cycles, such as the permanent retention of water, which promotes the proliferation of dense reeds that are avoided by the snipe, and could potentially render water levels too deep to be suitablea reduction in the frequency of flooding, with the Murray River now flooding about once every 14 years as opposed to about once every three years in the past.As a wetland inhabitant, the Australian Painted Snipe is also presumed to be vulnerable to other processes that reduce the potential for flooding, such as prolonged drought (del Hoyo et al. 1996).The habitat of the Australian Painted Snipe might also be degraded by other processes. Grazing and associated trampling of wetland vegetation by cattle and/or sheep is a threat to the Australian Painted Snipe, particularly in arid regions where grazing tends to become concentrated around wetlands in the dry season (NSW NPWS 1999b; Rogers et al. 2005). For example, an apparent decline in Australian Painted Snipe numbers in the Kimberley region of Western Australia has been linked to overgrazing by cattle (Johnstone & Storr 1998). It is possible that cattle could also trample nests (Hassell & Rogers 2002).Concern exists that changes to fire regimes might be affecting savannah vegetation around wetlands in northern Australia (White 1997). Over some time scales, fire may not be detrimental to the habitat of the Australian Painted Snipe. For example, fire is employed as a management tool at wetlands in the Riverina region to prevent the formation of dense stands of canegrass. However, the long term effects of persistent burning are poorly known (Rogers et al. 2005).The replacement of endemic wetland vegetation by invasive, noxious weeds could render habitats less suitable or unsuitable for the snipe (Rogers et al. 2005). For example,  Parkinsonia aculeata  is a thorny shrub that currently infests more than 800 000 ha of land in the semi-arid and sub-humid tropical regions of Australia, and has the potential to become much more widespread. It thrives around sources of water and forms tall, dense thickets that are unlikely to be used by the snipe and more generally have a detrimental impact on the health of wetland communities (CRC for Australian Weed Management et al. 2003; Rogers et al. 2005).PredationPredation by feral animals is a potential threat to the Australian Painted Snipe. The habit of the snipe to nest on the ground could render it vulnerable to introduced terrestrial predators such as the European Red Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) or feral cat ( Felis catus ). However, there is no evidence to suggest that predation by feral animals has played a role in the population decline.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=77037'),('77038','Galaxias auratus','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Galaxiidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=77038'),('77039','Paragalaxias mesotes','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Galaxiidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=77039'),('77041','Paragalaxias eleotroides','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Galaxiidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=77041'),('77042','Paragalaxias dissimilis','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Galaxiidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=77042'),('77672','Antipodia chaostola leucophaea','Endangered','Insecta','Hesperiidae','The Tasmanian Chaostola Skipper is a butterfly with stout body, brown wings with white to pale yellow spots on the forewings and a suffused yellow patch on each hindwing. The males have a black patch on each forewing. Underneath, the wings are brownish to black with a grey wing tip, a pale indistinct yellow triangle extending from the base to halfway along the costa (the thickened fore edge of the wing), and with several white spots, that may be indistinct. The underneath surface of the hindwing are grey with a number of indistinct outlined grey spots. Wingspan ranges from 32 mm (male) to 35 mm (female) (Braby 2000).','Larvae live and feed in looped leaves of the sedges Thatch Sawsedge and Slender Sawsedge that occur on relatively infertile substrates derived from sandstones, mudstones, siltstones, granites or windblown sands (Tas. TSS 2008b). The sedges are often found as minor understorey species in open forest dominated by one or more of Black Peppermint ( Eucalyptus amygdalina ), Silvertop Ash ( E. sieberi ) (north-east only) and Ribbon Gum ( E. viminalis ), with Messmate ( E. obliqua ), Swamp Gum ( E. ovata ), Tasmanian Blue Gum ( E. globulus ) and Black Wattle ( Acacia mearnsii ) sometimes present. Unknown factors, other than food plant availability affect the distribution of the butterfly (FPA Tas. 2002a).Given the specific requirements for the larval food plants, the butterfly is particularly vulnerable to habitat loss (Tas. DPIW n.d).','Tasmanian Chaostola Skipper caterpillars feed nocturnally on leaves of sedge species, such as Slender Saw-sedge and Thatch Saw Sedge (Herbison-Evans & Crossley 2005; Mitchell 2009).','Land clearance and habitat degradationClearing for urbanisation has seen the local extinction of known populations of the Tasmanian Chaostola Skipper, especially in the Hobart area. Habitat degradation has also occurred in remNAts of suitable habitat close to urban development. Food source plants for the Tasmanian Chaostola Skipper may have been extensively distributed in south-east Tasmania, indicated by their dense presence in roadside and fenceline stands (Tas. TSS 2008b). Much of this area is now subdivided into small residential blocks (Neyland & Bell 2000). The clearance of lowland coastal vegetation comprising sedges continues along the east coast of Tasmania (Tas. TSS 2008b). Other coastal developments (e.g. resorts in the Freycinet/Swansea areas) have probably contributed to the reduction of potential habitat.Agricultural development has also contributed to a decline in the extent and quality of Tasmanian Chaostola Skipper habitat, with grazing, road works and forestry practices destroying its food plants (Jolly 2006).Invasion of habitat by weeds, such as Spanish Heath ( Erica lusitanica ) in the Coningham area, is another habitat degradation threat (Bell 2005).Inappropriate fire regimesMainland  Antipodia chaostola  subsp. appear more abundant a few years following fire, and the Tasmanian subspecies is also suggested to be a \'fire-successionist\' (Sands & New 2002; Tas. TSS 2008b). Without fire events, scrub vegetation appears to displace open vegetation supporting the Tasmanian Chaostola Skipper\'s food plants (Slender Saw-sedge and Thatch Saw Sedge) (Tas. TSS 2008b). Inappropriate fire regimes or  wildfires during the butterfly\'s life cycle (mid-October to mid-December) may result in the local extinction of populations (Bryant & Jackson 1999b; Jolly 2006).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=77672'),('77743','Ogyris subterrestris petrina','Critically Endangered','Insecta','Lycaenidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=77743'),('77747','Oreisplanus munionga larana','Vulnerable','Insecta','Hesperiidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=77747'),('78900','Tursiops aduncus (Arafura/Timor Sea populations)','','Mammalia','Delphinidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=78900'),('78931','Cherax tenuimanus','Critically Endangered','Malacostraca','Parastacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=78931'),('78959','Engaeus granulatus','Endangered','Malacostraca','Parastacidae','The Central North Burrowing Crayfish is a small crayfish with an average body length under 10 cm. This species is characterised by the granulated surface of the chelae (claw) (Horwitz 1990a).','The Central North Burrowing Crayfish occupies seeps, wetlands and stream banks in relatively undisturbed habitats. The species is only rarely seen above ground or in standing water. Their burrows exhibit characteristic chimneys of pelleted soil (Horwitz 1990a). The Central North Burrowing Crayfish is often found in more clayey soils with deeper burrows than other  Engaeus  species. Burrows can be complex and extensive and may often be the product of several generations of crayfish activity (Doran & Richards 1996).','The Central North Burrowing Crayfish is believed to eat rotting wood, detritus, root material and, occasionally, animal material (Doran 1999b).','Current levels of habitat disturbanceAround known colonies of the Central North Burrowing Crayfish, nearly all land within potential habitat is disturbed. The species\' range is highly modified by agriculture, forestry and urban development. Approximately 86% of the species\' known habitat occurs on private and public land subject to disturbance and modification, with a further 11.5% existing in state forest (Walker-Smith 2004, pers. comm.).The species is apparently tolerant of clearing and agricultural development, occurring naturally in small and scattered colonies inlcuding in farm, suburban, and industrial forest surrounds. However, severe and prolonged disturbance could eliminate the species (TSSC 2005br).Threats to habitatThe Central North Burrowing Crayfish may be impacted by activities that severely alter water quality or quantity or soil and food availability. The species\' habitat may also be affected by poor waste management; waterway pollution; the inappropriate application of pesticides and fertilisers; and degradation through the establishment of weeds such as Gorse ( Ulex europaeus ) and Blackberries ( Rubus  species) in waterways and seeps (TSSC 2005br).While all of these impacts have the potential to affect burrowing crayfish habitat over the long term, this species is most at risk from these activities at periods when it is moulting, visiting the surface, mating or nurturing young (Horwitz 1991).Introduced pestsThe Freshwater Yabby ( Cherax destructor ) has been recorded from a dam where Central North Burrowing Crayfish were present. The Freshwater Yabby is not native to Tasmania and is regarded as an introduced pest. It may pose a threat to the Central North Burrowing Crayfish through competition for food and habitat (DPIW 2007; Nelson 2003).Low population vigourThe Central North Burrowing Crayfish has low population vigour compared to other members of the same genus. Other burrowing crayfish species tend to produce highly active colonies with large numbers of individuals and burrows present at any one site (Nelson 2003).Potential threatsPotential threats include: the clearing of vegetation along rivers and drains; ploughing; dam construction; unrestricted stock grazing (which churns and compacts the soil); burning; conversion to plantation (which imposes significant mechanical disturbance on stream headwaters and seepage channels); frequent high intensity fires that have negative long term effects on soil and vegetation; the establishment of roads and associated drainage activities that impact on seep, wetland and stream bank habitat quality (e.g. through the promotion of siltation and erosion); and other activities that degrade river bank integrity and enhance erosion (DPIW 2007).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=78959'),('79073','Isurus oxyrinchus','','Chondrichthyes','Lamnidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=79073'),('79086','Cophixalus aenigma','Endangered','Amphibia','Microhylidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=79086'),('79111','Mesodontrachia fitzroyana','Endangered','Gastropoda','Camaenidae','The Fitzroy Land Snail is a large Camaenid land snail. The shell has a medium-yellow horn, a white lip and five to six whorls. The shell is between 17–23 mm in diameter and 10–14 mm high. The apex and spire are moderately elevated and somewhat rounded above (Ward et al. 2006a).','The Fitzroy Land Snail is found under rocks in open eucalyptus woodland and in small patches of vine scrub thicket on pavement limestone (TSSC 2006z; Ward et al. 2006a).','NA','The population of  the Fitzroy Land Snail has declined substantially in recent years due to the species\' susceptibility to hot frequent fires during the snail\'s dormant period in the dry season (TSSC 2006z). In both the wet and dry seasons, the species is also susceptible to trampling by stock, which may trample aestivating snails and reduce the covering vegetation (V. Kessner 2004, pers. comm.; TSSC 2006z).Feral predators such as rats, mice and Cane Toads ( Bufo marinus ) may have a significant impact on the Fitzroy Land Snail in the future. Cane Toads are expected to invade the sites where the Fitzroy Land Snails occur and are likely to predate the species, as molluscs are a known component of the Cane Toad diet (Pearson et al. 2009; TSSC 2006z). However, doubt exists on whether Camaenid snails in north-western Australia are at risk from the invasion of Cane Toads. Pearson and colleagues (2009) investigated the possibility of spatial and temporal overlap between Cane Toads and the Fitzroy Land Snail at the Timber Creek locality. Twenty-five of the species were located and their habitat use was recorded and compared with Cane Toad habitat use of a site close by. The results indicate that, while the two species are active at the same time, places, and during the same temporal conditions, the Cane Toads would not have been able to forage on the snails because of the largely arboreal activity of the Fitzroy Land Snails and the low density of Cane Toads in the limestone habitats used by the snail.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=79111'),('79113','Sinumelon bednalli','Endangered','Gastropoda','Camaenidae','Bednall\'s Land Snail is a large greenish-yellow camaenid land snail, approximately 20–26 mm in diameter, with a weak reddish spiral colour band. The apex and spire are usually strongly and evenly elevated and there are four to five whorls (Solem 1993 in Ward et al. 2006).','Very little is known about the habitat preferences of Bednall\'s Land Snail. Adults of this species aestivate (lie dormant) in loose litter under fig trees (V. Kessner, pers. comm. in Ward et al. 2006).','NA','Bednall\'s Land Snail is only found at two locations, 41 km apart. It has almost disappeared from one location (near Alice Springs) and is under pressure from urban expansion, fire and weeds such as buffel grass ( Cenchrus ciliaris ) (DIPE 2006; V. Kessner, pers. comm. in Ward et al. 2006).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=79113'),('79219','Semotrachia euzyga','Endangered','Gastropoda','Camaenidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=79219'),('79221','Ordtrachia septentrionalis','Critically Endangered','Gastropoda','Camaenidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=79221'),('800','Sterna sumatrana','','Aves','Laridae','The Black-naped Tern is a small and slender marine tern (total length 30–32 cm; mean weight approximately 105 g) with a long and deeply forked tail.','In northern and north-eastern Australia, Black-naped Terns breed and roost on islands, which are very occasionally close to or attached to the mainland at low tides, and forage in seas surrounding colonies. Black-naped Terns are mainly associated with small, offshore sand and coral cays, coral reefs and lagoons, and sandy and rocky islands and islets, and in the surrounding seas. The species is only occasionally recorded in inshore waters away from their breeding colonies or coastal mainland Australia, such as harbours or bays, with their occurrence inshore probably being influenced by climatic conditions (Chatto 2001; Gochfeld & Burger 1996; Higgins & Davies 1996).Black-naped Terns usually nest in exposed, open sites, in simple, usually unlined depressions on bare sand or shingle beaches of cays, reefs and islands, typically in the narrow strip just above the high-water mark where debris collects. Occasionally they nest on spits, bare rock or among coral rubble or, more rarely, on top of logs or on structures, such as shipwrecks. Nests are usually away from vegetation or occasionally near the edge of vegetation, among grass and shrubs, or, rarely, beneath trees. Nests are placed up to 1.5 m above the high-water mark and 9–15 m from the sea (Chatto 2001; Gochfeld & Burger 1996; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman & Smith 1988; King 1986; McLean 1999; Walker 1986a, 1989).Black-naped Terns generally forage on and around coral reefs, over lagoons, reef-flats, reef-crests and reef-edges as well as rock pools and the open sea beyond the surf-zone along outer reefs. They forage further out to sea outside of the breeding season. During the breeding season, > 80% of birds forage within 2 km of their colonies (Chatto 2001; Gochfeld & Burger 1996; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman 1974, 1976; Hulsman & Smith 1988; Serventy et al. 1971; Smith 1990, 1993).Black-naped Terns usually roost near the edge of the water, on sandy beaches or spits and occasionally on rubble banks or rocks. They roost at their nesting areas during the breeding season. On One Tree Island, timing of roosting depends on tidal cycles and the heights of tides and use of different roosting sites varies with height of tides, wind and presence of other birds (Chatto 2001; Gochfeld & Burger 1996; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman 1974, 1977).There is no information on the use of refuge habitats by Black-naped Terns.Black-naped Terns are not known to rely on any threatened ecological community in Australia, nor are they specifically associated with any threatened species, although they potentially share habitat with such species. Black-naped Terns will often nest, roost or forage close to other species of terns, especially Roseate Terns, but also often with Crested, Lesser Crested and Bridled Terns, sometimes in large mixed groups, though there may be some segregation within such congregations (Chatto 2001; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman 1977; Walker 1986a).','Black-naped Terns feed solely on fish, mainly Engaulidae, Exocoetidae, Atherinidae and Clupeidae. In Australia, fish eaten include species of: Apogonidae, Atherinidae (including  Atherinomorus lacunosus ,  Pranesus capricornensis ,  Hypoatherina uisila ), Blenniidae (including  Belnnies ), Carangidae, Clupeidae (including  Spratelloides delicatulus ,  Amblygaster sirm ,  Herklotsichthys quadrimaculatus ), Coryphaenidae, Engraulidae (including  Encrasicholina ,  Engraulis australis ), Exocoetidae, Gobiidae, Hemiramphidae, Labridae, Mugilidae, Parapercidae, Pinguipedidae, Pomacentridae, Scombridae and Sphryroenidae. Mean length of prey 35 mm, but take fish up to 100 mm long (Gochfeld & Burger 1996; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman 1974, 1976, 1981, 1987; Hulsman & Smith 1988; Smith 1990).Black-naped Terns usually forage diurnally, but foraging is also regulated by the tidal cycle (with most birds roosting at high tides). In Australia, the species forages mainly by dipping, taking prey from the surface of the water or from just below it, and sometimes by shallow plunging. In a worldwide summary of feeding behaviour, the species is said to forage mainly by shallow plunge-diving, less often by surface-dipping and occasionally by swim-dipping. Black-naped Terns often forage over schools of fish that have been forced to the surface by marine predators. Birds tend to forage singly when breeding but often forage with conspecifics and other species of terns and noddies, such as Bridled and Roseate Terns and Black Noddies, at other times. They will steal food from conspecifics and other species of birds, and have food stolen from them by Silver Gulls and Roseate Terns (Gochfeld & Burger 1996; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman 1974, 1976; Hulsman & Smith 1988; Smith 1990, 1993).','Black-naped Terns are highly sensitive to human disturbance when roosting or nesting. As surface nesters, such human disturbance can be a threat by causing adults to leave nests, exposing eggs and chicks to potential predation. Whereas such disturbance is likely to increase in Australia, most of the islands on which the species breeds in Queensland are within reserves, with access controlled, and most lie within the Great Barrier Reef Marine Park. In the Northern Territory, although few colonies are within reserves, most are on Aboriginal land and are quite remote (Chatto 2001; Higgins & Davies 1996; WBM Oceanics & Claridge 1997).Silver Gulls are major predators of eggs and small chicks at some colonies (regardless of human disturbance). In the Northern Territory, Silver Gulls no doubt take eggs and young, although gulls tend not to nest near Black-naped Terns as often as they do with some other species (only 12% of Black-naped Tern sites had Silver Gull colonies on the same island). In Queensland, predation of Black-naped Terns by gulls was reduced if the Terns nested at the same time as Crested Terns. Other predators of eggs and chicks include Ruddy Turnstones ( Arenaria interpres ); and Black Rats ( Rattus rattus ), which if abundant can result in much predation of eggs and chicks and breeding failure. Breeding has also failed when Black-naped Terns have been displaced by Lesser Crested Terns, or eggs incidentally destroyed by Brown Boobies. Turtle nesting also probably affects some colonies in the Northern Territory (Chatto 2001; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman 1977; Hulsman et al. 1999; Serventy et al. 1971; Smith & Buckley 1986; WBM Oceanics & Claridge 1997).In the Northern Territory, eggs of Black-naped Tern are harvested by Aboriginal people. However, as the eggs of Black-naped Terns are smaller in size than those of other terns such as the Crested Tern, combined with the fact that colonies are typically not as large nor as predictable in terms of nesting stage as other terns,their eggs are less frequently taken than those of other species (Chatto 2001).Cyclones and storms, and associated tidal surges and flooding, can cause loss of eggs and young (Chatto 2001; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman 1977; Hulsman & Smith 1988; Hulsman et al. 1999; Langham 1986; WBM Oceanics & Claridge 1997). Nevertheless, even if causing total failure at some colonies, such events are not likely to affect the species severely.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=800'),('80610','Cecropis daurica','','Aves','Hirundinidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=80610'),('808','Hydroprogne caspia','','Aves','Laridae','The largest tern in Australia, the Caspian Tern has long, slender backswept wings and a slightly forked tail. The heavy bill is red with a dusky tip. The sexes are similar, with a body length between 53 and 60 centimetres long, and an average weight of 680 grams (Higgins & Davis 1996).','The Caspian Tern is mostly found in sheltered coastal embayments (harbours, lagoons, inlets, bays, estuaries and river deltas) and those with sandy or muddy margins are preferred. They also occur on near-coastal or inland terrestrial wetlands that are either fresh or saline, especially lakes (including ephemeral lakes), waterholes, reservoirs, rivers and creeks. They also use artificial wetlands, including reservoirs, sewage ponds and saltworks. In offshore areas the species prefers sheltered situations, particularly near islands, and is rarely seen beyond reefs (Higgins & Davis 1996).Large numbers may shelter along the coast, behind coastal sand-dunes or coastal lakes during rough weather, and have been recorded inland after storms (Higgins & Davies 1996).Foraging habitatThe Caspian Tern usually forages in open wetlands, including lakes and rivers. They often prefer sheltered shallow water near the margins, but can also be found in open coastal waters. In coastal inlets they may prefer to forage in tidal channels, or over submerged mudbanks (Higgins & Davis 1996).Breeding habitatThe Caspian Tern breeds on variable types of sites including low islands, cays, spits, banks, ridges, beaches of sand or shell, terrestrial wetlands and stony or rocky islets or banks. Nests may be in the open, or among low or sparse vegetation, including herbfield, tussocks, samphire or other prostrate sand-binding plants. They sometimes nest near bushes or other shelter such as large sticks, driftwood, piles of beachcast seagrass. Nests usually consist of a slight hollow scraped in the ground, and is left bare or is lined with grass, a few twigs, seaweed, feathers, small stones and shells. Generally roosting occurs on bare exposed sand or shell spits, banks or shores of coasts, lakes, estuaries, coastal lagoons and inlets. Occasionally they nest among beachcast debris above the high-water mark or at artificial sites, including islands in reservoirs, or on dredge-spoil (Higgins & Davis 1996).','The Caspian Tern\'s diet consists predomiNAtly of fish (5–25 cm in length) as well as the eggs and young of other birds, carrion, aquatic invertebrates (e.g. crayfish), flying insects and earthworms (Birdlife International 2010a). They forage diurnally, mostly early to mid-morning, patrolling in slow lazy flight, 3–15 m above the water. They usually forage by shallow plunging, hovering up to 15 m above the water, with their bill pointing down, they flex their wings, then dive, fully submerging, and quickly re-emerge. They usually swallow fish in flight, head first. They show some opportunistic behaviour. For example, they have been recorded following cormorants cooperatively hunting Herring ( Nematalosa erebi ), diving to take fish forced to the surface (Higgins & Davies 1996). The species may forage up to 60 km from their nesting site (Birdlife International 2010a).','The Caspian Tern is more vulnerable to threats when it is younger. Once it reaches adulthood, birds may live for a considerable time (Minton & Deleyev 2001). The species is at risk from a range of threats including:Habitat loss or degradation through the introduction of exotic plant species (Shuford & Craig 2002 cited in Birdlife International 2010a).Predation of chicks by Silver Gulls ( Larus novaehollandiae ), feral Cats ( Felis catus ) and Dingoes ( Canis familiaris ) during the breeding period (Minton & Deleyev 2001). Gull predation has been observed at Mud Island, Victoria (Minton & Deleyev 2001).Human disturbance and trampling by cattle at breeding sites (Blokpoel & Scharf 1991 cited in Birdlife International 2010a; Shuford & Craig 2002 cited in Birdlife International 2010a). This disturbance causes terns to rise from their nest, leaving eggs and small chicks exposed to predation by gulls (O\'Neill & Channells 1997). Human visitation has been observed to have a negative impact on a breeding population in the Great Barrier Reef, Queensland. An increase in human visitation saw Caspian Tern numbers decline in the mid 1980s (O\'Neill & Channells 1997).Entanglement of young birds with fishing line and nets (Minton & Deleyev 2001).Exposure to and bioaccumulation of contamiNAts (e.g. organochlorines or methylmercury) in fish could be lowering the species\' reproductive success (del Hoyo et al 1996; Grasman & Fox 2001).Newcastle disease and avian botulism, especially at local high density populations, although these diseases are unlikely to threaten the global population as a whole (Kuiken et al. 2006 cited in Birdlife International 2010a; Shuford & Craig 2002 cited in Birdlife International 2010a).Weather events that damage breeding sites, including gusty weather that deposits sand on nests and nest flooding by high tides or storms (Minton 1995; Minton & Deleyev 2001; Minton et al. 2002).Sea level rises may also affect the species\' breeding habitat (Shuford and Craig 2002, cited in Birdlife International 2010a).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=808'),('81011','Mirafra javanica melvillensis','Vulnerable','Aves','Alaudidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=81011'),('81025','Psophodes leucogaster leucogaster','Vulnerable','Aves','Psophodidae','The Western Whipbird (eastern) is about 20 to 25 cm long and has a mass of around 47 g (Higgins & Peter 2002). It is a distinctive bird, with a short triangular crest, a short and stout bill, long and powerful legs, short rounded wings, and a long graduated tail. It is mostly greyish-olive to olive above, with a prominent white stripe down each cheek and a black chin and throat, and grey to olive below, with a broad white stripe down the centre of the breast and belly (Higgins & Peter 2002; Schodde & Mason 1999). It has dull red irides, a narrow ring of grey skin around each eye, a grey-black to black bill, and dark grey legs and feet. The sexes are alike, but juvenile birds can be distinguished from the adults by the absence of the black and white colouring on the cheeks, chin and throat (Higgins & Peter 2002).','The Western Whipbird (eastern) inhabits mallee and thicket vegetation in coastal and inland areas of southern South Australia (Baker-Gabb in prep.). It usually occurs in habitats that have an open layer of mallee about 3–5 m tall and an understorey of dense shrubs about 1.5–2 m tall (Woinarski et al. 1988). It occurs in mallee scrub on sand flats, dunes and limestone that consists of an overstorey of mallee eucalypts such as Lerp Mallee ( Eucalyptus incrassata ), Red Mallee ( E .  socialis ), Narrow-leaved Mallee ( E .  foecunda ), White Mallee ( E .  dumosa ), Soap Mallee ( E .  diversifolia ) or Giant Mallee ( E .  oleosa ). This habitat is characterised by a dense species-rich heath understorey of shrubs including Dryland Teatree ( Melaleuca lanceolata ), Broom Honey-myrtle ( M .  uncinata ),  Baeckea behrii , Desert Banksia ( Banksia ornata ), Mallee Pine ( Callitris   verrucosa ), Desert Hakea ( Hakea muelleriana ),  Leptospermum coriaceum , species of  Allocasurina , and Porcupine Grass ( Triodia irritans ) (Carpenter & Matthew 1986; Condon 1966; Higgins & Peter 2002; Howe & Ross 1933; Hunt 1976; Hunt & Kenyon 1970; McGilp & Parsons 1939; Woinarski et al. 1988). It also occurs in thickets of  Acacia  (Condon 1966).The structure of the habitat appears to be more important in determining suitability than the species composition (Smith 1991b) and the frequency of wildfire has an important role in maintaining a habitat structure that is suitable for the Western Whipbird (eastern) (Baker-Gabb in prep.; Woinarski et al. 1988). The Western Whipbird (eastern) has been recorded in habitats that were last burnt less than two years earlier, and in habitats that were last burnt forty or more years ago, but most habitats that are occupied have a post-fire age of 10 to 25 years (Clarke 2005b; Higgins & Peter 2002; Woinarski et al. 1988).The Western Whipbird (eastern) is said to associate with the Red-lored Whistler ( Pachycephala rufogularis ) (Hunt & Kenyon 1970), which is listed as Vulnerable under the EPBC Act. It also occurs in areas inhabited by the Malleefowl ( Leipoa ocellata ) and Regent Parrot (eastern) ( Polytelis anthopeplus monarchoides ) both listed as Vulnerable under the EPBC Act and the Black-eared Miner ( Manorina melanotis ) and Mallee Emu-wren ( Stipiturus mallee )  (Baker-Gabb in prep.) listed as Endangered under the EPBC Act.','The Western Whipbird (eastern) feeds on insects (such as ants and grasshoppers) and spiders (Condon 1966; McGilp & Parsons 1939).The Western Whipbird (eastern) forages on the ground and amongst the lower foliage of shrubs such as  Scaevola  and  Olearia  (Condon 1966; McGilp & Parsons 1939; Menkhorst & Bennett 1990). It hops across the ground in search of food items (Condon 1966; McGilp & Parsons 1939). Its tendency to feed on and close to the ground renders the Western Whipbird (eastern) vulnerable to terrestrial predators (Baker-Gabb in prep.).','The decline of the Western Whipbird (eastern) has primarily been caused by the broad-scale clearance of suitable mallee habitat (Bryant 1938; Garnett & Crowley 2000; McGilp & Parsons 1939; SA DEH 2006; Woinarski et al. 1988). The threat from clearing has now diminished (most extant populations of the whipbird occur in conservation reserves) (Garnett & Crowley 2000; SA DEH 2005, 2006), but the small and fragmented populations that remain are highly vulnerable to wildfire. Wildfire has always been a threat to the Western Whipbird (eastern), but its effects are likely to be exacerbated now because clearing has fragmented and reduced the extent of suitable habitat available. This habitat fragmentation has reduced the potential for whipbird populations to find refuge in unburnt areas when confronted with wildfire, and to recolonise burnt areas after a wildfire (SA DEH 2006; Woinarski et al. 1988).Extensive wildfires in the Murray-Mallee region in 1959, 1985, 1986 and 1988 burnt large areas of habitat and thus may have eliminated many local whipbird populations (Woinarski et al. 1988). A series of wildfires in more recent years has further reduced the range and habitat of the Western Whipbird (eastern) in the Murray-Mallee region (Garnett & Crowley 2000). The effect of fire has been most notable in Ngarkat Conservation Park, where most suitable habitat was burnt during wildfires in 2005 and 2006 (SA DEH 2006). It generally takes several years for habitat to regenerate sufficiently to be suitable for the Western Whipbird (eastern), although the whipbird has been recorded in habitat burnt less than two years earlier. The majority of occupied habitats have had post-fire ages of 10 to 25 years, and there have been records in habitats that had not been burnt for 40 years or more (Clarke 2005b; Higgins & Peter 2002; Woinarski et al. 1988).The suitable habitat that remains occurs in isolated fragments that are separated by cleared land or other unsuitable habitats that could inhibit or prevent birds from dispersing. It is probable that populations in small fragments of suitable habitat are unlikely to survive in the long-term (Baker-Gabb in prep.; Woinarski et al. 1988). For example, the subspecies no longer occurs in small fragments of suitable habitat near Billiatt Conservation Park (Clarke 2004).The removal of eggs from nests by collectors has been touted as a possible factor in the decline of the Western Whipbird (eastern) (Woinarski et al. 1988), but the collection of eggs was not acknowledged as a potential threat by later authors (Baker-Gabb in prep.; Garnett & Crowley 2000) and is now, presumably, a rare occurrence.The tendency of the Western Whipbird (eastern) to forage and nest on and/or close to the ground renders the subspecies vulnerable to terrestrial predators (Baker-Gabb in prep.; Howe & Ross 1933). However, predation has not been linked to the decline of the Western Whipbird (eastern) (Baker-Gabb in prep.; Garnett & Crowley 2000), and no information is available to show that predation is having, or might be having, an adverse impact on the subspecies.The Western Whipbird (eastern) lays two eggs per clutch (Howe & Ross 1933; McGilp & Parsons 1939) and is claimed to produce only one clutch per breeding season (Boles 1988). This apparent low rate of reproduction limits the potential for the subspecies to persist and recover when confronted with a threatening process or event (Condon 1966).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=81025'),('81247','Mystivagor mastersi','Critically Endangered','Gastropoda','Charopidae','Masters\' Charopid Land Snail has a small shell (6.5 mm in diameter and 4.5 mm in height) of three whorls and a dull yellowish brown colouration, flamed with brown (Iredale 1944).  It is the only member of a monotypic genus endemic to Lord Howe Island.','Little is known about the biology and ecology of this very rare species. The species is suggested to be arboreal, but actual habitat requirements are unclear (TSSC 2008ael).','NA','Habitat degradation and modificationThe Lord Howe Island Group was listed as World Heritage in 1982 (DEWHA undated). Much of the island is covered in rainforest, with about 10% of land area cleared, for urban development and agriculture, with a further 20% disturbed by introduced animals and exotic weeds (WWF 2001). The southern half of the island is reserved, and whilst this is where the Masters\' Charopid Land Snail occurs, the restricted distribution of the species makes it highly vulnerable to extinction from on-going threats or catastrophic events.Feral animalsThe key threat to Masters\' Charopid Land Snail is predation by introduced rats.  The Ship Rat ( Rattus rattus ), arrived on the island from a wrecked ship in 1918 and has since become well established on Lord Howe Island (DEWHA undated).  Ship Rats prey on snail species, and are thought to have been responsible for the significant decline in, and possible extinction of  Placostylus bivaricosus etheridgei  on Lord Howe Island (NSW NPWS 2001a; Ponder 1997b).  Ship Rats are likely to prey on Masters\' Charopid Land Snail, though the program of baiting of rats currently undertaken on the island is likely to benefit the species if it persists on Mount Gower.  However, this baiting program is unlikely to completely mitigate the effect of predation by Ship Rats on Masters\' Charopid Land Snail as it is not undertaken across the species\' entire range. Two large species of land snails,  Epiglypta howinsulae   and  Placostylus bivaricosus etheridgei   that were restricted to the southern mountains are apparently now extinct, almost certainly due to the activity of the Ship Rat (Ponder 1997b). The New South Wales Scientific Committee has declared predation by the Ship Rat on Lord Howe Island as a key threatening process (NSW Scientific Committee 2000a).Pigs and goats that were introduced to Lord Howe Island by settlers for food later became feral pests (DEWHA undated).  Both species caused damage to the surface litter and ground cover in areas where Masters\' Charopid Land Snail occurred, most notably the trail to Mt Gower (Smithers et al. 1977). It is likely that this resulted in a decline in the species\' numbers.  However, these pest species are no longer likely to be directly impacting on the species, as pigs have now been eliminated from the island, and goats virtually eliminated (DEWHA undated).Another potential threat to Masters\' Charopid Land Snail is predation and habitat disturbance by invasive ant species.  The African Big Headed Ant ( Pheidole megacephala ) is present in the northern settlement area of Lord Howe Island and may affect Masters\' Charopid Land Snail should it invade the area where the species occurs.Further potential threats to Masters\' Charopid Land Snail include introduced birds, particularly the Song Thrush ( Turdus philomelas ) and Common Blackbird ( Turdus merula ), which prey upon  Placostylus  species on Lord Howe Island and may prey on Masters\' Charopid Land Snail.  Although the habitat of Masters\' Charopid Land Snail is protected in the reserved southern area of Lord Howe Island, the species is potentially threatened by trampling, disturbance and collection by visitors, habitat damage by weeds and wildfire.Global warmingThe cloud forest on top of Mount Gower is threatened by global warming (UNESCO 2002).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=81247'),('81249','Pseudocharopa whiteleggei','Critically Endangered','Gastropoda','Charopidae','Whitelegge\'s Land Snail has a loosely coiled shell of few whorls which is 13 to 16 mm in diameter and 6 mm in height.  The shell is relatively flat with a depressed spire and a unicolour appearance of dark red-brown (Iredale 1944).','Little is known about the biology and ecology of this species.  It has been recorded living under and inside logs and in moss (TSSC 2008aen).','NA','Habitat degradation and modificationThe Lord Howe Island Group was listed as a World Heritage Area in 1982 (DEWHA undated). Much of the island is covered in rainforest, with about 10% of land area cleared for urban development and agriculture, with a further 20% disturbed by introduced animals and exotic weeds (WWF 2001). The southern half of the island is reserved, and whilst this is where Whitelegge\'s Land Snail occurs, the restricted distribution of the species makes it highly vulnerable to extinction from on-going threats or catastrophic events.Feral animalsThe key threat to Whitelegge\'s Land Snail is predation by introduced rats. The Ship Rat ( Rattus rattus ),also known as the Black Rat, arrived on the island from a wrecked ship in 1918 and has since become well established on Lord Howe Island (NSW Scientific Committee 2000a). Ship Rats prey on snail species, and are thought to have been responsible for the significant decline in, and possible extinction of, a subspecies of Placostylus ( Placostylus bivaricosus etheridgei ) on Lord Howe Island (NSW NPWS 2001a; Ponder 1997b). Ship Rats are likely to prey on Whitelegge\'s Land Snail, though the program of baiting of rats currently undertaken on the island is likely to benefit the species if it persists on Mount Gower. However, this baiting program is unlikely to completely mitigate the effect of predation by Ship Rats on the Whitelegge\'s Land Snail as it is not undertaken across the species\' entire range. Two large species of land snails,  Epiglypta howinsulae  and  Placostylus bivaricosus etheridgei  that were restricted to the southern mountains are apparently now extinct, almost certainly due to the activity of the Ship Rat (Ponder 1997b). The NSW Scientific Committee has declared predation by the Ship Rat on Lord Howe Island as a key threatening process (NSW Scientific Committee 2000a).Pigs and goats that were introduced to Lord Howe Island by settlers for food later became feral pests (DEWHA undated). Both species caused damage to the surface litter and ground cover in areas where Whitelegge\'s Land Snail occurred, most notably near the trail to Mt Gower (Smithers et al. 1977). It is likely that this resulted in a decline in the species\' numbers. However, these pest species are no longer likely to be directly impacting on the species, as pigs have now been eliminated from the island, and goats virtually eliminated (DEWHA undated).Another potential threat to Whitelegge\'s Land Snail is predation and habitat disturbance by invasive ant species. The African Big Headed Ant ( Pheidole megacephala ) is present in the northern settlement area of Lord Howe Island and may affect the Whitelegge\'s Land Snail should it invade the Mount Gower area.Further potential threats include introduced birds, particularly the Song Thrush ( Turdus philomelas ) and Common Blackbird ( Turdus merula ), which prey upon  Placostylus  species on Lord Howe Island and may prey on the Whitelegge\'s Land Snail. Although the habitat of the Whitelegge\'s Land Snail is protected in the reserved southern area of Lord Howe Island, the species is potentially threatened by trampling, disturbance and collection by visitors, habitat damage by weeds and wildfire.Global warmingThe cloud forest on top of Mount Gower is threatened by global warming (UNESCO 2002).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=81249'),('81250','Advena campbellii','Critically Endangered','Gastropoda','Helicarionidae','Campbell\'s Helicarionid Land Snail is a small land snail which usually has an elevated, fawn spire and a black, round base. A typical specimen is about 17 mm in diameter and 11 mm high (TSSC 2008aev).','Campbell\'s Helicarionid Land Snail is known to live under rotting logs (TSSC 2008aev). A recent study (Neuweger et al. 2001) only collected this subspecies in beach and dune ecosystems.Norfolk Island has been intermittently occupied by various settlers who have dramatically altered the environment, predomiNAtly by land clearing for agriculture and housing (DEH 2000). Approximately 80% of the original vegetation has been cleared, and the invasion of remNAts by weed species has been extensive. Much of the Norfolk Island landscape has been transformed from a densely vegetated sub-tropical island to a highly modified pastoral landscape characterised by grazed kikuyu pastures bordered by remNAt woodland (DEH 2000, 2004i).Phillip Island lies approximately 7 km south of Norfolk Island and is approximately 4 km². The vegetation on the island has been severely degraded by the grazing of pigs, goats and rabbits released there for food and sport during early colonisation of the islands by Europeans. Pigs and goats were removed in the early 20th century, but rabbits were not removed until 1988 (TSSC 2008aev).','NA','Habitat degradation and modification by the introduction of feral animals (notably  Rattus  spp.) to Norfolk Island has led to the extinction of several island fauna (Ponder 1997b). Land clearing and stock damage are also contributing to declines and are likely to have caused the extinction of  Posticobia norfolkensis , the only freshwater mollusc recorded on the island (Ponder 1997b).Habitat degradation and modificationPrior to European settlement, Norfolk Island was almost entirely covered by rainforest, dominated by Norfolk Island Pines ( Araucaria heterophylla ); however, only 20% of the native vegetation of Norfolk Island remains intact, while vegetation on Nepean and Phillip Islands has been almost completely lost (DEH 2000). Much of the remNAt vegetation is degraded owing to weed infestation and stock accesibility. Even Mount Pitt Reserve was not fenced until recently, previously being grazed by livestock. Exotic weed growth has been a major problem on the island, spreading at a rate much faster than it can be controlled (DEH 2004i). Weeds displace the natural vegetation on the island and can dramatically transform the original landscape, particularly the leaf litter and fallen bark that the snails require for survival. In addition, some weed control measures may be detrimental to land snail survival (TSSC 2008aev).A 2001 survey of the land snail fauna in Emily Bay region of Norfolk Island illustrates a grossly altered fauna in this area compared with archaeological samples from pre-European times (Neuweger et al. 2001). This is likely the result of habitat loss and the habitat being heavily vegetated prior to Polynesian and European settlement. Human activity on the island has led to the conversion of tracts of land to pasture and residential development, undoubtedly modifying habitat, introducing flora, reducing available moisture and possibly increasing fire frequency (TSSC 2008aev).Feral animalsThe key threat to Campbell\'s Helicarionid Land Snail is predation by introduced rats. The Polynesian Rat ( Rattus exulans ) is presumed to have been introduced thousands of years ago by Polynesian visitors to Norfolk Island. The Black Rat ( Rattus rattus ) was introduced later, possibly around 1943 (DEH 2000).  Both species are likely to have caused a decline in the numbers of Campbell\'s Helicarionid Land Snail by direct predation. An extensive rat control program has been operating on Norfolk Island since 1992. This baiting program, however, is unlikely to completely mitigate the effect of predation by rats on Campbell\'s Helicarionid Land Snail as it is not undertaken across the subspecies\' entire range (TSSC 2008aev).An additional potential threat to Campbell\'s Helicarionid Land Snail is feral poultry, which have become common in Norfolk Island National Park. Anecdotal evidence suggests that feral poultry prey on snails and may reduce population numbers quickly. Other invasive species, such as ants and the African or Giant Land Snail, pose potential threats to Campbell\'s Helicarionid Land Snail should they be introduced and become established on Norfolk Island. The likelihood such species being introduced and becoming established is unknown but remains a potential threat (TSSC 2008aev).WeedsThe subspecies\' habitat is likely to be declining in quality due to the presence of weed species on Norfolk Island. Over 200 species of introduced vascular plants have been recorded on Norfolk Island, including Lantana ( Lantana camara ), \'William Taylor\' weed ( Ageratina riparia ) and Wild Tobacco ( Solanum mauritianum ) (Hyman 2005).  Parks Australia is currently implementing a weed control program involving the broad scale treatment and rehabilitation of weed infested areas, however it is likely that the habitat of Campbell\'s Helicarionid Land Snail remains threatened, as weed control is not undertaken across the entire range of the subspecies. Anecdotal evidence also suggests that populations of Campbell\'s Helicarionid Land Snail may have been affected by the construction of a stormwater drain leading off the Mount Pitt road. The construction process caused top soil to be washed away and encouraged weed growth by washing weed seeds into previously uninfested areas (TSSC 2008aev).Other threatsAlthough part of the habitat of Campbell\'s Helicarionid Land Snail is protected in Norfolk Island National Park, the subspecies is also potentially threatened by wildfire and trampling, disturbance and collection by visitors (TSSC 2008aev).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=81250'),('81252','Mathewsoconcha phillipii','Critically Endangered','Gastropoda','Helicarionidae','The Phillip Island Helicarionid Land Snail is a small land snail that is 16 mm in diameter and is 12 mm high. It has a fawn to whitish coloured shell with a narrow white peripheral band and a short, depressed spire (Hyman 2005).','Norfolk Island has been intermittently occupied by various settlers who have dramatically altered the environment, predomiNAtly by land clearing for agriculture and housing. Approximately 80% of the original vegetation has been cleared, and the invasion of remNAts by weed species has been extensive. Much of the Norfolk Island landscape has been transformed from a densely vegetated sub-tropical island to a highly modified pastoral landscape characterised by grazed kikuyu pastures bordered by remNAt woodland (DEH 2000; 2004i).Phillip Island lies approximately 7 km south of Norfolk Island and is approximately 4 km². The vegetation on the island has been severely degraded by the grazing of pigs, goats and rabbits released there for food and sport during early colonisation of the islands by Europeans. Pigs and goats were removed in the early 20th century, but rabbits were not removed until 1988 (TSSC 2008aeo).','NA','The key historical threat to the Phillip Island Helicarionid Land Snail was predation by introduced rats. The Polynesian Rat ( Rattus exulans ) is presumed to have been introduced thousands of years ago by Polynesian visitors to Norfolk Island. The Black Rat ( Rattus rattus ) was introduced later, possibly around 1943 (DEH 2000). Both species are likely to have caused a decline in the numbers of the Phillip Island Helicarionid Land Snail by direct predation on Norfolk Island. An extensive rat control program has been operating on Norfolk Island since 1992, however the Phillip Island Helicarionid Land Snail has only been recorded on Phillip Island during the last 100 years, so it is unlikely to benefit from this program. Rats do not currently occur on Phillip Island, however, it is possible that they could disperse to Phillip Island via a boat (TSSC 2008aeo).A further historical threat to the species, with ongoing effects, was the destruction of vegetation on Phillip Island by the grazing of pigs, goats and rabbits. While these animals are no longer present on Phillip Island, the landscape has suffered severe soil erosion and of the few of the plants that survived, many are introduced weeds. Phillip Island continues to be a highly degraded habitat, though programs to control weeds, re-establish native vegetation and protect rare plants and animals have been undertaken by Parks Australia since 1978. This degradation and associated soil erosion is likely to have drastically altered the habitat available to the Phillip Island Helicarionid Land Snail, and caused a decline in the species\' numbers (TSSC 2008aeo).The species\' available habitat is also likely to be declining in quality due to the presence of weed species on Norfolk Island. Over 200 species of introduced vascular plants have been recorded on Norfolk Island, including Lantana ( Lantana camara ), \'William Taylor\' weed ( Ageratina riparia ) and Wild Tobacco ( Solanum mauritianum ) (Hyman 2005). Parks Australia is currently implementing a weed control program involving the broad scale treatment and rehabilitation of weed infested areas, however it is likely that the habitat of the Phillip Island Helicarionid Land Snail remains threatened, as weed control is not undertaken across the entire former range of the species (TSSC 2008aeo).Land clearance is likely to have drastically altered habitat available to the Phillip Island Helicarionid Land Snail, and caused a decline in the species\' numbers. Land clearance since European settlement has been extensive on Norfolk Island, with approximately 80% of the original vegetation having been cleared for agriculture and housing (DEH 2004i).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=81252'),('81253','Quintalia stoddartii','Critically Endangered','Gastropoda','Helicarionidae','Stoddart\'s Helicarionid Land Snail is a small land snail which is usually orange-brown to fawn coloured. It has an imperforate, depressed conic shell, that is typically 14 mm in diameter and 8 mm high (Iredale 1944; Varman 1991).','Norfolk Island has been intermittently occupied by various settlers who have dramatically altered the environment, predomiNAtly by land clearing for agriculture and housing (DEH 2000). Approximately 80% of the original vegetation has been cleared, and the invasion of remNAts by weed species has been extensive. Much of the Norfolk Island landscape has been transformed from a densely vegetated sub-tropical island to a highly modified pastoral landscape characterised by grazed kikuyu pastures bordered by remNAt woodland (DEH 2000; 2004i). Similarly, almost all of the vegetation on Philip Island was destroyed during the mid-20th century (TSSC 2008aep).','NA','The key historical threat to Stoddart\'s Helicarionid Snail was predation by introduced rats. The Polynesian Rat ( Rattus exulans ) is presumed to have been introduced by Polynesian visitors to Norfolk Island. The Ship Rat ( Rattus rattus ) was introduced later, possibly around 1943 (DEH 2000). Both species are likely to have caused a decline in the numbers of Stoddart\'s Helicarionid Snail by direct predation. An extensive rat control program has been operating on Norfolk Island since 1992, however, Stoddart\'s Helicarionid Land Snail has only been recorded on Phillip Island in the last 100 years, so it is unlikely to benefit from this program. Rats do not currently occur on Phillip Island, however, it is possible that they could disperse to Phillip Island via a boat (TSSC 2008aep).A further historical threat to the species, with ongoing effects, was the destruction of vegetation on Phillip Island by the grazing of pigs, goats and rabbits. While these animals are no longer present on Phillip Island, the landscape has suffered severe soil erosion and of the few of the plants that survived, many are introduced weeds. Phillip Island continues to be a highly degraded habitat, though programs to control weeds, re-establish native vegetation and protect rare plants and animals have been undertaken by Parks Australia since 1978. This degradation and associated soil erosion is likely to have drastically altered the habitat available to Stoddart\'s Helicarionid Land Snail, and caused a decline in the species\' numbers (TSSC 2008aep).The species\' available habitat is also likely to be declining in quality due to the presence of weed species on Norfolk Island. Over 200 species of introduced vascular plants have been recorded on Norfolk Island, including Lantana ( Lantana camara ), \'William Taylor\' weed ( Ageratina riparia ) and Wild Tobacco ( Solanum auriculatum ) (Hyman 2005). Parks Australia has been implementing a weed control program involving the broad scale treatment and rehabilitation of weed infested areas, however it is likely that the habitat of Stoddart\'s Helicarionid Land Snail remains threatened as weed control is not undertaken across the entire former range of the species (TSSC 2008aep).Land clearance is likely to have drastically altered habitat available to Stoddart\'s Helicarionid Snail, and caused a decline in the species\' numbers. Land clearance since European settlement has been extensive on Norfolk Island, with approximately 80% of the original vegetation having been cleared for agriculture and housing (DEH 2004i).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=81253'),('81322','Orcaella heinsohni','','Mammalia','Delphinidae','Australian Snubfin Dolphins are characterised by a broadly rounded head that is extremely mobile and usually has a visible neck crease (Beasley et al. 2005). There is no sign of a beak and the mouth line is straight. The teeth in  Orcaella  are peg-like and number less than 20 on each side of the jaws (Martin 1990). In the reverse situation to most dolphins, the u-shaped blowhole of  Orcaella  is open to the front (Leatherwood & Reeves 1983). A distinctive feature of Australian Snubfin Dolphins appears to be a lack of a dorsal groove between the snout and the dorsal fin (Beasley et al. 2005). The dorsal fin of the Australian Snubfin Dolphin is small and situated in the latter half of the body (Beasley et al. 2005), while the flippers are broad, paddle-like and highly mobile. The colour pattern for Australian Snubfin Dolphins is characteristic, with a subtle three-tone consisting of a dark cape, white abdomen and intermediate light grey to brownish grey side (Arnold & Heinsohn 1996; Beasley et al. 2005).','Within Australia, Australian Snubfin Dolphins have been recorded almost exclusively in coastal and estuarine waters. It is doubtful that they venture very far upstream in river systems, although occasional vagrants may venture upstream (Parra et al. 2002a).Boat-based surveys along the east coast of Queensland indicate that Australian Snubfin Dolphins are primarily found in shallow waters less than 20 m deep, close to the coast, close to river and creek mouths and in the proximity of seagrass beds (Parra 2006; Parra et al. 2002a). Within Cleveland Bay, north-east Queensland, Australian Snubfin Dolphins tend to concentrate their activities in areas with these specific features. Within such areas, animals spend most of their time foraging and travelling, and to a lesser extent socialising. The predomiNAce of foraging activities in these areas indicate that these areas represent important feeding habitats for these species (Parra 2006).The Australian Snubfin Dolphin has been found in the shallow coastal waters and estuaries along the Kimberley coast. Beagle and Pender Bays on the Dampier Peninsula and tidal creeks around Yampi Sound and between Kuri Bay and Cape Londonderry are important areas for Australian Snubfin Dolphins (DEWHA 2008b).Australian Snubfin Dolphins share similar habitat preferences with Indo-Pacific Humpback Dolphins, with these two species potentially sympatric (occurring in the same areas) throughout most of their Australian range (Parra 2006).','Australian Snubfin Dolphin prey includes fish of the families Engraulidae, Clupeidae, Chirocentridae, Anguillidae, Hemirhampidae, Leiognathidae, Apogonidae, Pomadasydae, Terapontidae and Sillaginidae (Heinsohn 1979; Marsh et al. 1989). These fishes are typically associated with shallow coastal waters and estuaries in tropical regions (Parra et al. 2002a).Feeding may occur in a variety of habitats, from mangroves to sandy bottom estuaries and embayments, to rock and/or coral reefs. Feeding primarily occurs in shallow waters (less than 20 m) close to river mouths and creeks.','The past and current threats to Australian Snubfin Dolphins include habitat destruction and degradation; incidental capture in gillnets; traditional hunting by Indigenous Australian communities; and live capture for oceanariums (Bannister et al. 1996). In addition, competition with fisheries for prey species is also expected to have become a threat in recent years as fishers turned their attention to estuarine-associated fish that have previously not been targeted.Habitat destruction and degradationHabitat degradation and loss is primarily a concern along the Queensland coast with its high level of construction, dredging, mining, land reclamation, resource extraction, agricultural development, commerce, tourism and recreational activities that are currently present and are likely to continue.In the Northern Territory, the development of a liquefied natural gas plant in waters at Wickham Point, Darwin, and dredging for the port of the McArthur River mine, western Gulf of Carpentaria, have also been highlighted as potential impacts on the species.Off the Kimberley, Western Australia, the development of infrastructure mostly associated with the petroleum industry and iron ore activities, and seismic surveys and petroleum explorations are of concern and are suspected to have an impact at the local level at all affected sites. This threat to Australian Snubfin Dolphins is considered likely to continue into the future, with the potential to increase its impact as habitat degradation and loss increase with increased human population requirements (Bannister et al. 1996; Parra et al. 2002a).Incidental capture in netsIncidental captures have occurred in nets set across creeks, rivers and shallow estuaries for barramundi ( Lates calcarifer ) and Threadfin Salmon ( Polynemus sheridani  and  Eleutheronema tatradactylum ) (DEW 2007a; Hale 1997), and in shark nets set for bather protection (Gribble et al. 1998; Paterson 1990). Captures have occurred primarily in the northern part of the species\' range, but the magnitude is unknown. Between 1967 and 1987, 520 dolphins were caught in mesh along the Queensland coast, with the Australian Snubfin Dolphin being the most common species caught in nets north of Mackay. From 1993 to 2003, eight Australian Snubfin Dolphins were caught in nets, of which five died (DEW 2007a). Regulations to reduce incidental non-target mortalities, such as net attendance rules and gear modifications, have been introduced but enforcement is lacking in remote areas (Hale 1997). The impact on Australian Snubfin Dolphins is expected to reduce as mitigation measures become more common and better policed.Shark nets set for the protection of swimmers capture Australian Snubfin Dolphins, and kill an estimated 1.3 individuals per annum along the Queensland coast (Gribble et al. 1998). Most captures in shark nets occur in the Townsville area, suggesting there may be potential for local stock depletion (Parra et al. 2002a). Although trawl nets and driftnets have not reported incidental bycatch, they may occasionally capture this species.Competition with fisheriesFishing of prey species is an unquantified impact as no quantitative studies on the feeding habits of Australian Snubfin Dolphins have been made. However, based on the distribution and habitat preferences of this dolphin species, plus studies of stomach contents (Heinsohn 1979; Marsh et al. 1989), it appears that this species feeds mainly on estuarine-associated fish species. These prey species constitute a component of the shrimp trawl fishery bycatch, plus are targeted in some areas by estuarine fishers (e.g. barramundi and threadfin salmon). This potential anthropogenic impact can be expected throughout the Australian range of this species. Additional threats may come through targeted fishing of these potential Australian Snubfin Dolphin prey-fish. This is expected to become an increasing threat as fishers turn their attention to estuarine-associated fish that have previously not been targeted. This suspected threat may increase in future years as fishers target historically less desirable fish due to collapse of preferred fish stocks.Pollution of habitatThe northern and north-western coastlines are relatively unpopulated compared to other areas within the Australian Snubfin Dolphin\'s range. However, pollutants still enter coastal and estuarine waters along Australia\'s northern coastline, and can be of many types (e.g. heavy metals, pesticides, herbicides, nutrients and sediments) and from many different sources (e.g. industrial and sewage discharges, catchment runoff and groundwater infiltration) (Cosser 1997). The concentration and rapid growth, especially along the urban coast of Queensland has placed increased pressure on coastal resources. Although the ecological significance of existing contamiNAts within the range of Australian Snubfin Dolphins is not known, recent studies on contamiNAt levels and water quality along the urban Queensland coastline indicate that there is a significant risk that some areas might be damaged in the future. Organohalogen pollutant levels in marine mammals from north-east Queensland were higher than expected, and may therefore affect this species. Polychlorinated dibenzo-p-dioxin and dibenzofuran (PCDD/Fs) levels off Queensland were also found to be high (Gaus et al. 2001), potentially threatening species such as Australian Snubfin Dolphins that prefer sheltered shallow waters. The adverse effects of complex mixtures of organohalogen compounds and PCDD/Fs on marine mammal health are not fully understood, but their toxic properties and high concentration in Bottlenose Dolphins and Dugongs along the Queensland coast suggests they may also be a threat to Australian Snubfin Dolphins in Australia. This threat is likely to escalate as industrial and agricultural activities along the coastline increase (Bannister et al. 1996).The Australian Snubfin Dolphin depends on coastal and riverine habitats that may be affected by developments and pollution.  Higher levels of polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs) have been found in dolphins from the Gold Coast than anywhere else in Australia. High levels of PCBs have been linked to severely impaired reproductive capacity in dolphins. Some dolphins are thought to feed regularly around sewage outlets and port facilities and could be vulnerable to contamination from poor water quality. Some studies have found significant levels of mercury in the respiratory tracts of dolphins, raising the possibility that air quality adjacent to major centres may affect dolphins (DEW 2007a)Interaction with vesselsThe coastal near-shore distribution of Australian Snubfin Dolphins leads to the high probability of interactions with vessels. Boat traffic in densely populated areas of the Queensland coast has increased dramatically in the past decade, with predictions that this will increase even further in future years. Australian Snubfin Dolphins can be expected to exhibit vessel avoidance behaviour, potentially negatively affecting their extent of occupancy and life history, as per other nearshore dolphins (Bedjer et al. 2006). Additionally, the frequencies of whistles produced by Australian Snubfin Dolphins are likely to fall within the range often emanating from boat traffic, suggesting that noise pollution may a problem for this species.PathogensMarine mammals are very susceptible to pathogen-induced mass mortalities (Bannister et al. 1996), suggesting that an epizootic event could threaten a species like the Australian Snubfin Dolphin with its apparently small population size and restricted coastal range. Recent studies have shown that three Humpback Dolphins recovered in the Townsville region between 2000 and 2001 were infected with  Toxoplasmosis gondii  (Bowater et al. 2003), a terrestrial parasite that can be fatal or have deleterious effects on the health of marine mammals (e.g., infection with  T. gondii  is one of the leading causes of mortality of southern sea otters along the California coast: Kreuder et al. 2003). Given their small population size and the fact that they occupy similar habitats to Humpback Dolphins, the incidence of this pathogen is of serious concern for the conservation of Snubfin Dolphins (Parra 2006). Slow reproductive rateThe calving interval of Australian Snubfin Dolphins is unknown, however, as per most Delphinidae, it is expected to be approximately one calf born per two to three years. This low reproductive rate could result in a slow population recovery from any threatening processes.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=81322'),('81552','Euastacus bispinosus','Endangered','Malacostraca','Parastacidae','The Glenelg Spiny Freshwater Crayfish is a large, long-lived freshwater crayfish, which is distinguished by its robust claws and spiny carapace (main body) (Morgan 1986). This species is commonly olive green in colour, sometimes brown, with splashes of red colouration on the joints of their claws and legs. They are known to grow up to at least 130 mm OCL (occipital carapace length; length between eye and end of main body segment) and up to 1.1 kg in weight (Morgan 1986).','Glenelg Spiny Freshwater Crayfish is considered a specialist species with typically low tolerance to environmental conditions (namely dissolved oxygen concentrations), ensuring that species requires specific habitat requirements. As with other  Euastacus  species, Glenelg Spiny Freshwater Crayfish have a preference for permanently-flowing, cool (and shaded) and well-oxygenated water (Morgan 1986; Morgan 1997). Other habitat requirements vary across Victorian and South Australian populations. The poorly understood flow requirements of the species have recently been explored (Whiterod et al. 2014b)VictoriaIn Victoria, the Glenelg Spiny Freshwater Crayfish is generally found in cool, shaded, flowing habitats with good water quality and intact riparian vegetation (Morgan 1986; HoNA 2004) with specific in-stream habitat preferences including cobbles in the Grampians National Park (Johnston & Robson 2009) and rock boulders, coarse woody debris, undercut banks in other areas of the Glenelg catchment (HoNA 2004). HoNA (2004) identified two key features of streams containing the Glenelg Spiny Freshwater Crayfish in Victoria – some debris which they can use for shelter and reasonable water quality. Streams that contain the species are known to vary significantly in regards to width, depth, substrate, debris content and temperature. As use of habitat characteristics as a proxy for occurrence is unreliable, adequate surveys are likely to be important for determining whether the species is present. In the Grampians, where these types of habitat may be absent, the species prefers soft-sediment channels and pools (30 to 100 cm deep) containing low levels of colouration, mud and aquatic vegetation (i.e.  Triglochin  spp.), high levels of dissolved oxygen and a high cover of cobbles and high alkalinity (Johnston & Robson 2009).South AustraliaThe South Australian population of the species exists in the remNAts of a very large peat swamp system, as well as the artificial channels and streams used to drain it (Hammer & Roberts 2008; Whiterod et al. 2014a). Despite being close to the coastline, South Australian habitat is characterised by relatively strong flows of cool, clear, low salinity water with low levels of suspended solids, which is thick with aquatic vegetation and an array of aquatic fauna (Hammer & Roberts 2008). The availability of suitable microhabitats appears to be a limiting factor in the species\' South Australian distribution, as rocks and woody debris is rare (Hammer & Roberts 2008). The greatest abundance of individuals occur in large, relatively deep pools (5-10 m) with a high cover of fringing vegetation and undercut banks (Sweeney & Dickson 2011). In south east South Australia, karst systems discharge groundwater under pressure to form surface water bodies resembling small lakes and streams (Allison & Harvey 1983 cited in Whiterod et al. 2014). The term karst rising-spring (KRS) has been adopted by Keith et al. 2013 to describe this habitat. South Australian KRS have recently been one of 20 ecosystems assessed and used as a case study by a team of international scientists to design IUCN Red List criteria for ecosystems. This South Australian KRS habitat was determined during this study as meeting the criteria of a critically endangered ecosystem. While this IUCN Red List risk assessment criteria for ecosystems is not currently in place, if accepted it would be used to assess the health of a variety ecosystems around the world.','The Glenelg Spiny Freshwater Crayfish is considered to be an omnivore, foraging on organic material as well as actively predating on fish and other macroinvertebrates (HoNA 2004; Johnston et al. 2011; TSSC 2011). They forage on the river bed for a variety of organic material, such as decomposing vegetation and animal material, aquatic macrophytes and algae (HoNA 2004). They are also known to strike at living prey, such as fish and other aquatic invertebrates.  Adult crayfish can move significant amounts of riverbed substrate and organic matter during foraging. This action is thought to play a role in nutrient recycling and structural dynamics in the streams where crayfish occur (TSSC 2011a).','The Glenelg Spiny Freshwater Crayfish is threatened by a number of factors. Some threats have been addressed (i.e. closure of the South Australian and Victorian fishery); however, many of the threatening processes still remain (Sweeney & Dickson 2011). South Australian populations are characterised by critically low levels of genetic diversity generally, highlighting their potential vulnerability to localised extinction (Miller et al. 2014). The threats identified below have been taken from the Conservation Advice for the species and the threat risk assessment carried out at the expert workshop in June 2013 (Whiterod 2013b). Many of the extreme or very high risk threats relate to wide ranging (and interrelated) impacts on habitat condition. Genetic deterioration is likely to strongly affect the ability of the species to respond to these threats and climate change is an overriding and emerging threat to the species (Whiterod 2013b).  The Victorian and South Australian populations of the Glenelg Spiny Freshwater Crayfish are threatened by the following factors (HoNA 2004; TSSC 2011a; Whiterod 2013b):ThreatRisk Assessment for VictoriaRisk Assessment for South AustraliaClearing of riparian vegetation and cattle grazing adjacent to waterways (resulting in habitat degradation via erosion and siltation)Extreme riskExtreme riskGenetic deterioration (inbreeding depression)Extreme riskExtreme riskLow levels of water inflow due to nearby  Eucalyptus  spp. plantations (low flows can lead to pools drying, lowered dissolved oxygen levels and increased salinity)Extreme riskModerate riskWetland draining and channel modificationExtreme riskHabitat destruction due to de-snagging of streams and dredgingExtreme riskExtreme riskWater quality issues (nutrient-laden runoff, herbicides/pesticides, salinity, deep pool stratificationVery high to extreme riskModerate to extreme riskReduced stream flows and groundwater rechargeExtreme riskClimate changeExtreme riskIllegal fishing/fishing pressure (fishing restrictions have been in place since the 1980\'s in Victoria and the species is now protected under South Australian fishing regulations)Very high riskSubstantial riskNatural disturbance events (fire, flood)Very high riskModerate riskMarine intrusionVery high riskExtreme riskDiseaseSubstantial riskIntroduced species (including legal stocking of);  Oncorhynchus mykiss  (Rainbow Trout) and  Salmo trutta  (Brown Trout),  Perca fluviatilis  (Redfin Perch) and  Cyprinus carpio  (European Carp)Substantial riskLow riskHybridisationLow riskLow risk','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=81552'),('81648','Elseya albagula','Critically Endangered','Reptilia','Chelidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=81648'),('817','Sterna dougallii','','Aves','Laridae','The Roseate Tern is a small-medium tern, with a wingspan of 67-76 cm (Higgins & Davies 1996). The Roseate Tern has a slender, pointed, black bill, which develops a red base in the breeding season. The upper wings are grey and the underside is white. Adults have long, flexible tail streamers and orange-red legs (Higgins & Davies 1996).','The Roseate Tern occurs in coastal and marine areas in subtropical and tropical seas. The species inhabits rocky and sandy beaches, coral reefs, sand cays and offshore islands. Birds rarely occur in inshore waters or near the mainland, usually venturing into these areas only accidentally, when nesting islands are nearby (Higgins & Davies 1996). The Roseate Tern is usually associated with coral reefs, where foraging may occurs along the seaward margin, within reef lagoons, or over the reef itself. The species may also forage around islands on the continental shelf, either in lagoons or offshore. They are rarely recorded foraging in shallow sheltered inshore waters (Higgins & Davies 1996). The Roseate Tern usually roosts or loafs in the intertidal zone on islands, including on the upper sections of beaches, above the high-water mark (but still in the wash-zone) on banks, spits and bars, usually of coral or sand. Birds occasionally roost on exposed rubble banks or on rocky features, such as cliffs, headlands, plateaux, stacks and ledges, among rocks or in crags. Birds can roost in the open, but this is often at the edge of, or among, sparse, prostrate vegetation, including grasses, succulents and herbs, usually comprising less than 25% ground-cover. The Roseate Tern often roosts with other terns, such as the Black-naped Tern ( Sterna sumatrana ). Some nests are lined with  Casuarina  sp. \"needles\"\" from nearby trees (McLean 1999). Different islands can be chosen for the breeding colony from year to year. As they do not forage widely from their breeding colonies',' suitable nesting islands may be chosen because of nearby aggregations of their pelagic fish prey (Milton et al. 1996).\"','The Roseate Tern forages mainly on fish, but also on some crustaceans. Fish that have been recorded as being consumed  include:  Atherinomorus lacunosus, Hypoatherina uisila ,  Herklotsichthys quadrimaculatus ,  Sardinops neopilchardus ,  Spratelloides gracilis ,  S. delicatulus  and  Engraulis australis  (Higgins & Davies 1996). Subspecies of  Sterna dougallii  outside Australia are also known to prey on molluscs (including squid) and insects (Cramp 1985). The Roseate Tern forages diurnally, mostly on the rising tide, especially in the evening. Birds forage by ‘dipping’; taking prey on, or just below, the surface, and, less often, plunging to take fish on the edges of schools. They join large congregations of other terns feeding on schools of fish that have been forced to the surface by other marine predators. They may steal prey from other tern species (Higgins & Davies 1996). Birds have also been recorded feeding on prawn trawler discards in the north Great Barrier Reef (Blaber et al. 1998).','Australian Roseate Tern colonies are considered to be secure (Garnett & Crowley 2000); however, there are a number of threats known to impact on the species. These threats include:Predation of adults;Egg predation or nest destruction;Storm events;Shifts in food abundance.Predators of eggs and chicks include the White-bellied Sea-Eagle ( Haliaeetus leucogaster ), Silver Gulls ( Larus novaehollandiae ) and lizards (Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman et al. 1999). Turnstones ( Arenaria interpres ) and large skinks ( Egernis kingie ) are also suspected predators in some locations (Hatch & Szczys 2000). The Black Rat ( Rattus rattus ) is a suspected introduced predator; after a rat baiting program on Wreck Island (Great Barrier Reef) the production of young increased (Burbidge & Fuller 1998; Hulsman et al. 1999). Crushing of chicks and eggs and disruption of breeding due to human activity is likely to be an issue in areas with moderate visitation (Stokes et al. 1996). Storm surges, combined with high tides, can lead to total loss of eggs and young (Stokes et al. 1996); therefore rising sea-levels may threaten breeding populations in the long-term.  Conditions in northern Australia do not appear to be favourable for the rapid growth and breeding success of this species. Pelagic fish populations around inshore islands in tropical Australia may only be able to support limited numbers during the Roseate Tern breeding season. This makes the north-east Australian breeding colonies extremely vulnerable to changes in the availability of prey. It is possible that rapid increases and decreases in prey availability caused by trawling and increased competition from other species, may add to the natural factors influencing the breeding colony size (Blaber et al. 1998). Further to this, cases of mass mortalities in the northern Great Barrier Reef and north-east Northern Territory strengthen the concept that tropical Australian colonies are extremely susceptible to shifts in food abundance during breeding. They appear to be poorly adapted to changes in prey availability, especially in large aggregations (Chatto 2001; Milton et al. 1996). Colonies in Europe and North America have declined and are considered threatened because of small numbers and restricted distributions. In the north-west Atlantic Ocean, the female-biased sex ratio contributes to the slowness of the species recovery (Hatch & Szczys 2000).'),('81851','Mathewsoconcha suteri','Critically Endangered','Gastropoda','Helicarionidae','Mathewsoconcha suteri  is a small land snail that is 9–10 mm in diameter and 6–6.5 mm high.  It has an orange-brown to fawn coloured shell with a narrow white peripheral band and a depressed spire (Hyman 2005).','Specimens have been found inside hollowed out tree branches on the ground (TSSC 2008aer). A recent study (Neuweger et al. 2001) only collected this species in beach and dune ecosystems.Norfolk Island has been intermittently occupied by various settlers who have dramatically altered the environment, predomiNAtly by land clearing for agriculture and housing. Approximately 80% of the original vegetation has been cleared, and the invasion of remNAts by weed species has been extensive. Much of the Norfolk Island landscape has been transformed from a densely vegetated sub-tropical island to a highly modified pastoral landscape characterised by grazed kikuyu pastures bordered by remNAt woodland (DEH 2000, 2004i).','NA','The key threat to  Mathewsoconcha suteri  is predation by introduced rats. The Polynesian Rat ( Rattus exulans ) is presumed to have been introduced thousands of years ago by Polynesian visitors to Norfolk Island. The Black Rat ( Rattus rattus ) was introduced later, possibly around 1943 (DEH 2000).  Both species are likely to have caused a decline in the numbers of  M. suteri  by direct predation. An extensive rat control program has been operating on Norfolk Island since 1992. This baiting program, however, is unlikely to completely mitigate the effect of predation by rats on  M. suteri  as it is not undertaken across the species\' entire range (TSSC 2008aer).The species\' habitat is also likely to be declining in quality due to the presence of weed species on Norfolk Island.  Over 200 species of introduced vascular plants have been recorded on Norfolk Island, including Lantana ( Lantana camara ), \'William Taylor\' weed ( Ageratina riparia ) and Wild Tobacco ( Solanum mauritianum ) (Hyman 2005). Parks Australia has been implementing a weed control program involving the broad scale treatment and rehabilitation of weed infested areas, however it is likely that the habitat of  M. suteri  remains threatened, as weed control is not undertaken across the entire range of the species (TSSC 2008aer).Land clearance is likely to have drastically altered habitat available to  M. suteri , and caused a decline in the species\' numbers. Land clearance since European settlement has been extensive on Norfolk Island, with approximately 80% of the original vegetation having been cleared for agriculture and housing (DEH 2004i).An additional threat to  M. suteri  may be feral poultry, which have become common in Norfolk Island National Park. Anecdotal evidence suggests that feral poultry prey on snails and may reduce population numbers quickly. Other invasive species, such as ants and the African or Giant Land Snail, pose potential threats to  M. suteri  should they be introduced and become established on Norfolk Island. The likelihood of introduction and becoming established is unknown but remains a potential threat (TSSC 2008aer).Although the habitat of  M. suteri  is protected in a reserved area and in Norfolk Island National Park, the species is also potentially threatened by wildfire and trampling, disturbance and collection by visitors (TSSC 2008aer).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=81851'),('81852','Mathewsoconcha grayi ms','Critically Endangered','Gastropoda','Helicarionidae','Gray\'s Helicarionid Land Snail is a small land snail which usually has an orange-brown to fawn coloured shell. A typical specimen is about 15 mm in diameter and 11 mm high. There is no peripheral band (Hyman 2005).','Norfolk Island has been intermittently occupied by various settlers who have dramatically altered the environment, predomiNAtly by land clearing for agriculture and housing. Approximately 80% of the original vegetation has been cleared, and the invasion of remNAts by weed species has been extensive. Much of the Norfolk Island landscape has been transformed from a densely vegetated sub-tropical island to a highly modified pastoral landscape characterised by grazed kikuyu pastures bordered by remNAt woodland (DEH 2000, 2004i).Phillip Island lies approximately 7 km south of Norfolk Island and is approximately 4 km². The vegetation on the island has been severely degraded by the grazing of pigs, goats and rabbits released there for food and sport during early colonisation of the islands by Europeans. Pigs and goats were removed in the early 20th century, but rabbits were not removed until 1988 (TSSC 2008aes).','NA','Feral animalsThe key historical threat to Gray\'s Helicarionid Land Snail was predation by introduced rats. The Polynesian Rat ( Rattus exulans ) is presumed to have been introduced thousands of years ago by Polynesian visitors to Norfolk Island. The Black Rat ( Rattus rattus ) was introduced later, possibly around 1943 (DEH 2000). Both species are likely to have caused a decline in the numbers of Gray\'s Helicarionid Land Snail by direct predation on Norfolk Island. An extensive rat control program has been operating on Norfolk Island since 1992, however, Gray\'s Helicarionid Land Snail is likely to be extinct on Norfolk Island, so it is unlikely to benefit from this program.  Rats do not currently occur on Phillip Island, however, it is possible that they could disperse to Phillip Island via a boat (TSSC 2008aes).Neuweger and colleagues (2001) found a higher diversity of snails in the pre-settlement cultural layer and below it. This reduction appears to have occurred as a result of human impact, combined with predation by the Polynesian Rat introduced by Polynesian settlers prior to European settlement. The Black Rat arrived later (circa 1940) and probably played a significant role in the further decline of these species and of other similar-sized snails (Neuweger et al. 2001).Habitat degradationA further historical threat to Gray\'s Helicarionid Land Snail, with ongoing effects, was the destruction of vegetation on Phillip Island by the grazing of pigs, goats and rabbits. While these animals are no longer present on Phillip Island, the landscape has suffered severe soil erosion and of the few plants that survived, many are introduced weeds. Phillip Island continues to be a highly degraded habitat, though programs to control weeds, re-establish native vegetation and protect rare plants and animals have been undertaken by Parks Australia since 1978. This degradation and associated soil erosion is likely to have drastically altered the habitat available to the Gray\'s Helicarionid Land Snail, and caused a decline in the species\' numbers (TSSC 2008aes).WeedsGray\'s Helicarionid Land Snail available habitat is also likely to be declining in quality due to the presence of weed species on Norfolk Island. Over 200 species of introduced vascular plants have been recorded on Norfolk Island, including Lantana ( Lantana camara ), \'William Taylor\' weed ( Ageratina riparia ) and Wild Tobacco ( Solanum auriculatum ) (Hyman 2005). Parks Australia is currently implementing a weed control program involving the broad scale treatment and rehabilitation of weed infested areas, however it is likely that the habitat of the Gray\'s Helicarionid Land Snail remains threatened, as weed control is not undertaken across the entire former range of the species (TSSC 2008aes).Land clearingPrior to European settlement, Norfolk Island was almost entirely covered by rainforest, dominated by Norfolk Island Pines ( Araucaria heterophylla ); however, only 20% of the native vegetation of Norfolk Island remains intact, while vegetation on Nepean and Phillip Islands has been almost completely lost (DEH 2000). Much of the remNAt vegetation is degraded owing to weed infestation and stock accesibility. Even Mount Pitt Reserve was not fenced until recently, previously being grazed by livestock. Exotic weed growth has been a major problem on the island, spreading at a rate much faster than it can be controlled (DEH 2004i). Weeds displace the natural vegetation on the island and can dramatically transform the original landscape, particularly the leaf litter and fallen bark that the snails require for survival. In addition, some weed control measures may be detrimental to land snail survival (TSSC 2008aes).A 2001 survey of the land snail fauna in the Emily Bay region of Norfolk Island illustrates a grossly altered fauna in this area compared with archaeological samples from pre-European times (Neuweger et al. 2001). This is likely the result of habitat loss and the habitat being heavily vegetated prior to Polynesian and European settlement. Human activity on the island has led to the conversion of tracts of land to pasture and residential development, undoubtedly modifying habitat, introducing flora, reduing available moisture and possibly increasing fire frequency.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=81852'),('82034','Oligosoma lichenigera','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Lord Howe Island Skink is a rich metallic-bronze/olive lizard growing to 8 cm with small brown flecks/streaks aligned longitudinally, often with brown spots on the head, a pale golden stripe from above the eye to the base of the tail bordered by darker brown on the upper body usually enclosing pale spots, a white/grey throat with dark greyish-brown flecks and pale/dark brown limbs (Cogger 2000).','In general, it occurs in closed forest, low open woodland, tussock grassland, littoral complex and rocky isolates (Cogger  et al . 1993). On Phillip I. it is found in a wide range of habitats from bare eroded slopes to dense thickets of African Olive and amongst the roots of dense tussocks of graminoids such as Moo-oo ( Cyperus haematodes ) and the native Flax ( Phormium tenax ) (Cogger  et al . 1993).On the Lord Howe I. mainland they appear restricted to a single, rare habitat type behind Lagoon Beach at the base of Signal Point, and at the base of Malabar. The habitat consists of honeycombed beachrock partially embedded in the soil, surrounded by  Howea  palm forest in which there is a thick layer of humus formed by palm and other leaf litter. The surfaces of the rocks are pitted with holes averaging 1 - 2 cm in diameter, tunneling deep into the matrix of the rock. Some tunnels join to form larger chambers. The tunnels appear to provide the only safe shelter site for lizards from vertebrate predators. The surrounding humus provides many invertebrate prey items (Cogger 1971).On Blackburn I. skinks were found to be common under loose basalt boulders on slopes on the northern leeward side of the island, especially around the bases of low trees (Cogger 1971).','A climbing party observed one individual on Ball\'s Pyramid to roll a tern egg down a rock slope until it broke then feed on the contents (Cogger 1971).','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82034'),('82063','Litoria myola','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Hylidae','The Kuranda Tree Frog is a medium-sized stream and forest dwelling frog. There is considerable sexual dimorphism in size between sexes; males are 35–45 mm in length and weigh 2–5 g, and females are 57–69 mm in length and weigh 9–19 g (Hoskin 2007). Males and females are generally a mottled pattern of tan and brown on the upper surface and pale underneath. A green crescent is present in the upper iris and the back edge of the forearms and legs is fringed with small skin extensions (Hoskin 2007).','The Kuranda Tree Frog is found in rainforest near slow-moving permanent and ephemeral streams (Hoskin 2007). All sites from which the species is known are close to the Barron River and between 300 and 400 m altitude. The sites are generally sheltered and experience little wind. At these mid altitudes, the climate is warm and humid. There are pronounced wet and dry seasons, with most rain falling in the warmer \'wet season\' between November and April. Streams inhabited by the Kuranda Tree Frog are meandering and structured as long, slow pools separated by short, shallow sections of riffles or cascades. The streams are small to moderate-sized, with low levels of flow (except following heavy rain) (Hoskin 2007).The species has been observed in relatively mature rainforest as well as in areas of regenerating rainforest. The species appears to require reasonably thick riparian forest and is generally absent from sites where only narrow strips of riparian forest have been retained (Hoskin 2007).Male Kuranda Tree Frogs are encountered calling along streams through the spring and summer months, primarily near riffle areas and small cascades (Hoskin 2007). Males are rarely encountered away from streams. Calling males clump around the shallower, flowing sections of streams. Female Kuranda Tree Frogs are rarely encountered, and those that have been found were visiting streams to breed. A few females have been observed in the mid and upper strata of rainforest trees (both near and some distance from streams) and Hoskin (2007) suggests that this is where they live when not visiting streams to breed.','The species\' diet is not known in detail but, as for similar frog species, it most likely consists of invertebrates (insects and arthropods) (Hoskin 2007).','The Kuranda Tree Frog is affected by vegetation clearance, hydrological disturbances, species hybridisation and chytrid fungus.Vegetation clearanceThe species is threatened by clearing of rainforest vegetation (including regrowth), particularly in relation to the current and proposed rural sub-division and urban development within the species\' geographic distribution (Hoskin 2007).Hydrological distrubancesChanges in water flow, water quality and sedimentation, particularly due to current and proposed residential development also threaten the Kuranda Tree Frog. These changes can occur as a result of impacts both at the sites where the species occurs as well as upstream in the catchments (Hoskin 2007).Species hybridisationThe Kuranda Tree Frog is potentially threatened by hybridisation with the closely related Green-eyed Tree Frog ( Litoria genimaculata ). Currently the two species co-exist in this region but levels of hybridisation are very low. However, disruption to the natural levels of interaction due to captive breeding and release or movement of individuals in and out of the region or between sites may increase levels of hybridisation (Hoskin 2007; TSSC 2010g).Chytrid fungusThe exotic frog chytrid fungus ( Batrachochytrium dendrobatidis ), which has been found on the closely related Green-eyed Tree Frog, is also a potential threat (Hoskin 2007).  Female Kuranda Tree Frogs are believed to be at a higher risk of mortality during their seasonal breeding movements between forest and stream habitats (TSSC 2010g).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82063'),('82084','Micropathus kierNAi','Critically Endangered','Insecta','Rhaphidophoridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82084'),('82270','Diomedea antipodensis gibsoni','Vulnerable','Aves','Diomedeidae','Gibson\'s Albatross is very similar to the Wandering Albatross in appearance. Adults have a white or pale back that extends along the dorsal surface of the wings near the body. The dorsal wing surface has a black trailing edge, black remiges and mottled white patches on black primary coverts. The ventral wing surface is white with a dark trailing edge. The white tail has black edges, except in fully grown males. Females are slightly smaller and duller than males, with greyer fine barring and/or a pink wash over the neck and breast. Up close, the bill is large, shapely, and pale-flesh coloured; and the white plumage of the head and body has very fine grey barring (Pizzey & Knight 1999).','Gibson\'s Albatross is marine, pelagic and aerial. In the Antarctic, it occurs in open water, and rarely enters the belt of icebergs region (Falla 1937a; Hicks 1973). In late summer, it may approach the edge of the pack-ice (Darby 1970).Gibson\'s Albatross flies within 15 m of the sea surface, using the updraft from wave fronts for lift. It circles over breeding islands to heights of at least 1500 m (Marchant & Higgins 1990).On breeding islands, the Gibson\'s Albatross nests on coastal or inland ridges, slopes, plateaux and plains, often on marshy ground (Falla 1937a; Warham & Bell 1979). Nests of the Gibson\'s Albatross are sited on moss terraces, in dense tussocks, and often in loose aggregations on the west (windward) side of islands. It prefers open or patchy vegetation (tussocks, ferns or shrubs), and it requires nesting areas that are near exposed ridges or hillocks so that it can take off (Warham & Bell 1979).','Gibson\'s Albatross eats squid, fish and crustaceans (Gales 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1990).Gibson\'s Albatross feeds pelagically, using the wind to travel great distances to forage, both during and between breeding seasons (Reinke et al. 1998). It feeds from the sea surface or just below it, or makes shallow dives from heights of 2–5 m (Harper 1987; Voisin 1981). Foraging behaviours of albatrosses, such as flying long distances to search for food, following boats, feeding aggressively on offal and diving for baits make them susceptible to being drowned in longline fishing gear (AGDEH 2006q).','Gibson\'s Albatross chicks are unlikely to survive if a parent is killed while foraging at sea (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Due to late breeding (at more than 10 years of age) and low chick production (once every 2–3 years), this species is less able to sustain bycatch mortality (Walker & Elliott 1999). There are four key threats to Gibson\'s Albatross (EA 2001f):Incidental catch during longline fishing operations.Incidental catch during trawl fishing operations.Intentional shooting/killingIncidental catch during trolling operationsOceanic longline fishing has been used to target pelagic and demersal fish in the southern oceans since the 1950s, and is used in almost all Australian waters today (AGDEH 2006q). Gales and Brothers (1995) reported that 75% of the birds killed on longlines and retained for identification were albatrosses. Internationally, some longline fishing fleets still operate without substantial by-catch mitigation measures. Murray and colleagues (1993, cited in Walker & Elliott 1999) noted high bycatch of Gibson\'s Albatross by longline fishing boats. Hook and plastic ingestion also potentially threaten Gibson\'s Albatross. Hook ingestion by albatross appears to have increased in recent years. Between 50–100 million hooks are set each year in the Southern Ocean and as many as 1.1 billion hooks are set globally. Seabirds and fishing vessels concentrate in areas of high biological productivity (EA 2001f).The Gibson\'s Albatross may also die from collisions with cables and warps used on fishing trawlers. Outside of the Australian Fishing Zone, trawlers carrying netsonde monitor cables or their equivalent may cause substantial mortality in albatrosses (EA 2001f).The species may also be shot by fishermen to protect bait or for sport (EA 2001f; Gales 1998).Trolling (trailing a line with baited hooks) for pelagic species such as Albacore Tuna ( Thunnus alalunga ) is another potential threat (EA 2001f; Gales 1998; Weimerskirch et al. 1997; Weimerskirch & Jouventin 1998).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82270'),('82273','Thalassarche bulleri platei','Vulnerable','Aves','Diomedeidae','The Pacific Albatross is a small, rather lightly built albatross, with a wingspan of 205–213 cm (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Males weigh slightly more than females (2.5–3.3 kg compared to 2.15–2.8 kg) (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The species has a long slender striking black and yellow bill, a neat grey hood, prominent silvery-white forecap, black patch before the eye, and a thin white crescent to the rear of or below the eye (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The underwings are mostly white, with a moderately broad, fairly straight and sharply defined black leading edge (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The Pacific Albatross is a marine, pelagic species. It occurs in subtropical and subantarctic waters of the South Pacific Ocean (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Habitat preferences are poorly known (Marchant & Higgins 1990). In New Zealand, the species has been observed in association with fishing boats close inshore and over waters of 180–360 m depth (Robertson & Jenkins 1981; Secker 1969) although it is not so strongly associated with fishing grounds as are other albatrosses (Bartle 1974).In Australia, the species occurs over inshore, offshore and pelagic waters (Blaber 1986; Carter 1977; Rogers 1969) and off the coast of south-east Tasmania. The Pacific Albatross prefers waters of the East Australia Current where sea surface-temperatures are greater than 16.5 °C (Blaber 1986). The birds fly in low or medium airspace using updraft off sea swell for lift (Marchant & Higgins 1990). The species takes food from the surface with shallow dives to depth of 1 m observed (Fenwick 1978).The birds breed on subtropical and subantarctic islands and rock stacks in the New Zealand region, on sparsely vegetated slopes, cliff tops and ledges on rocky islands or stacks (Dawson 1973; Robertson 1974; Wright 1984).','The Pacific Albatross is likely to eat cephalopods (squid) and fish (Marchant & Higgins 1990). This species has been observed attending fishing boats (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The  National recovery plan for Albatrosses and Giant-Petrels  (EA 2001f) identified incidental catch during longline fishing operations, competition with fisheries for marine resources and marine pollution as the biggest threats to the Pacific Albatross populations in Australian waters. When migrating through the East Marine Region, the Pacific Albatross may be at threat from a loss of food stock, ingestion or being caught in marine debris, oil spills, pollution and commercial fishing that occurs within the region (DEWHA 2009m).Incidental catch during longline fishing operationsLongline fishing has been identified as the primary threat currently affecting albatross (Gales 1998). The two main forms of mortality that affect albatross are bycatch during line-setting, and ingestion of (discarded) fishing hooks.Incidental bycatch during line-settingSince the 1950s longline fishing fleets have expanded into every major oceanic sector to the point that most individual albatrosses are likely to interact with longline fishing vessels at some stage in their lives. During line-setting, baits attached to hooks are paid out from the stern of the ship. Albatross habitually follow fishing vessels and aggressively compete for baits. In doing so, birds risk getting hooked on the lines and being drawn underwater to drown (Alexander et al. 1997).Ingestion of fishing hooksAlbatross captured on longline fishing hooks may survive the hauling process, but retain the long-line hooks, causing death or disability (Brothers 1991; Nel & Nel 1999). Presumably, most instances of hook ingestion occur as a result of the processing procedures (notably the discarding of hooked fish heads by factory crew) undertaken on non-Australian and/or illegal demersal longlining vessels. Occasionally, fishing gear is regurgitated to chicks, resulting in chick-death (EA 2001f). The frequency of longline hooks being regurgitated at South Georgia nest sites of Wandering Albatrosses ( Diomedea exulans ) and Black-browed Albatrosses ( Thalassarche melanophris ) had reportedly increased six-fold in the 1990s (Cooper 1995; Huin & Croxall 1996). Since almost all albatross species have been recorded on longline hooks, it is very likely that most, or all, albatross species suffer from swallowing fishing equipment (EA 2001f).Competition with fisheries for marine resourcesThe progressive degradation of the marine habitat, particularly the global over-extraction of marine resources, may have serious long-term effects on the status of albatross (Croxall & Gales 1998). Seabird populations have declined through direct competition with fisheries for prey (Croxall & Gales 1998; EA 2001f). The ecological sustainability of fisheries is crucial to albatross (EA 2001f).Marine pollutionOrganochlorines and heavy metals degrade very slowly in the environment. These chemical contamiNAts are retained by organisms and become concentrated in the tissues of higher-order feeders. Consequently, top order predators, such as albatross, may build-up hazardous levels of synthetic chemicals in their tissue. Furthermore, because albatross are a long-lived and typically highly dispersive species, they have even greater opportunity to accumulate high levels of chemical contamiNAts (EA 2001f). Elevated levels of persistent organic pollutants can have deleterious population level effects through diminished reproductive success caused by eggshell thinning, embryo non-viability and offspring deformities (Croxall et al. 1984; Ludwig et al. 1998).In addition, sea-jettisoned marine debris can impact upon albatross in two ways: through ingestion or via entanglement (Huin & Croxall 1996). Many albatross species ingest plastic and other marine debris that have a wide range of lethal or sub-lethal effects. The debris can cause physical damage, perforation, mechanical blockage or impairment of the digestive system, resulting in starvation. Some plastics are also a source of toxic pollutants, which are released into the blood stream (Ryan 1988a; Ryan et al. 1988). The subsequent reduction in fitness can lower the bird\'s ability to reproduce, catch prey and/or avoid predation (Fry et al. 1987; Sileo et al. 1990).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82273'),('82287','Notechis scutatus ater','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Elapidae','Krefft’s Tiger Snake (Flinders Ranges) can be distinguished from other tiger snakes by its small size, black colouration, number of scales and venom colour (Ehmann 1992). The Krefft’s Tiger Snake (Flinders Ranges) has a dark brown to black coloured body, light to very dark grey coloured belly and smooth scales (Cogger 2000). Faint darker or lighter cross-bands are often visible along the body, particularly in juveniles. The Krefft’s Tiger Snake (Flinders Ranges) reaches a maximum length of 1.2 m, and female adults are larger than males (Ehmann 1992; Mirtschin & Bailey 1990).','Krefft\'s tiger snake (Flinders Ranges) is restricted to wetter parts of the Flinders Ranges and Broughton River, within the 500 mm annual rainfall isohyet, along permanent and semi-permanent watercourses and forages in water for frogs, tadpoles and possibly fish (Mirtschin & Bailey 1990). It occurs in rocky, often steep margins of watercourses that may dry to become isolated pools during the summer, beginning in September (Wilson & Knowles 1988; Mirtschin & Bailey 1990; Cogger et al. 1993). A second habitat occurs along the coastal plain of the Broughton River, which is the largest watercourse in the region and retains water for most of the year (Ehmann 1992).Riparian vegetation (southern Flinders Ranges) consists of woodland dominated by river red gum ( Eucalyptus camaldulensis ) and sugar gum ( Eucalyptus cladocalyx ). Valley slope vegetation (Broughton River) is dominated by long-leafed box ( Eucalyptus goniocalyx ) with an understorey of mustard bush ( Cassinia  sp.) and  HymeNAthera angustifolia  (Mirtschin & Bailey 1990).Snakes take shelter in flood debris accumulated against trees and shrubs in creek beds, in rocky screes on valley slopes, and in shrubby undergrowth on the plains (Mirtschin & Bailey 1990; Cogger et al. 1993). Some snakes take refuge in water when disturbed (Mirtschin & Bailey 1990). It becomes inactive over winter, retreating into rodent burrows, hollow logs, rock crevices and tree stumps (Fearn 1993). Groups of juvenile snakes have been found overwintering in the same place (Fearn 1993).','Krefft\'s tiger snake (Flinders Ranges) forage in water, perhaps utilising their black colouration to quickly gain heat when out of the water before reentering to forage. They have been observed to muzzle under submerged rocks, flipping their tails on the surface, in search of tadpoles. Individuals have been observed to stay submerged for up to nine minutes. The diet of wild individuals includes frogs, tadpoles and ducklings. Captive specimens will readily take mice, rats and chickens (Mirtschin & Bailey 1990). Keogh and colleagues (2005) indicate that anecdotal evidence suggests that the subspecies may feed only on seasonally available tadpoles.The diet of wild Krefft\'s tiger snake (Flinders Ranges) is predomiNAtly comprised of frogs and tadpoles (Mirtschin & Bailey 1990) and presumably also includes fish. Six species of frogs occur in the Mid-North around Mt Remarkable NP. These include the brown tree frog ( Litoria ewingi ), eastern common froglet ( Crinia signifera ), eastern banjo frog ( Limnodynastes dumerili ), spotted marsh frog ( Limnodynastes tasmaniensis ), mallee spadefoot toad ( Neobatrachus pictus ) and Bibron’s toadlet ( Pseudophryne bibroni ).The small size of Krefft\'s tiger snake (Flinders Ranges) and specialised food preferences of (i.e. frogs and tadpoles) increases its sensitivity to changes in food availability, relative to other mainland tiger snakes that are capable of eating larger prey (possibly due to prey availability and head size) (Fearn et al. 2012). Other mainland tiger snake subspecies can to switch to alternative (larger) prey species. In the wild, other tiger snake subspecies are cannibalistic (Fearn & Spencer 1995).','Krefft\'s tiger snake (Flinders Ranges) is likely to be threatened by habitat degradation, loss of prey caused by chytridiomycosis, introduced fish or hydrological change and inappropriate fire regimes.Outside Mt Remarkable NP, the distribution of Krefft\'s tiger snake (Flinders Ranges) is likely to be severely fragmented as the region is subject to intensive farming activities. Heavy grazing, tree and shrub clearance, clearing of sheltering sites (woody debris or rocky scree) and soil erosion has degraded many watercourses (Mirtschin & Bailey 1990). Despite heavy grazing along degraded creeks, the species is occasionally observed in these areas (Mirtschin & Bailey 1990). Goats and rabbits may also contribute to habitat degradation.Fire may pose a threat to subpopulations through destruction of habitat and possible reduction of food sources. A population on sheep grazing land showed a decline following a fire. Fire is probably the major threat to the population in Mt Remarkable NP (Mirtschin & Bailey 1990). The park had major fire events in 1988 and 1927 (DEH 2001).The species is particularly sensitive to changes in the availability of tadpoles and frogs. Chytridiomycosis, introduced trout at Waterfall Creek and Burra Creek (Mirtschin in Cogger et al. 1993) and introduced mosquito fish could reduce the availability of prey. Hydrological changes that could impact the subspecies include eutrophication and water pollution (Mirtschin & Bailey 1990), salinity, chemical spraying, changes to hydrology in areas of agriculture and conversion of ponds to dams for stock. Lack of standing water may become a threat during periods of drought.Potential threats that have been identified include predation by foxes, butcherbirds, goshawks, harriers, ibises, kites and kookaburras (Vestjens 1977) and inappropriate collection (Mirtschin & Bailey 1990).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82287'),('82329','Acanthornis magna greeniana','Critically Endangered','Aves','Pardalotidae','The Scrubtit (King Island) is about 11 to 12 cm in length and has a mass of 8.5 to 11 g. The adults are brown above, and mostly yellowish-white below, with a white ring around each eye, yellowish irides, a grey \'mask\', a greyish-black bill, two white spots on the shoulder of each wing, white margins on some feathers of the wings, a black band across the posterior end of the tail, and pinkish-brown to grey feet and legs. Juvenile birds can be distinguished from the adults, if viewed at close range, on the basis of the duller plumage, smaller and less prominent white spots on the wings, finer white margins on the feathers of the wings, and pale (rather than black) gape (Higgins & Peter 2002).','The Scrubtit (King Island) inhabits remNAt patches of mature Swamp Paperbark  Melaleuca   ericifolia  forest that occur in flat, low-lying and poorly-drained swamps (Donaghey 2003; McGarvie & Templeton 1974). It is most common in patches of tall Swamp Paperbark forest that support a dense understorey of young Swamp Paperbark and ground-layer plants (Donaghey 2003). In recent decades it also inhabited some large remNAts of wet Tasmanian Blue Gum  Eucalyptus globulus  forest in the south-east of King Island, where it occurred in gullies lined with tree-ferns (Donaghey 2003, 2007; Green & McGarvie 1971; McGarvie & Templeton 1974).The swamp forest habitat of the Scrubtit (King Island) may provide refuge to the subspecies during wildfire. In 2000 a major bushfire burnt almost all of Lavinia State Reserve, including a small area of the Nook Swamps, but the Scrubtit (King Island) was able to survive the fire by sheltering in unburnt areas of swamp forest habitat in the Nook Swamps (Donaghey 2003; KINRMG 2006).','The diet of the Scrubtit (King Island) has not been recorded. However, it probably feeds on insects, spiders and snails, like the nominate subspecies  A .  m .  magnus  (Butler 1906; Lea & Gray 1935; North 1901-1904; Pickett 1996; Thomas 1974).The Scrubtit (King Island) forages in ferns, shrubs and Swamp Paperbark (and probably other trees). It forages systematically: it alights on a trunk, near the ground, and makes its way up and around the trunk to the canopy, picking food items from beneath loose bark and among foliage (Donaghey 2007, pers. comm.; Garnett & Crowley 2000; McGarvie & Templeton 1974).','The habitat of the Scrubtit (King Island) has been greatly reduced by clearing and burning (Barnes et al. 2002; Donaghey 2003; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Holdsworth 2002, pers. comm.; KINRMG 2006). The small Scrubtit (King Island) population (which is estimated to consist of 200 or less breeding birds) is now severely fragmented and confined to a small number of habitat remNAts, and as such is extremely vulnerable to wildfire or disease epidemics (Donaghey 2003; Garnett & Crowley 2000; KINRMG 2006). Furthermore, birds that have been collected in recent years have been infested with large numbers of ticks, and it is possible that these infestations may be having an adverse affect on the Scrubtit (King Island) population (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Schodde & Mason 1999). Clearing is unlikely to be a major threat at the present time because the Scrubtit (King Island) population that remains seems to be mainly confined to habitat in Livinia State Reserve (Donaghey 2003, 2007, pers. comm.; Holdsworth 2002, pers. comm.; KINRMG 2006; TSN-WWF 2004).The Forest Raven  Corvus tasmanicus  is a current potential threat to the Scrubtit (King Island). The Forest Raven was first recorded on King Island in the late 1970s. Its population has rapidly expanded and it is now abundant on the island. The Forest Raven was found breeding in the Nook Swamps in 2000 (Donaghey 2003) and, as a known predator of eggs and nestlings of other birds (Higgins et al. 2006), it could, given its large numbers, possibly have an adverse affect on the breeding success of the Scrubtit (King Island) (Donaghey 2007, pers. comm.). The Scrubtit (King Island) is extremely vulnerable to catastrophic events such as extensive wildfire or disease epidemics due to its very small population size (Donaghey 2003; Garnett & Crowley 2000; KINRMG 2006).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82329'),('82338','Anthochaera phrygia','Critically Endangered','Aves','Meliphagidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82338'),('82344','Thalassarche cauta steadi','Vulnerable','Aves','Diomedeidae','The White-capped Albatross has a grey back and wings; faint or absent greyish wash on cheeks; and a white head, neck and rump. The underwing is mostly white with a narrow black margin and a small dark notch at the wing-pit. The bill is pale greyish straw colour, with a yellowish tip (Pizzey & Knight 1999). There is also a thin black eyebrow and a delicate, grey wash over the face.','The White-capped Albatross is a marine species and occurs in subantarctic and subtropical waters. It reaches tropical areas associated with the cool Humboldt Current off South America (Marchant & Higgins 1990). It is unknown what sea-surface temperatures this subspecies prefers; however, in the southern Indian Ocean it has been observed in waters of 6.4–13.5 °C (Rand 1963).The White-capped Albatross has been noted in shelf-waters around breeding islands and over adjacent rises. During the non-breeding season, birds have been observed over continental shelves around continents. The species occurs both inshore and offshore (Cox 1976; Falla 1937; Marchant 1977) and enters harbours and bays (Jehl 1973). The species is scarce in pelagic waters (Falla 1937; Jehl 1973). Birds gather to scavenge at commercial fishing grounds.Birds nest on slopes vegetated with tussock and succulents on Auckland Island (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The White-capped Albatross probably has a diet of inshore cephalopods (squid) and fish, but this has not been studied (Gales 1993; Marchant & Higgins 1990). This subspecies takes food from the surface, or just below, and has been observed diving to depths of 2+ m for offal (Nicholls 1979). The birds scavenge at commercial feeding grounds (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','The White-capped Albatross is threatened on Auckland Island by pig predation at nests (Croxall & Gales 1998; Environment Australia 2001f).The White-capped Albatross is threatened by drowning in longline fishing gear and collision with trawl warps (steel rope connecting trawl gear to vessel) while foraging (Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1993, 1998). The partitioning (and quantification) of Shy Albatross and White-capped Albatross longline deaths is very difficult as their appearence is very similar (Gales et al. 2000). The mobile nature of juvenile White-capped Albatrosses exposes them to many fisheries, however, it has been suggested that most deaths occur in South African, Namibian and New Zealand fisheries (Baker et al. 2007). One estimate suggests that 6850–7050 worldwide drownings occur annually and, due to its far greater movement range, this species is far more likely to drown due to fishing rather than the Shy Albatross (Baker et al. 2007). In Australian waters, it is estimated that less than ten White-capped Albatross drown annually (Baker et al. 2007).When migrating through the East Marine Region the White-capped Albatross may threatened by reduced food stock, ingestion or being caught in marine debris, oil spills, pollution and commercial fishing that occurs within the region (DEW 2007a).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82344'),('82345','Thalassarche cauta cauta','Vulnerable','Aves','Diomedeidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82345'),('82404','Ardenna carneipes','','Aves','Procellariidae','The Flesh-footed Shearwater is a large (length 40–47 cm; wingspan 99–107 cm; weight 510–750 g), broad-winged, blackish-brown shearwater with dark brown irides, a pale-horn bill (tipped black) and flesh-pink legs and feet (Enticott & Tipling 1997; Johnstone & Storr 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1990). Individuals are typically solitary at sea, although flocks of hundreds of birds can form around sources of food, and at dusk when individuals raft together offshore from their breeding islands (Bartle 1974; Johnstone & Storr 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1990; Warham 1958). Pairs nest in colonies (Marchant & Higgins 1990; Powell et al. 2007).','The Flesh-footed Shearwater mainly occurs in the subtropics over continental shelves and slopes and occasionally inshore waters. Individuals also pass through the tropics and over deeper waters when on migration (Brooke 2004; Marchant & Higgins 1990; Reid et al. 2002). Individuals have been recorded over waters of 12.9–22.9 ºC in the south-western Pacific Ocean (Reid et al. 2002) and over waters of 11–16 ºC in the northern Pacific Ocean (Ainley 1976; Kuroda 1955). Pairs breed on islands in burrows on sloping ground in coastal forest, scrubland, shrubland or grassland (Dyer 2002; Marchant & Higgins 1990; Powell et al. 2007; Warham 1958). These same burrows are also used for roosting during the breeding season (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Burrows are excavated in substrates that are friable and sufficiently deep to accommodate burrows. Areas where excavation will be impeded by rock, deep ground litter or dense vegetation are avoided (Dyer 2002; D. Hobcroft 2002, pers. comm.; Lane 1982b; 1982c; Tingay & Tingay 1982; Warham 1958). Burrows are situated in areas that provide a clear flight-path for birds to enter and exit their colonies (Hindwood 1940; D. Hobcroft 2002, pers. comm.). Diurnal loafing and probably some nocturnal roosting occur at sea (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The Flesh-footed Shearwater does not occur in any of the threatened ecological communities listed under the EPBC Act. The Flesh-footed Shearwater and Great-winged Petrel, the latter listed as Marine under the EPBC Act, breed at different times of the year but tend to occupy the same nesting sites and often the same burrows on islands where both species occur off the coast of south-western Western Australia (Marchant & Higgins 1990; Warham 1958).','The Flesh-footed Shearwater feeds on small fish, cephalopod molluscs (squid, cuttlefish, nautilus and argonauts), crustaceans (barnacles and shrimp), other soft-bodied invertebrates (such as  Velella ) and offal (Gould et al. 1997; Johnstone & Storr 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1990; Serventy et al. 1971).The Flesh-footed Shearwater forages almost entirely at sea and very rarely on land. It obtains most of its food by plunging into the water from in flight and partially submerging to take prey (termed \'surface plunging\') or pursuing prey beneath the surface by swimming (termed \'pursuit plunging\').It also regularly forages by settling on the surface of the ocean and snatching prey from the surface (termed \'surface seizing\'), momentarily submerging onto prey beneath the surface (termed \'surface diving\') or diving and pursuing prey beneath the surface by swimming (termed \'pursuit diving\'). Birds have also been observed flying low over the ocean and pattering the water with their feet while picking food items from the surface (termed \'pattering\'). One individual was seen running among gulls and taking offal from a beach in Western Australia (Brown et al. 1978; Falla 1934; Harper et al. 1985; Harrison 1970; Johnstone & Storr 1998; Oka 1994a).The Flesh-footed Shearwater routinely attends fishing vessels to feed on baited hooks, discarded scraps and prey attracted to the surface by such vessels (Bartle 1974; Falla 1934; Serventy et al. 1971). This behaviour exposes individuals to incidental mortality through interactions with fishing vessels (Australian Antarctic Division 2005a; Baker & Wise 2005; Gales et al. 1998).','A description of threats is available in the Commonwealth Listing Advice on  Ardenna carneipes  (TSSC 2014dp).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82404'),('82408','Accipiter hiogaster natalis','Endangered','Aves','Accipitridae','The Christmas Island Goshawk is a large hawk with a dark grey head and upperparts, mostly rufous underparts with fine and sometimes almost imperceptible white barring, yellow irides, yellow eyelids, greenish-yellow cere (the area at the base of the bill), yellow legs and feet and black talons (Gibson-Hill 1947; Hurley 2005; Marchant & Higgins 1993). The sexes have similar plumages, although the throat of the male is white with grey spots whilst the throat of the female has a rufous-brown wash (Gibson-Hill 1947). The female (total length about 42 cm, weight 271–490 g) is noticeably larger than the male (total length about 36 cm, weight 200–260 g) (Gibson-Hill 1947; Hurley 2005). Immature and sub-adult goshawks can be readily distinguished from the adults by the predomiNAtly brown upperparts and the thick brown and white barring on the underparts (Hurley 2005).','The Christmas Island Goshawk occurs in all forest types on the island, but is commonly seen in secondary forest, settlements or rehabilitated habitat (Hill 2004a). It often occurs in sparser vegetation growth at edges or in clearings in the forest (Gibson-Hill 1947).The Christmas Island Goshawk nests in tall trees in forest patches of more than 1.5 ha in area. Its nest sites are often near cleared land, possibly because these sites provide better visibility and access to food (Hill 2004a). The species of trees, the density and height of trees, and the amount of understorey vegetation are apparently not important in habitat choice (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','The Christmas Island Goshawk feeds on large insects, such as grasshoppers, beetles and mantids, centipedes and small birds, mammals and reptiles (Gibson-Hill 1947; Hill 2004a; Hurley 2005).The Christmas Island Goshawk searches for prey mainly from concealed perches within foliage, but also from low unconcealed perches or actively on the wing. It is not usually active on the ground, but may stalk and take prey there (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','Yellow Crazy AntThe invasive Yellow Crazy Ant was introduced to Christmas Island in 1915–1934. At high densities, it is capable of having a devastating impact on the rainforest ecosystem of Christmas Island. Local populations of ground-dwelling animals, including the Red Crab ( Geocarcoidea natalis ), may be reduced or eliminated in heavily infested areas, and insect populations could also be affected. Such changes could have a direct effect on the Christmas Island Goshawk, which is wholly dependent on rainforest vertebrates and invertebrates for food (Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2005a).The removal of the Red Crab, which is the domiNAt rainforest species on Christmas Island, could potentially alter the structure, composition and litter dynamics of the rainforest ecosystem. The ant also exhibits a mutually beneficial relationship with scale insects, and the combined foraging activity of these organisms can stress trees to the point of death and cause dieback of the rainforest canopy. Yellow Crazy Ants probably kill nestlings and any bird that goes to ground in a heavily infested area (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hill 2004a; O\'Dowd et al. 1999; Orchard et al. 2002).In 2001, the Yellow Crazy Ant was widespread in the rainforest of Christmas Island, and present in very high densities at 22.7% of rainforest sites surveyed (Orchard et al. 2002). To address the threat posed by the ant, an island-wide aerial baiting campaign was undertaken in September 2002, during which all sites with very high densities of ants were treated with insecticide. The baiting campaign proved to be successful at controlling the spread of the ant, but did not eradicate it from the island entirely. In 2004, the Yellow Crazy Ant persisted on Christmas Island in low densities, but the absence of sustained monitoring and (where necessary) control the pest could rapidly attain high densities. Parks Australia North monitor ant densities on the island and plan to undertake hand baiting wherever high densities begin to develop (Hill 2004a).Habitat lossThe clearance of native rainforest is considered a primary cause of the historical decline of the Christmas Island Goshawk (Stokes 1988). Approximately 25% or more of the native rainforest on Christmas Island has been cleared for human settlement, phosphate mining operations, Commonwealth buildings and other infrastructure (Environment Australia 2002i; Stokes 1988). Some areas that were cleared for historic mining operations or the construction of roads, today support secondary vegetation that is used by the Christmas Island Goshawk for foraging purposes (Environment Australia 2002i; Hill 2004a). It is unlikely that these same areas are used for breeding, but this situation may be partly rectified in the future by the Christmas Island Rainforest Rehabilitation Program, which aims to rehabilitate disused minefields (Hill 2004a). Future development may further reduce rainforest habitat (Hill 2004a).DiseaseThe introduction of an avian disease to Christmas Island could potentially impact on the Christmas Island Goshawk. No specific disease has been identified and the potential for the Christmas Island Goshawk to be exposed to a new avian disease has been reduced by the introduction of a quarantine barrier in 1994 (Hill 2004a).Small population size and restricted distributionThe Christmas Island Goshawk population is small and confined to a single small location. As such, it is conceivable that the entire population could be affected by a single catastrophic event such as a cyclone or severe storm. The small population size also renders the goshawk vulnerable to fluctuations in demographic parameters such as mortality and breeding success, and, in the event of a further permanent decline in numbers, to inbreeding depression, a condition in which breeding between closely related individuals can reduce the health and resilience of the resultant offspring (Hill 2004a).PersecutionKilling by humans, and especially by owners of poultry, is considered to have been a primary cause of the historical decline of the Christmas Island Goshawk (Gibson-Hill 1947; Hill 2004a; Stokes 1988). The goshawk is now protected under the terms of the EPBC Act. Consequently, illegal killing is presumed to be a minor threat to the subspecies, although Stokes (1988) reported that birds are still occasionally observed with injuries attributable to slingshots.Road deathsThere have been reports of goshawk deaths resulting from collisions with vehicles. A substantial increase in vehicular traffic is expected if the proposed construction of the immigration reception and processing centre and satellite launching facility is approved. This would likely increase the incidence of road deaths in areas with high levels of vehicular traffic (Hill 2004a).PredationCats ( Felis catus ) are considered to be a potential threat to the Christmas Island Goshawk, especially around settled areas (Hill 2004a).Invasive weedsWeeds, and especially newly introduced invasive species, could reduce the number of suitable nest sites, for example, by forming vine towers over nesting trees (Hill 2004a).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82408'),('82451','Turnix varius scintillans','Vulnerable','Aves','Turnicidae','The Painted Button-quail (Houtman Abrolhos) has a length of 14–17 cm and a mass of 52–82 g (Johnstone & Storr 1998; Storr 1965a; Storr & Johnstone 1984). Its upperparts are mainly grey or brownish-grey, but are heavily marked with a combination of white, reddish-brown and black spots, blotches, bars and streaks, and a large reddish-brown patch on each shoulder. Its underparts consist of a white chin and throat, a grey breast with buff spots, a white, buff-white or cream belly, and a buff to reddish-buff undertail. It has reddish-orange or (when breeding) red irides, a grey or brownish-grey bill, and yellow legs and feet (Johnstone & Storr 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1993). The sexes are similar in appearance, but adult females are substantially brighter and somewhat larger than adult males (J. Blyth 2007, pers. comm.; Marchant & Higgins 1993; Storr & Johnstone 1984). Juvenile birds are probably similar to adult males but still separable from adults of either sex on the basis of size and some other features (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','The Painted Button-quail (Houtman Abrolhos) can occur in all available habitats in the Houtman Abrolhos (Garnett 1993), except for limestone pavements associated with old guano mining facilities (Storr 1965a). It is most common in open  Spinifex longifolius  grassland on low sand dunes, and in open shrubland, composed of  Atriplex cinerea  and  Halosarcia halocnemoides , on flats (Garnett 1993; Johnstone & Storr 1998; Storr 1965a). It also occurs in  Frankenia pauciflora  shrubland and dense thickets of  Nitraria , and occasionally forages in the sub-littoral zone and around fishing camps (Storr 1965a). The Painted Button-quail (Houtman Abrolhos) does not occur in any of the ecological communities that are listed as threatened under the EPBC Act. It is not known to associate with any other species or subspecies that is listed as threatened under the EPBC Act.','The diet of the Painted Button-quail (Houtman Abrolhos) is essentially unknown. It takes scraps from around fishing camps (Storr 1965a) and, based on observations of the subspecies  T. v. varia  on mainland Australia, probably feeds on a combination of seeds, fruits and insects (Cleland et al. 1918; Johnstone & Storr 1998; McKeown 1944; Rose 1973).The Painted Button-quail (Houtman Abrolhos) forages on the ground by scratching in soil and loose sand with its feet (Storr 1965a).','The small population of the Painted Button-quail (Houtman Abrolhos) on North Island is currently thought to be threatened by habitat degradation caused by the introduced Tammar Wallaby. The population of the Tammar Wallaby on North Island has expanded rapidly since its recent introduction. Grazing and trampling by the now abundant wallaby population has eliminated much of the ground litter and dense low vegetation that would otherwise be utilised by the Painted Button-quail (Blyth et al. 2006). This threat is in the process of being addressed by the Department of Environment and Conservation in Western Australia, which has begun to remove the wallaby population from North Island (J. Blyth 2007, pers. comm.).The main potential threats to the Painted Button-quail (Houtman Abrolhos) throughout its range are thought to be fire and the future introduction of a predator or competitor to any of the islands inhabited by the subspecies (Garnett & Crowley 2000). However, the Painted Button-quail (Houtman Abrolhos) has persisted on North Island despite severe fires in 1935 and 1946, which may have temporarily reduced the population size, and the introduction of the House Mouse ( Mus musculus ), which may compete with the Painted Button-quail (Houtman Abrolhos) for food, and which may prey upon Painted Button-quail (Houtman Abrolhos) eggs (Garnett 1993; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Storr 1960a; Storr et al. 1986). At present none of the islands that are occupied by the Painted Button-quail (Houtman Abrolhos) have any larger introduced predators such as rats or cats. The introduction of a large predator to any of the occupied islands could have a catastrophic effect on the Painted Button-quail (Houtman Abrolhos) population (Garnett & Crowley 2000).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82451'),('82453','Glyphis glyphis','Critically Endangered','Chondrichthyes','Carcharhinidae','The Speartooth Shark is a medium sized whaler shark with a uniformly slate-gray dorsal surface and a white ventral surface. In small individuals the difference between the dorsal and ventral surfaces are clearly noticeable. In larger individuals the colour definition is less marked (Compagno et al. 2008; Stevens et al. 2005).','To date, the Speartooth Shark has only been captured in tidal rivers and estuaries indicating that large tropical river systems appear to be the primary habitat for this shark (Stevens et al. 2005). It is inferred that this species may be largely restricted to low salinity environments such as freshwater and brackish areas of rivers (Pillans et al. 2005; Pogonoski & Pollard 2003). The majority of the specimens of Speartooth Shark recorded have been new recruits and juveniles although a small number of sub-adults have also been captured. Most of these specimens were found in fresh water and estuarine environments (Pillans et al. 2005; Stevens et al. 2005).No sexually mature adult specimens have been captured in these environments, suggesting that they occupy a separate habitat to new recruits and juveniles (Stevens et al. 2005).Speartooth Sharks have been caught in varying levels of salinity from very low salinity (0.8 parts per thousand, ppt) to salinity levels nearing seawater (28 ppt) (Stevens et al. 2005).  Given the range of salinity in which the Speartooth Shark has been recorded, Stevens and colleagues (2005) have classified it as a euryhaline elasmobranch, capable of living in and moving between freshwater and marine environments.  Based on data obtained from other euryhaline elasmobranches (e.g. River or Bull Shark -  Carcharhinus leucas ), it is predicted that adult Speartooth Sharks would live in inshore marine coastal areas, although so far none have been caught in a marine environment despite intensive inshore and offshore sampling (Stevens et al. 2005). One Speartooth Shark, possibly an adult based on weight recorded, was caught at sea in a study of the Northern Territory Offshore Net and Line Fishery (NTONL) (Field et al. 2008).Specimens have been collected in varying temperatures ranging from 27 to 32ºC (Stevens et al. 2005).','The small eyes and slender teeth of the Speartooth Shark suggest that they are primarily fish-eaters, adapted to life in turbid river waters (Fowler 1997). Peverell and colleagues (2006) analysed the stomach contents of specimens from the Wenlock River in Queensland. The stomach contents included long-armed prawns ( Macrobrachium ), burrowing gobies ( Taenoides  or  Trypauchen ), gudgeons ( Prionobutis microps ), benthic-feeding jewfish ( Nibea squamosa ) and bony bream ( Nematalosa erebi ) indicating that Speartooth Sharks hunt close to and among the soft substrate. The large number of sensory ampullae and the small eye of the Speartooth Shark indicate that it may have adapted to feeding on benthic and demersal species in turbid waters, mainly relying on electromagnetic receptors (Peverell et al. 2006).','The main threats to the Speartooth Shark are recreational linefishing, gillnetting (e.g for Barramundi  Lates calcarifer ), and habitat degradation (Pogonoski et. al. 2002; Pogonoski & Pollard 2003; Stevens et al. 2005).In the Northern Territory the Speartooth Shark is threatened by Barramundi gillnetting and recreational fishing as well as the capture of juveniles for crab-pot bait (Ward & Larson 2006).  Over a 10 day period, Stevens and colleagues (2005) observed eight Speartooth Sharks of 50 to 70 cm total length being captured by recreational fishers in the same location on the Adelaide River. All were killed and either eaten or left on the bank (DEWHA 2008; Stevens et al. 2005).The Speartooth Shark may also be at risk from habitat modification, such as the potential development of Port Musgrave by mining companies, with proposed dredging activities in the Ducie and Wenlock River systems and Port Musgrave. This development could potentially affect the populations of Speartooth Shark in this area (DEWHA 2008).The Shark Advisory Group (SAG) (2001) found that sharks that occur in freshwater are at a greater risk of fishing pressure as they are generally more accessible to human exploitation and habitat degradation and inhabit a less stable and proportionally smaller habitat than salt water species (Compagno 2000; Walker 1998). In Australia there are four species that appear to occur solely in freshwater,  Glyphis glyphis  and  Glyphis garricki  (as  Glyphis  sp. A and C),  Pristis microdon , Freshwater Sawfish and  Himantura chaophraya , Freshwater Whipray. The Speartooth Shark and the Freshwater Sawfish are protected under the  Environment Protection and Biodiversity Conservation Act 1999 .Environmental degradation may also impact on sharks. Nursery areas for some shark species occur in shallow inshore areas which are vulnerable to habitat modification associated with industrial, domestic and agricultural development. These areas may need monitoring and protection from degradation (Walker 1998; Walker 2000 as cited in SAG 2001). In addition, aquaculture, ecotourism, spread of exotic organisms and pollution in the marine environment can also impact adversely on aquatic habitats and shark nursery areas and may also warrant monitoring and management to ensure shark populations are protected (SAG 2001).The quantities and identities of many types of shark captured while fishing for other target species remain unrecorded and some of these species may be at risk of depletion without this threat being recognised (Walker 1998).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82453'),('82454','Glyphis garricki','Endangered','Chondrichthyes','Carcharhinidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82454'),('825','Anous stolidus','','Aves','Laridae','NA','During the breeding season, the Common Noddy usually occurs on or near islands, on rocky islets and stacks with precipitous cliffs, or on shoals or cays of coral or sand. When not at the nest, individuals will remain close to the nest, foraging in the surrounding waters. Birds may nest in bushes, saltbush, or other low vegetation. They may also nest on the ground in Pigface ( Carpobrotus  spp.) or grass, on bare rock, on top of rocks protruding above vegetation, on shingle beaches, among coral rubble or in sand close to grassy areas. The species has also been recorded nesting in the forks of tall trees, at the top of Coconut Palms ( Cocos nucifera ), in holes in dead timber and on tree-stumps. On Lord Howe, Kermadec and Christmas Islands, many nests are built on cliff ledges (Higgins & Davies 1996). Although the species is obviously quite flexible in regards to nesting locations, pairs appear to select nesting habitat based on a hierarchy of preference (Higgins & Davies 1996). During the non-breeding period, the species occurs in groups throughout the pelagic zone (open ocean) (Higgins & Davies 1996).','The Common Noddy feeds mainly on fish, although they are known to also take squid, pelagic molluscs, medusae, aquatic insects and even Screw Pine ( Pandanus  spp.) fruit (Higgins & Davies 1996). Birds usually feed during the day, although they will feed at night when there is a full moon (Gibson-Hill 1947). Individuals feed by dipping; gleaning items from the surface or just below the surface of the water, while flying (Higgins & Davies 1996). The Common Noddy will often forage farther from shore than other species of the same genus (Feare 1981) and flocks have been recorded at sea hundreds of kilometres from breeding islands (Serventy et al .  1971).','The Common Noddy is considered to be mostly secure in Australia, but some colonies have suffered declines that appear mainly to be due to introduced predators. Numbers on Christmas Island have been adversely affected by Rats ( Rattus  spp.), Cats ( Felis catus ) and humans since settlement (Stokes 1988). Colonies on Lacepede Island may also have been affected by Rats, which have since been eradicated) (Fuller et al. 1994). On Rat, Houtman and Abrolhos Islands, an estimated 1 million birds bred in 1889 (Campbell 1900), but breeding stopped between 1913 and 1936 (Johnstone & Coate 1992). These colonies were thought to have been destroyed by guano-mining and predation by Cats and Rats during this time (Fuller & Burbidge 1992). Rats were potentially a threat on the Coringa Islet in Coral Sea; however, a rat eradication program carried out between 1985 to 1991 succeeded, as there was no further evidence of rats on the islets (as of 2001) (Environment Australia 2001g).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=825'),('82651','Ardenna grisea','','Aves','Procellariidae','The Sooty Shearwater is a large, robust sea bird, with a wingspan up to 105 cm and a weight of up to 1 kg. The head, upper body, upper wing and tail of the Sooty Shearwater are uniformly dark brown-grey. It often appears all dark at sea, except for the under-wing. The species’ iris is dark brown, as are the legs and feet (sometimes black). There is some level of seasonal variation in colouring; however, there is no difference in colouration between the sexes (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','Foraging habitat The Sooty Shearwater forages in pelagic (open ocean) sub-tropical, sub-Antarctic and Antarctic waters. The species migrates and forages in the North Pacific and Atlantic Oceans during the non-breeding season. Sooty Shearwaters may forage inshore occasionally, especially during rough weather. In Australian waters, the Sooty Shearwater has been recorded in areas with sea surface-temperatures of 8.7-22.0° C (Reid et al. 2002). Off southern South America, the species occupies ocean with sea-surface temperatures between 0-19° C. In the North Pacific, the species prefers a narrower range of temperature, and birds have been found over cool waters of 8-14° C. Roosting and breeding habitat The Sooty Shearwater breeds mainly on subtropical and sub-Antarctic islands, as well as on the mainland of New Zealand. Birds nest in burrows or rock crevices on coastal slopes, ridges and cliff tops, in herbfields, tussock grassland or forest. Areas with waterlogged or shallow soils and/or dense vegetation are avoided. At The Snares, Sooty Shearwaters are excluded from areas occupied by Snares Penguins ( Eudyptes robustus ). Nesting Sooty Shearwaters are known to impact on the vegetation surrounding nesting sites, as they undermine trees, trample seedlings and remove leaf litter and ground vegetation for nest lining (Richdale 1963). Breeding birds roost solitarily at night, either in the burrow or on the ground near burrow entrance. Pre-breeders or failed breeders usually roost on the ground, but sometimes in burrows. Individuals often roost and ‘loaf’ offshore during the day, except when weather conditions are rough. Most birds leave the roost at dawn; although, some non-paired birds remain in burrows during day (Marchant & Higgins 1990). Micro-habitat needed for breeding At The Snares, the Sooty Shearwater was found to nest in high densities in tussock meadows dominated by  Poa  spp., where there were few roots in the soil. They were also found in high densities in  Olearia  forest, where there was no leaf-litter (due to leaf-litter removal by the birds for nest-building). Sooty Shearwaters were found in the lowest density in  Hebe  spp. and  Senecio  spp. scrub. At Whero and The Snares, birds prefer to dig burrows in peat more than 45 cm thick and generally avoid thin, water-logged and eroded soils (Richdale 1963). On Solander Island, most nests are in thickets and scrub of Alpine Hebe ( Hebe elliptica ) and  Senecio stewartiae  and around the bases of tree-ferns. On Motuara Island, birds have been recorded nesting among Blackberries ( Rubus  spp.), Ivy ( Hedera  spp.) and other introduced plants and also under remNAts of abandoned houses. Conversely, at Twelve Mile Bluff, the species avoids areas of introduced plants like Gorse ( Ulex europaeus ) and Blackberries, even Bracken ( Pteridium  spp.). Generally, there are few burrows in shallow, hard, stony soils, with birds favouring sandy soils. Burrows are often overgrown and inconspicuous, but those of non-breeders often have freshly dug soil at the entrance. Burrows are not always used by the same pair each year, however pairs usually nest in the same area each year. In Australia, the species often selects higher and more secluded parts of islands for nesting; although, they may burrow at the base of cliffs, or along shorelines (less than 10 m above sea level). Exposed rocks, slopes and cliff edges are required near colonies for take-off (Marchant & Higgins 1990).','Diet The Sooty Shearwater feeds on a wide variety of pelagic prey, including cephalopods, fish and crustaceans. Different food items make up varying proportions of the diet, depending on the season and location of the foraging individual. Specific food items that have been recorded as consumed by the Sooty Shearwater include (Marchant & Higgins 1990; Warham 1996):Crustaceans, including krill ( Nyctiphanes australis, N. capensis, Thysanoessa spinifera ,  Euphausia lucens ), copepods and amphipods ( Themisto pacifica ,  Paracallisoma alberti ,  Squilla armata ) and crab larvae;Fish, including Pacific Saury ( Cololabis saire ), Three-spined Stickleback ( Gasterosteus aculeatus ), Chub Mackrel ( Scomber japonicus ); young Rockfishes ( Helecolenus  and  Neosebastes ), Californian Anchovy ( Engraulis mordax ),  Sebastes  spp., North Pacific Hake ( Merluccius productus ) and Atlantic Herring ( Clupea harengus ), Capelin ( Mallotus villosus ), Sand Lance ( Ammodytes hexapterus ), South African Anchovy ( Engraulis capensis ), Mueller’s Pearlside ( Maurolicus muellerii ), Hector’s Lanternfish ( Lampanyctodes hectoris );Cephalopods including Minimal Armhook Squid ( Berryteuthis anonychus ),  Japetella  spp.,  Argonauta  spp, Opalescent Inshore Squid ( Loligo opalescens ) , Gonatus  spp., Boreal Clubhook Squid ( Onychoteuthis borealijaponicus ) and East Pacific Red Octopus ( Octopus rubescens );Barnacles, including  Cirripedia  spp. and  Lepas  spp;Jellyfish, including  Velella  spp.; andBristleworms (class Polychaeta).Foraging behaviour The Sooty Shearwater takes most food by pursuit-plunging, pursuit-diving, surface-diving, shallow plunging, surface-seizing or hydroplaning. Observations of feeding have indicated that pursuit-plunging is the favoured method, followed by shallow plunging and surface-seizing. When pursuit-plunging, birds dive from 3-5 m above the water surface, with wings one third extended from body and feet spread in front of the breast. Birds then strike the water with the breast and feet and propel themselves underwater by slowly flapping its wings for one minute or more, attaining depths of 60 m (Marchant & Higgins 1990; Weimerskirch & Sagar 1996). Sometimes birds will peer underwater before pursuit-diving and then submerge smoothly. The species is known to graze on barnacles attached to floating logs. The species is known to sometimes feed in association with whales, including Grey Whales ( Eschrichtius robustus ) and dolphins. They may also flock and feed in association with the Black Petrel ( Procellaria parkinsoni ), White-headed Petrel ( Pterodroma lesson ), Black Storm-Petrel ( Oceanodroma melania ), Arctic Tern ( Sterna paradise ) and the White-fronted Tern ( S. striata ) . In both the northern and southern hemispheres, feeding concentrations are often observed over thermal fronts, at edges of upwellings and at boundaries of cool and warm water-masses.','Studies have indicated that the following threats impact on the Sooty Shearwater (King 1984; Marchant & Higgins 1990; Ogi 1984; Scofield et al. 2001; Warham 1996):By-catch in drift nets and gillnets;Breeding habitat alteration/degradation (due to human activities or introduced herbivores);Introduced predators in breeding habitat;Muttonbirding – hunting of nesting birds, for human consumption.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82651'),('82652','Ardenna tenuirostris','','Aves','Procellariidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82652'),('82674','Engaewa pseudoreducta','Critically Endangered','Malacostraca','Parastacidae','The Margaret River Burrowing Crayfish is a small crayfish up to 50 mm in length. The species has a pale to mid-brown coloured body, with purplish-blue claws. The abdomen is often narrower than the head and thorax. Other distinguishing features are the small eye, and large claws adapted for digging. The fingers of each claw move in a vertical plane (Horwitz & Adams 2000).','The Margaret River Burrowing Crayfish lives in the narrow, creek tributaries of the Margaret River and Carbunup River. Habitat at the two known areas are quite different.At Treeton, the species has been collected in heavy grey-yellow clays (TSSC 2009h) in areas of narrow, sloping depressions (Burnham 2014). With a dense shurb strata, minimal tree strata ( Melaleuca  spp. and  Eucalyptus  spp.), at 110-120 m above sea level with more burrows on a southerly aspect (Burnham 2014).At Payne Road species has been collected on a flat site (Burnham et al. 2012) with low dendritic channels in coarse white sand with open and low shrub strata, no tree strata, at 40 m above sea level (Burnham 2014). At both sites during the wet season, surface water is present and can cover burrows (Burnham 2014).','NA','The main threat to the Margaret River Burrowing Crayfish is habitat loss caused by human or human-linked disturbance within the species\' very limited range. Land clearing for agriculture and forestry has removed habitat for the species and may have increased salinity in habitats utilised by the species. Farm dam construction has flooded suitable habitat and has altered surface water and groundwater flows. Cattle grazing has physically destroyed burrows through trampling and soil compaction, and has created serious erosion and has impaired soil permeability and water holding capacity (Burnham 2005; Burnham et al. 2007; Horowitz & Adams 2000).Potential threats to the Margaret River Burrowing Crayfish include drainage for peat, sand mining or agriculture activities, which can desiccate the species\' moisture-rich habitats and water extraction from bores, which can lower water tables and potentially cause acidification and mobilisation of toxic metal ions in wetlands.Feral pigs ( Sus scrofa ) are an additional threat, as feral pig numbers are increasing in south-western Western Australia due to illegal introductions by recreational pig hunters and subsequent reproductive success. Feral pigs may damage habitat through ground-rooting feeding behaviour and directly prey on crayfish during rare surfacing events (Spencer & Hampton 2005).Further threats that have not been quantified but may be detrimental to the Margaret River Burrowing Crayfish include fire, road and bridge construction, disease from introduced crayfish species, exposure and subsequent hydration of acid sulphate soils, use of pesticides, fertilisers or herbicides that contaminate or reduce water quality, and climate change reducing rainfall and wetland habitats (Burnham 2005; Burnham et al. 2007).The impacts of fire on the Margaret River Burrowing Crayfish have not been closely examined. However, it is suggested that, whilst not directly threatening individual Margaret River Burrowing Crayfish, burning may alter the water holding capacity of habitat such as peatlands, and alter the soil structure making it both more prone to future fires and less suitable for the species through acidification and metal toxification. Fire fighting techniques could also be detrimental to a species with such a restricted distribution (WA DEC 2008a).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82674'),('82675','Engaewa reducta','Critically Endangered','Malacostraca','Parastacidae','The Dunsborough Burrowing Crayfish is a small burrowing crayfish up to 50 mm in length. It generally has a pale to mid-brown colour with purplish-blue claws. The narrow abdomen is often shorter than the head and thorax. Other distinguishing features are the reduced eye size, large claws adapted to digging, and the way that the fingers of the claws move in a vertical plane (Horwitz & Adams 2000).','The Dunsborough Burrowing Crayfish occupies a wide range of habitats, though generally with sandy soils (Burnham 2014) and an accessible watertable (TSSC 2009i). In both the northern and southern populations burrows are found both in areas of habitat where the water table would, or almost would, reach the surface and would periodically be shallowly flooded (whether by the water table or surface run-off), and in areas where the water table would rarely, if ever, reach the surface (Burnham 2014).In the north of its range (between Dunsborough and the Margaret River) the species primarily occurs in sandy (sometimes with organic content), deep draining soils in relatively narrow drainages, where they dig expansive burrow systems and produce large sandy chimneys (Burnham 2014). Collections have been made in vegetated seepages, swamp plains and swampy headwaters of streams (TSSC 2009i). The vegetation in these habitats is generally open with little to no tree canopy; however, they may also be present in tea-tree swamps in the far north of their range (Burnham 2014). Extreme habitat modification has occurred that makes it difficult to assess the variety of habitat that the species may have previously used (Burnham 2014).In the south of its range (the Blackwood River area) the species digs large burrow systems often in sand, however, the clay content of the soil may be much higher. The vegetation in this region is generally open (Burnham 2014).','The Dunsborough Burrowing Crayfish is difficult to study in the wild and details of diet  and reproduction are not known.  Other burrowing freshwater crayfish are believed to eat rotting wood, detritus, root material and occasionally animal material (Bryant & Jackson 1999b; Growns & Richardson 1988; Suter & Richardson 1977).','The main threat to the Dunsborough Burrowing Crayfish has been habitat loss and destruction caused by anthropogenic disturbance within the species\' range. Land clearing for agriculture and forestry has removed habitat for the species. Farm dam construction has flooded suitable habitat and thus altered surface water and groundwater flows. Cattle grazing has physically destroyed burrows through trampling and soil compaction, has created serious erosion and has impaired soil permeability and water holding capacity (Burnham 2005; Burnham et al. 2007). These processes have led to the extinction of one population and have likely led to other unrecorded, localised population extinctions (WA DEC 2008a).Potential threats to the Dunsborough River Burrowing Crayfish include drainage for peat, sand mining or agriculture activities, which can desiccate the species\' moisture-rich habitats; and water extraction from bores, which can lower water tables and potentially cause acidification and mobilisation of toxic metal ions in wetlands (WA DEC 2008a).Feral pigs ( Sus scrofa ) may damage habitat through ground-rooting feeding behaviour and directly prey on crayfish during rare surfacing events. Feral pig numbers are increasing in south-western Western Australia due to illegal introductions by recreational pig hunters and the subsequent reproductive success of the feral pigs (Spencer & Hampton 2005)The impact of fire on the Dunsborough Burrowing Crayfish has not been investigated, but fire can severely damage swamp habitats (WA DEC 2008a). It is suggested that, whilst not directly threatening individual Dunsborough Burrowing Crayfish, burning may destroy the organic content, structure and water holding capabilities of soils found in those habitats, making it more prone to future fires and thus less suitable for the species through acidification and metal toxification. Fire fighting techniques could also be detrimental to a species with such a restricted distribution (WA DEC 2008a).A further threat that has not been quantified but may be detrimental to the Dunsborough Burrowing Crayfish is disease from introduced crayfish species (Burnham 2005; Burnham et al. 2007).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82675'),('82676','Engaewa walpolea','Endangered','Malacostraca','Parastacidae','The Walpole Burrowing Crayfish is a small burrowing crayfish up to 50 mm in length. It generally has a pale to mid-brown colour with purplish-blue claws. The narrow abdomen is often shorter than the head and thorax. Other distinguishing features are the reduced eye size, large claws adapted to digging, and the fingers of the claws move in a vertical plane (Horwitz & Adams 2000).','The Walpole Burrowing Crayfish occurs in areas that are particularly wet compared to other  Engaewa  species (Burnham 2014). Habitat usually has very moist soils and a shallow, very accessible watertable. These habitats include surface seepages, swamp plains and shallow swampy creeklines (Burnham 2005; Burnham et al. 2007). Collections have been made in the bottom of depressions or in channels that become completely submerged for significant periods of time (Burnham 2014). These areas usually have very dense vegetation, of varying heights (Burnham 2014). Native vegetation types associated with these habitats are Karri ( Eucalyptus diversicolor ) woodland, sedge, peatbog and heathland. One population is known from an area with non-native vegetation cover comprising introduced Tree Ferns ( Dicksonia  species), with Kikuyu Grass ( Pennisetum clandestinum ) and Cape Gooseberry ( Physalis peruviana ) understorey (Burnham 2005; Burnham et al. 2007).The Walpole Burrowing Crayfish constructs burrows down to the watertable. The burrow systems are generally quite shallow (in one study, many appeared to end around 40 cm below the surface) and relatively simple compared to the other  Engaewa  species; hence this species generally creates only small chimneys, or often there will be no chimney at all and the burrow can only be identified by small holes (Burnham 2014). Specimens of this species collected from burrows were found within a maximum of 50 cm from the surface, though most were found significantly closer to the surface (in the range of 10-20 cm). As this species is small this again supports a correlation between body size (and possibly chelae size) and degree of burrowing (Burnham 2014).The species has been found occupying burrows with small  Cherax , perhaps digging short tunnels off the main  Cherax  burrow; further suggesting this species may not be as strongly burrowing as the other species. Associations between  Engaewa  and  Cherax  species have previously been recorded by Riek (1967) and Horwitz and Adams (2000), though it seems most pronounced in this species (Burnham 2014).Walpole Burrowing Crayfish burrows are predomiNAtly found in shallow dark peaty loam soils, some with a higher proportion of sand, overlaying a layer of gravel and/or clay. Soil profiles were examined at two sites where the species was present. An impenetrable layer of gravel and/or clay was encountered at 1.30 m and 1.65 m below the ground level, assumedly representing a shallow occluding layer, which would restrict further digging (Burnham 2014). By comparison, soils where other  Engaewa  species occur continue to depths in excess of 2 m at a number of sites and in some cases deeper than 3 m. This occluding layer, if largely impervious to water, may create a perched water table, allowing the crayfish to remain in contact with the groundwater without needing to burrow deeply (Burnham 2014).','The Walpole Burrowing Crayfish is difficult to study in the wild and details of diet and reproduction are not known. Other burrowing freshwater crayfish are believed to eat rotting wood, detritus, root material and occasionally animal material (Bryant & Jackson 1999b; Growns & Richardson 1988; Suter & Richardson 1977).','The main threat to the Walpole Burrowing Crayfish has been habitat loss and destruction caused by anthropogenic disturbance within the species\' range. Land clearing for agriculture and forestry has removed habitat for the species. Farm dam construction has flooded suitable habitat and has altered surface water and groundwater flows. Cattle grazing has physically destroyed burrows through trampling and soil compaction, has created serious erosion and has impaired soil permeability and water holding capacity (Burnham 2005; Burnham et al. 2007). These processes have led to the extinction of one population and have likely led to other unrecorded, localised population extinctions (WA DEC 2008a). Potential threats to Walpole Burrowing Crayfish populations within Walpole-Nornalup National Park include reduced rainfall from climate change, feral pigs ( Sus scrofa ) and inappropriate fire regimes. Reduced rainfall from climate change may lead to the drying out and loss of swamp and drainage system habitats (WA DEC 2008a). Feral pigs may damage habitat through ground-rooting feeding behaviour and directly prey on crayfish during rare surfacing events. Feral pig numbers are increasing in south-western Western Australia due to illegal introductions by recreational pig hunters and the subsequent reproductive success of the feral pigs (Spencer & Hampton 2005) The impact of fire on the Walpole Burrowing Crayfish has not been investigated, but fire can severely damage swamp habitats (WA DEC 2008a). It is suggested that, whilst not directly threatening individual Walpole Burrowing Crayfish, burning may destroy the organic content, structure and water holding capabilities of soils found in those habitats, making it more prone to future fires and thus less suitable for the species through acidification and metal toxification. Fire fighting techniques could also be detrimental to a species with such a restricted distribution (WA DEC 2008a). A further threat that has not been quantified but may be detrimental to the Walpole Burrowing Crayfish is disease from introduced crayfish species (Burnham 2005; Burnham et al. 2007).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82676'),('82679','Centrophorus zeehaani','Conservation Dependent','Chondrichthyes','Squalidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82679'),('82790','Rhinonicteris aurantia (Pilbara form)','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Rhinonycteridae','The Pilbara Leaf-nosed Bat is of moderate size, having short fur, relatively small, pointed ears and a fleshy diamond-shaped noseleaf surrounding the nostrils. It weighs around 8.7–9.3 g and has a forearm length of 45.2–47.8 mm (Armstrong 2001, 2002). Sexes are mostly similar in size, especially in external features (Armstrong 2002).','The Pilbara Leaf-nosed Bat roosts during the day in caves and mine adits (horizontal tunnels) with stable, warm and humid microclimates because of its poor ability to maintain its heat and water balance (Armstrong 2001; Baudinette et al. 2000; Churchill et al. 1988; Churchill 1991; Jolly 1988; Kulzer et al. 1970). Humidity in roosts is maintained from seeps of water and moist wall surfaces in natural caves, and the flooded lower levels of some old mines. Although caves are common in the ironstone terrain and some other landscapes of the Pilbara, most are essentially shallow overhangs, or are not sufficiently deep to support warm, humid microclimates. As a result, the roosting opportunity and area of occupancy of the Pilbara Leaf-nosed Bat is restricted to a very small area.In terms of natural structures, roosting opportunity is limited to those geological formations that provide rocky outcrop, and that also have the propensity to erode into sufficiently deep underground structures. Only two natural cave roosts are known currently, but the majority of suspected roosts are spread throughout the Hamersley Group ironstone terrain of the Hamersley Basin and other isolated Fortescue Group ironstone remNAts north of the Fortescue Valley. In these landscapes, caves typically form below mesa caps (commonly canga and other consolidated rocks), in zones of weakness between layers in gorges found in the dip faces of inclined sedimentary formations (e.g. in Brockman Iron Formation), and in horseshoe-shaped gullies below hard ferruginous caps (e.g. Marra Mamba Iron Formation). The other confirmed roost of the Pilbara Leaf-nosed Bat is in a narrow cave formed in the zone of weakness between massively layered metamorphosed silcrete formations at the southern edge of the Pilbara (in Barlee Range Nature Reserve of the upper Gascoyne region), and other similar structures are probably used in this formation where it outcrops (Kiangi Creek Formation; e.g. Mt Vernon, south of Newman). There is also a possibility that some roosts exist in the deeper spaces amongst granite tor rockpiles (‘koppies’) in the eastern Pilbara. (Armstrong and Anstee 2000; Armstrong 2001, 2003).Roosts of the Pilbara Leaf-nosed Bat have been located in several types of underground mine—though usually the deepest and most complex underground structures that were excavated to recover gold and copper. These are typically found in volcanic formations of the Pilbara Supergroup, which are recognisable as ‘greenstone’ ranges in the eastern Pilbara, and were the focus of a goldrush in the Pilbara beginning in 1888. Mines used by these bats typically have a horizontal adit rather than a shaft as a main entrance, and roost aggregations form in the lower or most inaccessible levels where humidity is highest. There are numerous straight adits in the Hamersley Basin that were constructed as part of iron ore exploration activities in the 1970’s, some of which are occupied by the Ghost Bat, but only one has been confirmed as being a roost of the Pilbara Leaf-nosed Bat (adit \'K75W\'; Biota 2013j cited in Eco Logical Australia 2014).The Pilbara Leaf-nosed Bat can be detected readily at the entrance to various underground structures if it is present in a particular locality, and these can be categorised according to how the species uses them. Some structures are used during the day on a year-round permanent basis, some are visited only at night for a variety of possible reasons, others are used for at least some proportion of the breeding cycle, and the remainder might provide microclimates suitable for roosting for only part of the year. Given that some aspects of the breeding cycle occurs over a nine month period—mating occurs in July, parturition in December following a prolonged gestation period, and the independence of young occurs in February and March (Churchill 1995; Armstrong 2001)—many roosts that are occupied for much of the year are important for reproduction as well as daily survival. A standardised nomenclature for these different types, and based on the considerations of both breeding and daily survival, is provided in the Conservation Advice for the Pilbara Leaf-nosed Bat:permanent diurnal roosts —occupied year-round and likely the focus for some part of the 9-month breeding cycle; considered as critical habitat that is essential for the daily survival of the PLNB.non-permanent breeding roosts —evidence of usage during some part of the 9-month breeding cycle (July–March), but not occupied year-round; considered as critical habitat that is essential for both the daily and long-term survival of the PLNB.transitory diurnal roosts —occupied for part of the year only, outside the breeding season (i.e. April–June), and which could facilitate long distance dispersal in the region; considered as critical habitat that is essential for both the daily and long-term survival of the PLNB.nocturnal refuge —occupied or entered at night for resting, feeding or other purposes, with perching not a requirement. Excludes overhangs. Not considered critical habitat, but are important for persistence in a local area.The Pilbara Leaf-nosed Bat often shares roosts with the Ghost Bat,  Macroderma gigas , Finlayson\'s Cave Bat,  Vespadelus finlaysoni , Common Sheath-tailed Bat,  Taphozous georgianus , and possibly Hill\'s Sheath-tailed Bat,  Taphozous hilli , in some parts of its range. Any management strategy that benefits the Pilbara Leaf-nosed Bat is also likely to benefit these species. Some level of mortality from predation by Ghost Bats occurs when this species is present in the same roost.Cave-roosting bats have two separate biotopes that are occupied for half of each day—the underground roost environment, and the external habitats that are used for foraging. The Pilbara Leaf-nosed Bat has been observed foraging in a variety of habitats—Triodia hummock grasslands covering low rolling hills and shallow gullies, with scattered  Eucalyptus camaldulensis  along the creeks (e.g. near Marble Bar, Bamboo Creek, Lalla Rookh and Copper Hills; Armstrong 2001; K.N. Armstrong unpubl. obs.; Churchill et al. 1988); over small watercourses amongst granite boulder terrain and around nearby koppies; over pools and low shrubs in ironstone gorges; and above low shrubs and around pools in gravelly watercourses with  Melaleuca leucodendron , such as in Barlee Range Nature Reserve (Armstrong 2001). They are most commonly encountered over small pools of water in rocky gullies and gorges, and these sites are ideal for detection and monitoring.The daytime occupation of trees expounded by Gould (1863) has never been corroborated (Calaby & Keith 1974; Dixon 1978; Parker 1973), and there have been no observations that would support Churchill’s (1991, 1995) suggestion that bats become “forest dwellers” in the Northern Territory during the wet season. Several accounts exist of roosting in buildings (review in Armstrong 2003; Churchill et al. 1988), but never in the Pilbara. The Pilbara is considered too dry to support the Pilbara Leaf-nosed Bat in trees and buildings that provide only suboptimal microclimates.','Diet has not been studied in the Pilbara Leaf-nosed Bat, but a comprehensive study was undertaken in the Northern Territory (Churchill 1994). The Orange Leaf-nosed Bat was classified as a generalist insectivore, with the main component of the diet consisting of moths and beetles, but it also feeds opportunistically on short term emergences of groups such as termites. Lower frequencies of other insect types were also found in faecal samples (see also Vestjens and Hall 1977). Given the morphological similarity of Pilbara and more northern populations of  R. aurantia  (Armstrong 2002), diet is probably similar in the Pilbara Leaf-nosed Bat. The significant differences in call frequency between population isolates (Armstrong and Coles 2007) may have very little influence on prey type and size (Armstrong and Kerry 2011).Bats emerge from their daytime roosts after dusk and usually after species such as Finlayson\'s Cave Bat  Vespadelus finlaysoni  and the Common Sheath-tailed Bat Taphozous georgianus, with whom they often share roosts (Churchill et al. 1988; Armstrong 2001). At least some individuals remain near the entrance of the roost and continually enter and re-emerge for around two hours after their initial emergence (K.N. Armstrong unpubl. obs.). Such \'lingering\' behaviour might have a social function, since bats are sometimes observed following each other, but equally it might be related to feeding upon insect accumulations at entrances (Cramer et al. 2016). They are also thought to rest in the diurnal roost during the night, as well as other shallower caves that might provide a temporary refuge when bats are foraging several kilometres from their diurnal roost (K.N. Armstrong unpubl. data).Despite their frequent detection over pools (both generally at a landscape scale, and throughout the night at particular sites), it is not known if they drink. They forage in the open against vegetation (Bullen & McKenzie 2002), and flight behaviour is described as a \"sinuous pattern of turns; zigzagging up and down ...\"\" (Churchill et al. 1988)',' sometimes within centimetres of the ground',' but typically up to 2–3 m in height (K.N. Armstrong unpubl. obs.).\"'),('82806','Discocharopa vigens','Critically Endangered','Gastropoda','Charopidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82806'),('82845','Onychoprion anaethetus','','Aves','Laridae','The Bridled Tern is an elegant, medium-sized tern (total length 30–32 cm; mean adult weight 110–180 g [Higgins & Davies 1996]) with a fairly sturdy, grey-black bill (about the same length as the head), long slender wings and a long, deeply forked tail. Sexes do not differ in plumage or size (though females from Western Australia appear to have shorter bills, though sample sizes are small) (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Bridled Terns occupy tropical and subtropical seas, breeding on islands, including vegetated coral cays, rocky continental islands and rock stacks (Chatto 2001; Dunlop & Jenkins 1992; Dunlop, J.N in Higgins & Davies 1996). Bridled Terns are only rarely found in inshore continental waters and along mainland coastlines, though the species is reported to breed on the mainland of far southern Western Australia (Higgins & Davies 1996; Johnstone & Storr 1998).Bridled Terns breed on islands. Nests are usually found in rocky areas or on coral, concealed in crevices or caves up to 1.5 m deep, under rocks, among talus or coral rubble, on ledges of cliffs, or on the ground beneath low shrubs, roots of  Pandanus , vines or among grasses. Occasionally nests occur on shingle or sandy beaches or, rarely, in the open, on pigface (a plant) or on rock (AOU 1998; Chatto 2001; Dunlop & Jenkins 1992; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman & Langham 1985; Serventy et al. 1971).During the breeding season in south-western Australia, birds forage over offshore, mid- and outer continental shelf waters, usually within approximately 70 km of breeding colonies but mostly within 20–40 km of a colony (Dunlop 1997; Dunlop & Jenkins 1992; Higgins & Davies 1996). Off south-western Australia, there was no direct relationship between the foraging zones of Bridled Terns and the water masses of the Leeuwin Current (Dunlop 1997). Birds breeding on islands of the Great Barrier Reef tend to forage 8–12 km form their colonies, occasionally within 2–3 km, especially in the late afternoon. They have been recorded foraging in swell near the surf-zone, in straits between islands and on reefs in very shallow water (Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman 1974, 1988; Hulsman & Langham 1985). The species often forages over rafts of  Sargassum , particularly in the latter stages of the breeding season. The availability of  Sargassum  rafts, and other flotsam, in the marine environment may be a key factor influencing the breeding and wintering distribution of this species (Dunlop 1997; Garavanta & Wooller 2000; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman 1988; Surman & Wooller 2000).The Bridled Tern roosts ashore when breeding. Frequency of use of different sites varies with time of breeding cycle following return from non-breeding areas, and with time of day. At breeding colonies, birds roost or loaf on branches of shrubs or low trees (such as  Pisonia ,  Argusia ), on rocks, less often on the ground among vegetation or rubble or on the shoreline. However, at the start of the breeding season and when the chicks are older ( about 40 days old), birds roost or loaf in groups during the day on sandbanks or beaches and the like, distant from final breeding sites. They also roost on artificial structures, including posts and buoys (Chatto 2001; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman & Langham 1985; Serventy et al. 1971).Roosting behaviour away from breeding colonies is poorly known, but birds appear not to roost ashore. They readily rest on floating material at sea, including coconuts and fishing boats, and such material is probably important for roosting at sea (Dunlop & Johnstone 1994; Higgins & Davies 1996). However, Chatto (2001) located apparent night roosts on some outer islands that may have been used as shore roost by non-breeding birds. For logistical reasons these island roosts were not checked on or after dusk and confirmation is needed.There is no indication of the use of refuge habitats by Bridled Terns.Bridled Terns are not known to rely on any threatened ecological community in Australia, nor are they specifically associated with any threatened species though they potentially share habitat with such species. Bridled Terns will associate with or nest close to other species of terns, including Crested, Caspian ( Hydroprogne caspia ), Roseate Terns, Black-naped Terns ( Sterna sumatrana ), as well as Silver Gulls ( Larus novaehollandiae ), Wedge-tailed Shearwaters ( Puffinus pacificus  ) (Chatto 2001; Higgins & Davies 1996), other terns (including noddies) and shearwaters (Haney et al. 1999).','Bridled Terns feed on a range of species of fish, crustaceans, cephalopods and insects. In Australia, they feed almost entirely on fish, though they also take crustaceans and aquatic insects. They often feed on schools of fish forced to the surface by other predators. This is reflected in the species caught as these fish occur within the upper few centimetres of the surface. The presence of gastropods and crabs in the diet indicates that they do forage on reefs in very shallow water, but the numerical and biomass domiNAce of pelagic fish species caught indicate that they mostly forage at sea. Even the reef-dwelling fish that they catch are invariably pre-juvenile individuals that are transported by currents before finding a place to settle (Dunlop 1997; Higgins & Davies 1996; K. Hulsman. 2002, pers. comm.).Recorded prey items include: molluscs (including gastropods and cephalopods); crustaceans (including prawns and decapod crabs); insects (including Hemiptera, Lepidoptera, Hymenoptera and Coleoptera); and fish (including Acanthuridae, Aluteridae, Apogonidae, Atherinidae, Balistidae, Blenniidae, Carangidae, Clupeidae, Engraulididae, Exocoetidae, Gonorhynchidae, Hemiramphidae, Labridae, Monocanthidae, Mullidae, Pomacentridae, Pomotomidae, Priacanthidae, Scombridae, Syngnathidae and Tetraodontidae) (Barker & Vestjens 1989; Dunlop 1997; Higgins & Davies 1996).Bridled Terns forage singly or in small loose flocks, mainly by contact dipping, with birds hovering or gliding close to the surface of the sea and swooping down and immersing only the head and breast when attacking prey, which are usually taken from the top few centimetres of the sea surface (<20 cm). Birds occasionally surface-plunge from 2–13 m above the water at angles of 20°–90° and rarely submerging entirely (Cramp 1985; Dunlop 1997; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman 1988). During the breeding season in south-western Australia, birds usually foraged within 70 km of their breeding colonies (Dunlop 1997). On One Tree Island, Great Barrier Reef, Bridled Terns mostly foraged within 15 km of colonies but are recorded up to 28 km from colonies (Higgins & Davies 1996; Hulsman & Langham 1985). Foraging is apparently mostly diurnal, birds possibly moving between breeding colonies and feeding areas at night (Hulsman 1974; Hulsman & Langham 1985).','Human disturbance can be a threat in some colonies of Bridled Terns, causing adults to leave nests and exposing eggs and chicks to potential predation. This is a greater threat in places where Terns nest in the open or in sparse vegetation (for example, Lady Musgrave Island, Queensland) than where they nest among or under vegetation (Garavanta & Wooller 2000; K. Hulsman 2002, pers. comm.). Birds may also break eggs when scrambling from nests (Garavanta & Wooller 2000).Predators include King\'s Skink ( Egernia kingii ) (on Penguin Island), White-bellied Sea-Eagles ( Haliaeetus leucogaster ), Silver Gulls and Red Foxes ( Vulpes vulpes ); Buff-banded Rails, and rats ( Rattus  spp.) that probably take eggs (Chatto 1998; Garavanta & Wooller 2000; Higgins & Davies 1996).On some islands in south-western Western Australia, Bridled Terns are said to compete with Rock Doves ( Columba livia  ) for nesting sites in small caves in limestone cliffs (Higgins & Davies 1996).Cyclones and storms can be a threat, with young drowning from storm-surges and some chicks may starve after cyclones if adult foraging efficiency is reduced (Hulsman 1977; Hulsman & Langham 1985; Langham 1986; Chatto 1999). On Gannet Cay, Great Barrier Reef, after a cyclone destroyed plant cover in the summer of 1980, the species was not recorded on the island until April 1986 (Walker & Jones 1986c) though any subsequent absence is not known.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82845'),('82849','Sternula albifrons','','Aves','Laridae','The Little Tern is a small, slender and elegant marine tern (total length 20–28 cm; mean adult weight approximately 53 g for males, 49 g for females [Higgins & Davies 1996]) with narrow wings and a fairly long and deeply forked tail. Sexes do not differ in plumage or size.','In Australia, Little Terns inhabit sheltered coastal environments, including lagoons, estuaries, river mouths and deltas, lakes, bays, harbours and inlets, especially those with exposed sandbanks or sand-spits, and also on exposed ocean beaches. Little Terns are widespread on islands off the Northern Territory coast but appear to be less often on offshore continental islands or coral cays off Queensland (Chatto 2001; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hill et al. 1988; Johnstone & Storr 1996; NSW National Parks and Wildlife Service 2003). In the Northern Territory, Little Terns are commonly seen in sandy coastal habitats and in mangrove-mudflat habitats along the coast or in bays and estuaries, but not recorded on wetlands more than 1 km from the coast (Chatto 2001).Little Terns nest on sand-spits, banks, ridges or islets in sheltered coastal environments, such as coastal lakes, estuaries and inlets, and also on wide and flat or gently sloping sandy ocean beaches, and also, occasionally, in sand-dunes. In the Northern Territory, colonies are always on sandy beaches, often mixed with shells or coral rubble, placed just above the high-tide mark, in among the dunes or on open blow-out areas among or behind the dunes. Elsewhere, Little Terns readily use artificial banks, islets, dunes or excavated areas created from dredge-spoil, gravel or shell, though nests in newly created habitats are sometimes abandoned because substrates are unstable or overheat (Chatto 2001; Collins & Jessop 1997a; Egan & Smith 1994; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hill et al. 1988; Larkins 1984; Morris 1979; NSW National Parks and Wildlife Service 2003; Owen 1990, 1991; Reside et al. 1989; Smith 1990b; Starks 1992; Vincent 1983). In the Northern Territory, Little Terns were the only species of tern that regularly nested on remote mainland beaches and large islands, though they also nested on the beaches of small offshore islands, all of which were within approximately 25 km of the mainland or another large island or island chain with most within a few kilometres of either the mainland or a large island (Chatto 2001). Chicks will hide in dunes, under vegetation and even in crab holes and artificial shelters (Neilly 2002).Little Terns forage in shallow waters of estuaries, coastal lagoons and lakes, frequently over channels next to spits and banks or entrances, and often close to breeding colonies. They also forage along open coasts, especially around bars off the entrances to rivers and lagoons, less often at sea, and usually within 50 m of shore. In the Gippsland Lakes, the entrance channel to the lakes is an important feeding site, with numbers feeding there increasing on flood tides and decreasing on ebb tides (Higgins & Davies 1996; Owen 1990, 1991; Reside et al. 1989; Smith 1990b; Taylor & Roe 2005).Little Terns usually roost or loaf on sand-spits, banks and bars within sheltered estuarine or coastal environments, or on the sandy shores of lakes and ocean beaches (Bolger 1984; Chan & Dening 2007; Chan et al. 2008; Chatto 2001; Dening 2003; Owen 1990, 1991; Reside et al. 1989; Vincent 1983). They prefer sheltered sand-spits that are surrounded by narrow shallow channels within lakes, to more exposed spits in large lakes, which are, in turn, preferred to ocean beaches (Reside et al. 1989). In the Northern Territory, Little Terns roost on saline mudflats just inland of the coast or in the estuaries of larger river mouths and in sandy coastal habitats (Chatto 2001).The species is not known to use refuge habitats.Little Terns are not known to rely specifically on any threatened ecological community in Australia, nor are they specifically associated with any threatened species though they potentially share habitat with such species. The species is, however, associated with a number of Ramsar sites.','Little Terns feed mainly on small fish (< 10 cm in length), but also eat crustaceans, insects, annelids and molluscs (Cramp 1985; Gochfeld & Burger 1996; Higgins & Davies 1996; Johnstone & Storr 1996; NSW National Parks & Wildlife Service 2003; Urban et al. 1986). Breeding Terns on Rigby Island, in the Gippsland Lakes of Victoria, fed their chicks entirely on juvenile fish of the families Clupeidae, Engraulidae, Pomatomidae and Carangidae, including Pilchards ( Sardinops neopilchardus ), Southern Anchovies ( Engraulis australis ) and Blue Sprats ( Spratelloides robustus ) (Taylor & Roe 2005). Families of fish taken in NSW (Forster and Botany Bay), include the families Centropomidae, Clupeidae, Eleotrididae, Exocoetidae, Mugilidae, Poeciliidae, Pomatomidae, Scorpididae, Sillaginidae and Tetraodontidae (Higgins & Davies 1996; NSW National Parks & Wildlife Service 2003) and the family Atherinidae is also taken in Australia (Higgins & Davies 1996).Little Terns forage singly, or in small loose flocks and occasionally in tighter flocks. Little Terns are primarily diurnal, and feed by plunging in shallow water of channels and estuaries, or in surf on beaches, typically from 3–10 m above the surface though up to 13 m above water. The species also gleans from surface of water (Chafer & Brandis 1991; Davies 1981; Hulsman 1974; Owen 1990, 1991; Reside et al. 1989; Taylor & Roe 2005).','Little Terns have a naturally high rate of breeding failure, with ground-nesting making the species vulnerable to a wide range of natural events that contribute to low success, such as loss of eggs and chicks through native predators, flooding of nesting sites (including high tides), and adverse weather conditions. However, high rates of failure have been exacerbated by increased or novel threats since the arrival of Europeans, particularly near centres of human settlement. Nesting sites are sometimes destroyed or completely abandoned (at least temporarily) as a direct result of human disturbance or increased levels of predation associated with humans, such as by domestic or feral Dogs and Cats, or rats. Silver Gulls are also a major predator of eggs and small chicks at some colonies, and increased numbers of Gulls near cities and other settlements may result in increased predation of Little Terns. Human disturbance further indirectly exacerbates predation by Silver Gulls by disturbing adults from nests allowing predation of eggs and chicks. Some colonies have been disturbed or destroyed by residential, recreational and industrial developments, including sand-mining and establishment of waste-disposal dumps (Chatto 2001; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Gibson 1977; Higgins & Davies 1996; Hill et al. 1988; Larkins 1984; Morris 1979; NSW National Parks & Wildlife Service 2003; Reside et al. 1989; Smith 1990b).More generally, Little Terns may also be threatened by loss or degradation of estuarine habitats through development or changes to estuarine morphology and hydrology, and potential or actual impacts on the quantity and quality of food supplies through pesticide residues and other pollutants, over-fishing, and oiling of both birds and beaches (Higgins & Davies 1996; NSW National Parks & Wildlife Service 2003; Smith 1990b). In the Northern Territory, while occurring, it is unlikely that Aboriginal egg collection is a significant factor owing to the asynchrony of nesting, the small size of eggs, and the small and diffuse structure of colonies and the resultant difficulty in finding them (Chatto 2001).Interbreeding has been recorded between this species and the Fairy Tern in south-eastern mainland Australia, and it has been suggested that this may constitute a threat to the genetic integrity of the two taxa in the future (Garnett & Crowley 2000).In addition to the impacts on breeding sites, the Caloundra and Noosa sandbanks, in south-eastern Queensland, are major roosting sites for non-breeding Little Terns (with counts of up to 11 300 birds). Both sites are adjacent to large and rapidly growing human population centres and subject to increasing levels of human recreational and tourism activity (such as boating, kite-surfing, diving, fishing, bait gathering, and use of jet-skis, and similar motorised personal watercraft), some of which are known to affect the behaviour of birds and all of which potentially threaten the use of the area by terns (and other species). Further, populations of Little Terns at this site are greatest in summer, which is also when human activity in the surrounding waters peaks (Chan & Dening 2007; Chan et al. 2008; Dening 2003). At the Noosa sandbanks, most human disturbance occurred during high tide and on sandbanks closest to the mainland, with people and dogs the most common human-related disturbances. Human disturbance were greatest on weekends and public holidays and on some sandbanks during such times, birds were completely excluded by the sheer volume of people present (Chan et al. 2008).On Rigby Island, in the Gippsland Lakes, Victoria, there was mass mortality of Pilchards in the area in 1995 and in 1998–99. There was no evidence that breeding success or the number of pairs breeding were adversely affected by the 1995 mass-mortality event, but breeding success was reduced significantly in 1999 and 2000 following the second event. The 1995 event mainly affected larger size classes of Pilchard, whereas the 1998–99 event also affected younger age-classes, which may explain why Terns were adversely affected by the second event (Taylor & Roe 2005). A severe hailstorm in Gippsland, Victoria, in the 2001–02 breeding season killed at least 38 adult Little Terns, and many Fairy Terns (Olsen et al. 2003).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82849'),('82864','Gudeoconcha sophiae magnifica','Critically Endangered','Gastropoda','Helicarionidae','The Magnificent Helicarionid Land Snail has a thin, bronze shell with a depressed spire, sculptured with fine ripple marks. Its dimensions are 35 mm in diameter and 20 mm high (Hyman 2005).','Little is known about the biology and ecology of this species.  The generation length of the Magnificent Helicarionid Land Snail is not known (TSSC 2008aet).','NA','Habitat degradation and modificationThe Lord Howe Island Group was listed as a World Heritage Area in 1982 (DEWHA undated). Much of the island is covered in rainforest with about 10% of land area cleared for urban development and agriculture, with a further 20% disturbed by introduced animals and exotic weeds (WWF 2001). The southern half of the island is reserved, and whilst this is where the Magnificent Helicarionid Land Snail occurs, the restricted distribution of the species makes it highly vulnerable to extinction from on-going threats or catastrophic events.Feral animalsThe key threat to the Magnificent Helicarionid Land Snail is predation by introduced rats. The Ship Rat ( Rattus rattus ), also known as the Black Rat, arrived on the island from a wrecked ship in 1918 and has since become well established on Lord Howe Island (DEWHA undated). Ship Rats prey on snail species, and are thought to have been responsible for the significant decline in, and possible extinction of,  Placostylus bivaricosus etheridgei  on Lord Howe Island (NSW NPWS 2001a; Ponder 1997b). Ship Rats are likely to prey on the Magnificent Helicarionid Land Snail, though the program of baiting of rats currently undertaken on the island is likely to benefit the species if it persists on Mount Gower and Mount Ligdbird. However, this baiting program is unlikely to completely mitigate the effect of predation by Ship Rats on the Magnificent Helicarionid Land Snail as it is not undertaken across the species\' entire range. Two large species of land snails,  Epiglypta howinsulae   and  Placostylus bivaricosus etheridgei  that were restricted to the southern mountains are apparently now extinct, almost certainly due to the activity of the Ship Rat (Ponder 1997b). The New South Wales Scientific Committee has declared predation by the Ship rat on Lord Howe Island as a key threatening process (NSW Scientific Committee 2000a).Pigs and goats that were introduced to Lord Howe Island by settlers for food later became feral pests (DEWHA undated). Both species caused damage to the surface litter and ground cover in areas where the Magnificent Helicarionid Land Snail occurred, most notably the trail to Mt Gower (Smithers et al 1977). It is likely that this resulted in a decline in the species\' numbers. However, these pest species are no longer likely to be directly impacting on the species, as pigs have now been eliminated from the island, and goats virtually eliminated (DEWHA undated).Another potential threat to the Magnificent Helicarionid Land Snail is predation and habitat disturbance by invasive ant species. The African Big Headed Ant ( Pheidole megacephala ) is present in the northern settlement area of Lord Howe Island and may affect the Magnificent Helicarionid Land Snail should it invade the area where the species occurs (TSSC 2008aet).Further potential threats to the Magnificent Helicarionid Land Snail include introduced birds, particularly the Song Thrush ( Turdus philomelas ) and Common Blackbird ( Turdus merula ), which prey upon  Placostylus  species on Lord Howe Island and may prey on the Magnificent Heliacarionid Land Snail.Although the habitat of the Magnificent Heliacarionid Land Snail is protected in the reserved southern area of Lord Howe Island, the species is potentially threatened by trampling, disturbance and collection by visitors, habitat damage by weeds and wildfire.Global warmingThe cloud forest on top of Mount Gower is threatened by global warming (UNESCO 2002).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82864'),('829','Tringa glareola','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Wood Sandpiper is a small thin wader and member of the  Tringinae  family. The species has a length of 19–23 cm, a wingspan of 56–57 cm and a weight of 55 g. The species has a short straight bill and long legs. It is similiar in size to the Sharp-tailed Sandpiper,  Calidris acuminata , however has a longer neck and slimmer build, slightly longer, straighter bill and longer legs. The species is a dark grey-brown or plain brown above and spotted pailer and white below with a greyish wash on the breast. It has dark streaking on the foreneck and breasts as well as some barring on the fore-flanks. In all plumages the species shows a white supercilium, extending well behind the eye with greenish or yellow legs (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Typical habitatThe Wood Sandpiper uses well-vegetated, shallow, freshwater wetlands, such as swamps, billabongs, lakes, pools and waterholes. They are typically associated with emergent, aquatic plants or grass, and dominated by taller fringing vegetation, such as dense stands of rushes or reeds, shrubs, or dead or live trees, especially  Melaleuca  and River Red Gums  Eucalyptus camaldulensis  and often with fallen timber. They also frequent inundated grasslands, short herbage or wooded floodplains, where floodwaters are temporary or receding, and irrigated crops. They are also found at some small wetlands only when they are drying. They are rarely found using brackish wetlands, or dry stunted saltmarsh. Typically they do not use coastal flats, but are occasionally recorded in stony wetlands. This species uses artificial wetlands, including open sewage ponds, reservoirs, large farm dams, and bore drains (Higgins & Davies 1996). In Western Australia, within wetlands, birds often occur within a few metres of one another and are concentrated at a few sites in a wetland (Higgins & Davies 1996).Habitat for feedingThe Wood Sandpiper forages on moist or dry mud at the edges of wetlands, either along shores, among open scattered aquatic vegetation, or in clear shallow water (Higgins & Davies 1996).Habitat for roostingThe Wood Sandpiper has been recorded loafing on a low, grassy hillock in a flooded meadow. It as also been recorded perched low in trees and on fences (Higgins & Davies 1996).','The Wood Sandpiper is carnivorous, eating mainly insects and molluscs in Australia (Higgins & Davies 1996). Elsewhere the species also eats seeds, algae, worms, crustaceans, arachnids, fish and frogs (Cramp & Simmonds 1983). On breeding grounds the Wood Sandpiper eats mainly adult and larval midges, as well as seeds (del Hoyo et al. 1996). The species wades in shallow fresh water, often up to belly, gleaning prey from the surface of the water (Hindwood & McGill 1953). They are known to probe, sometimes with head and neck submerged, and sweep the bill from side to side under water (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Global threatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area.Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006).Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005c; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).Threats within AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Wood Sandpiper.Habitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation (DEWHA 2009aj) include, but are not restricted to:loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflatsinvasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grasswater pollution and changes to the water regimechanges to the hydrological regimeexposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site.DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=829'),('82947','Isurus paucus','','Chondrichthyes','Lamnidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82947'),('82950','Sternula nereis nereis','Vulnerable','Aves','Laridae','A small piscivorous (fish-eating) bird, the Fairy Tern is approximately 22–27 cm in length, 70 g in weight and has a wingspan of 44–53 cm (Higgins & Davies 1996). The Fairy Tern is bulky and round bodied (Simpson & Day 2004).','The Fairy Tern (Australian) nests on sheltered sandy beaches, spits and banks above the high tide line and below vegetation. The subspecies has been found in embayments of a variety of habitats including offshore, estuarine or lacustrine (lake) islands, wetlands and mainland coastline (Higgins & Davies 1996; Lindsey 1986a). The bird roosts on beaches at night (Higgins & Davies 1996).The subspecies may migrate within southern Western Australia and Tasmania, where are seen less frequently during the winter months. The bird is more sedentary in the north of Western Australia, South Australia and Victoria (Hill et al. 1988).','DietThe Fairy Tern predates on small bait-sized fish (Van de Kam et al. 2004). Plant material, molluscs and crustaceans have also been recorded; however these are possibly from the stomachs of their fish prey (Higgins & Davies 1996). Fish species consumed by the bird include Anchovies ( Engraulis australis ), Pilchards ( Sardinops neopilchardus ) and Blue Sprats ( Spratelloides robustus ) (Taylor & Roe 2007).FeedingFairy Terns hover and then dive into shallow waters in order to catch fish; however they may scavenge from shoals of feeding predatory fish (Higgins & Davies 1996).Survey GuidelinesTopFeedingFairy Terns hover and then dive into shallow waters in order to catch fish; however they may scavenge from shoals of feeding predatory fish (Higgins & Davies 1996).Survey GuidelinesTopThe Fairy Tern is similar to the Little Tern but differs in having a shorter tail, a bigger head with a larger bill and shorter, narrower wings. Fairy Tern are distinguishable in breeding plumage by their entirely yellow beaks (Higgins & Davies 1996) and the black patch at the eye which does not extend to a point at the bill (Cox & Close 1977).','The main threat to the subspecies is the disturbance of breeding sites by human activities (including bikes, horses and vehicles) and predation by introduced species and birds. It is the species’ nesting behaviours that make the Fairy Tern so susceptible to disturbance and predation.Disturbance may cause direct destruction of eggs or the abandonment of nesting sites by the birds resulting in egg predation or chilling or overheating of eggs (Higgins & Davies 1996). Predators of the Fairy Tern include Foxes ( Vulpes vulpes ), Dogs ( Canis familiaris ), Cats ( Felis catus ), Black Rats ( Rattus rattus ), Silver Gulls ( Larus novaehollandiae ), Pacific Gulls ( Larus pacificus ), Harriers ( Circus  spp.) and Ravens ( Corvus  spp.) (Saunders and de Rebeira, 1985; Hill et al. 1988  In  TSSC 2011t).Fairy Tern nests are a simple scrape in the sand and thus any counterproductive activities in or around the breeding sites are a threat. This includes overgrown vegetation, weed encroachment, housing development, extreme weather events, increased salinity and incorrect water management in waters surrounding breeding sites (Higgins & Davies 1996; IUCN 2010; TSSC 2011t).Furthermore, increased salinity in waters adjacent to breeding colonies (particularly in the Coorong South Australia) causes local population crashes in the numbers of prey fish. Nest flooding or exposure to predators can occur due to a respective rise or decline in water levels (TSSC 2011t).In the event of an oil spill, the Fairy Tern would be potentially threatened due to the proximity of the species’ breeding habitat to offshore oil facilities (TSSC 2011t).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82950'),('82953','Hyridella glenelgensis','Critically Endangered','Bivalvia','Hyriidae','The Glenelg Freshwater Mussel is a sedentary, bivalve mollusc that attains 51–80 mm in length. The shell is strong and almond-shaped, with a rounded posterior border, and both the umbo (peak along the hinge line) and the shell surface are marked with fine sculpture (wrinkles). The Maximum Height Index (MHI), the ratio of maximum height of the shell to its length used to distinguish mollusks, is about 50% for the species. The periostracum (flaky shell covering) is olive-green in immature individuals and dark purple-brown in mature individuals (Playford & Walker 2008; Walker et al. 2001).','The Glenelg Freshwater Mussel is found in shallow, narrow, flowing sections of the Crawford River with dense riparian vegetation that shade the water thus moderating water temperatures. Woody debris from the riparian vegetation that falls into streams is an important habitat feature, providing stable sediments and a refuge from strong currents (Playford & Walker 2008).  The species lives in firm, coarse sandy sediments that supply ideal burrowing substrate, and allows feeding, respiratory and reproductive organs to function without clogging. The species is also reliant on flowing water as this assists in maintaining suitable water temperatures and restricting algal growth. Mussels burrow using their hard shell as a blade and a strong muscular \'foot\' as an anchor, leaving only the hindmost part of their shell above the sediments. They may occur singly in marginal habitats, and in small aggregations or shoals in more favourable environments. Due to the physical attributes of the Glenelg Freshwater Mussel, it is suggested that the species favours smaller streams with less forceful water movements (Playford & Walker 2008).  Water quality is an important aspect of mussel habitat. Adult Glenelg Freshwater Mussels are likely to have an upper salinity tolerance of about 4 parts per thousand, similar to other Hyriidae mussels (Walker et al. 2001). Only the Crawford River and two smaller tributaries in the Glenelg River catchment consistently have salinities below this level in the known range of this species (Playford & Walker 2008). Plant species found in riparian areas where the Glenelg Freshwater Mussel is located include  Eucalyptus  species, Blackwood  (Acacia melanoxylon ) and Woolly Tea-tree ( Melaleuca lanigerum ) (Playford & Walker 2008).','Glenelg Freshwater Mussels, like all Hyriidae mussels, are omnivorous filter feeders. They draw in water through a siphon, and food particles are trapped by ciliated ctenidia (gills), sorted and passed to the mouth. Food particles include phytoplankton (bacteria, algae), organic detritus and zooplankton. Feeding is assisted by normal stream flows delivering food particles to the gills (MDFRC 2006; Vic. DSE 2009t).','Habitat loss and habitat degradation Erosion, siltation and loss of riparian vegetation caused primarily by trampling and grazing stock affect the habitat of the Glenelg Freshwater Mussel. The species is not found where cattle have access to the river bank, as loss of vegetation increases soft silts in stream beds that can then clog feeding, respiratory and reproductive organs of the species, or bury them totally (Playford & Walker 2008). Loss of riparian vegetation also removes shading, increasing water temperatures and promoting algal growth that is unfavourable to mussels, and removes in stream debris that provides a refuge for mussels. De-snagging of the river system in the 1960s and 1970s is partly responsible for bank and bed instability and siltation, and may have contributed to the contraction of the local range of the species (Playford & Walker 2008). A study by Brainwood and colleagues (2006) suggests that the width of riparian vegetation surrounding populations may play an important protective role against surrounding land uses. Habitat requirements of freshwater mussels\' means they are often found \'patchily\' in waterways, often in dense clusters. The reliance on specific substrate and water flows makes these species highly susceptible to any changes in riparian vegetation, water flows and sedimentation. Clearing of riparian areas, urban build-up close to streams, and intensive farming have all been implicated in the loss of freshwater mussel species within Australia and Northern America (Brainwood et al. 2006). Altered hydrology Low water flows may increase salinity, water temperatures and lower oxygen levels, all of which threatens the survival of the Glenelg Freshwater Mussel. The more shallow regions of streams, that are preferred habitat of the species, are prone to drying out during low flows, causing the species to burrow or follow the receding water. Cessations in flow can threaten the refuge habitats used by species in drier periods (Vic. DSE 2009t).  Periods of low flows and cessations in flow are increasing in the Crawford River due to growth in plantations in the area and drought. More than 18 000 ha of  Eucalyptus  spp. plantations have been established in the Crawford River sub-catchment since 1990, lowering water tables and causing reduced flows and drying of springs (SKM 2008 cited in FWPA 2009). Drought has also affected the catchment, with flow records since 1970 indicating an increase in months of low to nil flows (Vic. DSE 2009t). Potential threats  Potential threats to the Glenelg Freshwater Mussel include pesticide use, predation and habitat degradation by introduced Carp ( Cyprinus carpio ), loss of native fish hosts for the glochidia, bushfires and impacts of timber harvesting (Brainwood et al. 2006; Playford & Walker 2008; Vic. DSE 2009t). Freshwater mussels are affected by contamination of waterways by chemicals such as pesticides (Ruessler et al. 2009) due to their filter feeding habit that may cause them to see them accumulating large quantities of contamiNAts in tissue (ROPME 2010; Vic. DSE 2009t). Pesticides are used as part of eucalypt plantation forestry along the Crawford River catchment (FWPA 2009; Vic. DSE 2009t). Introduced Carp first appeared in the Glenelg River in 2001 and are likely to invade the whole system, including the Crawford River (ASFB 2001; Vic. DPI 2010). Carp pose a serious predation risk to juvenile mussels, and also disturb bottom sediments, damage or destroy aquatic vegetation and compete with native fish. Experimental trials suggest that the glochidia of Australian freshwater mussel species may not utilise Carp as a host, but this requires confirmation (Walker 1981).  Bushfires can cause destruction of riparian and catchment vegetation and severe degradation of aquatic habitats (Vic. DSE 2009t).Timber harvesting has the potential to degrade mussel habitat through large scale sediment inputs and siltation, especially if buffer zones are inadequate (Vic. DSE 2009t).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82953'),('82954','Phascogale pirata','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','The Northern Brush-tailed Phascogale is a carnivorous marsupial approximately 15–21 cm long, with silvery to dark grey fur and long dark hairs on the tail, which form a distinctive brush. The hairs can be stiffened when alarmed, giving a bottle-brush appearance. The species has a notably pointed snout, large ears and eyes and weighs about 150–200 g (NT NRETA 2007).','The Northern Brush-tailed Phascogale is recorded from tall open forests dominated by Darwin Woollybutt ( Eucalyptus miniata ) and Darwin Stringybark ( E. tetrodonta ) (NT NRETA 2007). The species is solitary in nature and arboreal, though nocturnal foraging occurs both on the ground as well as in trees. The species utilises hollows in trees for nesting during the day (IUCN 2011).','The Northern Brush-tailed Phascogale primarily consumes invertebrates and some small vertebrates (NT NRETA 2007).','Habitat clearingThe Northern Brush-tailed Phascogale is threatened by the loss of hollow-bearing trees from within eucalypt forests. Populations on Melville Island and on private land in the Batchelor-Litchfield area are said to be \'variably\' affected by loss of vegetation for forestry plantations and development (TSSC 2010w).Disease and introduced faunaWhilst the impacts of disease, predation and poisoning by exotic pest species is not well documented, the probable local extinction of the Northern Brush-tailed Phascogale from West Island corresponds to the introduction to the island of the domestic Cat ( Felis catus ) and Cane Toads ( Bufo marinus ), the latter of which the Northern Brush-tailed Phascogale may try to eat (NT NRETA 2007; Taylor et al. 2004).WeedsThe recent increase in the extent and domiNAce of invasive pasture grasses, particularly Mission Grasses ( Cenchrus  spp.) and Gamba Grass ( Andropogon gayanus ), may also threaten the species. These grasses have an adverse impact on habitat by affecting: vegetation structure and composition; hunting efficiency and on-ground movement (NT NRETAS 2009a); and fire regimes.Altered fire regimesIncreased fire frequency regimes are likely to simplify forest structure (Liedloff & Cook 2007) and reduce the availability of suitable tree hollows (Williams et al. 1999) that the species relies on.Climate changeSome of the known populations of the species occur in coastal areas known for a high incidence of cyclones (such as Cobourg Peninsula and Melville Island). Cyclones may be detrimental to the species through destruction of tree hollows and changes to forest structure (NT NRETAS 2009a). The incidence of severe cyclones is expected to increase in this region as a consequence of climate change (NT NRETAS 2009a).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82954'),('82993','Lucasium occultum','Endangered','Reptilia','Gekkonidae','The Yellow-snouted Gecko is a small ground-dwelling gecko (snout-to-vent length 40 mm). The species is dark brown above, with a reddish head, four large, squarish pale brown blotches along the back, and whitish spots scattered on the flanks and limbs (DIPE 2006).','Very little is known of the ecology of the Yellow-snouted Gecko. All individuals captured to date have occurred in conjunction with well-developed leaf litter and grasses (King et al. 1982) in open forests dominated by  Eucalyptus miniata  and  E. tetrodonta . Records from Wildman Reserve include sites with sparse to moderate occurrences of introduced gamba grass ( Andropogon gayanus ).','NA','The Yellow-snouted Gecko appears to be restricted to lowland open forests in the adjoining Mary, Wildman and West Alligator catchments. Fire regimes in this environment and this region have been the subject of a series of recent studies. These have concluded that the current regime is different from the historic regime, and is now characterised by an increased extent of fires and more intense fires resulting from a higher frequency of fires in the late dry season (Andersen et al. 1998, 2003). The current fire regime is regarded as being too frequent for the Yellow-snouted Gecko (Andersen et al. 2005; Pardon et al. 2003; Woinarski 2004; Woinarski et al. 2004).Compounding this change in burning practices, the Wildman and Mary River catchments have been extensively invaded by exotic pasture grasses, particularly Gamba ( Andropogon gayanus ) and Mission ( Pennisetum polystachion ) grasses. These grasses are also increasing within Kakadu National Park. Studies of these exotic grasses in open forests in Wildman Reserve suggest that fuel loads are increased three to five times, and fire intensities eight-fold, relative to comparable open forests with native grasses (Rossiter et al. 2003). These hotter fires are likely to increase the mortality of terrestrial geckos and their eggs, reduce the leaf litter in which they shelter, and increase predation risks.A study by Beggs (2009) has also found a significant negative association between the Yellow-snouted Gecko and the level of gamba grass cover in the Mary River Catchment area.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=82993'),('83000','Thalasseus bergii','','Aves','Laridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83000'),('83079','Liopholis guthega','Endangered','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Guthega Skink is a diurnal medium-sized member of the  Egernia whitii  species group of skinks. The mean snout-vent length (SVL) of Guthega Skink is 9.75–11.10 cm (Donnellan et al. 2002). It is blackish brown in colour on the dorsum and upper flanks, with greyish brown vertebral (down the back) and dorsolateral (back and side) stripes and numerous longitudinal rows of sharp, pale spots. Juveniles are darker in colour than adults, with more prominent spots but less pronounced stripes. Guthega Skinks are known to be colonial, living in extensive warren systems (Green & Osborne 1994; Michael & Lindenmeyer 2010; Wilson & Swan 2003).','The preferred habitats for the Guthega Skink are usually rocky or have sub-surface boulders hidden beneath soil or thick vegetation. The species utilizes burrows often opening from under boulders or shrubs. The skink is also known to use fallen timber and surface rocks for shelter. Basking is carried out on rocks (Michael & Lindenmeyer 2010; Vic DSE n.d.). Sites are generally covered with snow from approximately June to October and have mild temperatures in summer. During the colder periods, the species is insulated by living in soil burrows combined with deep snow cover (Green & Osborne 1994).Individuals have been recorded in a range of vegetation types, including open Snow Gum ( Eucalyptus pauciflora ) woodland with grassy or shrubby understoreys, dry tussock grassland, and tall and short heath (Donnellan et al. 2002). The Guthega Skink usually occurs in areas where the topography ranges from flat plains to rolling alpine hills. The geology in known areas of occurrence is often granitic (Green & Osborne 1994).Sympatric (occurring in the same habitat/geological area) fauna species include the Tussock Skink ( Pseudemoia pagenstecheri ), White-lipped Snake ( Drysdalia coronoides ), Highland Copperhead Snake ( Austrelaps ramsayi ), the Mountain Pygmy Possum ( Burramy parvus ), and  Antechinus  and  Rattus  species. Several other reptiles from the genera  Pseudemoia ,  Eulamprus  and  Egernia  also occur in sympatry with the Guthega Skink.','The Guthega Skink feeds on small invertebrates, and may also include some plant material in its diet (Vic DSE n.d.). Within the  Ergenia  species group, larger members are known to be predomiNAtly herbivorous, whereas juveniles and smaller members tend to favour insects as the basis of their diet (Chapple 2003).','Loss and degradation of habitatHistorically, large tracts of suitable habitat for the species have been lost as dams and alpine resort villages have been constructed and expanded. Infrastructure for resorts such as roads, tracks and ski runs have also destroyed, fragmented or modified habitat (Vic DSE n.d). Degradation of the species\' habitat has also resulted from grazing and trampling by cattle ( Bos  sp.), the Feral Horse ( Equus caballus ), deer ( Cervidae  sp.) and the Pig ( Sus scrofa ), and the grooming of ski runs. Domestic cattle have been removed from alpine park areas; however feral cattle still remain (Vic DSE n.d.).PredationPredation by the Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) and the Cat ( Felis catus ) is a serious current threat that has been on the rise and requires quantification. The impact of predation is via the direct loss of individuals and detrimental alterations in lizard behaviour. Furthermore, continued development in the area increases predator access to the species (due to increased exposure of habitat, including hiding areas) and decreases areas of predator free habitat (TSSC 2011n, 2011o).Altered fire regimesThe most likely catastrophic threat to the Guthega Skink is wildfire. Large fires in the Australian Alps are not considered common, but two such fires have occurred in the past seven years (2003 and 2007), affecting much of the species\' range in Victoria. Wildfires kill individuals, expose them to greater predation and alter floristics of habitat making it less suitable for the species (Clenmann 2009; Vic DSE n.d.). Predicted climate change is likely to increase fire frequency and severity in this region (TSSC 2011n, 2011o).Climate changeWith limited and specific habitat characteristics pertaining to alpine conditions, the impact of climate change on the Guthega skink may be particularly pronounced. As the species is currently living in some of the highest areas within Australia, movement into cooler, upward land is most likely unfeasible (NSW DECCW 2008; Vic DSE n.d.; Vic Gov 2010). Warmer temperatures may also see an increase in predator species that may impact on the Guthega Skink, as predators are able to encroach on previously predator free areas. For example, kookaburras (known skink predators) have become regular subalpine residents in the past decade (Green & Pickering 2002). Any impacts of climate change on the Guthega Skink will affect the species across its geographic distribution (TSSC 2011n, 2011o).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83079'),('83086','Antechinus minimus maritimus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83086'),('831','Tringa incana','','Aves','Scolopacidae','NA','The Wandering Tattler is generally found on rocky coasts with reefs and platforms, points, spits, piers, offshore islands and shingle beaches or beds. It is occasionally seen on coral reefs or beaches, and tends to avoid mudflats (Higgins & Davies 1996).Foraging habitat is among rocks or shingle, or in shallow pools at edges of reefs or beaches, mainly along the tideline. Wandering Tattlers have been recorded roosting or perching on top of boulders surrounded by or close to water (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Wandering Tattlers feed on Polychaete worms, molluscs and crustaceans (including crabs). Outside Australia, they are also recorded eating insects and fish (Higgins & Davies 1996).Wandering Tattlers feed singly or in small groups. Feeding habitat is mainly on rocky coasts, reefs, and, less often, on beaches and mudflats (Higgins & Davies 1996).','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=831'),('83106','Cryptoblepharus gurrmul','Endangered','Reptilia','Scincidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83106'),('83143','Euastacus dharawalus','Critically Endangered','Malacostraca','Parastacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83143'),('83160','Liopholis kintorei','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Great Desert Skink is a large burrowing lizard that can grow up to 44 cm long and weigh up to 350 g. The species has reddish-tan smooth scales, with creamy-lemony flanks and a yellow belly. One of their Aboriginal names - Mulyamiji - means \'red nose\' (DEH 2004; EA 2002h).','The Great Desert Skink generally occurs on red sandplains and sand ridges (Cogger et al. 1993).Populations in the Gibson Desert occur on sandplains with a surface cover of fine gravel (Pearson et al. 2001). Vegetation usually consists of hummock grassland ( Triodia basedowii, Triodia pungens  and  Triodia schinzii ), with some scattered shrubs and occasional trees (e.g.  Acacia  spp.,  Eucalyptus  spp.,  Hakea  spp.,  Grevillea  spp. and  Allocasuarina decaisneana ) (Cogger et al. 1993; McAlpin 2001).In the Tanami Desert and parts of the Great Sandy Desert, this skink also occurs on paleodrainage lines with giant termite mounds and  Melaleuca  shrubs.The population in SA was found in open Mulga ( Acacia aneura ) and Minyura ( Acacia minyura ) woodland over Woollybutt grass ( Eragrostis eriopoda ) and spinifex ( Triodia  spp.) (McAlpin 2001).Sites in WA are dominated by  Triodia basedowii  and  Triodia schinzii  with some  Eremophila leucophylla  shrubs (Pearson et al. 2001). The population at Patjarr WA occurs on a gravelly undulating plain with scattered Black Gidgee ( Acacia pruinocarpa ) or Mulga over  Triodia basedowii  and low shrubs (McAlpin 2001).Regenerating vegetation appears to be a critical habitat requirement (McAlpin 1997). Skinks appear to prefer a mosaic landscape of different aged vegetation and inhabit sites that have been burnt in the previous three to fifteen years (McAlpin 1998, 2001). Preferred habitat has at least 50% bare ground (McAlpin 1998). Regenerating areas may provide ample food while unburnt patches provide shelter (Pearson et al. 2001). The reproductive output of burrows is highest in areas burnt in the previous ten years (McAlpin 2001).','Great Desert Skinks bask near their burrows in the early morning and late afternoon, and venture further at night to forage (Pearson et al. 2001). The feeding behaviour and diet of L. kintorei varies depending on food availability. Liopholis kintorei is known to both forage away from its burrow (observed up to 150 m) in search of food and also opportunistically ambush potential prey from the burrow entrance (McAlpin 2011).The species consumes a variety of invertebrates including beetles, cockroaches, ants, spiders and termites (Pearson et al. 2001). The species is omnivorous, feeding predomiNAtly on harvester termites of the genus Drepanotermes (McAlpin 2011). Small vertebrates are also eaten, with one record of a scat containing a 200 mm long Blindsnake ( Ramphotyphlops  spp.). During good seasons they also consume a variety of plant material such as Bush Tomato ( Solanum  spp.) fruits, Parakeelya ( Calandrina  spp.) leaves, and Paper Daisy ( Leucochrysum stipitatum ) flowers. Bush Tomatoes ( Solanum centrale ) appear to be an important food source in regenerating herbfields in the Gibson Desert (Pearson et al. 2001). Scat analysis reveals that skinks eat their own shed skin (McAlpin 1997). Termites form a major part of the diet of Great Desert Skinks from Uluru-Kata Tjuta National Park. Following good summer rains the skinks feed heavily on termite alates (with wings) by darting out at them as they pass or waiting next to cracks from which the alates are emerging (McAlpin 1997).','Fire RegimesThe cessation of traditional land management practices over most of the western deserts region has created a new fire regime. Vast areas remain unburnt for many years. When a fire eventually burns in these unmanaged areas, either by lightning strike or through human intervention, it is likely to be a very hot, extensive fire that creates a huge swath of burnt country with few patches of unburnt habitat within it. Small animal populations at the edge of such a fire may be able to survive, but the chance of finding a suitable patch of unburnt habitat for most animals within the fire zone is greatly diminished. Over time such a fire regime is likely to eliminate most populations until only a few fragmented, small populations persist (McAlpin 2001).The only populations of the Great Desert Skink that appear to be secure are found in areas that currently have intensive fire management occurring. One of these populations is in Uluru-Kata Tjuta National Park where patch burning has been recommenced to enhance biodiversity conservation as well as to mitigate the threat of extensive wildfire. In other populations, intensive fire management has been as a result of continuous traditional hunting practices. Optimal patch-burn size for the Great Desert Skink is as yet unknown. Current adaptive management practices at Uluru, combined with continued population monitoring, should enable a patch burning prescription to be developed for possible application in other parts of the western deserts region (McAlpin 2001). A major increase in fire size and frequency in fire-managed habitat will cause localised extinction (Cadenhead et al. 2016).Predation and Competition by FeralsBoth the Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) and the Cat ( Felis catus ) have been identified as predators of Great Desert Skinks. Cats prey on the skinks, particularly juveniles, by sitting near a burrow entrance and waiting to pounce on a lizard when it emerges (S. McAlpin pers. obs. cited in McAlpin 2001). The impact of this predation pressure on Great Desert Skink populations is currently poorly understood (McAlpin 2001).Foxes catch skinks after dark when the lizards are actively foraging out from their burrows (I. Noble pers. comm. cited in McAlpin 2001). The extent of this predation is unknown as is the overall threat to the species or to individual populations.The Rabbit ( Oryctolagus cuniculus ) has been recorded moving in to one active burrow system of the Great Desert Skink, causing the lizards to abandon the burrow system (McAlpin 1997).Mulgara ( Dasycercus cristicauda )  are known to prey on Great Desert Skinks (S. McAlpin pers. comm. cited in McAlpin 2001), possibly concentrating on juvenile or hibernating lizards.Traditional Food SourceThe species is important both as food and lore to the Pitjantjatjira and Pintupi people (D. Carter cited in Cogger et al. 1993; Pearson et al. 2001). Older Pintupi women still hunt it occasionally (Pearson et al. 2001).TourismPopulations at Yulara (near Uluru) are threatened from increasing tourism development. Tourism infrastructure at Yulara and within Uluru-Kata Tjuta National Park has occasionally been inadvertently sited close to active Great Desert Skink burrows, resulting in burrow abandonment, or mortality of lizards on roads (McAlpin 2001). Spinifex harvesting conducted as part of a fire management program around tourism infrastructure at Yulara also threatens to resident populations of Great Desert Skinks in this area (McAlpin 2001).Groundwater ExtractionA significant population of Great Desert Skinks occurs in the Yulara borefields area, where the water supply for Yulara township is sourced. There are some concerns that planned increases in the volume of artesian water harvested may impact on the biologically diverse borefield\'s flora and fauna, including Great Desert Skink populations (McAlpin 2001).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83160'),('83161','Bellatorias obiri','Endangered','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Arnhem Land Egernia is a large (> 20 cm snout-to-vent length), thickset, ground-dwelling lizard of the skink family. It is grey to light brown above, with a brown lengthwise streak. Toward the head, the sides are dark with irregular patches that merge into faint transverse bands between the front and back legs. The legs are short and chunky (DIPE 2006).','The Arnhem Land Egernia is largely restricted to sandstone outcrops, typically with extensive fissures and cave systems. The species is probably at least partly nocturnal or crepuscular (active at dawn and dusk) (Sadlier 1990).','NA','The ecology of the Arnhem Land Egernia is poorly known. While the available data on past, current and future threats impacting on the species is limited, there are threatening processes operating within the Arnhem Land plateau which are likely to have adversely affected the species in the past and continue to do so (TSSC 2006y). The species may be affected by changes in food resources caused by altered fire regimes or predation by cats. Cane toads,  Bufo marinus , may also affect the Arnhem Land Egernia by poisoning (Armstrong & Dudley 2004). It will be difficult to determine the impact of these and other threats without a more detailed understanding of the biology of this species, and its population and distribution status.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83161'),('83162','Liopholis pulchra longicauda','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Jurien Bay Skink is a slender, flat-headed, medium-sized skink with a long tail. The subspecies\' upper surface is brown, while a black laterodorsal stripe is usually present and enclosing a series of pale spots and bordered below by pale grey dorsolateral stripe.The Jurien Bay Skink has a bright orange ventral surface (except the throat), and a suffusion of orange on the upper and lower labials (lips), auricular lobules (ears), loreals (scales on the side of the head) temporals, side of neck and many pale spots on the back. The orbit is black contrasting with the creamy white edge of eyelids. The sides of the Jurien Bay Skink are grey and densely flecked with black or, rarely, white. (Ford 1963; Storr et al. 1999; TSSC 2009u, 2009v)','The Jurien Bay Skink inhabits rock isolates and low shrubland. It is found in pre-existing cavities such as crevices amongst limestone rocks and sometimes in seabird burrows (Cogger et al .  1993; TSSC 2009u, 2009v). On Escape Island, it has been observed in dense ground litter beneath low scrub vegetation, as well as under sheets of cardboard (Ford 1965; TSSC 2009u, 2009v).','NA','The main identified threats to the Jurien Bay Skink are habitat disturbance, accidental fire, and competition and predation from introduced animals, all associated with frequent human visitation to the islands (TSSC 2009u; WA CALM 2004a).Competition with introduced animals is currently known to be threatening this subspecies. It has been confirmed that the house mouse ( Mus musculus ) on Boullanger Island is limiting the population size of the Jurien Bay Skink by eating vast quantities of insects and depleting the food resources of the island (TSSC 2009v; Dickman 1999).Escape, Favourite, Whitlock and Boullanger Islands are only a couple of kilometres offshore from the mainland. This proximity to the coast exposes the subspecies to a number of potential threatening processes associated with frequent human visitation, such as the disturbance of habitat (from trampling and erosion), accidental fire, and the unintentional introduction of animals or invasive plants to the islands. These threats are likely to be ongoing, as visitor pressure is predicted to increase as a result of Jurien Bay\'s growth as a regional centre (WA CALM 2004a; TSSC 2009v).Given that it only occupies small, low-lying islands, the Jurien Bay Skink could be threatened by rising sea levels as a result of climate change (TSSC 2009v).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83162'),('83163','Liopholis slateri slateri','Endangered','Reptilia','Scincidae','Slater\'s Skink is a smooth, heavily built burrowing skink. The upperbody is greyish brown in colour with black patterning and the underbody is pale cream to bluish-grey. It can have a rose-coloured flush around the sides of the head and neck area (G.Fyfe 2004, pers. comm.). Average snout-vent length is 8.5 cm (Horner 1991; Pavey 2002).','At most sites, Slater\'s Skink occurs in eucalypt and mulga woodland and open woodland on alluvial soils close to drainage lines. However in Finke Gorge National Park it has been located in a range of environments including an isolated dune supporting shrubland, low rolling calcareous rises with 60% spinifex cover and on an elevated, narrow, rocky creekline (Pavey 2002).A burrowing species, it digs complex burrow systems under small trees and shrubs, particularly corkwood ( Hakea divaricata ), Turpentine ( Eremophila sturtii ) (Pavey 2002), and Spotted Emu-bush ( Eremophila maculata ) (G.Fyfe 2004, pers. comm.). The burrows are dug into the low pedestal of soil that usually builds up beneath these trees (Pavey 2002). May occasionally be found under ground debris (Horner 1991).','Feeds on arthropods (Pavey 2002).','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83163'),('832','Tringa nebularia','','Aves','Scolopacidae','General','Typical habitatThe Common Greenshank is found in a wide variety of inland wetlands and sheltered coastal habitats of varying salinity. It occurs in sheltered coastal habitats, typically with large mudflats and saltmarsh, mangroves or seagrass. Habitats include embayments, harbours, river estuaries, deltas and lagoons and are recorded less often in round tidal pools, rock-flats and rock platforms. The species uses both permanent and ephemeral terrestrial wetlands, including swamps, lakes, dams, rivers, creeks, billabongs, waterholes and inundated floodplains, claypans and saltflats. It will also use artificial wetlands, including sewage farms and saltworks dams, inundated rice crops and bores. The edges of the wetlands used are generally of mud or clay, occasionally of sand, and may be bare or with emergent or fringing vegetation, including short sedges and saltmarsh, mangroves, thickets of rushes, and dead or live trees. It was once recorded with Black-winged Stilts ( Himantopus himantopus ) in pasture, but are generally not found in dry grassland (Higgins & Davies 1996).Feeding habitatThe species is known to forage at edges of wetlands, in soft mud on mudflats, in channels, or in shallows around the edges of water often among pneumatophores of mangroves or other sparse, emergent or fringing vegetation, such as sedges or saltmarsh. It will occasionally feed on exposed seagrass beds (Higgins & Davies 1996).Roosting habitatThe Common Greenshank roosts and loafs round wetlands, in shallow pools and puddles, or slightly elevated on rocks, sandbanks or small muddy islets. Occasionally the species will perch and roost on stakes (Higgins & Davies 1996). The species is known to have roosted on an inland claypan near Roebuck Bay, Western Australia; this site may be an important roost site for this species at least during the non-breeding season (Collins et al. 2001).','The Common Greenshank is carnivorous. In Australia is has been recorded eating molluscs, crustaceans, insects, and occasionally fish and frogs. Elsewhere, it has  also been recorded eating annelids, lizards, and rodents (Higgins & Davies 1996).The species feeds during both day and night time. It is active and agile, finding prey by sight or, occasionally, by touch. The birds wade in shallow water along edge of water in tidal estuaries, muddy claypans, saltworks and saltpans (Higgins & Davies 1996). They glean from the surface of mud, vegetation or water and pursue insects on the surface of the water and in the air. Prey is occassionally manipulated, crushed and washed before being swallowed whole, especially large items such as eels (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Global ThreatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area. However, Moores (2008) has documented the change in species\' composition and numbers since the sea-wall was completed, and there is some indication of an increase in the number of Common Greenshanks recorded since 2006 (Moores 2008).Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Wei et al. 2006). Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter 2005c; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Common Greenshank:Loss/modification of habitatThe demands of long flights make migratory shorebirds particularly susceptible to loss of, or changes to, the habitat of resting or foraging grounds along their route (AGDEH 2005c). Site fidelity is another feature of migratory shorebird behaviour which can compound the risk that habitat modification or loss can represent. Residential, farming, industrial and aquaculture/fishing activities represent the major cause of habitat loss or modification in Australia. Residential or other development of saltworks or land adjacent to mudflats near the outskirts of built-up areas can reduce suitable habitat for the species and increase levels of disturbance (Straw 1992a).Silt, pollution, weeds or pest invasionIncreased silt in the water, pollution and weed or pest invasion of habitats can change the quality or quantity of food available from the sites or modify important biophysical aspects. Pollution is a particular threat as pollutants tend to accumulate and concentrate in wetlands (AGDEH 2005c). Excess nutrients, including from offsite, diffuse sources, can lead to eutrophication which in turn can impact on the availability of benthic prey species (Harding et al. 2007; Straw 1992a). Industrial pollution, such as in the case of accidental release, can lead to the build up of heavy metals or toxic elements in the substrate of wetlands which, in turn, can affect benthic prey fauna (AGDEH 2005).DisturbanceWith increasing tourist visitation and development along the Queensland coast and around Broome, Western Australia, increasing levels of disturbance from human recreational activity are likely. Recreational fishing, four-wheel driving, unleashed dogs and jet-skiing may disturb the foraging or roosting behaviour of migratory shorebirds. Migratory shorebirds are most susceptible to disturbance during daytime roosting and foraging periods. Disturbance can lead to reduced energy reserves required by the birds prior to migration (AGDEH 2005c).Introduced SpeciesIntroduced plants, such as Water Hyacinth ( Eichhornia crassipes ) can lead to long-term changes to the nature and biodiversity of wetlands which in turn can affect their suitability for use by migratory shorebirds (AGDEH 2005c). Introduced plants, such as Cord Grass ( Spartinia ), can invade intertidal mudflats and reduce the amount of suitable foraging areas, as has already occurred in other countries (Goss-Custard & Moser 1988). Exotic marine pests may also result in the loss of benthic food sources (AGDEH 2005c).The biological characteristic of the species which poses a key threat to its survival is that it regularly flies for thousands of kilometres over some of the most densely populated areas of the world. The huge human population in east Asia places enormous pressure on natural resources, and manifests itself in activities such as the reclamation of mudflats (Barter 2002, 2005).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=832'),('83288','Lamna nasus','','Chondrichthyes','Lamnidae','The Porbeagle is a stout-bodied, thermo-regulating shark that grows to more than 200 cm long and up to 230 kg. The species is strongly counter-shaded (dark on the upper half of the body and white/light on the lower half) (Last & Stevens 2009). The species has a very large dorsal fin and long, narrow pectoral fins.','The Porbeagle primarily inhabits oceanic waters and areas around the edge of the continental shelf. They occasionally move into coastal waters, but these movements are temporary (Campana & Joyce 2002; Francis et al. 2002). The Porbeagle utilises a broad vertical range of the water column and is known to dive to depths exceeding 1300 m (Campana et al. 2010; Saunders et al. 2011). The Porbeagle is thought to be reasonably flexible in the types of habitat used for foraging (Pade et al. 2009). The surface temperatures of waters inhabited by the Porbeagle typically range from 8-20° C; however, the species has been captured in water temperatures between 2-23° C (Campana & Joyce 2004). It is noted that the  Lamna  genus is the most cold-adapted of the Lamnidae family and that they are able to access and exploit foraging habitats that are unsuitable for ectothermic predators (Saunders et al. 2011).','The Porbeagle has a diet similar to the Shortfin Mako ( Isurus oxyrhinchus ) and is known to feed on a range of prey items including teleost fish (mackerel, herring, cod, hake, lumpfish), elasmobranchs (i.e. dogfish) and cephalopods (primarily squid) (Joyce et al. 2002; Last & Stevens 2009). Similarly to other species in the Lamnidae family , the species also appears to undergo a dietary shift as individuals mature. Juvenile Porbeagle sharks mainly consume cephalopods; shifting to mainly consuming pelagic fish as the animal matures (Joyce et al. 2002). Unlike the larger members of the Lamnidae family, the Porbeagle is not known to consume marine mammals (i.e. cetaceans and pinnipeds) and elasmobranchs are only likely to form a small part of the diet (Joyce et al. 2002). The Porbeagle appears to feed at depths roughly aligned with the thermocline (point in the water column where there is an abrupt decrease in temperature) and can alter diving depths and patterns to account for variations due to seasonal mixing of the water column (Campana & Joyce 2004).','The Porbeagle is known to be particularly vulnerable to overfishing. The fins and meat of the species are highly valued and there have been documented rapid Porbeagle fishery collapses in the past (Francis et al. 2002). The estimated low abundance of the species, slow growth rate, late age at maturation and low fecundity indicate that sustainable yields of this species would be low (Francis et al. 2002, 2007). Although most fisheries are now closed or highly regulated, the Porbeagle is still taken as bycatch in longline fisheries targeting other species (Francis et al. 2002).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83288'),('833','Tringa stagnatilis','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Marsh Sandpiper is a medium sized member of the  Tringinae  family. It has a length of 22–26 cm, a wingspan of 40–45 cm and a weight of 70 g. In all plumages the species shows a contrasting outerwing, a very pale whitish tail and a bold white wedge up the back (Higgins & Davies 1996). They occur singly or in small to large flocks. They often associate with other waders and are often seen with Greenshanks, especially in saltfields. They may feed in tight co-ordinated groups, and sometimes feed with other wading birds (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Habitat overviewThe Marsh Sandpiper lives in permanent or ephemeral wetlands of varying salinity, including swamps, lagoons, billabongs, saltpans, saltmarshes, estuaries, pools on inundated floodplains, and intertidal mudflats and also regularly at sewage farms and saltworks. They are recorded less often at reservoirs, waterholes, soaks, bore-drain swamps and flooded inland lakes. In north Australia they prefer intertidal mudflats (Higgins & Davies 1996), although surveys in Kakadu National Park recorded more birds around shallow freshwater lakes than in areas influenced by tide (Bamford 1988). At the Top End they often use ephemeral pools on inundated freshwater and tidal floodplains (Higgins & Davies 1996). Three of the five sites with highest recorded numbers are saltwater habitats (Hunter Estuary, NSW; Port Hedland Saltworks, Western Australia; Tullakool Evaporation Ponds, NSW) (Watkins 1993). In the south-east Gulf of Carpentaria they have been recorded round both saline and fresh waters (Garnett 1989). Elsewhere they said to avoid, or rarely occur in, tidal habitats, and rarely occur on beaches. In Western Australia they prefer freshwater to marine environments. In south-east Australia they prefer inland saline lakes and coastal saltworks. They are found infrequently around mangroves (Higgins & Davies 1996).Habitat for feedingThe Marsh Sandpiper usually forages in shallow water at the edge of wetlands. They probe wet mud of mudflats or feed among marshy vegetation (Higgins & Davies 1996).Habitat for roostingThe Marsh Sandpiper has been recorded roosting or loafing on tidal mudflats, near low saltmarsh, and around inland swamps (Higgins & Davies 1996).','The Marsh Sandpiper is carnivorous; recorded eating insects, molluscs and (internationally) crustaceans. Plant material has been found in stomachs but this may have been ingested incidentally (Higgins & Davies 1996). There is a recent record of a fish being carried to shore and eaten (Wieneke & Cross 1996). The species usually feed in shallow water, often wading deeper than the level of the tarsus. They walk briskly and steadily, or dash about, turning in half-circles and sometimes swim. They generally pick at the surface of water or mud and may glean from vegetation. They feed singly or in groups and have also been recorded following ducks, egrets and other waders, feeding on prey disturbed by these birds (Cramp & Simmonds 1983).','Global threatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area.Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006).Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005c; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).Threats within AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Marsh Sandpiper.Habitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation (DEWHA 2009aj) include, but are not restricted to:loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflatsinvasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grasswater pollution and changes to the water regimechanges to the hydrological regimeexposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site.DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=833'),('83395','Nyctophilus corbeni','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Vespertilionidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83395'),('835','Tringa totanus','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Common Redshank is 27–29 cm long, has a wingspan of 48–55 cm and weighs around 120 g. It is a somewhat dumpy wader, with long orange-red legs and a straight, medium-length bill with a reddish base. With regards to its plumage, the species is characterised by a bold white rump and a V on the back. It has a broad white trailing-edge to innerwing in flight. In flight the feet project beyond the tip of the tail (Higgins & Davies 1996).','The Common Redshank is found at sheltered coastal wetlands such as bays, river estuaries, lagoons, inlets and saltmarsh (with bare open flats and banks of mud or sand). They are also found around saltlakes, freshwater lagoons, artificial wetlands and saltworks and sewage farms (Higgins & Davies 1996).The Common Redshank has been observed feeding in shallow water, on wet bare mud or sand, or on algal deposits, round the edges of wetlands, near rocks or samphire (Higgins & Davies 1996). They have been recorded roosting on small elevated areas such as estuarine sandbars and muddy islets surrounded by water (Higgins & Davies 1996).','The Common Redshank is carnivorous and known to consume worms, molluscs, crustaceans, spiders and insects. It has also been recorded eating fish and tadpoles. The species is diurnal and nocturnal; they locate prey by sight during the day and use touch at night. They feed on rocky, sandy or muddy shores (Higgins & Davies 1996).','GlobalHabitat lossThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the East Asian-Australiasian Flyway (EAAF). The greatest threat is direct and indirect habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development including aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they will be reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). As part of the Project, a 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, significantly affecting the 40 100 ha area used by the species (Barter 2005c). Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the EAAF, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006).Reduction in quality and quantity of waterWater regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998). For example, reduction in river flows in parts of China, due to upstream water diversion, represents potentially significant threats to the species which is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998). Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas. As a result, intensive oil exploration and extraction in China are other potentially signficant threats (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006).DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact, it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (for example, construction sites) and approaching objects (for example, boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj). It is likely that human related disturbances will increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).Global warmingGlobal warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).HuntingHunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).AustraliaHabitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialised feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation include (but are not restricted to):loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflatsinvasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grasswater pollution and changes to the surface water regimechanges to the hydrological regimeexposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=835'),('83504','Zearaja maugeana','Endangered','Chondrichthyes','Rajidae','The Maugean Skate is a medium-sized skate with a quandrangular disc and pointed snout. It has a broad, slightly depressed tail, an elongated snout and spatula-like claspers. The species is grey-black above and lighter grey with dark-edged pores underneath. Mature males have a distinctive triple row of thorns on their tails. The species grows 84 cm in length and males mature at about 65 cm (Last & Stevens 1994, 2009).','The Maugean Skate is restricted to brackish, estuarine, low nutrient water, 5–7 m deep (Pogonoski et al. 2002; TSSC 2004) in the shallower upper reaches of the estuaries (IUCN 2007). The species is one of the few skate species worldwide living mainly in estuaries (Last & Stevens 2009).','Maugean Skate have a restricted diet dominated by three groups of epibenthic crustaceans, namely crabs, carid shrimp and mysids (Bell et al. 2016). Fish represent a minor prey item (Bell et al. 2016). In one study, the common grapsid shore crab,  P. gaiimardii , dominated the diet of having been consumed by most individuals examined (Treloar et al. 2016).','Pollution is a possible threat to the Maugean Skate. The population in Macquarie Harbour is in a bay estuary that is heavily polluted from the historic mining operations of Mt Lyell. The sediments in the harbour are polluted with contamiNAts from the mine, including heavy metals such as cooper and zinc. Boat-based tourism is also known to be increasing in Macquarie Harbour and both populations occur in areas that are facing increasing pressure from ecotourism activities. The impact of these pressures on the Maugean Skate is unknown (TSSC 2004).This species is probably also caught by recreational gillnetting (Pogonoski et al. 2002). Catch by recreational fishers in Macquarie Harbour may be low due to fishers setting nets close to the shore in relatively shallow water or on shallow sand flats (Bell et al. 2016). The majority of skate captured in gillnets are likely to be released in healthy condition (Bell et al. 2016).Aquaculture in Macquarie Harbour produces organic waste that increases biological oxygen demand and reduces dissolved oxygen and enriches the pelagic environment (Bell et al. 2016; Ross & MacCloud 2017). As bottom dwellers, skates are at risk from hypoxia in the water overlying the sediment, and this risk is likely to increase with high organic loadings potentially detrimental to the skate (Treloar et al. 2016). The Macquarie Harbour Dissolved Oxygen Working Group (MHDOWG 2015, cited in Treloar et al. 2016) reported a clear downward trend in the dissolved oxygen levels of the waters below 15 m from 2009 to 2014, during a period of major farm expansion (Treloar et al. 2016). Aquaculture is situated in areas of deeper water which tends to be less preferred by the species. It is highly likely, however, that any reduction in bottom dissolved oxygen will negatively influence the area of core habitat (preferred depths) (Bell et al. 2016).Other potential impacts include a change in nutrient status caused by vessel discharge and habitat disturbance (TSSC 2004).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83504'),('83756','Thymichthys politus','Critically Endangered','Actinopterygii','Brachionichthyidae','Red handfish are small, slow moving benthic fish that are mostly red in colour. The species grows to at least 136 mm total length and has a relatively elongate and moderately compressed body that tapers towards the tail. The skin is covered in small, close-set, flattened warts. Unlike the spotted handfish, most scales and the associated spines of this species are fully embedded in the skin (Last & Gledhill 2009).','During observations made at Primrose Sands Reef in 1996, red handfish were found in a variety of locations, such as on the top of rocks, amongst macro-algae and in sandy areas between rocks and the reef-sand interface (Bruce et al. 1997). A few years later in 1999 they were also found to have shared habitat with spotted handfish on sediments with weed clumps near these reefs (Gledhill & Green unpub.). Last and Gledhill (2009) report a depth distribution of 1-20 metres.The green alga ( Caulerpa simpliciuscula ) was observed to be the preferred spawning substrate of red handfish at Primrose Sands Reef and appears to be critical to spawning success. Unlike spotted handfish bred in captivity, red handfish did not use the artificial spawning substrate provided but they did have access to and use  Caulerpa  spp. in the aquaria (Bruce et al. 1997). The absence of red handfish on the sediments adjoining the reef in 2005, despite there being abundant spawning habitat,  C. simpliciuscula  (Green 2005), suggests an undetected threatening process in operation (Gledhill & Green unpub.).Due to their limited and disjunct distribution, all of the areas within which red handfish have been found are considered important habitat.','In the 1980s, the red handfish were found to feed on small crustaceans and worms (Edgar et al. 1982).','Key threats to handfish habitat, and specifically spawning substrate include (DEH 2005u):pollution from industrial storm water and sewage that may deplete spawning substratesiltation of key estuarine habitat caused by land clearingcoastal developments, particularly those that involve dredging, as the red handfish lives in shallow coastal environments in close proximity to major urban and industrial areas.Habitat DegradationThe principle threat to handfish appears to be reduced abundance and distribution of benthic organisms suitable for egg mass attachment (Spotted Handfish Recovery Team 2002). Red handfish rely on semi-rigid vertical structures on which to attach their egg masses (DEH 2005u). When spawning substrate is absent handfish are unable to secure and guard their egg masses, which often results in any eggs laid being swept away in the current.While reports indicate that handfish may use alternative forms of substrate, such as filamentous alga, this strategy may not be reproductively viable. Red handfish at Frederick Henry Bay were observed attaching egg masses to filamentous alga but all egg masses failed as the algae was washed away (Jacques unpub.). Furthermore, blooms of filamentous alga may smother the egg masses and possibly restrict the movement of handfish. Several species of unidentified red and brown filamentous alga have been recorded in Frederick Henry Bay (Jacques unpub.). Filamentous alga cover varies in space and time and often appears in seasonal flushes. Anecdotal evidence indicates that warm summers and increasing water temperatures favour the growth of filamentous alga, which appears to outcompete other alga such as branching  Caulerpa  species (Flukes 2014, pers comm.).Other native species that have increased in abundance as a result of human activity may also impact on the availability of spawning substrate and interfere with the recruitment of juvenile handfish. The common butterfly-shell oyster ( Electroma georgiana ) is a rapidly growing species which experiences population explosions that result in the formation of large, smothering accumulations on the sea floor; these leave behind extensive swathes of decomposing matter when they die off (Green 2014, pers comm.). This speciestends to proliferate under high nutrient conditions (Aquenal Pty Ltd 2008).The native sea urchin ( Heliocidaris erythrogramma ) has also increased in abundance, possibly due to fishing activities that remove its predators, such as rock lobsters ( Jasus edwardsii ) (Brereton 2010, pers comm.) and wrasse species (Labridae family) (Flukes 2014, pers comm.; Gowlett-Holmes 2014, pers comm.).  Heliocidaris erythrogramma  form into large aggregations, known as barrens, that remove larger macroalgae (potential handfish spawning substrate) from the reef resulting in overgrazed habitat (Edgar 1997) with low productivity and biodiversity (Valentine & Johnson 2005).Environmental ThreatsAnthropogenic activities such as land clearing, land reclamation, dredging, port construction, damming and industrial and urban waste inputs often have significant impacts on estuarine and marine ecosystems and can lead to increases in run-off and sediment loads and reductions in water quality, habitat quality and availability, and fish abundance (Edgar et al. 2000).Due to their distribution in shallow coastal habitats in close proximity to urban and industrial areas handfish are exposed to numerous impacts from anthropogenic activities (DEP 2013). Impacts to handfish populations from coastal developments can arise as a result of increased top soil runoff and sedimentation in surrounding waterways, while impacts from marine developments can occur due to the loss or modification of habitat (DEP 2013).CollectionThe species is also of interest to private and commercial aquarium collectors because of its unusual appearance, and there have been anecdotal reports that the red handfish is one of several Tasmanian handfish species subject to small scale collection for illegal trade (DEH 2004j). While experts consider the likelihood of poaching to be low, the consequence of removing even a few individuals from the wild is considered to be severe given the small population size of each species.Other potential threatening processesAny form of fishing that degrades the benthic habitat can be considered to pose a threat to handfish species (Spotted Handfish Recovery Team 2002).Reductions in prey abundance, possibly related to decreases in benthic cover of seagrasses and alga that provide habitat for invertebrates, may impact upon handfish survival and reproduction (Spotted Handfish Recovery Team 2002).Climate change and warming ocean temperatures also pose a potential threat to all handfish species. Increased water temperature may impact upon handfish survival and reproductive capacity both directly, as handfish held in aquaria appeared distressed at temperatures above 18°C (Gledhill & Green unpub.), and indirectly, through the creation of conditions favourable to the growth of filamentous alga and the spread of native urchins. Water temperatures of approximately 20 ºC were noted at Primrose sands during the summer of 2000/01 (Gledhill & Green unpub.). Furthermore, climate change driven increases in severe weather events may dislodge spawning substrate and degrade habitat (Gowlett-Holmes 2014, pers comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83756'),('83757','Brachiopsilus ziebelli','Vulnerable','Actinopterygii','Brachionichthyidae','Ziebell’s handfish is the largest known handfish species, reaching a maximum total length of about 150 mm (DEH 2001). The species has a moderately short, rounded body that is usually humped near the head and tapers toward the tail (Last & Gledhill 2009). It has thick, flabby, smooth skin. Typically, the body is pink to white, with the upper surface and sides having purple to brown randomly placed blotches. Fins are generally bright yellow and, in some specimens, the yellow extends onto the body adjacent to the fins (Last & Gledhill 2009). The illicium (the modified first dorsal-fin spine) is pink to white (Last et al. 1983).','The Ziebell\'s handfish is found at depths of between 3–20m (DEH 2001). The species appears to prefer soft bottomed habitat, with patches of rock that support sponge and algae communities, which they use as spawning substrate (DEH 2001). However, the Actaeon Island population appears to be confined to a rocky-bottomed area of about 20 km² (DEH 2001). It has been found at the edge of towering kelp ( Marcrocystis pyrifera ) at the Actaeon Islands and in Cox\'s Bight (Edgar et al. 1982; Last et al. 1983), an ecological community that is now listed as Endangered under the EPBC Act (DSEWPaC 2012q). At Waterfall Bay, Ziebell\'s handfish was found on rock ledges and in cracks on open walls at about 20 m depth; it was also found on ledges and in cracks on walls inside caves at 12–18 m depth (Gowlett-Holmes 2004 pers. comm. cited in DEH 2005u).Due to the restricted distribution of known populations of Ziebell’s handfish and their low dispersal, all areas in which they are found are considered important habitat (DEH 2005u).','The diet of Ziebell\'s handfish is unknown but probably consists of small invertebrates (Pogonoski et al. 2002) such as crustaceans and worms (Edgar et al. 1982).','There is very little published information on Ziebell\'s handfish. Information gaps for this species include precise information on habitat requirements, current distribution, current abundance and threats.While threats to Ziebell\'s handfish have not been identified, personal collection and the aquarium trade have the potential to threaten populations by removing individuals from the wild. Under the  Marine Resources Managment Act 1995  (Tasmania), a person, in State waters, must not take or have possession of handfish without a permit (DEH 2005u).In addition, the Ziebell’s handfish has a restricted distribution, a low abundance, and, like other members of the Brachionichthyidae family is believed to have a low reproductive rate and limited dispersal capability. Furthermore, the effect of increasing sea surface temperatures off eastern Tasmania (Ridgeway 2007) are unknown, but are likely to place greater pressures on handfishes.Key threats to handfish habitat, and specifically spawning substrate include (DEH 2005u):pollution from industrial storm water and sewage that may deplete spawning substratesiltation of key estuarine habitat caused by land clearing','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83757'),('838','Phalaropus lobatus','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Red-necked Phalarope is the smallest Phalarope and member of the  Phalaropodinae  family. The species has a length of 18–19 cm, a wingspan of 31–34 cm and a weight of 34 g. It is a distinctive marine wader with a small head, slender neck, short straight needle-like bill, short legs and feet with lobed toes. In flight, all plumages show bold white wing-bar, white sides to a dark-centred rump and uppertail coverts. The species has white underwings with contrasting dark trailing edge and markings on the coverts. The Red-necked Phalarope along with Grey Phalaropes are the only waders occurring regularly at sea. They mainly winter at sea around the tropics, but are occasionally seen on coastal and inland wetlands (Higgins & Davies 1996).','During non-breeding period the Red-necked Phalarope occurs mainly at sea. In Australia it is recorded at both inland and coastal lakes/swamps, including highly saline waters and artificial wetlands notably saltfields (Higgins & Davies 1996).','There is limited information on the feeding habits of the Red-neck Phalarope both in Australia and the world. The species is known to take invertebrates in the open water, and very rarely on mudflats. While feeding, the Red-necked Phalarope spins in an anti-clockwise direction, occasionally fluttering and pecking at the surface of the water for disturbed insects. They have been observed feeding at the Port Hedland Saltworks, Western Australia (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Global ThreatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area (Barter 2005c).Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006). Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Red-necked Phalarope.Habitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation include (but are not restricted to): (1) loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflats; (2) invasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grass; (3) water pollution and changes to the water regime; (4) changes to the hydrological regime and (5) exposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site (DEWHA 2009aj).DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=838'),('83806','Maccullochella mariensis','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Percichthyidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83806'),('83821','Acanthophis hawkei','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Elapidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83821'),('83885','Adclarkia dulacca','Endangered','Gastropoda','Camaenidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83885'),('83886','Adclarkia cameroni','Endangered','Gastropoda','Camaenidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83886'),('83909','Stiphodon semoni','Critically Endangered','Actinopterygii','Gobiidae','The Opal Cling Goby has its first dorsal fin approximately the same height as the second (Seriously Fish 2010). This physical difference can be a distinguishing characteristic for the species. In Australian habitats the Opal Cling Goby has been recorded at a maximum total length of 35 mm (Thuesen et al. 2009).','In Australia, adult Opal Cling Gobies are found in pristine rainforest streams that have significant flow and direct access to marine habitats (Thuesen et al. 2009).','Opal Cling Gobies \'cling\' to rocky substrates in fast flowing rainforest streams while feeding on benthic algae, microinvertebrates and small macroinvertebrates (Thuesen et al. 2009).','The main threat to the Opal Cling Goby in Australia has been identified as collection for the aquarium trade. Whilst this threat has not been quantified, the small population size estimates for the species make any collection detrimental to survival of the species in the wild (Ebner & Thuesen 2010).Potential threats include loss of suitable habitat due to human development, water extraction, climate change and prolonged drought (Ebner 2009 pers. comm. cited in TSSC 2011i). These threats are likely to alter the species\' habitat through changes to water quality and flow regime. Construction of physical barriers, such as culverts and dams are also considered possible threats as these structures can prevent movement of the larvae out to sea and the subsequent return of juveniles (Ebner 2009 unpubl. data cited in TSSC 2010i). Due to the isolation of the species, stochastic events, such as severe floods or prolonged drought, in the area of habitat is likely to have a significant impact on the populations of this species.Spotted Tilapia ( Tilapia marinae ) is an introduced fish species that has established populations around the Cairns area (ACTFR 2007). The Spotted Tilapia may out compete the Opal Cling Goby for food resources, and has the potential for piscivory (consuming eggs and larvae of other fish) (ACTFR 2007).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=83909'),('840','Glareola maldivarum','','Aves','Glareolidae','The Oriental Pratincole is a medium-sized (23–24 cm long and weighs approximately 75 g), tern-like shorebird with long, pointed wings and a forked tail. The sexes are alike, with seasonal variation, and juveniles are separable.','In non-breeding grounds in Australia, the Oriental Pratincole usually inhabits open plains, floodplains or short grassland (including farmland or airstrips), often with extensive bare areas (Bravery 1970; Campbell 1920; Carruthers 1968; Garnett 1986; Jaensch 2004; Klapste 1977a; van Tets et al. 1969, 1977). They often occur near terrestrial wetlands, such as billabongs, lakes or creeks, and artificial wetlands such as reservoirs, saltworks and sewage farms, especially around the margins (Boekel 1980; Garnett 1986; Jaensch 1985, 2004; Liddy 1959; Lloyd & Lloyd 1991; Smith 1963a). The species also occurs along the coast, inhabiting beaches, mudflats and islands, or around coastal lagoons (Corben 1972b; Finch & Cox 1974; Garstone 1978; Hobbs & McGill 1973).Outside Australia, the species occurs in open areas (such as plains, meadows, airfields, playing fields and pastures), and around wetlands (such as marshes, rivers, lakes, saltpans, fish ponds and rice fields) (Ali & Ripley 1969; de Schauensee 1984; Dement\'ev & Gladkov 1951; MacKinnon & Phillipps 1993; Maclean 1996; Orn. Soc. Japan 2000).Roosting habitatDuring the heat of the day they usually loaf near water at the edges of terrestrial wetlands (Boekel 1980; Crawford 1972; Garnett 1986; Hobbs & McGill 1973; Jaensch 2004; Pierce 1978), and at one wetland they roosted in the hoofprints of stock (Hobbs & McGill 1973). They usually roost in bare areas such as claypans or areas with low vegetation, such as saltmarsh or airfields (Garnett 1986; Gill 1970; Jaensch 1985; van Tets et al. 1969; Waugh 1988).Breeding habitatThe species does not breed in Australia. It breeds in colonies on open grassland plains (often recently burnt) or stubble fields, or at the edge of wetlands such as lakes, rivers or ricefields, including on grassy islands or reclaimed land (Ali & Ripley 1969; Crossland 2003; Dement\'ev & Gladkov 1951; Maclean 1996).The species does not rely on a listed threatened ecological community.','During the non-breeding season, Oriental Pratincoles eat insects, including dragonflies, cicadas, beetles, moths, ants, termites, locusts, grasshoppers, flies, bees and wasps (Barker & Vestjens 1989; Boekel 1980; Kilgour 1904; Johnstone 1983; Mathews 1909, 1910; Pierce 1978; van Tets et al. 1969).During the breeding season, they also eat flying insects (Ali & Ripley 1969; Maclean 1996).The species usually feeds aerially, at heights varying from just above the ground up to 300 m (Campbell 1920; Corben 1972b; Garnett 1986; Liddy 1959). They travel in flocks, in search of swarms of locusts or other insects (Kilgour 1904), and large flocks may ascend thermals near cyclonic storms or fires to feed on insects and other prey sucked up by thermals (Campbell 1920; van Tets et al. 1977). They also sometimes glean insects from the ground, running after or lunging at prey on the ground (Pierce 1978; Stewart et al. 2007; van Tets et al. 1969).','Australia  In Australia, the species occurs in sparsely-settled areas, and there are no immediate threats to its survival (Higgins & Davies 1996).  In northern Australia, Oriental Pratincoles often loaf on roads, where they may be struck by vehicles (Klapste 1977a), and birds roosting or feeding on airstrips are often struck by aircraft, sometimes in large numbers (van Tets et al. 1969). The species often inhabits habitats vegetated with sparse grass that is grazed at low levels (not intensively), and it is unclear how grazing of this land affects the species (Watkins 1993). If the pattern of grazing was to change (that is, stop) or the grass was modified (for example, replaced by exotic grasses, or fertilized so that it grew denser) it could become too long or dense for use by Pratincoles, but either of these scenarios appears unlikely. With increasing tourist visitation around Broome (where the largest numbers of Pratincoles have been recorded in Australia [Sitters et al. 2004]), and subsequent development, increasing levels of disturbance from human recreation are likely (Rogers 1999b).Elsewhere  The species may be adversely affected by destruction or modification of habitat in its breeding grounds and on passage (Maclean 1996). When undertaking southward migration, large numbers of Oriental Pratincoles are killed for food in West Java (Milton & Marhadi 1989), and it was estimated in 1990 that 21% of the birds passing through the region were captured, making it the most heavily harvested shorebird (Johnson et al. 1992). As hunting is unregulated it is probably unsustainable (Johnson et al. 1992).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=840'),('841','Gallinago stenura','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Pin-tailed Snipe is a small member of the  Gallinago  family. It has a length of 25–27 cm, a wingspan of 44–47 cm and an average weight of 115 g. The species has a long straight bill, rather short broad somewhat blunt wings, a very short tail and short legs. In flight the species is noted for its small size, small head, squat body, somewhat rounded outerwing, short bill and the projection of the feet beyond the tip of the tail. The sexes are alike and there is no seasonal variation in plumages. The Pin-tailed Snipe is similiar to Latham\'s Snipe,  Gallinago hardwickii , and Swinhoe\'s Snipe,  Gallinago megala . The Pin-tailed Snipe is distinguished from the other two due to its smaller size (Higgins & Davies 1996).','During non-breeding period the Pin-tailed Snipe occurs most often in or at the edges of shallow freshwater swamps, ponds and lakes with emergent, sparse to dense cover of grass/sedge or other vegetation. The species is also found in drier, more open wetlands such as claypans in more arid parts of species\' range. It is also commonly seen at sewage ponds; not normally in saline or inter-tidal wetlands (Higgins & Davies 1996).','NA','Global threatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area.Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006).Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005c; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).Threats within AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Pin-tailed Snipe.Habitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation (DEWHA 2009aj) include, but are not restricted to:loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflatsinvasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grasswater pollutionchanges to the hydrological regimeexposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site.DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=841'),('84121','Amytornis modestus','Vulnerable','Aves','Maluridae','Thick-billed Grasswrens are thickset, dull brown grasswrens with dark stout bills. The underparts are pale grey-buff, with fine streaking from the chin to the breast, and on the back. Female Grasswrens have chestnut flanks (Pizzey & Knight 1999).','The eastern subspecies of the Thick-billed Grasswren occurs in chenopod shrublands (which occur in the arid and semi-arid zones), especially shrublands dominated by saltbush  Atriplex  spp. and bluebush  Maireana  spp., sometimes with widely scattered trees (Higgins et al. 2001).   At a site west of Oodnadatta, South Australia, in September 1996, the Thick-billed Grasswren was recorded on a clay peneplain with a sparse to open cover of saltbush  Atriplex  spp., bindieyes  Sclerolaena  spp., Roly-poly  Salsola kali , glasswort  Halosarcia  sp. and various daisies including  Rhodanthe  spp.,  Calotis hispidula  and  Craspedia  spp. (Matthew pers. comm. 2002). Similarly, during a survey of the Mount Eba and Millers Creek Stations, South Australia, the subspecies was recorded in chenopod shrubland with gilgais supporting large chenopods such as Oodnadatta Saltbush  Atriplex nummularia omissa , Blackbush  Maireana pyramidata , and Spiny Saltbush  Rhagodia spinescens .The Thick-billed Grasswren (eastern) probably favours areas on drainage lines where saltbush and bluebush shrubs are taller and thicker (Chapman 1996; Matthew pers. comm. 2002). There are historical records of the eastern subspecies of the Thick-billed Grasswren in Sandhill Canegrass  Zygochloa paradoxa  on sand dunes (Higgins et al. 2001). They possibly also occurred on the plains of the Lower Namoi River in Nitre Bush  Nitraria  shrubland (Parker 1972), although this historical record could also have been from areas of Grey Saltbush  Atriplex cinerea  or Roly-poly  Salsola kali  (McAllen 1987).The nest of the Thick-billed Grasswren is usually placed within 1 m of the ground, in the centre of a low shrub such as saltbush  Atriplex  spp., bluebush  Maireana  spp. or canegrass  Zygochloa spp. , including Sandhill Canegrass  Z. paradoxa  growing on sand dunes (Higgins et al. 2001; Parker 1972; Rowley & Russell 1997; Schodde 1982; Whitlock 1924). It is also reported to nest in flood debris (Whitlock 1924).','The eastern subspecies of the Thick-billed Grasswren is omnivorous. It eats seeds, fruits, insects and other invertebrates (Higgins et al. 2001; Rowley & Russell 1997; Whitlock 1924). The diet of Thick-billed Grasswrens in general includes seeds of grasses and other plants such as  Acacia  spp., species of Asteraceae, Brassicaceae, Cucurbitaceae, Geraniaceae and Malvaceae. They also eat Chilopods (centipedes) and insects including Coleoptera (beetles), Hemiptera (bugs), Hymenoptera (ants and wasps), Isoptera (termites) and Orthoptera (grasshoppers and crickets) (Higgins et al. 2001).   The eastern subspecies of the Thick-billed Grasswren forages mainly on the ground, under and around the bases of shrubs, and sometimes in open areas (Rowley & Russell 1997; Schodde 1982).','The Thick-billed Grasswren (eastern) is adversely affected by damage to soil and loss of understorey vegetation caused by grazing by domestic stock (sheep and possibly cattle) and feral animals such as rabbits  Oryctolagus cuniculus  and goats  Capra hircus . The Thick-billed Grasswren is also thought to be especially vulnerable to damage to its habitat during droughts (Blakers et al. 1984; Higgins et al. 2001; McAllen 1987; Schodde 1982). The decline and eventual extinction of the Thick-billed Grasswren (eastern) in NSW is thought to have been caused by heavy grazing of the sub-species\' shrubland habitat by domestic stock in the 1880s, and the subsequent devastating droughts in the 1890s (McAllen 1987).However, in South Australia the sub-species continues to occur in areas degraded by sheep and rabbits (Garnett & Crowley 2000).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=84121'),('84159','Trisyntopa scatophaga','Endangered','Insecta','Oecophoridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=84159'),('842','Limicola falcinellus','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Broad-billed Sandpiper is a small member of the  Calidridinae  family. It has a length of 16–18 cm, a wingspan of 34–37 cm and a weight of 40 g. It is a small, stint-like wader with short legs and a diagnostic long straight black bill that is flattened and kinked downwards at the tip. When viewed from above the bill appears broad with parallel sides, tapering sharply to a pointed tip. The wing tips project a short distance beyond the tail at rest. The species\' flight pattern is similiar to that of stints (Higgins & Davies 1996).','The Broad-billed Sandpiper occurs in sheltered parts of the coast, favouring estuarine mudflats but also occasionally occur on saltmarshes, shallow freshwater lagoons, saltworks and sewage farms, and in areas with large soft intertidal mudflats, which may have shell or sandbanks nearby. Occasionally they occur on reefs or rocky platforms. They have also been recorded in creeks, swamps and lakes near the coast, particularly those with bare mudflats or sand exposed by receding water. They often favour mud among, or fringed by, mangroves, particularly on the seaward side and sometimes occur in estuaries edged by saltmarsh. They are rarely recorded inland. Foraging occurs on exposed flats of soft mud or wet sand at edges of coastal and near-coastal wetlands, often around channels on mudflats or in accumulated mud in swales between shell banks. In northern Australia, they forage in soft mud near mangroves, but may remain on same muddy section, even though fresher substrate may be exposed by the receding tide. They also forage in shallow water on muddy edges of ponds. They roost on the banks of sheltered sandy, shelly or shingly beaches (Higgins & Davies 1996). They nest on the ground, frequently in the top of a tussock (Cramp 1985).','The Broad-billed Sandpiper is omnivorous, foraging on worms, including polychaetes, molluscs, crustaceans, insects, seeds and occasionally rootlets and other vegetation. They forage by walking quickly, sometimes running, gleaning from side to side. In Australia, they forage on wet mud and in shallow water, rapidly and repeatedly probing substrate with their bill, sometimes immersing the head completely. They also have been observed walking on floating material, and gleaning insects from the surface of the water (Cramp 1985; Higgins & Davies 1996).','Global ThreatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area (Barter 2005c).Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006). Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Broad-billed Sandpiper.Habitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation include (but are not restricted to): (1) loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflats; (2) invasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grass; (3) water pollution and changes to the water regime; (4) changes to the hydrological regime and (5) exposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site (DEWHA 2009aj).DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=842'),('84292','Ardenna pacifica','','Aves','Procellariidae','The Wedge-tailed Shearwater has a body length of 46–47 cm, and a wing span of 97–99 cm, brown eyes, lead grey bill, and flesh coloured feet with distinctive white toenails (Lindsey 1986; Onley & Scofield 2007). The species has two colour morphs:','The Wedge-tailed Shearwater is a pelagic, marine bird known from tropical and subtropical waters. The species tolerates a range of surface-temperatures and salinities, but is most abundant where temperatures are greater than 21 °C and salinity is greater than 34.6 %. In tropical zones the species may feed over cool nutrient-rich waters. The species has been recorded in offshore waters of eastern Victoria and southern NSW, mostly over continental slope with sea-surface temperatures of 13.9–24.4 °C (Drummond 1985; Reid et al. 2002) and usually off the continental shelf in north-west Australia (Collins & Jessop 1997; Marchant & Higgins 1990).The species was noted to decline in numbers off Christmas Island (Pacific Ocean) during an El Niño Southern Oscillation, when surface-temperatures were high and food supply poor (Smithers et al. 2003). A similar decline occurred at colonies on islands in the Great Barrier Reef where chick survival declined during warming sea surface temperatures (Smithers et al. 2003). In WA, an ongoing study of islands in the North West Shelf area show a correlation between El Niño conditions and a lower number of eggs laid (Dunlop et al. 2002).','In Australia, Wedge-tailed Shearwaters have been observed feeding along the junction between inshore and offshore water masses. In tropical waters, they mainly forage within the Equatorial Countercurrent, extending north and south into Equatorial Currents, and birds may be associated with current boundaries and associated upwellings (Drummond 1985; Reid et al. 2002).When foraging at sea the inverse is found, birds are often alone or in small groups. However they will congregate into large flocks that often include other seabird species around fishing boats or to attack large shoals of fish/shrimp swarms (Lindsey 1986).HuntingWhen feeding, Wedge-tailed Shearwaters fly less than ten metres above the surface of the ocean and dive to a depth of two to three metres. Birds often settle on the surface of the water, especially after feeding or before migration. In rough weather birds have been recorded to loaf in lees of islands and in harbours (Marchant & Higgins 1990).Food is taken by contact-dipping, dipping, surface-seizing and, rarely, deep-plunging. In one study, dipping consisted 78% of all feeding and pursuit-plunging 17% (n = 71). At the Seychelles, 83% of 23 birds researched dived to a mean maximum depth of 14 ± 23 m (range 1–66 m). This diving ability gives the Wedge-tailed Shearwaters access to additional, deeper prey inaccessible to most other tropical seabirds (Burger 2001).DietThere is no detailed analysis of the diet of Australian adult Wedge-tailed Shearwater\'s, however tropical residing Wedge-tailed Shearwater birds are known to mostly consume fish, some cephalopods, insects, jellyfish and prawns. In Australia, one study found chicks\' stomachs contained jellyfish, cephalopods and fish. Stomach-oil consisted of triglycerides and cholesterol (Marchant & Higgins 1990).On islands in north-west Hawaii, fish comprised 67.0% by volume of stomach contents sampled and 73.3% by number, cephalopods 28.6% and 23.1%, with very small proportion of crustaceans, insects and coelenterates. The mean length of all prey was 5.7 cm. Of the fish, a wide variety was taken, particularly species of Mullidae and  Decapterus macrosoma ; cephalopods were mostly  Symplecoteuthisn  spp. (Ommastrephidae) (Marchant & Higgins 1990).In tropical waters, Wedge-tailed Shearwater flocks have been recorded feeding on schooling fish with Sooty Terns ( Sterna fusca ), White Terns ( Gygis alba ), noddies ( Anous  spp.), boobies ( Sula  spp.), Spotted Dolphins ( Stenella attenuata ), Spinner Dolphins ( S. longirostris ), Common Dolphins ( Delphinus delphis ) and Rough-toothed Dolphin ( Steno bredanensis ). Large flocks have been observed feeding in association with tuna off WA (Marchant & Higgins 1990), and with turtles in the east Pacific (Pitman 1993).','The following table presents a threats summary for the Wedge-tailed Shearwater:ThreatRiskDetailsSourceHarvesting for human consumptionHistoricHarvesting for human consumption previously occurred on North Keeling Island and North West Island, Queensland.Stokes and colleagues (1984)Guano miningHistoricAt Freycinet Island, WA, hard ground and rubble left by guano mining in the 1900s last century made the area unsuitable for burrowing.Dyer and colleagues (1995)TramplingLowHigh density colonies on soft sand are at particular risk of burrow damage from trampling. Some colonies occur where cattle graze and these sites suffer from erosion.Marchant and Higgins (1990), WBM Oceanics and Claridge (1997)ConstructionLowRed Bluff, NSW, was partly destroyed by construction of drains. The colony at Slope Island, WA, declined after a salt-company began operations and nest sites and protective vegetation were destroyed.Marchant and Higgins (1990)WeedsLowInvasive vegetation, such as Lantana ( Lantana camara ) and Prickly Pear ( Opuntia stricta ) may restrict burrowing.Dyer (2000)Oil pollutionLowAs a deep, pursuit plunging diver, the Wedge-tailed Shearwater is at risk from oil pollution. Oil pollution has been blamed for the deaths of scores to hundreds of individuals near North West Island, in the Great Barrier Reef, Queensland.Dann and Jessop (1994), Walker (1994)Long-line fishingLowThe Wedge-tailed Shearwater is also moderately susceptible to being caught by long-line fishing operations.AGDEH (2006)PredationModerateVulnerable to Foxes ( Vulpes vulpes ), rats ( Rattus  spp.), feral Cats ( Felis catus ), lizards ( Varanus  spp.), snakes and gulls ( Larus  spp.). On Kermadec Island (New Zealand), cats and rats have caused a significant decline in the breeding population. At one site, construction of a causeway allowed predators to access breeding colonies.Marchant and Higgins (1990)ParasitesLowSeveral species of mites and ticks were found in shearwater burrows on Masthead Island, Queensland, but their effects on fecundity and survival are unknown.Shaw (1999)Climate changeLowClimate change may have an effect on the species through changes in sea temperatures which will alter food resources and subsequent ability of the species to reproduce. Smithers and collegues (2003) found that elevated sea surface temperatures in the southern Great Barrier Reef had a negative effect on Wedge-tailed Shearwater chick provisioning by adults. Dunlop and colleagues (2002) found that the El Niño Southern Oscillation delayed the breeding of WA colonies and effected their breeding success.On Montague Island, NSW, in a fifty year study of breeding in three shearwater species, the proportion of Wedge-tailed Shearwaters breeding has increased. It has been suggested that this trend indicates that sea surface temperature changes may be favouring this species (MIP 2010) and causing range fluctuations.Congdon and colleagues (2007), Dunlop and colleagues (2002), MIP (2010), Smithers and colleagues (2003)','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=84292'),('843','Limnodromus semipalmatus','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Asian Dowitcher is a large wader and member of the  Limnodrominae  family. The species has a length of 33–36 cm and a wingspan of 59 cm. Males weigh 180 g while females weigh 190 g. The species is distinctive, combining elements of both snipes and godwits. It is characterised by a long neck, long dark legs and a diagnostic long dark straight, snipe-line bill. It is slightly larger and bulkier than the Greenshank,  Tringa nebularia  and smaller and slimmer than the male Bar-tailed Godwit,  L. semipalmatus . There is a marked seasonal variation in plumages and juveniles are distinct from adults (Higgins & Davies 1996).','The Asian Dowitcher occurs in sheltered coastal Environments, such as embayments, coastal lagoons, estuaries and tidal creeks. They are known to frequent shallow water and exposed mudflats or sandflats. In Australia the Port Hedland Saltworks provides crucial habitat for the species. The species is commonly found in the round ponds and channels of saltworks and sewage farms. It is also found at near-coastal swamps and lakes (Higgins & Davies 1996).','There is only limited information on the diet of the Asian Dowitcher in Australia. It is known to eat polychaete worms and larvae, also insect larvae and molluscs. The species feeds on inter-tidal mudflats, this habitat is often vulnerable to pollution (e.g. oilspill, urban waste) and reclamation, especially in highly populated parts of range in Asia (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Global ThreatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area (Barter 2005c).Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006). Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Asian Dowitcher.Habitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation include (but are not restricted to): (1) loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflats; (2) invasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grass; (3) water pollution; (4) changes to the hydrological regime and (5) exposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site (DEWHA 2009aj).DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=843'),('844','Limosa lapponica','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Bar-tailed Godwit is a large wader and member of the Tringinae family. The bird has a length around 37–39 cm, a wingspan of 62–75 cm and a weight between 250–450 g. The bird has a long neck with a very long upturned bill. The bill is characterized by a dark tip and pinkish base. The Bar-tailed Godwit is slightly larger and stockier than the Black-tailed Godwit,  Limosa limosa , with a shorter neck and legs, steeper forehead, and a more upturned and pointed bill. All plumages have a uniform upper pattern, with a dark back and upper rump. It is distinguishable from other Godwits by the dark barring on the lower white rump, uppertail and lining of the underwing. The sexes differ, with females being larger with longer bills than males and a duller breeding plumage. Both sexes exhibit marked variation in plumages, with juveniles also having distinct plumages (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','Typical habitatThe Bar-tailed Godwit is found mainly in coastal habitats such as large intertidal sandflats, banks, mudflats, estuaries, inlets, harbours, coastal lagoons and bays. It is found often around beds of seagrass and, sometimes, in nearby saltmarsh. It has been sighted in coastal sewage farms and saltworks, saltlakes and brackish wetlands near coasts, sandy ocean beaches, rock platforms, and coral reef-flats. It is rarely found on inland wetlands or in areas of short grass, such as farmland, paddocks and airstrips, although it is commonly recorded in paddocks at some locations overseas (Marchant & Higgins 1993). Habitat for feedingThe Bar-tailed Godwit usually forages near the edge of water or in shallow water, mainly in tidal estuaries and harbours. They appear not to forage at high tide and prefer exposed sandy substrates on intertidal flats, banks and beaches. The also prefer soft mud; often with beds of eelgrass  Zostera  or other seagrasses. Occasionally they have been known to forage among mangroves, or on coral reefs or rock platforms among rubble, crevices and holes. They rarely forage in grassy or vegetated areas. On Heron Island they have been seen feeding on insect larvae among the roots of Casuarina (Marchant & Higgins 1993).Habitat for roostingThe Bar-tailed Godwit usually roosts on sandy beaches, sandbars, spits and also in near-coastal saltmarsh. In New Zealand, a few have been recorded roosting in wet grasslands and farmlands. They have been observed roosting at high tide on a claypan 2 km inland of Roebuck Bay, Western Australia (Collins et al. 2001). In some conditions, waders may choose roost sites where a damp substrate lowers the local temperature. In Moreton Bay, inspection of major roosts on opposite sides of the bay during northward migration revealed a marked difference in the proportion of birds in breeding plumage; also, a significantly higher number of moulting males (perhaps breeding adults) were found on islands, as opposed to mainland sites (Thompson 1990b).During periods of cyclonic activity waders moved to sheltered areas to avoid high winds and heavy rain, and only a few casualties (including one Bar-tailed Godwit) were observed (Jessop & Collins 2000).','Summary of food items or sourcesThe Bar-tailed Godwit is mainly carnivorous with a diet consisting of worms, molluscs, crustaceans, insects and some plant material. It has also been recorded eating fruits, fish and tadpoles. While it is in breeding grounds it eats mainly ground dwelling insects (Marchant & Higgins 1993). On the estuary of the Parramatta River, NSW, polychaetes represented at least 86.7% of their diet and were the only prey identified (Taylor et al. 1996). Feeding behavioursThe Bar-tailed Godwit generally feeds during the day, but sometimes by moonlight (Marchant & Higgins 1993). In Westernport Bay, Victoria, the stealing of food by Silver Gulls,  Larus novaehollandiae,  significantly reduces the feeding rate of Bar-tailed Godwits (Dann 1979). A survey on the estuary of the Parramatta River revealed the Bar-tailed Godwits lost between 0.1–1% of their prey to gulls (Taylor et al. 1996). Human disturbance can interrupt feeding and may restrict the area of feeding habitat available. Bar-tailed Godwits are known to take off when humans approached within 10–70 m (Taylor & Bester 1999). Sexual differences in the length of the bill lead to corresponding differences in diet and behaviour. At Moreton Bay, Queensland, males were predomiNAtly found in areas with seagrass cover (65%), while females were more common on sandy flats (83%). Seagrass supported about twice the density of Godwits, and it is not known why females used the apparently inferior habitat (sand) so extensively (Zharikov & Skilleter 2000). At the Parramatta estuary in NSW, females spent most of their time in water while males spent 50% of their time in the water, 30% on dry ridges and 20% in wet hollows. Both sexes fed entirely on polychaete worms, and females were domiNAt over males, possibly forcing them to feed in less profitable habitats. The prey capture rates of females feeding in water were 41% higher than those of males (Taylor et al. 1999). On Heron Island, on wet sand, males were found to be more successful feeders than females (Marchant & Higgins 1993). In Roebuck Bay, north-west Western Australia, the Godwits show a strong tendency to follow the tide edge with 80% of individuals mapped on receding tides being found in sea-edge flocks, with the longer-billed females tending to feed closer to the sea edge than males (Rogers 1999a). Bar-tailed Godwits were observed feeding on bivalves which had been exposed by a cyclone (Jessop & Collins 2000).','Global threats There are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area.Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006). Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007). Iwamura and colleagues (2013) found that rises in sea level could cause a dramatic collapse of population flow of this species caused by intertidal habitat loss. Taking into account upshore movements of intertidal habitat, their modelling indicates that this species population flow could reduce by 15% with a 150 cm sea level rise (Iwamura et al. 2013).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).Australia Within Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Bar-tailed Godwit.  Habitat loss The loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj). Habitat degradation As most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation include (but are not restricted to): (1) loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflats; (2) invasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grass; (3) water pollution and changes to the water regime; (4) changes to the hydrological regime and (5) exposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site (DEWHA 2009aj). Disturbance Disturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four-wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).  Direct mortality Direct mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=844'),('845','Limosa limosa','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Black-tailed Godwit is a large wader and member of the  Tringinae  family. The species has a length of 40–44 cm, a wingspan of 63–75 cm and a weight of 200–300 g. The species is described as being large and graceful with a rather small head, long neck, very long straight or slightly curved bill and very long legs. The species is slightly smaller than the Bar-tailed Godwit,  Limosa lapponica , with a straighter and slightly blunter bill, longer neck, shallower forehead, slimmer body and longer legs. Females have a slightly larger and longer bill, but a duller breeding plumage as compared to males. They occur singly or in small to large groups, numbering hundreds at favoured roosting sites. They associate with other waders; often at edges of flocks of other species of Godwit and, in New Zealand, sometimes with Black-winged Stilts,  Himantopus himantopus  (Higgins & Davies 1996). They feed in sea-edge flocks (Rogers 1999b).','Habitat overviewIn Australia the Black-tailed Godwit has a primarily coastal habitat environment. The species is commonly found in sheltered bays, estuaries and lagoons with large intertidal mudflats or sandflats, or spits and banks of mud, sand or shell-grit; occasionally recorded on rocky coasts or coral islets. The use of habitat often depends on the stage of the tide. It is also found in shallow and sparsely vegetated, near-coastal, wetlands; such as saltmarsh, saltflats, river pools, swamps, lagoons and floodplains. There are a few inland records, around shallow, freshwater and saline lakes, swamps, dams and bore-overflows. They also use lagoons in sewage farms and saltworks (Higgins & Davies 1996).Refuge habitatDuring a period of cyclonic activity waders (including this species) moved to sheltered areas to avoid high winds and heavy rain, and few casualties (none of this species) were observed (Jessop & Collins 2000).Habitat for feedingThe Black-tailed Godwit forages on wide intertidal mudflats or sandflats, in soft mud or shallow water and occasionally in shallow estuaries. They use similar habitats on shores of inland lakes and other wetlands. They are found in muddy areas often open and unvegetated, but commonly use drying marshy wetlands preferred by Pectoral Sandpipers,  Calidris melanotus , and Long-toed Stints,  C. subminuta , (Higgins & Davies 1996); sometimes they forage among mangroves. They roost and loaf on low banks of mud, sand or shell, bars, islets and beaches in sheltered areas; also on saltflats behind mangroves. They may occur in non-vegetated areas, or among low vegetation, such as samphire (Higgins & Davies 1996).Habitat for roostingThe claypan may be an important roost site for this species at least during the non-breeding season (Collins et al. 2001).','Summary of food items or sourcesThe Black-tailed Godwit is omnivorous. There is little information on feeding habits in the Australian and New Zealand region, however, records from observers provide some insight into the species dietary requirments. The species has been recorded eating annelids, crustaceans, arachnids, fish eggs and spawn and tadpoles of frogs, and occasionally seeds (Higgins & Davies 1996). In Portugal, the bivalve mollusc  Scrobicularia plana  represented 88% of ingested biomass and polychaetes the remaining 12% (Moreira 1994). In a rice-growing region of Senegal, Black-tailed Godwits apparently only ate plant material, mostly (83.7%) rice including during the period of weight gain prior to migration (Tréca 1994). Seeds and berries are thought to be especially important after breeding and on migration (Cramp & Simmonds 1983).The Black-tailed Godwit feeds in sea-edge flocks, and are often associated with Bar-tailed Godwits, but appear to be quite selective in feeding sites. It has been suggested that they prefer areas with certain bivalves, e.g. Siliqua and Tellina in Roebuck Bay (Rogers 1999b). The species is diurnal and nocturnal and locate food by touch and sight. They often wade up to the tarsus in water (Higgins & Davies 1996). Outside of Australia they may come into competition with farmers, e.g. in one region with 6000 ha of rice fields, they are estimated to take 3–6 tons of seed per day; cultivated rice is taken at planting time and during and after harvest (Tréca 1994).','Global threatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area.Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006).Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005c; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).Threats within AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Black-tailed Godwit.Habitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation (DEWHA 2009aj) include, but are not restricted to:loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflatsinvasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grasswater pollution and changes to the water regimechanges to the hydrological regimeexposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site.DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=845'),('84578','Uvidicolus sphyrurus','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Gekkonidae','The Border Thick-tailed Gecko is a pale fawn to brown reptile growing to 7 cm with faint, darker brown flecks, very small white spots scattered over the head, neck, back, sides and limbs and dark grey-brown/black tail with alternate dark and pale cross-bands formed by rows of large tubercles (Cogger 2000). The tail is fat and rectangular with a thin tapering tip and typically has four pale rings (NSW OEH 2013p).','The Border Thick-tailed Gecko is a nocturnal species that shelters by day (NSW OEH 2013p) and is most commonly found in undisturbed habitat remNAts on rocky outcrops and stony hills within eucalypt and cypress-pine open forest or woodland between 500-1100 m elevation (NSW SC 2010b). The species was formerly thought to be restricted to granitic substrates, but records from regenerating habitat on basalt and metasediment lower slopes and flats, i.e. more fertile and less rugged sites, suggest the gecko was once more widespread in vegetation types that have been cleared (Spark pers. comm. 2008 cited in NSW SC 2010b). Nevertheless, it often occurs on steep rocky or scree slopes, especially on granite (NSW OEH 2013p) and it may prefer sites with easterly aspects and the base of rock scarps (Spark pers. comm. 2001b).Sheltering occurs in well-shaded micro-sites amongst boulders, rock slabs, fallen timber (logs or debris), bark on standing trees and deep leaf litter (NSW OEH 2013p; Spark unpub. data cited in NSW SC 2010b). Rough-barked Apple ( Angophora floribunda ) logs may be moist drought refuge (NSW SC 2010b). Occupied sites often have a dense tree canopy that creates a sparse grass/herb ground cover and abundant litter (Spark unpub. data cited in NSW SC 2010b). The majority of occupied sites in extensive surveys had undergone mild fires 20-30 years ago (Spark pers. comm. 2001b).The distribution of this species overlaps with the White Box-Yellow Box-Blakely\'s Red Gum Grassy Woodland and Derived Native Grassland ecological community, which is listed as Critically Endangered under the  Environment Protection and Biodiversity Conservation Act 1999 .','The Border Thick-tailed Gecko is an insectivore, feeding primarily on insects and spiders (NSW SC 2010b).','The distribution of the Border Thick-tailed Gecko coincides with an area of high human impact (Czechura & Covacevich 1985). Most sites are on skeletal midslope and ridge habitats that are of low agricultural value, but the more fertile sites remain vulnerable to clearing (NSW SC 2010b). Threats to the species include (NSW OEH 2013p):Clearing and fragmentation of areas of rocky dry open forest and woodland for agriculture and development (NSW OEH 2013p).Removal of bushrock for gardens or the removal of fallen timber for firewood (NSW OEH 2013p).Too frequent burning of rocky dry open forest or woodland (NSW OEH 2013p).Grazing and trampling of habitat by domestic stock and feral goats (NSW OEH 2013p).Predation by foxes and feral cats (NSW OEH 2013p).Invasive exotic grasses, particularly dense stands of Coolatai Grass ( Hyparrhenia hirta ) (Spark in litt. 2009 cited in NSW SC 2010b).Disturbance of habitat during native forest logging operations (Cogger et al. 1993).Inundation by dam construction (Cogger et al. 1993).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=84578'),('84650','Pezoporus flaviventris','Critically Endangered','Aves','Psittacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=84650'),('847','Numenius madagascariensis','Critically Endangered','Aves','Scolopacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=847'),('84745','Galaxias rostratus','Critically Endangered','Actinopterygii','Galaxiidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=84745'),('84753','Phyllurus gulbaru','Critically Endangered','Reptilia','Gekkonidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=84753'),('848','Numenius minutus','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Little Curlew is the smallest curlew with an average length of 28–31 cm, wingspan of 68–71 cm and weight of 175 g (Birds Australia 2010; Higgins & Davies 1996).','Feeding habitatThe Little Curlew is most often found feeding in short, dry grassland and sedgeland, including dry floodplains and blacksoil plains, which have scattered, shallow freshwater pools or areas seasonally inundated. Open woodlands with a grassy or burnt understorey, dry saltmarshes, coastal swamps, mudflats or sandflats of estuaries or beaches on sheltered coasts, mown lawns, gardens, recreational areas, ovals, racecourses and verges of roads and airstrips are also used (Higgins & Davies 1996).Generally, foraging is in relatively short grass (around 20 cm tall) as the birds avoid dense tall grasses (Higgins & Davies 1996). Foraging sites are usually within 5 km of daytime roosting sites, as birds move between grassland and wetland, most feeding in drier grassland occurring during the first few hours after dawn and the late afternoon. The Little Curlew is known to fly up to 10 km for available water then return to feeding grounds; therefore the availability of drinking water is an important habitat requirement (Bamford et al. 2008; Barter et al. 1999; Higgins & Davies 1996; Minton 2002 pers. comm.). Habitat requirements in the Huang He (Yellow River) Nature Reserve are similar to those in Australia (Barter et al. 1999).General habitatWhen resting during the heat of day, the Little Curlew congregates around pools, river beds and water-filled tidal channels, and shallow water at edges of billabongs. The species prefers pools with bare dry mud (including mudbanks in shallow water) and they do not use pools if they are totally dry, flooded or heavily vegetated (Higgins & Davies 1996).Birds may also rest in grassy, open woodlands and on bare blacksoil plains, or on dry or recently burnt grasslands on floodplains, which may be without vegetation for hundreds of metres, and occasionally on mudflats when nearby grasslands are unburnt, or around swamps. Resting has also been recorded under partly submerged vegetation. After freshwater pools dry up, roosting may occur in the shallows of reservoirs and the sea (Higgins & Davies 1996).','The Little Curlew is omnivorous, mainly eating insects, but also seeds and berries (Higgins & Davies 1996). When drinking, they stand deep in the water placing their heads and open mouths right into the water taking large gulps, and sometimes do this continuously for several minutes (Minton 2002 pers. comm.).','Habitat lossThe greatest threat facing waders in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway is global habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas (mudflats) used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by reclamation for development (Barter 2002, 2005b, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Moores 2006; Rogers et al. 2006; Round 2006). In many suitable staging areas along the East Asia Flyway many intertidal areas have been reclaimed, and in the mid 2000s the process was continuing with the potential to accelerate in the future (Barter 2002, 2005b, 2005c).This Little Curlew may be more vulnerable to reclamation activities than most other waders, due to the very specific species and size classes of shellfish that they eat (Minton 2002 pers. comm.).Other human intervention issuesIntensive oil exploration, water regulation (globally and in Australia) and diversion infrastructure in major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows into mudflats, which compounds the problem of habitat loss (Barter 2002, 2005b; Barter et al. 1998; Melville 1997). Threats associated with construction, recreation activities, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture are likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter 2005b; Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993; Rogers 2001).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, such as organochlorines or heavy metals discharged into the sea from industrial or urban sources, and from agricultural pesticides (Barter 2005b; Blomqvist et al. 1987; Del Hoyo et al.1996; Harding et al. 2007; Huettmann & Gerasimov 2006; Melville 1997; Schick et al. 1987).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and the Little Curlew is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).Climate changeGlobal warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997).Weeds and predatorsImportant migratory stop-over sites for this species in northern Australia are also being degraded through colonisation by invasive plants, such as Mimosa ( Mimosa pigra ), Hymenachne ( Hymenachne amplexicaulis ) and Para Grass ( Brachiaria mutica ) (Minton 2002 pers. comm.) .Damage from the Feral Pig ( Sus scrofa ) and Buffalo ( Bubalus bubalis ) are also potential threats to habitat (Bellio et al. 2006 cited in Birdlife International 2010), whilst the Red Foxes ( Vulpes vulpes ) and possibly the Dog ( Canis familiaris ) are also a threat to the Little Curlew whilst feeding and roosting (Minton 2002 pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=848'),('849','Numenius phaeopus','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Whimbrel is a medium sized curlew, with a length of around 40–45 cm, weight of approximately 350 g and wingspan of 76–89 cm (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Typical habitatThe Whimbrel is often found on the intertidal mudflats of sheltered coasts. It is also found in harbours, lagoons, estuaries and river deltas, often those with mangroves, but also open, unvegetated mudflats. It is occasionally found on sandy or rocky beaches, on coral or rocky islets, or on intertidal reefs and platforms. It has been infrequently recorded using saline or brackish lakes near coastal areas. It also used saltflats with saltmarsh, or saline grasslands with standing water left after high spring-tides, and in similar habitats in sewage farms and saltfields (Higgins & Davies 1996). There are a small number of inland records from saline lakes and canegrass swamps (Jarman 1978). It has also been recorded in coastal dunes and on a football field (Smith & Chafer 1987). Habitat for feedingThe Whimbrel generally forages on intertidal mudflats, along the muddy banks of estuaries and in coastal lagoons, either in open unvegetated areas or among mangroves. They sometimes forage on sandy beaches or among rocks. It has occasionally been sighted feeding on exposed coral or rocky reefs and rock platforms. It is known to probe holes and crevices among rubble and on reef flats, but not on reef crests (Higgins & Davies 1996). It was once recorded feeding on a grassy football field (Smith & Chafer 1987). At Rhyll Inlet, Victoria, the birds preferred mudflats with a 10–50% cover of Zostera; followed by areas of sand, mud bare mudflats, and rock platforms (Dann 1993).Habitat for roostingThe Whimbrel is one of a small group of shorebird species that regularly roost in mangroves and other structures flooded at high tide. They often roost in the branches of mangroves around mudflats and in estuaries and occasionally in tall coastal trees. They have also been observed to roost on the ground (sometimes under mangroves or in shallow water), on muddy, sandy or rocky beaches; rocky islets and coral cays (Higgins & Davies 1996). They were once recorded perched on upright stakes attached to oyster racks (Forest 1982). On Rottnest Island, they have been seen perched on cliff-tops at high tide (Storr 1964). Whimbrels were also recorded roosting at high tide on a claypan 2 km inland of Roebuck Bay, Western Australia (Collins et al. 2001). In some conditions, waders may choose roost sites where a damp substrate lowers the local temperature. This may have important conservation implications where these sites are heavily disturbed beaches (Rogers 1999b).Habitat needed for refugeDuring a period of cyclonic activity waders moved to sheltered areas to avoid high winds and heavy rain, and few casualties were observed (Jessop & Collins 2000).','Summary of food itemsIn non-breeding areas the Whimbrel is mainly carnivorous, taking annelids, crustaceans (including crabs and shrimps), and, rarely, vertebrates (e.g. small fish, Little Tern,  Sterna albifrons , nestlings). Outside Australia, it is also known to take berries, molluscs, arachnids, insects and reptiles (Higgins & Davies 1996). In Roebuck Bay, Western Australia, Whimbrels feed mainly on large crabs, but might also eat mantis shrimps and mudskippers (Rogers 1999a). Feeding behaviours that may make the species vulnerableThe Whimbrel is diurnal and nocturnal and uses both visual and non-visual cues to locate prey (Higgins & Davies 1996). Due to its choice of prey and relatively small size, the Whimbrel is subject to high levels of kleptoparasitism by Gull-billed Terns in Roebuck Bay (Rogers 1999a). Grey Plovers ( Pluvialis squatarola ) have also been recorded stealing food from Whimbrels (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Global threatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area.Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006). Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Whimbrel.Habitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialised feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation include (but are not restricted to): (1) loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflats; (2) invasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grass; (3) water pollution and changes to the water regime; (4) changes to the hydrological regime and (5) exposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site (DEWHA 2009aj).DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=849'),('84994','Manta alfredi','','Chondrichthyes','Mobulidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=84994'),('84995','Manta birostris','','Chondrichthyes','Mobulidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=84995'),('850','Philomachus pugnax','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Ruff is a medium sized wader and member of the  Calidridinae  family. Males have a length of 26–32 cm while females are 20–25 cm long, males weigh 180 g while females weigh 110 g. The species has a small head with a low sloping forehead, enhancing its drawn out facial appearance. It has a long neck, bulky deep-bellied body which is often hunched back. The legs are short to medium in length, the bill is slightly decurved. At rest the folded primaries are level with the tip of the tail. The males of the species are close in size to the Common Greenshank,  Tringa nebularia , while the females (referred to as Reeve(s)) are similiar to the Ruddy Turnstone,  Arenaria intepres . There is a marked seasonal variation in plumages, with the juveniles being distinctive and the immatures separable (Higgins & Davies 1996).','In Australia the Ruff is found on generally fresh, brackish of saline wetlands with exposed mudflats at the edges. It is found in terrestrial wetlands including lakes, swamps, pools, lagoons, tidal rivers, swampy fields and floodlands. They are occasionally seen on sheltered coasts, in harbours, estuaries, seashores and are known to visit sewage farms and saltworks. They are sometimes found on wetlands surrounded by dense vegetation including grass, sedges, saltmarsh and reeds. They have been observed on sand spits and other sandy habitats including shingles. The Ruff forages on exposed mudflats, in shallow water and occasionally on dry mud. They have been observed foraging in dry waterside plants and in swampy areas next to aeration tanks in sewage farms. They prefer to roost amongst shorter vegetation (Higgins & Davies 1996).','The Ruff is insectivorous throughout the breeding grounds, however, it is omnivorous elsewhere. It is diurnal and nocturnal.  The species uses its bill to probe and peck in water, dry land and among dead vegetation at the edge of the water. It is sometimes known to crane its neck to glean items above its bead. There is no specific information on the Ruff in Australia, however it is believed to feed on moss, plant fibre, seeds, annelids, molluscs, crustaceans, spiders, insects, fish and amphibians (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Global ThreatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area (Barter 2005c).Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006). Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Ruff.Habitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation include (but are not restricted to): (1) loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflats; (2) invasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grass; (3) water pollution; (4) changes to the hydrological regime and (5) exposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site (DEWHA 2009aj).DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=850'),('851','Tringa brevipes','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Grey-tailed Tattler is a medium sized wader and member of the Tringinae family. It has a length of 25 cm, wingspan of 51 cm and an average weight of 125 g. Compared to other waders is has rather long wings and tail. It has a medium length straight bill and short yellow legs. It is very similar to the Wandering Tattler, however it can be distinguished by its shorter wings and slightly smaller build. In all plumages, the Grey-tailed Tattler is plain grey above with a white supercilium and a dark loral stripe. It has slate-grey under wings and yellow legs. There is a marked seasonal variation between breeding and non-breeding adults, the sexes are alike and juveniles are separable from adults (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Typical habitatThe Grey-tailed Tattler is often found on sheltered coasts with reefs and rock platforms or with intertidal mudflats. It can also be found at intertidal rocky, coral or stony reefs as well as platforms and islets that are exposed at low tide. It has been found around shores of rock, shingle, gravel or shells and also on intertidal mudflats in embayments, estuaries and coastal lagoons, especially fringed with mangroves. In Moreton Bay, Queensland, it is most abundant in areas with dense beds of seagrass. In Tasmania it is also abundant in areas with seagrass beds. It is less often on open flat sandy beaches or sandbanks, especially around accumulated seaweed or isolated clumps of dead coral. It is occasionally found around near-coastal wetlands, such as lagoons and lakes and ponds in sewage farms and saltworks. Inland records for the species are rare with sightings on river banks and the edges of rock pools (Higgins & Davies 1996).Habitat for feedingThe Grey-tailed Tattler usually forages in shallow water, on hard intertidal substrates, such as reefs and rock platforms, in rock pools and among rocks and coral rubble, over which water may surge. It has also been recorded foraging on exposed intertidal mudflats, especially with mangroves and possibly seagrass nearby. Occasionally it forages on intertidal sandflats, around banks of seaweed or protruding rocks or lumps of coral (Higgins & Davies 1996).Habitat for roosting and breedingThe Grey-tailed Tattler usually roosts in the branches of mangroves or, rarely, in dense stands of other shrubs, or on snags or driftwood. Where mangroves are not present, it roosts on rocks that are sometimes partly submerged. It is also known to roost on beaches and reefs; however, it is rarely reported roosting on bare sandy beaches or sandbanks. It occasionally roosts among beds of  Samolus . Sightings also indicate it roosts on sand-dunes. It often perches on artificial structures. It is occasionally found in near-coastal saltworks and sewage ponds and once recorded at a bore-drain. It may roost on or feed among oyster-racks and other artificial structures, such as seawalls, rocky causeways and boats (Higgins & Davies 1996; Rogers 1999b). It breeds in montane taiga and the forest tundra of northern Siberia, along rivers and streams and on the stone or pebble shorelines of lakes (del Hoyo et al. 1996).','Summary of food itemsThe diet of the Grey-tailed Tattler consists primarily of; Polychaetes, molluscs, crustaceans, insects and, occasionally, fish. It is believed that crabs are possibly a more important food source before migration. Crustaceans eaten include amphipods, isopods and crabs (Higgins & Davies 1996). In Roebuck Bay, the preferred prey is probably soft-bodied arthropods more than 5 mm long and crabs less than 16 mm long (Rogers 1999b).Feeding behaviorsThe species is diurnal, meaning it roosts at night. They locate prey by sight or by probing rocky shores, reef crests, areas of reef rubble, and along the edge of water at beaches and mudflats. They have been seen chasing and catching small fish in rock pools, and sometimes take prey ashore (Higgins & Davies 1996). They are noted for being clumsy in attempts to handle small prey (Rogers 1999b).','Global threats There are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area. Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998). Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006). Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993). It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998). Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007). Iwamura and colleagues (2013) found that rises in sea level could cause a dramatic collapse of population flow of this species caused by intertidal habitat loss. Taking into account upshore movements of intertidal habitat, their modelling indicates that this species population flow could reduce by 15% with a 150 cm sea level rise (Iwamura et al. 2013). Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).  Australia Within Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Grey-tailed Tattler.  Habitat loss The loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj). Habitat degradation As most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation include (but are not restricted to): (1) loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflats; (2) invasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grass; (3) water pollution and changes to the water regime; (4) changes to the hydrological regime and (5) exposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site (DEWHA 2009aj). Disturbance Disturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).  Direct mortality Direct mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=851'),('85104','Phascolarctos cinereus (combined populations of Qld, NSW and the ACT)','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Phascolarctidae','The Koala is a (mainly) arboreal, medium-sized marsupial with a stocky body, large rounded ears, sharp claws and predomiNAtly grey-coloured fur. The species displays sexual dimorphism (males generally are larger than females). There is also a general gradient in body weight from north to south across the biolog range, with larger individuals occurring in the south and smaller individuals occurring in the north (the average weight of males is 6.5 kg in Queensland, compared with 12 kg in Victoria). In the north of the biological species\' range, the Koala tends to have shorter, silver-grey fur, whereas in the south it has longer, thicker, brown-grey fur (Martin & Handasyde 1999).','Koalas naturally inhabit a range of temperate, sub-tropical and tropical forest, woodland and semi-arid communities dominated by  Eucalyptus  species (Martin & Handasyde 1999).Koala habitat can be broadly defined as any forest or woodland containing species that are known koala food trees, or shrubland with emergent food trees. The distribution of this habitat is largely influenced by land elevation , annual temperature and rainfall patterns, soil types and the resultant soil moisture availability and fertility. Preferred food and shelter trees are naturally abundant on fertile clay soils.Along the Great Dividing Range and the coastal belt throughout the species\' range, Koalas inhabit moist forests and woodlands mostly dominated by  Eucalyptus  species. In coastal lowlands in Queensland and NSW, Koalas are also found in vegetation communities dominated by  Melaleuca  or  Casuarina  species (TSSC 2012p).On the western slopes, tablelands and plains in Queensland and NSW Koalas are found in sub-humid  Eucalyptus -dominated forests and woodlands in riparian and non-riparian environments, and some  Acacia -dominated forests and woodlands in non-riparian environments (Melzer et al. 2000).In the dry, subtropical to semi-arid environments in the western parts of the species’ range, Koalas inhabit  Eucalyptus -dominated forests and woodlands, particularly in the vicinity of riparian environments, and  Acacia -dominated forests, woodlands and shrublands (Melzer et al. 2000; NSW DECC 2008; Sullivan et al. 2003a).Koalas are also known to occur in modified or regenerating native vegetation communities, as well as urban and rural landscapes where food trees or shelter trees may be highly scattered. Importance of shelter trees There is a growing body of evidence that identifies the importance of shelter (non-food) trees to koalas. Crowther and colleagues (2013) expand on this and suggest that shelter trees are equally important as food trees and should be weighted as such when assessing habitat suitability. Shelter trees play an essential role in thermoregulation and are likely to be selected based on height, canopy cover and elevation (i.e. trees occuring in gullies are preferable) (Crowther et al. 2013). The difficulty in regards to shelter trees is that, unlike food trees, there is no identified sub-set of forest and woodland trees known to be shelter trees. The use of a particular tree species, or individual trees within a species is highly contextual and variable (Crowther et al. 2013).','The Koala is a leaf-eating specialist that feeds primarily during dawn, dusk or night (Crowther et al. 2013). Its diet is restricted mainly to foliage of  Eucalyptus  spp; however, it may also consume foliage of related genera, including  Corymbia  spp. , Angophora  spp. and  Lophostemon  spp. The Koala may, at times, supplement its diet with other species, including  Leptospermum  spp. and  Melaleuca  spp. (Martin & Handasyde 1999; Moore & Foley 2000). While Koalas have been observed sitting in or eating up to 120 species of eucalypt (Phillips 1990), the diet of individual Koalas is usually limited to obtaining most of their nutrition from one or a few species present at a site (Moore & Foley 2000). Species-level preferences may also vary between regions or seasons (Moore & Foley 2000). Consequently, assessment of habitat quality for Koalas is usually based on the identification of local preferences for species and quantification of the availability of those species (Phillips & Callaghan 2000; Phillips et al. 2000).Koalas show strong preferences between individual trees within species (Hindell et al. 1985; Martin 1985a). Experiments show that the chemical anti-feedants may limit or prevent Koalas feeding on foliage of individual trees even when the species is considered preferred (Lawler et al. 1998; Moore et al. 2005). This variability creates a nutritional patchiness such that species-based assessments of habitat likely result in overestimates of the availability of high quality habitat and food trees (Moore & Foley 2005; Moore et al. 2005).Leaf chemistry, and thus feeding choices, are influenced by elevation and temperature (Moore et al. 2004), water content in semi-arid areas (Munks et al. 1996) and soil nutrients (Moore & Foley 2000). Soil nutrients, and their influence on leaf nutrients, may be particularly important. Koalas are able to maintain positive nitrogen balance at a foliage nitrogen concentration of slightly above 1% (Cork 1986).Where groups of Koalas reach high densities, they may affect the composition of the  Eucalyptus -dominated vegetation community, through preferential herbivory. This is apparent in some areas of Victoria and SA where Koalas have been introduced and become overabundant, causing the deaths of preferred food trees (Menkhorst 2004, 2008). Koalas may impose selective pressure on favoured  Eucalyptus  species, causing evolutionary divergences among related sympatric species (Moore et. al. 2005).','The main threats to the Koala are ongoing habitat loss and habitat fragmentation, vehicle strike and predation by the domestic or feral Dogs ( Canis lupus familiaris ). Drought and incidences of extreme heat are also known to cause very significant mortality, and post-drought recovery may be substantially impaired by the range of other threatening factors (TSSC 2012o).Habitat loss and fragmentationLand clearing has been a significant cause of Koala mortality (Cogger et al. 2003). Local extinctions of Koala sub-populations have occurred in the past and have highlighted the need for recognition of Koala sub-population structure, and the need for facilitating movements of individuals between smaller areas (Lunney et al. 2002).Logging has often resulted in the loss of Koala habitat, however the effect on local Koala numbers is a function of the management regime. For example, while clear-felling will completely remove habitat, Koalas may persist in selectively-logged forests (Kavanagh et al. 1995, 2007). Thus, the level of threat posed by logging is specific to the situation, and is determined by the management regime and adherence to its prescriptions. Koalas have also been recorded to have established home ranges within revegetated Eucalyptus-dominated woodlands and eucalypt monoculture plantations (TSSC 2012p).Sherwin and colleagues (2000) noted that the loss of all sub-populations in any one part of the species\' range would certainly diminish the genetic variation and could reduce the species\' long-term adaptability to environmental change. They also noted that no studies had enough detail to allow mapping of the boundaries between management units (Sherwin  et al. 2000). Additional studies have since been undertaken which have examined genetic variability at smaller scales. Koalas on the Koala Coast (the 375 km 2  area of the south-eastern Brisbane Metropolitan Area) have been shown through the analysis of mitchondrial DNA to be distinct from Koalas in adjacent regions and should be considered a distinct management unit (Lee et al. 2009). This differentiation was interpreted to be recent: as a function of isolation due to barriers to dispersal imposed by major roads and urban development. The Koala Coast group contained few alleles (variations of genes) that were not present in adjacent mainland groups, however, the remainder of the mainland Koalas had many alleles that were not present in the the Koala Coast group (Lee et al. 2009). In the same study, distinct sub-population clusters were identified around Lismore in north-east NSW (Lee 2010), which are likely to be indicative of colonisation of the area by Koalas from the north.Similar research has been conducted in other areas of NSW, but is still in the preliminary stages (Lee 2010 pers. comm. cited in TSSC 2012p). In western Sydney, three Koala groups with very limited gene flow between them have been identified (Lee et al. 2010). There are also some indications, based on the analysis of mitchondrial DNA, that Koalas on the south coast of NSW are distinct from those in the Sydney region (TSSC 2012p).The impact of habitat fragmentation and isolation is also influenced by the relative hostility of the intervening habitat matrix. Urban environments, with higher densities of roads and dogs exacerbate the effect, while in rural settings, greater isolation has relatively less impact (Gordon et al. 2006; McAlpine et al. 2006a, 2006b; White 1999). For a given amount of habitat available, a landscape of more numerous, smaller patches is less likely to be occupied than one of fewer, larger patches (McAlpine et al. 2006a, 2006b).Urban expansion continues to threaten Koalas, particularly in coastal regions. A study on the fragmented sub-population at Port Stephens suggests that even relatively large groups (up to 800 individuals) may be vulnerable to extinction and that this vulnerability will be increased with further fragmentation (Lunney et al. 2007). It is, therefore, expected that the number of Koalas on the NSW coast will continue to decline (Lunney et al. 2007, 2009).Phillips and colleagues (2007) estimated that approved urban development in the Coomera-Pimpama Koala Habitat Area on the Gold Coast would see over a third of the resident Koala population lost. Vegetation clearing, including Koala habitat, is well underway. Anticipated further development will see additional losses, while an escalation of associated threats, for example cars and dogs, will invariably lead to a further decline in the number of Koalas in the area (Phillips et al. 2007). Phillips and colleagues (2007) determined that, in the absence of an assertive management response, the group of Koalas in the area would become unviable once incidental mortality arising from the associated threats exceeded 6% of total population size (Phillips et al. 2007).The effects of habitat loss and fragmentation may be greater than is indicated simply by estimating the proportion of land cleared. Land clearing is focussed disproportionately on flatter, more fertile areas, which constitute high-quality habitat for Koalas, so that what remains is often the poorer quality habitat on steep terrain and/or poorer soils (McAlpine et al. 2006a, 2006b). Even if land clearing were to discontinue, there is likely to be an ongoing “extinction debt” (Tilman et al. 1994) to be paid, as extinction processes continue to operate on habitat patches that are now too isolated or small to support viable populations (Cogger et al. 2003; McAlpine et al. 2006a, 2007). Habitat fragmentation may also impede post-drought recovery of inland Koalas (TSSC 2012p).Mortality due to dog attacks and vehicle strikesDog attacks and vehicle strikes are two threats to Koalas that are closely associated with urban expansion, with exposure to both threats increasing as land adjacent to Koala habitat is developed and occupied. However, while these threats are most intense in the urban and peri-urban environment, both may also be threats in rural areas (Crowther et al. 2010; Senate Environment and Communications References Committee 2011).A prime example of how dog attacks and vehicle strikes cause significant declines of Koala numbers is the 64% decline of Koala numbers on the Koala Coast in south-east Queensland between 1999 and 2009 (Dique et al. 2004; QLD DERM 2009c). Between 1997 and May 2011 in south-east Queensland, at least 1144 Koalas were killed by dogs and 4055 were killed by cars (QLD DERM 2011c). An additional 5757 deaths were attributed to a combination of cars, dogs and/or disease. While it is not possible to ascribe each of these deaths to a particular area or group of Koalas, the substantial declines noted above for the Koala Coast and Pine Rivers Koala groups suggest that such mortality rates are unsustainable (QLD DERM 2011c).Dique and colleagues (2003c) formally assessed the Koala mortality rate due to vehicle strikes on the Koala Coast. At a time when the Koala population was estimated at approximately 6250 (Dique et al. 2004), Koala mortality due to vehicle strike averaged 281 individuals per year. This equated to an annual mortality rate of approximately 5% due to vehicle strike (note that this is not necessarily the rate of population decline as it does not include other causes of mortality nor births or migration).This isolated sub-population fragment is considered to be approaching functional extinction (QLD DERM 2009c).From 2001 to 2008, urban Koala numbers in the Pine Rivers District, north of the Koala Coast, declined by 45% and by 15% in bushland areas (GHD 2008) as a result of habitat loss and the associated dog attacks and vehicle strikes. This equated to an overall decline of 40% (Dique et al. 2003a). It is also likely that the drought between 2001 and 2007 has had an impact on populations in south-east Queensland (McDonnell 2010).DiseaseUntil recently, the most well-known disease present in the Koala population is associated with particular strains of  Chlamydia  (NRMMC 2010). Many Koalas carry  Chlamydia , but do not always show clinical symptoms (known as chlamydiosis). The symptoms include eye, urinary tract, respiratory tract and reproductive tract infections, and the latter can lead to infertility in female Koalas (NRMMC 2010). There is circumstantial evidence that chlamydiosis might increase in response to environmental stresses such as overcrowding and poor nutrition (Melzer et al. 2000), although the epidemiology of chlamydiosis is not well understood.Reduced female fertility caused by  Chlamydia  infection may limit the reproductive potential of Koala populations (NSW DECC 2008). Chlamydiosis may contribute to local declines or extinctions in small, isolated Koala sub-population fragments, where recruitment rates between Koala groups are low and mortalities from other threats are high (NSW DECC 2008). However, through reducing female fertility, chlamydiosis may also prevent some Koala sub-populations from reaching very high densities and over-browsing their food trees (NSW DECC 2008). The SA and French Island (Victoria) populations are thought to be  Chlamydia -free, but the disease is present throughout the remainder of the species’ range (Martin & Handasyde 1999). Recent research has shown that up to half of the Koalas in South-east Queensland have detectible reproductive disease likely to result in infertility (Hanger & Loader 2009). Hanger and Loader (2009) also caution that the ultrasound method used to detect the disease likely underestimates its prevalence.Another recently discovered disease may have significant implications for Koala conservation. Koala Retrovirus (KoRV) was recently identified and is thought to be responsible for a range of conditions, including leukaemia (Tarlinton et al. 2005) and an immunodeficiency syndrome. Up to 100% of Koalas in Queensland and NSW have KoRV, but the proportions are lower in southern populations (Hanger & Loader 2009; Lee 2010; Tarlinton et al. 2006) which, until recently, showed none of the associated conditions (Bodley cited in Hanger & Loader 2009). There is some evidence that chlamydiosis may be exacerbated by KoRV (Tarlinton et al. 2005).Koala Retrovirus has \'endogenised\' in Koalas (Tarlinton et al. 2006) in Queensland and NSW. That is, it has infected germ line cells (spermatozoa or oocytes) and is transmitted genetically (by inheritance) from parents to offspring. Although this is a known mechanism of transmission, KoRV may also spread from Koala to Koala (horizontal spread) by close contact, and from infected mothers to their joeys via the milk, in a manner similar to the way that many other retroviruses spread (Hanger 1999). Whether KoRV can be transmitted by biting-insects has yet to be determined.The effects of disease on Koala populations are of growing concern (Hanger & Loader 2009; Lunney et al. 2002; Queensland Government 2009), particularly in south-east Queensland and northern NSW. The Moggill Koala Hospital in south-east Queensland reported 3134 deaths attributable to disease in the years 1997-2009, with an additional 4538 due to a combination of cars, dogs and disease (QLD DERM 2011c). Due to a change in the method of recording the data where the main cause of mortality may, in the past, have been recorded as disease,  cases of disease are increasingly being attributed to the “combination” category. Consequently, there is a strong negative correlation between the number of deaths attributed to disease and those attributed to “combination”. Thus, disease, as a primary cause of death, has apparently declined from over 30% to approximately 20% of overall mortality. However, this category alone is equivalent to the mortality due to vehicles (described above) and, when the combined category is added, they have been consistently around 60% of the causes of mortality of Koalas in south-east Queensland over 10 years. Indeed, 60% of mortality in the recent Koala Coast declines was attributed to disease (QLD DERM 2009c). The mortality data reported by Koala care groups support the observation that disease is a significant contributor to overall mortality: Hunter Koala Protection Society (mean 16%, range 6-47%); Friends of the Koala (41% 2009); Coffs Harbour City Council (30% 1999-2002, 15% 2003-2006); Currumbin Wildlife Hospital (46% 2000-2009); and Native Animal Trust Fund (20% 2009).Climate change and droughtClimate change is a potential threat to the Koala, as it is expected to lead to increased frequency of high temperatures, changes to rainfall, increasing frequency and intensity of droughts, and increased fire risk over much of the Koala’s range (NRMMC 2010). Increased temperatures inland are expected to cause the Koala’s range to contract eastward (Adams-Hosking 2011; Adams-Hosking et al. 2011; Dunlop & Brown 2008; Queensland Office of Climate Change 2008; Steffen et al. 2009). This effect would be compounded by extended drought that may be expected under climate change scenarios (Queensland Office of Climate Change 2008). In Victoria, more hot days, increased risk of intense fire and more droughts are expected (Victorian DSE 2009r). Adams-Hosking (2009) estimated, using bioclimatic modelling, that the Koala’s range, and particularly its core (10–90%) range, would contract by 20–30% by 2030, leaving bioregions such the Mulga Lands, Mitchell Grass Downs and Einasleigh Uplands uninhabitable by Koalas (Adams-Hosking 2011).In the west and north of their range, in Queensland, the distribution of Koalas is determined by heat in combination with water availability (Munks et al. 1996; Sullivan et al. 2003b). This is reflected in a tendency to find the highest densities of Koalas along creek lines. Anecdotal evidence suggests that the distribution of Koalas in south-western Queensland contracted eastwards in response to drought in the 1920s (Sullivan et al. 2003b). Sullivan and colleagues (2003b) also noted that Koalas were at higher densities in the north and central portions of their study area than in the south and west, consistent with rainfall patterns. In Mungalalla Creek, in the Mulga Lands bioregion, a Koala population crashed by at least 63% in the summer of 1979–80 in response to a continued drought (Gordon et al. 1988). Gordon and colleagues (1988) suggested that the regional persistence of Koalas may rely on the protection of ‘survival’ habitats around permanent water holes, from which Koalas may disperse into other habitats as conditions allow. The length of the drought may also have significant implications for the capacity of a population to recover.Under climate change projections, there is expected to be a general eastwards shift in the edge of the distribution of Koalas (Adams-Hosking et al. 2011). Discussion at the 2009 National Koala Abundance Workshop noted that this situation is complicated by hydrological changes that do not necessarily follow this directional trend. It is expected that, if recovery occurs, it will include a phase shift in riparian communities, with  Eucalyptus camaldulensis  replacing  E. tereticornis .  Eucalyptus camaldulensis  is more drought tolerant, but grows at lower densities so that, if there is a post-drought recovery, Koala populations may be expected to re-establish but stabilise at a lower density, as illustrated by the Mungalalla Creek population following a drought-induced population crash in the 1980s (Gordon et al. 1988).The Mulga Lands bioregion in south-west Queensland was estimated in 1995 to have 59 500 Koalas, occupying riparian habitats but also extending out at lower densities into expansive surrounding habitats (Sullivan et al. 2003a, 2003b, 2004). A severe decline in the number of Koalas is indicated as a result of the 2002/2003 drought (Seabrook et al. 2011). Using the same methods as Sullivan and colleagues (2004), Seabrook andf colleague\'s (2010) estimate of 11 600 Koalas in 2009 indicated a substantial decline from Sullivan and colleague\'s 1995 estimate. As noted above, Adams-Hosking (2011) suggests the bioregion may not be able to support Koalas by 2030.Drought may also be a significant factor in the decline in Koalas in coastal South-east Queensland (McDonnell 2010), where the substantial decline has largely been attributed to habitat fragmentation, vehicle strike and predation by dogs. McDonnell (2010) notes that many of the secure habitats, where Koalas had declined in the 2008 survey (Queensland DERM 2009b), are on drier sites. He also suggests that drought-related stress may have made Koalas more susceptible to disease. McDonnell (2010) also suggests that if drought was a significant factor in that decline, there should be observable signs of recovery via higher fecundity rates after the end of the drought. These data are not yet available. Nevertheless, other sources of mortality as described above remain severe, particularly with the population size much diminished (TSSC 2012p).Not all nitrogen (an essential element contained in proteins) in eucalypt foliage is available to Koalas (Cork et al. 1983). When eucalypts are grown under elevated CO 2 , the ratios of carbon to nitrogen in the foliage increase such that concentrations of carbon-based anti-herbivore compounds (such as tannins) increase while nitrogen  decreases (Lawler et al. 1997). It has recently been shown that tannins reduce the availability of nitrogen for digestion by eucalypt folivores, and that subtle differences in the balance between tannins and proteins may have profound effects on the ability of Koalas to utlilise their preferred food tree species in any given habitat. Therefore, Koala demography is likely to be negatively impacted by the changes in leaf chemistry induced by elevated CO 2  in the atmosphere due to CO 2  emissions (DeGabriel et al. 2009). It is not yet possible to assess forest nutritional quality over much of the Koala’s range, and thus to quantify the effect described above.Other threatsAdditional potential threats to Koala habitat include Bell Miner Associated Dieback (BMAD) and myrtle rust. BMAD occurs patchily from south-east Queensland to Victoria but the area of greatest concern is north-east NSW. It is recognised as a Key Threatening Process (KTP) by the NSW government. BMAD affects wet and dry sclerophyll forest communities often dominated by eucalypts. The KTP determination cites the Koala as occurring in forests damaged by BMAD in NSW. Myrtle rust is a recently arrived fungal pest of plants of the family Myrtaceae, including eucalypts. It is now found extensively across eastern NSW and Queensland and has infected over 90 plant species. A small number of Koala food tree species have been infected but these infections have been minor to date such that myrtle rust does not appear to be a current threat to Koala habitat (TSSC 2012p).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=85104'),('85267','Sphyrna lewini','Conservation Dependent','Chondrichthyes','Sphyrnidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=85267'),('85268','Pommerhelix duralensis','Endangered','Gastropoda','Camaenidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=85268'),('85279','Pseudocharopa ledgbirdi','Critically Endangered','Gastropoda','Charopidae','The Mount Ligdbird Charopid Snail has a small (8 mm in diameter and 6 mm in height), loosely coiled shell of few whorls with an elevated apex and a dull-grey colouration flame-marked with brown (Iredale 1944).','Little is known about the biology and ecology of this species.  It was once common on the summit of Mount Lidgbird where it lived on wet rock surfaces (TSSC 2008aem).','NA','Habitat degradation and modificationThe Lord Howe Island Group was listed as World Heritage in 1982 (DEWHA undated). Much of the island is covered in rainforest, with about 10% of land area cleared, for urban development and agriculture, with a further 20% disturbed by introduced animals and exotic weeds (WWF 2001). The southern half of the island is reserved, and whilst this is where the Mount Ligdbird Charopid Snail occurs, the restricted distribution of the species makes it highly vulnerable to extinction from on-going threats or catastrophic events.Feral animalsThe key threat to the Mount Lidgbird Charopid Snail is predation by introduced rats.  The Ship Rat ( Rattus rattus ), arrived on the island from a wrecked ship in 1918 and has since become well established on Lord Howe Island (NSW Scientific Committee 2000a).  Ship Rats prey on snail species, and are thought to have been responsible for the significant decline in, and possible extinction of  Placostylus bivaricosus etheridgei  on Lord Howe Island (NSW NPWS 2001a; Ponder 1997b).  Ship Rats are likely to prey on the Mount Lidgbird Charopid Snail, though the program of baiting of rats currently undertaken on the island is likely to benefit the species if it persists on Mount Gower.  However, this baiting program is unlikely to completely mitigate the effect of predation by Ship Rats on the Mount Lidgbird Charopid Snail as it is not undertaken across the species\' entire range. Two large species of land snails,  Epiglypta howinsulae   and  Placostylus bivaricosus etheridgei   that were restricted to the southern mountains are apparently now extinct, almost certainly due to the activity of the Ship Rat (Ponder 1997b). The New South Wales Scientific Committee has declared predation by the Ship Rat on Lord Howe Island as a key threatening process (NSW Scientific Committee 2000a).Pigs and goats that were introduced to Lord Howe Island by settlers for food later became feral pests (DEWHA undated).  Both species caused damage to the surface litter and ground cover in areas where the Mount Lidgbird Charopid Snail occurred, most notably the Erskine Valley and near the trail to Mt Gower (Smithers et al. 1977). It is likely that this resulted in a decline in the species\' numbers.  However, these pest species are no longer likely to be directly impacting on the species, as pigs have now been eliminated from the island, and goats virtually eliminated (DEWHA undated).Another potential threat to the Mount Lidgbird Charopid Snail is predation and habitat disturbance by invasive ant species.  The African Big Headed Ant ( Pheidole megacephala ) is present in the northern settlement area of Lord Howe Island and may affect the Mount Lidgbird Charopid Snail should it invade the area where the species occurs.Further potential threats to the Mount Lidgbird Charopid Snail include introduced birds, particularly the Song Thrush ( Turdus philomelas ) and Common Blackbird ( Turdus merula ), which prey upon  Placostylus  species on Lord Howe Island and may prey on the Mount Lidgbird Charopid Snail.  Although the habitat of the Mount Lidgbird Charopid Snail is protected in the reserved southern area of Lord Howe Island, the species is potentially threatened by trampling, disturbance and collection by visitors, habitat damage by weeds and wildfire.Global warmingThe cloud forest on top of Mount Gower is threatened by global warming (UNESCO 2002).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=85279'),('85296','Lerista nevinae','Endangered','Reptilia','Scincidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=85296'),('85451','Parvulastra vivipara','Vulnerable','Asteroidea','Asterinidae','The Tasmanian Live-bearing Seastar is a tiny, uniformly orange-yellow seastar, up to 15 mm across. The species usually has five short arms and is a rounded, pentagon shape. Morphological variation is common and three, four or six arms are occasionally present (Prestedge 1998).','The Tasmanian Live-bearing Seastar lives in rocky areas in the upper intertidal zone, usually under rocks or in crevices. They appear to have a water depth limit, being found from just below the high water mark to a depth of approximately 1.2 m at high water (Prestedge 2001a). The species prefers gently sloping, sheltered shores, characterised by rocks often no more than 20–30 cm high. The species was originally believed to have a strong affinity with sandstone, however it has been found to inhabit a variety of substrates including dolerite, sedimentary rock, basalt, concrete and house bricks (Prestedge 2001a).The Tasmanian Live-bearing Seastar does not overlap with any EPBC Act-listed threatened ecological communities (TSSC 2009au).','The Tasmanian Live-bearing Seastar feeds, unselectively, on the film of algae and microbes coating the surface of submerged rocks (Bryant & Jackson 1999b; Polanowski 2002). The Tasmanian Live-bearing Seastar feeds at night and on dull, overcast days (Prestedge 1998). It is an extra-oral (outside of the mouth) feeder and can evert (push out) its voluminous cardiac stomach to a diameter larger than that of its body. Tasmanian Live-bearing Seastars often have their stomach fully everted and in contact with the substratum, indicating that digestion is likely to take place outside the body (Polanowski 2002).','The main identified threats to the Tasmanian Live-bearing Seastar are interspecific competition, displacement and potential predation from introduced seastars (TSSC 2009au).Interspecific competition from introduced seastarsOwing to the small, restricted subpopulations of the species, it is considered highly vulnerable to interspecific competition and displacement from introduced species such as the New Zealand Seastar ( Patiriella regularis)  and the Northern Pacific Seastar ( Asterias amurensis)  (Bryant & Jackson 1999b).Predation by introduced seastarsThe Northern Pacific Seastar is known to prey upon the Tasmanian Live-bearing Seastar under controlled conditions (Prestedge 1999) and while this species has not yet been found in any colony of Tasmanian Live-bearing Seastar (M. Wapstra 2007, pers. comm.), it may be expanding its range into the Tasmanian Live-bearing Seastar\'s habitat (E. Turner 2008, pers. comm.).Habitat modification and destructionThe recorded range of the Tasmanian Live-bearing Seastar is in close proximity to areas inhabited by humans and, consequently, the species is impacted by habitat degradation and modification. Anthropogenic impacts include removal of rocks and suitable substrates from the intertidal zone, urban encroachment, poor land use practices and pollution-induced disturbances (i.e. eutrophication, sedimentation, increasing water temperature, declining salinity, ground water seepage from urban, industrial and agricultural land uses) (Bryant & Jackson 1999b).The species may be adversely impacted by reduced water quality due to sewerage treatment plant discharge, seepage from areas serviced by septic tanks and from storm water runoff (Prestedge 1998).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=85451'),('855','Calidris canutus','Endangered','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Red Knot is a small to medium member of the  Calidridinae  family. It has a length of 23–25 cm, a wingspan of 45–54 cm and a weight of 120 g. The species is robust, short-necked, rather dumpy but long bodied wader with a short straight bill, long wings extending beyond the tail and short legs. The Red Knot is similar in shape and proportions to Great Knot,  Calidris tenuirostris , but smaller and less bulky, with shorter bill, and the breeding plumage differs markedly. In all plumages the species has a clear narrow white wing bar and off-white patch on the rump and uppertail-coverts. It is obscured by narrow dark barring and appears pale grey at a distance (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Typical habitatIn Australasia the Red Knot mainly inhabit intertidal mudflats, sandflats and sandy beaches of sheltered coasts, in estuaries, bays, inlets, lagoons and harbours; sometimes on sandy ocean beaches or shallow pools on exposed wave-cut rock platforms or coral reefs. They are occasionally seen on terrestrial saline wetlands near the coast, such as lakes, lagoons, pools and pans, and recorded on sewage ponds and saltworks, but rarely use freshwater swamps. They rarely use inland lakes or swamps (Higgins & Davies 1996).Habitat for refugeAbout a day after a cyclone had passed through Broome, lower than expected numbers (no birds) were seen in Roebuck Bay. Birds presumably moved to sheltered areas to avoid the high winds and heavy rain (Jessop & Collins 2000).Habitat for feedingThe Red Knot usually forage in soft substrate near the edge of water on intertidal mudflats or sandflats exposed by low tide. At high tide the may feed at nearby lakes, sewage ponds and floodwaters (Higgins & Davies 1996). They have also been recorded foraging on beds of eelgrass on tidal sandflats (Battley, P. in Higgins & Davies 1996), on a thick algal mat in shallow water (Dann 1983), and in shallow pools on crest of coral reef (Domm & Recher 1973).Habitat for roostingThe Red Knot roosts on sandy beaches, spits and islets, and mudflats; also in shallow saline ponds of saltworks. In New Zealand they are known to roost on short wet pastures near the coast (Higgins & Davies 1996). They have been seen roosting on an inland claypan near Roebuck Bay, north-west Western Australia (Collins et al. 2001). They like to roost in open areas far away from potential cover for predators, but close to feeding grounds (Rogers 2001). In hot conditions, waders prefer to roost where a damp substrate lowers the local temperature (Rogers 1999b).','Summary of food itemsThe Red Knot is omnivorous. In Australia the species eats mostly worms, bivalves, gastropods, crustaceans and echinoderms (Higgins & Davies 1996). In Roebuck Bay, Western Australia, they feed predomiNAtly on buried bivalves which are located by touch, as they do internationally. However, in some circumstances they also visually located and took prey from the surface. Unusual food records included insects, seeds and mudskippers  Periophthalmidae  (Rogers 2001). Internationally they also take shoots, bulbs and roots, especially early in the breeding season, as well as hydrozoans, arachnids, insects, fish and kitchen scraps (Higgins & Davies 1996).Feeding behavioursThe Red Knot is diurnal and nocturnal. In non-breeding areas, feeding activity is regulated by the tide, they feed less just before and after high tide, but timing of cessation of feeding and roosting depends on the time of year and height of tides. They sometimes follow the receding edge of the tide. They are known to feed in large mixed flocks with Great Knots,  Calidris tenuirostris , Bar-tailed Godwits,  Limosa lapponica , and Grey-tailed Tattlers,  Heteroscelus brevipes  (Higgins & Davies 1996), as well as Curlew Sandpipers,  Calidris ferruginea , and Red-necked Stints  Calidris ruficollis  (Minton, C.D.T. 2002, pers. comm.). In Roebuck Bay, Western Australia, Red Knots followed the tide-edge closely when foraging, which resulted in them leaving areas of high prey abundance to feed in less rich areas as the tide receded (Rogers 2001). In one survey, juveniles foraged in different areas from adults, and were only found feeding far from the sea-edge, on soft mud near the mangroves (Rogers 1999a); adults spent more time, and were more successful, than young birds in tactile foraging as compared to visual foraging (Rogers 2001).','Global threats There are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area.Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006).Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005c; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007). Iwamura and colleagues (2013) found that rises in sea level could cause a dramatic collapse of population flow of this species caused by intertidal habitat loss. Taking into account upshore movements of intertidal habitat, their modelling indicates that this species population flow could reduce by 15% with a 150 cm sea level rise (Iwamura et al. 2013).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).Threats within Australia Within Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Red Knot.  Habitat loss The loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj). Habitat degradation As most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation (DEWHA 2009aj) include, but are not restricted to:loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflatsinvasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grasswater pollution and changes to the water regimechanges to the hydrological regimeexposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site.Disturbance Disturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).  Direct mortality Direct mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=855');
INSERT INTO `animals_profile` VALUES ('856','Calidris ferruginea','Critically Endangered','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Curlew Sandpiper is a small, slim sandpiper 18–23 cm long and weighing 57 g, with a wingspan of 38–41 cm. The legs and neck are long. The bill is also long, and is decurved with a slender tip. The bill is black, sometimes with a brown or green tinge at the base. The head is small and round, and the iris is dark brown. The legs and feet are black or black-grey. When at rest, the wing-tips project beyond the tip of the tail. The sexes are similar, but females have a slightly larger and longer bill and a slightly paler underbelly in breeding plumage (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Curlew Sandpipers mainly occur on intertidal mudflats in sheltered coastal areas, such as estuaries, bays, inlets and lagoons, and also around non-tidal swamps, lakes and lagoons near the coast, and ponds in saltworks and sewage farms. They are also recorded inland, though less often, including around ephemeral and permanent lakes, dams, waterholes and bore drains, usually with bare edges of mud or sand. They occur in both fresh and brackish waters. Occasionally they are recorded around floodwaters (Higgins & Davies 1996).Curlew Sandpipers forage on mudflats and nearby shallow water. In non-tidal wetlands, they usually wade, mostly in water 15–30 mm, but up to 60 mm, deep. They forage at the edges of shallow pools and drains of intertidal mudflats and sandy shores. At high tide, they forage among low sparse emergent vegetation, such as saltmarsh, and sometimes forage in flooded paddocks or inundated saltflats. Occasionally they forage on wet mats of algae or waterweed, or on banks of beachcast seagrass or seaweed. They rarely forage on exposed reefs (Higgins & Davies 1996). In Roebuck Bay, northern Western Australia, they are also said to feed on part of the mudflats that have been exposed for a longer period, foraging in small groups (Tulp & de Goeij 1994).Curlew Sandpipers generally roost on bare dry shingle, shell or sand beaches, sandspits and islets in or around coastal or near-coastal lagoons and other wetlands, occasionally roosting in dunes during very high tides and sometimes in saltmarsh (Higgins & Davies 1996). They have also been recorded roosting in mangroves in Inverloch, Victoria (Minton & Whitelaw 2000).\" The Shorebird Community occurring on the relict tidal delta sands at Taren Point \"\" has been listed as an Endangered Ecological Community in NSW (NSW DECC 2005d). The Curlew Sandpiper is one of 20 wader species that make up this community.\"','This species forages mainly on invertebrates, including worms, molluscs, crustaceans, and insects, as well as seeds. Outside Australia, they also forage on shrimp, crabs and small fish. Curlew Sandpipers usually forage in water, near the shore or on bare wet mud at the edge of wetlands. On wet mud they forage by pecking and probing. They probe in shallow water, and jab at the edge of the water where a film of water remains on the sand. They glean from mud, from the surface of water, or in drier areas above the edge of the water. For a \'jab\' less than half the length of the bill is inserted into the substrate; a probe is performed with a slightly open bill inserted to its full length. Curlew Sandpipers may wade up to the belly, often with their heads submerged while probing. They often forage in mixed flocks (Dann 1999b), including with Red-necked Stints ( Calidris ruficollis ).The diet of the Curlew Sandpiper includes (Barker & Vestjens 1989; Higgins & Davies 1996; Dann 1999b):Plants ( Ruppia  seeds)Annelid worms:  Ceratonereis eurythraeensis ,  Nereis caudataMolluscs: KelliidaeGastropods: Rissoidae, Cerithiidae, Fossaridae,  Polinices  sp.,  Salinator fragilis , Hydrococcidae, Hydrobiidae,  Assiminea brazieri, A. tasmanicaCrustaceans:  Cymadusa  sp.,  Paracorophium  sp., Brachyurans; Sentinel Crab ( Macrophthalamus latifrons )Insects: Diptera (Stratiomyidae, Chironomidae), adults, larvae and pupaeLarvae (of Coleoptera, Dytiscidae and Scarabaeidae)LepidopteraThe Curlew Sandpiper has also been recorded consuming grit. In tidal waters, on the outgoing tide, the birds move onto the most recently exposed parts of the tidal flats until low tide when they disperse widely. On the rising tide, the flocks remain in areas close to the water\'s edge until these areas are covered and then retreat in stages rather than moving continuously as they do on the outgoing tide. Occasionally, individuals feed at high tide near the roost, along stretches of sandy beach where piles of decomposing vegetation are scattered in the high-tide zone. Supratidal feeding mainly occurs during the pre-migratory fattening periods (February-April) (Dann 1999a).','There has been a very widespread and large population decline in southern Australia since the 1980s, probably due to threats in breeding areas that are outside Australia. In non-breeding grounds in Australia, this species mostly occurs in highly populated areas and is therefore vulnerable to possible habitat alteration. It is necessary to maintain undisturbed feeding and roosting habitat along the south-east coast and at sites on the north-west coasts used during migration for the species to survive at current population levels (Lane 1987; Gosbell et al. 2002).Iwamura and colleagues (2013) found that rises in sea level could cause a dramatic collapse of population flow of this species caused by intertidal habitat loss. Taking into account upshore movements of intertidal habitat, their modelling indicates that this species population flow could reduce by 15% with a 200 cm sea level rise (Iwamura et al. 2013).\"The Shorebird Community occurring on the relict tidal delta sands at Taren Point\"\"','  listed as an endangered ecological community in NSW (NSW DECC 2005d)'),('858','Calidris melanotos','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Pectoral Sandpiper is a small-medium sandpiper and member of the Scolopacidae family. The species has a length of 19–24 cm, a wingspan of 37–45 cm and a weight of 85 g for males and 60 g for females. The species is characterised by a flat back and a plumpish body that tapers to a drawn out rear end. The head is small and rounded, situated on a long neck. The legs are short and the bill varies from short and straight, to medium-length and gently decurved. When at rest the folded primaries (flight feathers) are level with, just short of, or slightly longer than the tip of the tail. Also, the folded primaries are short in breeding adults and long in juveniles (Higgins & Davies 1996).','In Australasia, the Pectoral Sandpiper prefers shallow fresh to saline wetlands. The species is found at coastal lagoons, estuaries, bays, swamps, lakes, inundated grasslands, saltmarshes, river pools, creeks, floodplains and artificial wetlands.The species is usually found in coastal or near coastal habitat but occasionally found further inland. It prefers wetlands that have open fringing mudflats and low, emergent or fringing vegetation, such as grass or samphire. The species has also been recorded in swamp overgrown with lignum. They forage in shallow water or soft mud at the edge of wetlands (Higgins & Davies 1996).','The Pectoral Sandpiper is omnivorous, consuming algae, seeds, crustaceans, arachnids and insects. While feeding, they move slowly, probing with rapid strokes. They walk slowly on grass fringing water (Higgins & Davies 1996).','The following table identifies threats relevant to the Pectoral Sandpiper, and migratory shorebirds in general:DistributionThreatDetailsAustraliaHabitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialised feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation include (but are not restricted to):loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflatsinvasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grasswater pollution and changes to the hydrological regimeexposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site (DEWHA 2009aj).DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).GlobalHabitat lossThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the East Asian-Australian Flyway (EAAF). The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development which includes aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) and will be reclaimed as part of the ongoing Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Birds Korea 2010; Barter 2002; 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area (Barter 2005c). Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the EAAF (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).PollutionMigratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding and breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006).DisturbanceGlobally, disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to continue to increase (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).Climate changeGlobal warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=858'),('860','Calidris ruficollis','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Red-necked Stint is a small Calidridinae approximately 13–16 cm in length and is the smallest shorebird in Australia (Geering et al. 2007). It weighs 25 g and has a wingspan between 29 and 33 cm. The species is characterised by a small head, steep rounded forehead, and long thickset body with an attenuated rear end. Other distinguishing features include short legs, a short, straight (or slightly decurved) bill with a slight bulbous or finely pointed tip. At rest the folded primaries reach slightly over the tip of the tail (rarely short of the tip). In flight all plumages show typical patterns of Stints, with white wing bars, white sides to a black centered rump and upper tail colours. The species has a variety of plumages depending on age, sex and time or year. Calls are important in identification. Sexes are similar, however, breeding adults are distinct from non-breeding adults as well as from juveniles (Higgins & Davies 1996).','In Australasia, the Red-necked Stint is mostly found in coastal areas, including in sheltered inlets, bays, lagoons and estuaries with intertidal mudflats, often near spits, islets and banks and, sometimes, on protected sandy or coralline shores. Occasionally they have been recorded on exposed or ocean beaches, and sometimes on stony or rocky shores, reefs or shoals. They also occur in saltworks and sewage farms; saltmarsh; ephemeral or permanent shallow wetlands near the coast or inland, including lagoons, lakes, swamps, riverbanks, waterholes, bore drains, dams, soaks and pools in saltflats. They sometimes use flooded paddocks or damp grasslands. They have occasionally been recorded on dry gibber plains, with little or no perennial vegetation (Higgins & Davies 1996). Habitat for feedingThe Red-necked Stint mostly forages on bare wet mud on intertidal mudflats or sandflats, or in very shallow water; mostly in areas with a film of surface water and mostly close to edge of water. During high tides they sometimes forage in non-tidal wetlands. Red-necked Stints may also forage in samphire, generally avoid beds of seagrass, but may feed along edges. On Lake Reeve, Victoria, they have been reported to occasionally feed on algal mats. In south-east Tasmania they have been observed foraging on duckweed in a lagoon. In Westernport Bay, Victoria, they forage on beaches without mangroves. On Pelsaert Island, Western Australia, they have been recorded foraging on mud beneath mangroves. On sandy ocean beaches they sometimes forage in beachcast seaweed. They have been recorded foraging in flooded paddocks and in a freshly cropped lucerne paddock near lagoons (Higgins & Davies 1996).Habitat for roostingThe Red-necked Stint roosts on sheltered beaches, spits, banks or islets, of sand, mud, coral or shingle, sometimes in saltmarsh or other vegetation. They occasionally roost on exposed reefs or shoals (Higgins & Davies 1996). Large numbers sometimes roost on ocean beaches, though it is probably not a preferred habitat and use of this habitat may increase when high numbers of birds are present (C.D.T. Minton 2002, pers. comm.). They were once recorded roosting  c . 1.5 km from an inland lake, in close-cropped grass. They also roost among beachcast seaweed or clods of mud or dried cow-pats (Hobbs 1961). During very high tides they may use sand dunes or claypans. Large numbers (an estimated 7967 birds) were recorded roosting at an inland claypan near Roebuck Bay in north-west Western Australia (Collins et al. 2001). Habitat needed for refuge from events such as fire, drought or floodAbout a day after a cyclone had passed through Broome, lower than expected numbers (250 birds) were seen in Roebuck Bay. The birds presumably moved to sheltered areas to avoid the high winds and heavy rain (Collins et al. 2001).','The Red-necked Stint is omnivorous. In Australia it is known to forage on intertidal and near-coastal wetlands. It jabs and probes with its bill into the soft mud for small invertebrates. It also gleans from plants in saltmarsh and water (Higgins & Davies 1996).The Red-necked Stint forages on plant seeds (such as from  Ruppia spp.  and  Polygonum spp. ) and on a range of marine worms, molluscs, snails and slugs, shrimps, spiders, beetles, flies and ants. The Red-necked Stint also eats grit (Higgins & Davies 1996). The Red-necked Stint sometimes feeds in dense flocks that spread out as the tide recedes. They often feed with other species, especially Sharp-tailed Sandpipers ( Calidris acuminata)  and Curlew Sandpipers ( Calidris ferruginea)  (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Global threatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area.Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006).Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005c; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).Threats within AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Red-necked Stint.Habitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation (DEWHA 2009aj) include, but are not restricted to:loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflatsinvasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grasswater pollution and changes to the water regimechanges to the hydrological regimeexposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site.DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=860'),('86071','Wollumbinia belli','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Chelidae','Bell\'s turtle is an intermediate-sized short-necked freshwater turtle. Females have a carapace length of up to 300 mm and males up to 227 mm (Fielder et al. 2015). It is in the \'saw-shelled\' turtle group, which refers to the saw-toothed rear edge of the upper shell that occurs in young turtles. This species is similar in most respects to  Wollumbinia lateristernum  (the Saw-shelled Turtle) (Cogger 2014).','The species is restricted to upland streams (between 600 and 1100 m altitude) that contain permanent pools deeper than about 2 m, granite boulders and bedrock. Its habitat is often complex, with underwater caverns formed by boulders, logs and overhanging banks. In areas of lower velocity, the typical substratum is coarse granitic sand overlain by fine silt, algal growth, and dense beds of macrophytes (Cann 1998, Fielder 2010, both cited in Fielder et al. 2015). It is absent from areas away from flowing streams, such as farm ponds and natural wetlands (Fielder et al. 2015).Turtles prefer narrow stretches of river, 30 to 40 m wide, with shallow to deep pools. Pools most commonly occupied by Bell\'s Turtle are less than 3 m deep with rock or sandy riverbed bottoms and small patches of weed (Cann 1998). Nests are dug out in riverbanks of sand or loam (NSW OEH 2014).Much of the land surrounding these narrow stretches of river is used for grazing sheep and cattle. Some riparian vegetation remains in the form of numerous Eucalypts and introduced willows ( Salix  spp.) (Cann 1998).','Bell\'s Turtle is largely a herbivore, eating plant material such as fine aquatic weeds, stems of plants up to 30 mm long and fallen terrestrial leaves. They will opportunistically eat invertebrates, including crayfish ( Carex  sp.) and aquatic insects. Gut content studies indicate that many individuals consumed large amounts of sediment (Cann 1998).Faecal analysis indicates that turtles may be scavengers, or that some feeding may be indiscriminate possibly due to an eye disability appearing as cloudiness or cataracts. One individual had consumed a feather 8 cm long (Cann 1998).','Like many freshwater turtles Bell\'s Turtle has a restricted distribution and is threatened by habitat destruction and degradation (DEHP 2011).Threats to Bell\'s Turtle include (Fielder et al. 2015; NSW OEH 2014):pollution and sedimentation of river habitattrampling and damage to river banks and riverside vegetation by grazing stockchanges to natural stream flows through removal of water for irrigationpredation on eggs by foxes ( Vulpes vulpes )hatchling predation by introduced native fish (Murray cod and golden perch) and exotic fish (redfin perch and rainbow trout)introduction of other native turtles (e.g.  Wollumbinia latisternum  or  Emydura macquarii ) into habitat threaten the species by interbreeding (in the case of  Wollumbinia ) and competitionunidentified disease causing blindness and therefore, potentially, malnutrition and reproductive constraints.The species has a high incidence of eye disease, appearing as cloudiness or cataracts. One specimen was examined and was said to have had \'non-specific conjunctivitis\'. The incidence of eye damage in adults ranges from 14% in populations well upstream, to over 50% in populations further downstream. The disease appears to worsen with age, with younger individuals showing a lesser degree of clouding. The cause of eye disease is unknown. Some turtles are completely blind. Many turtles may have difficulty identifying food due to their severely impaired sight (Cann 1998).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86071'),('86072','Wollumbinia georgesi','Critically Endangered','Reptilia','Chelidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86072'),('86084','Phyllodes imperialis smithersi','Endangered','Insecta','Noctuidae','The Pink Underwing Moth is a striking moth with leaf-shaped grey-brown forewings marked with white. The hindwings are black with a pink central patch and are fringed with seven or more white spots along the trainling edge (NSW DECC 2005ag). Its outstretched wings measure 13–14 cm across. The thorax and abdomen are grey-brown (TSSC 2008xy).','The Pink Underwing Moth is found below the altitude of 600 m in undisturbed, subtropical rainforest on rich volcanic soils and fertile alluvium. It occurs in association with the vine  Carronia multisepalea , a collapsed shrub that provides the food and habitat the moth requires in order to breed (Clarke & Spier-Ashcroft 2003; NSW DECC 2005ag). Where  C. multisepalea  attains an upright form, the association with the moth does not occur (TSSC 2002n).','The larvae of the Pink Underwing Moth feed on the vine  Carronia multisepalea which appears to be relatively rare (NSW SC 2003j). This vine is a plant that grows in the form of a shrub or a vine on rich volcanic soils in association with mature rainforest and regrowth vegetation (NSW RMS 2013), it is largely restricted to ‘old growth’ subtropical rainforests on the coast and nearby ranges below 1000 m (Sands 2012). The vine frequently occurs in association with another vine,  Pararistolochia praevenosa , the principal food plant for the Richmond birdwing butterfly,  Ornithoptera richmondia . Other forms of  P. imperialis  feed on  Pycanarrhena  species of vine (Sands 1999).Adults feed on the soft fruits of native rainforest plants, including  Ficus  and  Syzigium  and possibly also on fruits of cultivated plants in the vicinity of rainforest (NSW RMS 2013).','The main identified threat to the Pink Underwing Moth is the loss of its rainforest habitat (Sands 1999). Most old growth subtropical rainforest in north-eastern NSW and south-eastern Queensland is fragmented due to logging and clearing for agriculture and development (TSSC 2002n).The main potential threat to the Pink Underwing Moth is tourist disturbance at its only known breeding site at Mary Cairncross Scenic Reserve (TSSC 2002n). Habitat may be degraded through disturbance and weed invasion (NSW RMS 2013). Adult moths may be displaced through attraction to artificial light sources (NSW RMS 2013).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86084'),('861','Calidris subminuta','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Long-toed Stint is a very small sandpiper and member of the  Calidridinae  family. The species has a length of 13–16 cm, a wingspan of 26.5–30.5 cm and an average weight of 25 g. The species is characterised by its distinctive shape; a small head, long slim neck, rounded belly, short rear-end, long legs (often held flexed), short straight bill tapering to finely pointed tip, folded primaries that fall level with the tail and show little or no primary projection beyond the tertials.  The species also has long, thin toes (especially the middle toe) that give the impression of an awkwardly large foot. The species also has a distinctive stance. It is slightly smaller and more finely built than the Red-necked Stint,  Calidris ruficollis . The species has yellow legs and feet, pale-brown or yellow base to lower mandible. It has a well streaked gorget and its flight call can be used to distinguish it from other stints. The juveniles are distinct and the immatures separable (Higgins & Davies 1996).','In Australia, the Long-toed Stint occurs in a variety of terrestrial wetlands. They prefer shallow freshwater or brackish wetlands including lakes, swamps, river floodplains, streams, lagoons and sewage ponds. The species is also fond of areas of muddy shoreline, growths of short grass, weeds, sedges, low or floating aquatic vegetation, reeds, rushes and occasionally stunted samphire. It has also been observed at open, less vegetated shores of larger lakes and ponds and is common on muddy frindges of drying ephemeral lakes and swamps. The Long-toed Stint also frequents permanent wetlands such as reserviors and artificial lakes. They are uncommon, but not unknown, at tidal estuaries, saline lakes, saltponds and bore swamps (Higgnis & Davies 1996).The Long-toed Stint forages on wet mud or in shallow water, often among short grass, weeds and other vegetation on islets or around the edges of wetlands. They occasionally feed on open water, well away from the shore; this is more common in drying ephemeral wetlands. They roost or loaf in sparse vegetation at the edges of wetlands and on damp mud near shallow water. It also roosts in small depressions in the mud (Higgins & Davies 1996).','The diet of the Long-toed Stint is poorly known in Australia. The species is omnivorous; feeding on seeds, molluscs, crustaceans and insects. They mainly feed on fresh waters; singly or in small flocks. They have been sighted feeding in shallow water, on floating weed or algae, or in low vegetation with crouched or hunched posture (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Global ThreatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area (Barter 2005c).Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006). Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Long-toed Stint.Habitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation include (but are not restricted to): (1) loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflats; (2) invasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grass; (3) water pollution and changes to the water regime; (4) changes to the hydrological regime and (5) exposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site (DEWHA 2009aj).DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=861'),('86183','Amytornis modestus obscurior','Critically Endangered','Aves','Maluridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86183'),('862','Calidris tenuirostris','Critically Endangered','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Great Knot is the largest of the calidrid birds and grows to 26–28 cm long, with a wingspan of approximately 58 cm. Females are slightly larger than males. The bill is black, and slightly downward curved and tinged green at the tip. The eye is brown, legs and feet dark greenish-grey. The bird has noticeable breeding, non-breeding and juvenile plumages (Higgins & Davies 1996).','AustralasiaIn Australasia, the species typically prefers sheltered coastal habitats, with large intertidal mudflats or sandflats. This includes inlets, bays, harbours, estuaries and lagoons. They are occasionally found on exposed reefs or rock platforms, shorelines with mangrove vegetation, ponds in saltworks, at swamps near the coast, saltlakes and non-tidal lagoons. The Great Knot rarely occurs on inland lakes and swamps (Higgins & Davies 1996).Typically, the Great Knot roosts in large groups in open areas, often at the waters edge or in shallow water close to feeding grounds (Higgins & Davies 1996; Rogers 2001). It is known that in hot conditions, waders prefer to roost where a damp substrate lowers the local temperature (Rogers 1999b). A group of approximately 8610 birds have been recorded roosting at an inland claypan near Roebuck Bay in north-west Western Australia (Collins et al. 2001).EuropeThe Great Knot breeds in alpine and sub-alpine vegetation in north-east Siberia and the far north-east of Russia. Nesting colonies are usually at or above upper tree lines, at altitudes below 1000 m above sea level (asl) in the east and usually above 1000 m asl in the western half of the breeding range (Tomkovich 1997).','NA','There are a number of threats that affect all migratory waders, including the Great Knot, that occur in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway.Reclamation and developmentThe greatest threat facing waders is habitat loss, both direct and indirect (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for future development (Barter 2002, 2005b, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Moores 2006; Rogers et al. 2006; Round 2006). In many suitable staging areas along the East Asia Flyway many intertidal areas have been reclaimed, and the process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005b, 2005c). Twenty-eight percent of Yellow Sea tidal flats existing in the 1980s had disapeared by the late 2000s (1.2% annually) (Murray et al. 2014). Moreover, reference to historical maps suggests that up to 65% of tidal flats were lost since the 1960s (Murray et al. 2014).The Great Knot is probably more vulnerable to reclamation activities than most other waders, due to the very specific species and sizes of shellfish that they eat (Minton 2002 pers. comm.). Wetland degradation in the Yellow Sea is a particluar threat as 80% of the population stages on the northward migration (Garnett et al. 2011). About 90 000 individuals disappeared following the reclamation of tidal flats in the South Korean Yellow Sea in 2006 (Garnett et al. 2011; Moores et al. 2008).In addition to that noted above, intensive oil exploration, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows, which compound the problem of habitat loss (Barter 2002, 2005b; Barter et al. 1998; Melville 1997).Climate changeClimate change and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997). Iwamura and colleagues (2013) found that rises in sea level could cause a dramatic collapse of population flow of this species caused by intertidal habitat loss. Taking into account upshore movements of intertidal habitat, their modelling indicates that this species population flow could reduce by 35% with a 200 cm sea level rise (Iwamura et al. 2013).Human activitiesDisturbance from construction, recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter 2005b; Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993; Rogers 2001). Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and the Great Knot is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).PollutionMigratory shorebirds are adversely affected by pollution, such as organochlorines or heavy metals discharged into the sea from industrial or urban sources, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Barter 2005b; Blomqvist et al. 1987; Harding et al. 2007; Huettmann & Gerasimov 2006; Melville 1997; Schick et al. 1987).Roebuck BayCauses of disturbance in Roebuck Bay included birds of prey (39%), people or vehicles (18%) and false alarms (10%, i.e. no cause for disturbance), with the remaining disturbance (33%) being from unknown causes (Rogers 2001).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=862'),('86266','Westralunio carteri','Vulnerable','Bivalvia','Hyriidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86266'),('86269','Amytornis merrotsyi merrotsyi','Vulnerable','Aves','Maluridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86269'),('86270','Amytornis merrotsyi pedleri','Endangered','Aves','Maluridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86270'),('863','Gallinago hardwickii','','Aves','Scolopacidae','Latham\'s Snipe is a medium sized wader, and the largest snipe in Australia, with a length of 29-33 cm, a wingspan of 50-54 cm and a mass of 150-230 g. It has a long straight bill, rather short broad pointed wings, a long tail and short legs (Higgins & Davies 1996). The cryptic plumage is intricately marked with barring and chevrons of buff, black and various shades of brown, with blackish-brown stripes across the crown and cream streaks down the back. The belly and parts of the head are white, and the tail is rufous with a white tip. The eyes are large and blackish-brown in colour (Higgins & Davies 1996; Pizzey & Knight 1997). The colour of the bill varies from pale-brown to olive, becoming blackish at the distal third and olive-yellow at the base. The legs and feet are olive-grey to olive in colour. The sexes are similar in appearance, and there is no seasonal variation in the plumage. Juveniles in fresh plumage differ only slightly from adults, but can be distinguished by slight differences in the patterning on the upperwing. Adults and juveniles are indistinguishable after early November (Higgins & Davies 1996). In non-breeding areas, snipe that are flushed from cover flee with a distinctive and rapid \'zig-zagging\' flight (Weston 2006, pers. comm.).','In Australia, Latham\'s Snipe occurs in permanent and ephemeral wetlands up to 2000 m above sea-level (Chapman 1969; Naarding 1981). They usually inhabit open, freshwater wetlands with low, dense vegetation (e.g. swamps, flooded grasslands or heathlands, around bogs and other water bodies) (Frith et. al. 1977; Naarding 1983; Weston 2006, pers. comm.). However, they can also occur in habitats with saline or brackish water, in modified or artificial habitats, and in habitats located close to humans or human activity (Frith et al. 1977; Naarding 1983).Latham\'s Snipe occurs in temperate and tropical regions of Australia (Driscoll 1993). Its altitudinal range extends from sea-level (i.e. the coast) or possibly below. For example, there are records from near Lake Eyre (Higgins & Davies 1996) to approximately 2000 m above sea-level (Chapman 1969; Driscoll 1993).In Australia, Latham\'s Snipe occurs in a wide variety of permanent and ephemeral wetlands (Naarding 1981). They usually occur in open, freshwater wetlands that have some form of shelter (usually low and dense vegetation) nearby (Frith et al. 1977; Naarding 1983; Weston 2006, pers. comm.). They generally occupy flooded meadows, seasonal or semi-permanent swamps, or open waters (Frith et al. 1977; Naarding 1983), but various other freshwater habitats can be used including bogs, waterholes, billabongs, lagoons, lakes, creek or river margins, river pools and floodplains (Frith et al. 1977; Naarding 1981, 1983). The structure and composition of the vegetation that occurs around these wetlands is not important in determining the suitability of habitat (Naarding 1983). As such, snipe may be found in a variety of vegetation types or communities including tussock grasslands with rushes, reeds and sedges, coastal and alpine heathlands, lignum or tea-tree scrub, button-grass plains, alpine herbfields and open forest (Chapman 1969; Frith 1970; Frith et al. 1977; Naarding 1983; Wall 1990).Latham\'s Snipe sometimes occur in habitats that have saline or brackish water, such as saltmarsh, mangrove creeks, around bays and beaches, and at tidal rivers (Frith et al. 1977; Naarding 1983; Patterson 1991). These habitats are most commonly used when the birds are on migration (Frith et al. 1977). They are regularly recorded in or around modified or artificial habitats including pasture, ploughed paddocks, irrigation channels and drainage ditches, ricefields, orchards, saltworks, and sewage and dairy farms (Fielding 1979; Frith et al. 1977; Lane & Jessop 1985; Naarding 1982, 1983). They can also occur in various sites close to humans or human activity (e.g. near roads, railways, airfields, commercial or industrial complexes) (Frith et al. 1977; Naarding 1983).The foraging habitats of Latham\'s Snipe are characterized by areas of mud (either exposed or beneath a very shallow covering of water) and some form of cover (e.g. low, dense vegetation) (Frith et al. 1977; Todd 2000). The snipe roost on the ground near (or sometimes in) their foraging areas, usually in sites that provide some degree of shelter, e.g. beside or under clumps of vegetation, among dense tea-tree, in forests, in drainage ditches or plough marks, among boulders, or in shallow water if cover is unavailable (Frith et al. 1977; Naarding 1982, 1983). Latham\'s Snipe can occur coincidentally with the Painted Snipe  Rostratula benghalensis  (i.e. both species occupy similar habitats and may sometimes come into close proximity with one another) (Weston  2006, pers. comm.). The Painted Snipe (or Australian Painted Snipe) is listed as Vulnerable under the  EPBC Act 1999 .Latham\'s Snipe is known to occur in the upland wetlands of the New England Tablelands and Monaro Plateau, which is listed as an Endangered Threatened Ecological Community under the  EPBC Act 1999  (DEH 2006).  Based on the snipe\'s distribution and habitat preferences, it could also occur in swamps of the Fleurieu Peninsula (which are listed as Critically Endangered under the  EPBC Act 1999 ), temperate highland peat swamps on sandstone (which are listed as Endangered under the  EPBC Act 1999 ), and in the community of native species dependent on natural discharge of groundwater from the Great Artesian Basin (which is listed as Endangered under the  EPBC Act 1999 ). They could also potentially occur in Bluegrass  Dichanthium  domiNAt grasslands of the Brigalow Belt Bioregions (North and South) and in natural temperate grasslands of the Southern Tablelands of New South Wales and the Australian Capital Territory (both of which are listed as Endangered under the  EPBC Act 1999 ) if either of these communities are subject to flooding.','Latham\'s Snipe is an omnivorous species that feeds on seeds and other plant material (mainly from species in families such as Cyperaceae, Poaceae, Juncaceae, Polygonaceae, Ranunculaceae and Fabaceae), and on invertebrates including insects (mainly flies and beetles), earthworms and spiders and occasionally molluscs, isopods and centipedes (Frith et al. 1977; Todd 2000).The composition of the diet can vary somewhat over the duration of the species\' stay in Australia, but no clear patterns have been determined (Frith et al. 1977; Todd 2000). Latham\'s Snipe forage during the day or at night. They use their bills to jab and probe into mud that may be exposed or covered by very shallow water (Frith et al. 1977; Todd 2000).','Historically, the greatest threats to Latham\'s Snipe in Australia have been a loss of habitat caused by the drainage and modification of wetlands, and excessive mortality due to hunting (Frith et al. 1977; Littler 1910; Naarding 1985). The loss of habitat in Australia has been extensive, with many of the wetlands traditionally occupied by snipe having been drained or modified (Frith et al. 1977; Naarding 1983). The impact of habitat loss upon the species is largely unknown, although it has been implicated as a likely cause of some population declines (Littler 1910), and has probably been a factor in others (M.A. Weston, 2006, pers. comm.).The past impacts of shooting are better known. The species was formerly hunted, legally, in all states in eastern Australia. It has been estimated that up to 10 000 birds (including 6000 birds in Victoria and 1000 birds in Tasmania) were killed annually by hunters before bans on shooting were introduced in 1976 (in New South Wales), 1983 (in Tasmania) and 1984 (in Victoria) (shooting is also banned in Queensland and South Australia, but the dates at which bans were introduced are unknown) (Naarding 1981, 1983, 1985, 1986; M.A. Weston February 2006, pers. comm.).The current major threat to the species appears to be the ongoing loss of habitat. The wetland habitats occupied by Latham\'s Snipe are threatened by a variety of processes including drainage, diversion of water for storage or agriculture, development of land for urban or other purposes, and land management practices such as mowing of habitat during summer can render it unsuitable for several months (Frith et al. 1977; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Naarding 1981, 1985; Weston 1995). The habitat is also potentially threatened by vegetational replacement: on Cape York Peninsula, grasslands occupied by snipe on migration are being replaced by Broad-leaved Tea-tree  Melaleuca viridiflora  woodland, although the current rate of replacement (5% per decade) is not sufficient to threaten the species at present (Crowley & Garnett 1998; Garnett & Shephard 1997; Garnett & Crowley 2000).There do not appear to be any other major threats to the species at present. The birds are said to be easily disturbed by the intrusion of humans or cattle into their habitats (Naarding 1983), but some populations occupy wetlands that are prone to disturbance, e.g. near industrial complexes, roads or railways, airfields, within school grounds (Higgins & Davies 1996; Naarding 1982, 1983). The pollution of wetlands (via nutrient enrichment, industrial discharge or inappropriate land management practices) and the salinisation of wetlands are potential threats to the snipe (Melville 1997; M.A. Weston February 2006, pers. comm.), but no information is available on the impact of pollution or salinisation upon snipe populations.Collisions with vehicles could be a potential minor threat to some snipe, as birds are known to roost at times beside roadside puddles (M.A. Weston February 2006, pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=863'),('86380','Limosa lapponica baueri','Vulnerable','Aves','Scolopacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86380'),('864','Gallinago megala','','Aves','Scolopacidae','Swinhoe\'s Snipe is a medium sized member of the  Gallinagoniae  family. It has a length of 27–29 cm, a wingspan of 38–44 cm and a weight of 120 g. The species has a long straight bill, short, broad and somewhat blunt wings, short tail and short legs. It is similiar in size to Latham\'s Snipe,  Gallinago hardwickii  and the Pin-tailed Snipe,  G. stenura . The species is distinguished by slight differences in size and structure, however, field identification is often not possible. There is no seasonal variation in plumage, the sexes are alike (Higgins & Davies 1996).','During the non-breeding season Swinhoe\'s Snipe occurs at the edges of wetlands, such as wet paddy fields, swamps and freshwater streams. The species is also known to occur in grasslands, drier cultivated areas (including crops of rapeseed and wheat) and market gardens (Higgins & Davies 1996).Habitat specific to Australia includes the dense clumps of grass and rushes round the edges of fresh and brackish wetlands. This includes swamps, billabongs, river pools, small streams and sewage ponds. They are also found in drying claypans and inundated plains pitted with crab holes (Higgins & Davies 1996).','NA','Global ThreatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area (Barter 2005c).Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006). Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including Swinhoe\'s Snipe.Habitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation include (but are not restricted to): (1) loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflats; (2) invasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grass; (3) water pollution; (4) changes to the hydrological regime and (5) exposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site (DEWHA 2009aj).DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=864'),('86432','Limosa lapponica menzbieri','Critically Endangered','Aves','Scolopacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86432'),('865','Pluvialis squatarola','','Aves','Charadriidae','The Grey Plover is a medium-sized (length: 27–31 cm; weight: 250 g) plover with long legs and a short, stout bill. Sexes sometimes differ when in breeding plumage, but are inseparable when in non-breeding plumage; juveniles are separable from adults.','In non-breeding grounds in Australia, Grey Plovers occur almost entirely in coastal areas, where they usually inhabit sheltered embayments, estuaries and lagoons with mudflats and sandflats, and occasionally on rocky coasts with wave-cut platforms or reef-flats, or on reefs within muddy lagoons. They also occur around terrestrial wetlands such as near-coastal lakes and swamps, or salt-lakes. The species is also very occasionally recorded further inland, where they occur around wetlands or salt-lakes (Marchant & Higgins 1993 and references therein). On their breeding grounds they inhabit tundra (Dement\'ev & Gladkov 1951).Feeding habitatGrey Plovers usually forage on large areas of exposed mudflats and beaches of sheltered coastal shores such as inlets, estuaries and lagoons. They also occasionally feed in pasture and at the muddy margins of inland wetlands such as lakes, swamps and bores (Marchant & Higgins 1993).Roosting habitatThey usually roost in sandy areas, such as on unvegetated sandbanks or sand-spits on sheltered beaches or other sheltered environments such as estuaries or lagoons (Jaensch et al. 1988; Pegler 1983). In Port Phillip Bay, they roost on artificial sand islands created by dredge spoil (Marchant & Higgins 1993). They less often roost on the muddy edges of estuaries or water storages such as reservoirs (Bravery 1964; Jaensch et al. 1988) and salt-lakes (Storr 1964b). The species has also been recorded roosting in claypans 2 km from the sea (Collins et al. 2001).Breeding habitatGrey Plovers breed in tundra, often at higher elevations (up to the tree-line), and generally in dry positions, such as on low ridges or bluffs, in areas vegetated with sedges, moss, lichen and stunted trees, and interspersed with large wetlands and patches of snow and unmelted ice. They may avoid moist areas, though they have been recorded breeding in the deltas of large rivers and in other lowland or coastal areas (Cramp & Simmons 1983; Dement\'ev & Gladkov 1951; Wiersma 1996).The species does not rely on a listed threatened ecological community.','During the non-breeding season, Grey Plovers mostly eat molluscs (especially gastropods), insects and their larvae, crustaceans (especially crabs) and polychaete worms. Vegetation is very occasionally found in their stomachs (Barker & Vestjens 1989; Boehm 1964; Lea & Gray 1935a; Marchant & Higgins 1993; Rogers 1999a). During the breeding season, they eat mostly insects, but may ocassionally eat vegetation (Dement\'ev & Gladkov 1951).The Grey Plover usually forages during the day (Cramp & Simmons 1983), but sometimes also feeds at night (Cramp & Simmons 1983; Goodfellow 2001), when up to 40% of food may be obtained (Turpie & Hockey 1993). They usually locate prey by sight, with cues used including movement of water, sand or casts from the burrows of polychaete worms (Cramp & Simmons 1983; Marchant & Higgins 1993). They feed with a running, stopping and pecking action typical of many species of plovers, gleaning and probing the substrate (Cramp & Simmons 1983; Marchant & Higgins 1993). Bivalves are seized by the siphon and torn from the shell, while crabs are pecked apart (Bent 1962). They have been recorded washing their prey (Cramp & Simmons 1983). Grey Plovers have also been recorded stealing food from Whimbrels ( Numenius phaeopus ) and oystercatchers ( Haematopus  spp.) (Zwarts et al. 1990).','Though there are no threats that apply specifically to Grey Plovers, there are a number of threats that will affect all migratory waders.Australia  Pollution, including industrial and discharge nutrient hyperenrichment, with subsequent eutrophication, adversely affects the number of micro-organisms which occur in the benthos of the littoral zone, which, in turn, affects the efficiency of feeding by species such as the Grey Plover (Harding et al. 2007; Straw 1992a). It may also affect the Plovers directly through heavy metals, insecticides, herbicides and similar pollutants accumulating in their tissues. Conversely, efforts to increase the efficiency of treating effluent before it is released into the greater environment may result in lower levels of bacteria and invertebrates and their larvae which constitute a major proportion of the diet of the Grey Plover.With increasing tourist visitation around Broome, and subsequent development, increasing levels of disturbance from human recreation are likely (Rogers 1999a).Residential or other development of saltworks or land adjacent to mudflats near the outskirts of built-up areas (for example in areas along the western shores of Port Phillip Bay) results in a reduction of suitable habitat for the species and increased levels of disturbance (Straw 1992a).The spread of introduced plants, such as cord grass  Spartinia , can invade intertidal mudflats and reduce the amount of suitable areas to forage, as it has in other countries (Goss-Custard & Moser 1988).Elsewhere  There are a number of threats that affect migratory waders in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat facing waders is habitat loss, both direct and indirect (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for future development (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Huettmann & Gerasimov 2006; Moores 2006). In many suitable staging areas along the East Asian-Australasian Flyway many intertidal areas have been reclaimed, and the process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c; Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows, which compound the problem (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998; Melville 1997).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Huettmann & Gerasimov 2006; Melville 1997; Moores 2006; Wei et al. 2006).Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).The biological characteristic of the species which poses a key threat to its survival is that it regularly flies for thousands of kilometres over some of the most densely populated areas of the world. The huge human population of East Asia places enormous pressure on natural resources, and manifests itself in activities such as the reclamation of mudflats, which has seriously detrimental effects on populations of migratory waders (Barter 2002, 2005c).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=865'),('86568','Crocidura trichura','Critically Endangered','Mammalia','Soricidae','The Christmas Island Shrew is a small mouse-like mammal with short legs (Meek 1997), with reddish-brown to dark slate grey colouring. It weighs between 4.5 and 6 g, and like other members of the  Crocidura  genus it has a distinctly pointed muzzle (Schulz 2004).','General HabitatThe preferred habitat of the Christmas Island Shrew is unknown. The 1985 records of the species occurred in tall plateau rainforest in deep soils (J. Tranter, pers. comm., cited in Schulz 2004) and terrace rainforest with shallow soils (P. Goh, pers. comm., cited in Schulz 2004). The majority of primary plateau and terrace rainforest, including the locations for these two sightings, is now protected within the Christmas Island National Park. It is unknown whether the shrew may occur in secondary rainforest regrowth (Schulz 2004). Four 1997 anecdotal observations of the species occurred in coastal terrace habitat (Meek 1997, 2000). No records from human settlement areas have been made on the island (Schulz 2004).Sheltering HabitatAndrews (1900) noted the species as likely to use holes in rocks and the roots of trees as sheltering habitat. Other  Crocidura  species either dig their own burrows in loose soil or leaf mould frequently under fallen trees and rocks or use those of other animals (Nowak, cited in Schulz 2004). Many other  Crocidura  shrews require a high degree of ground cover and deep leaf litter in habitat, often with slightly moister soils for easier burrow construction and to assist in foraging and with predator avoidance (Dickman 1995). It is not known whether the Christmas Island Shrew favours these microhabitats within the rainforest.','Crocidurine shrews are insectivorous. Sight is poor in most shrews and there is a dependence on olfactory, auditory and tactile senses when foraging. There is evidence of echolocation in  Sorex  (Buchler 1976) and  Blarina  (Tomasi 1979) species, although it is not believed to be an important foraging tool. Hunting mostly involves searching using the sensitive snout to probe the litter layer and low plant substrate until prey is located. Some shrews are also known to cache prey when there is an abundance of food (Meek 1997, 2000).','DiseaseDisease is considered to be the most likely cause of the decline of the Christmas Island Shrew, as the species was considered probably extinct by 1908 before major broadscale habitat destruction was undertaken. During 1901 to 1904, the endemic Maclear\'s Rat became extinct on Christmas Island, most likely as the result of the introduction of the pathogen trypanosome via infected Black Rats ( Rattus rattus ) (Pickering and Norris 1996, cited in Schulz 2004).Yellow Crazy Ant  (Anoplolepis gracilipes) An invasive species, accidentally introduced to the island between 1915 and 1934, Yellow Crazy Ants formmulti-queened supercolonies. On Christmas Island dramatic increases in supercolony formation was noted in the mid to late 1990s. Aerial baiting of the island began in September 2002, however supercolonies were estimated to have already infested over 2500 ha of rainforest.Impacts from the Yellow Crazy Ant noted include a reduction of approximately 30% in the population of the Red Crab ( Gecaroidea natalis ) due to ant attack; dramatically altered plant community dynamics; damage to trees resulting in dieback; and canopy thinning due to the ants\' ecology of farming scale insects. The direct effects on the shrew are unknown, but it is likely that breeding, shelter and foraging sites would be severely affected. It is also likely the ants kill young animals in the nest, and possibly adults in severely affected areas (Schulz 2004). Habitat Loss Approximately 33% of Christmas Island\'s rainforest has been destroyed for phosphate mining (Schulz 2004). In total, the island\'s vegetation has reduced by 25% due to clearing (DEWHA 2010a). Whilst the Christmas Island Shrew was noted to be in dramatically low numbers prior to mining on the island, loss of habitat would not assist in recovery of the species. Two unconfirmed reports of the species were recorded in 1958 in habitat being cleared by bulldozers for mining. Habitat modification due to mining has detrimentally affected foraging resources, predation risk and microhabitat requirements, for example, via the loss of groundwater and moisture levels (Schulz 2004, Meek 1997, 2000). New proposals to clear primary rainforest on vacant crown land may apply additional pressure on any remaining shrew populations. These proposals include phosphate mining at sites in the eastern section of the island, and activities associated with developments such as the siting of a mobile phone tower on Limestone Hill, South Point; the Christmas Island airport upgrade; road re-alignment and new port facilities north of the former Christmas Island Resort area (Schulz 2004).  Habitat Alteration The loss of other endemic species from Christmas Island such as  Rattus nativitatis  and Maclear\'s Rat,  and impacts on the populations of species, such as the Red Crab, may alter the structure of rainforest habitat also through adverse changes in microhabitats. This may affect rainforest critical to the mainteNAce of shrew populations (Schulz 2004, Meek 1997, 2000).  Predation No instances of predation have been recorded. However, it is likely that introduced predators(e.g. Feral Cat, Black Rat and Wolf Snake), the naturalised Nankeen Kestrel ( Falco Cenchroides ), and endemic predators, such as the Christmas Island Goshawk ( Accipiter hiogaster natalis ) and Christmas Island Hawk-Owl may opportunistically predate on the Christmas Island Shrew (Meek 1997, 2000).  Small Population Size Once recorded as abundant, the shrew is now considered rare, and likely only in low densities. Small population size increases the risk of extinction through inbreeding depression and stochastic events (Caughley & Sinclair, cited in Schulz 2004). The network of wide mining haulage roads may have further isolated populations due to a possible reluctance of individuals to cross wide open spaces due to elevated predation risk (Schulz 2004, Meek 1997, 2000).  Other Potential Threats Roadkills, fire, and domestic cats and dogs on the island may also pose additional risks to the species (Schulz 2004).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86568'),('86598','Euastacus bindal','Critically Endangered','Malacostraca','Parastacidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86598'),('86651','Cuculus optatus','','Aves','Cuculidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86651'),('86675','Hipposideros inornatus','Endangered','Mammalia','Hipposideridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86675'),('86707','Litoria dayi','Vulnerable','Amphibia','Hylidae','NA','This frog is a rainforest species, endemic to the Wet Tropics Bioregion (Williams & Hero 1998, 2001).It is associated with rainforests and rainforest margins. In montane areas the species prefers fast-flowing rocky streams although they also frequent slower watercourses where ample vegetation exists along the margins. At low elevations, the Lace-eyed Tree Frog favours rock soaks, narrow ephemeral streams and rock outcrops in larger watercourses. It may also be found on rocks, boulders and vegetation in or adjacent to streams (Czechura et al. 1987).','Adults feed indiscriminately on both aquatic and terrestrial invertebrates (Hodgkinson & Hero 2002). Their principal diet includes Coleoptera, Aranea, Odonate larvae, Blattodea and Diptera (Hodgkinson & Hero in review).','The reason(s) for the decline of the species are largely unknown. Although in the past habitat destruction may have been a factor, clearing or logging has not taken place in the Wet Tropics World Heritage Area, where the species occurs, since 1988 (McDonald & Alford 1999). Richards et al. (1993) first noted a decline of the species in pristine rainforest habitats in 1989. Richards et al. (1993) reject drought, floods, habitat destruction or changes in water quality (pH, conductivity, temperature, dissolved oxygen and metal ions) as the primary causes of the decline. However, in a study by Hodgkinson & Hero (2002) cold temperatures were found to reduce the activity of the Lace-eyed Tree Frog and it was suggested that prolonged exposure to cold, dry conditions (particularly at high altitudes) may inhibit the breeding and survival of the frogs and influence recruitment in local populations. There has been repeated speculation that UV-B light has caused declines, but there is no evidence to support this and it is now considered unlikely as a hypothesis (NQTFRT 2001).Current research is examining the possibility that disease, possibly a virus or chytrid fungus, may have contributed to the decline of this species (Berger et al. 1999; McDonald & Alford 1999), and there is considerable circumstantial evidence to support this hypothesis (NQTFRT 2001). Individuals collected in December 1998 were infected with the chytrid fungus (Speare & Berger 2000). The Lace-eyed Tree Frog has less effective natural defences (protective skin peptides) against chytrid fungus than other frog species in the same habitats that have not declined (Woodhams et al. 2006).Chytridiomycosis is an infectious disease affecting amphibians worldwide. The disease has been recorded in four regions of Australia, namely the east coast, south-west Western Australia, Adelaide, and more recently Tasmania. This highly virulent fungal pathogen of amphibians is capable at the minimum of causing sporadic deaths in some populations, and 100 per cent mortality in other populations (AGDEH 2006o).Feral pigs are a potential cause of riparian habitat damage and adult frog mortality. The activity of feral pigs has increased over the period 1989-1992 in an area previously inhabited by the Lace-eyed Tree Frog. However, there is very little research into the impact of feral pigs on native frog populations (Richards et al. 1993).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86707'),('86865','Cyrtodactylus sadleiri','Endangered','Reptilia','Gekkonidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86865'),('86868','Pseudococcus markharveyi','Critically Endangered','Insecta','Pseudococcidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86868'),('86875','Kumonga exleyi','Vulnerable','Remipedia','Kumongidae','The Cape Range Remipede is a free-swimming, cave-dwelling, remipede crustacean. It is characterised by a short head and long trunk. The trunk is composed of 21-24 segments, each with a pair of paddle-like swimming appendages. This species grows to 1-1.5 cm long (Clark & Spier-Ashcroft 2003; Yager & Humphreys 1996).','The Bundera Sinkhole is one of a larger karst system of sinkholes and caves that have been carved out of the limestone over millions of years, and is partially fed from an underground aquifer. Below the caves, the aquifer contains a range of unique subterranean aquatic animals such as the Cape Range Remipede (Sutton 2000).There is a single entrance to the sinkhole which is about 20 m wide, below which bacterial colonies grow. The surface of the sinkhole is eutrophic (abundant in nutrients supporting dense algae) allowing very little light penetration. Its maximum depth is 33 m (Clark & Spier-Ashcroft 2003).  The Cape Range Remipede is found at a depth of approximately 30 m (Yager & Humphreys 1996 in Clark & Spier-Ashcroft 2003). The vegetation on the coastal plain, where the sinkhole and caves occur, comprises hummock grasslands with scattered sparse shrubs in a dry, harsh environment with temperatures greater than 35 degrees.','NA','Cave environments are uniquely sensitive to environmental changes and contamination because there is little filtration into the system from above and, in the case of Cape Range, there is little flushing out of the system (Humphreys et al. 1999 in Clarke & Spier-Ashcroft 2003). Activities that may pose a threat to the Cape Range Remipede include mining, grazing and military activities such as RAAF bombing for training purposes (Clark & Spier-Ashcroft 2003).  Other threats to the species include: the continued extraction of water from the aquifer system to supply urban, industrial and tourism activities (Sutton 2000); and diving, due to the disruption of the water layers in the sinkhole which, in turn, change the temperature and chemical composition of each layer (Clark & Spier-Ashcroft 2003).High levels of nutrients in the sinkhole may be due to the Feral Goat\'s ( Capra hircus ) use of the adjacent area .  This form of use, if continued, could represent a threatening process (Yager & Humphreys 1996).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=86875'),('872','Arenaria interpres','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Ruddy Turnstone is a medium sized member of the subfamily Arenariinae. It has a length between 22–24 cm, wingspan of 50–57 cm and a weight of approximately 115 g.','Typical habitatIn Australasia, the Ruddy Turnstone is mainly found on coastal regions with exposed rock coast lines or coral reefs. It also lives near platforms and shelves, often with shallow tidal pools and rocky, shingle or gravel beaches. It can, however, be found on sand, coral or shell beaches, shoals, cays and dry ridges of sand or coral. It has occasionally been sighted in estuaries, harbours, bays and coastal lagoons, among low saltmarsh or on exposed beds of seagrass, around sewage ponds and on mudflats. In north Australia it is known to occur in a wide variety of habitats, and may prefer wide mudflats. In southern Australia the Ruddy Turnstone prefers rockier coastlines and is less numerous on large embayments with extensive mudflats. On Flinders Island, Tasmania, it has been sighted around rocky reefs during spring and summer, and moves to bays and estuaries for autumn and winter. In south-west Australia, it may occur on pebble-strewn shores of saltlakes near the coast. On Rottnest Island, the Ruddy Turnstone prefers shores with scattered fragments of limestone. In New Zealand it has occasionally been recorded in paddocks or grassy areas. Surveys demonstrate that the Ruddy Turnstone can live away from coastal areas in habitats such river beds, and on inland lakes and adjacent farmland (Higgins & Davies 1996). Habitat for feedingThe Ruddy Turnstone mainly forages between lower supralittoral and lower littoral zones of foreshores, from strand-line to wave-zone. They often forage among banks of stranded seaweed or other tide-wrack. They are also known to forage on exposed rocky platforms, coral reefs and mudflats (Higgins & Davies 1996). In the south-east Gulf of Carpentaria they feed only on mangrove mudflats, especially those near shingle beaches (Garnett 1989). Sometimes they feed around coastal lagoons and sewage treatment ponds, occasionally among low vegetation in saltmarsh, on exposed beds of seagrass, or among dunes on coral cays. The have sometimes been known to forage in grassy areas above the tideline, in short pasture, or in ploughed paddocks. On Norfolk Island and Lord Howe Island they have been observed foraging on grassy commons and in floodwaters (Higgins & Davies 1996).Habitat for roostingThe Ruddy Turnstone roosts on beaches, above the tideline, among rocks, shells, beachcast seaweed or other debris. They have also been observed roosting on rocky islets among grassy tussocks, and on mudflats and sandflats. They sometimes fly around, or land on, ships at sea (Higgins & Davies 1996). Surveys have reported them roosting on an inland claypan near Roebuck Bay, north-west Western Australia (Collins et al. 2001).','Summary of food items or sourcesThe Ruddy Turnstone is carnivorous, eating insects, worms, crustaceans, molluscs, and spiders. It has occasionally been known to eat fish, birds\' eggs and carrion and human food scraps. It is capable of ingesting grit (Higgins & Davies 1996). During the summer in peak areas of south and south-east Australia, their main, or only food, is maggots obtained from rotting seaweed, and the larvae of sand-hoppers obtained from the top of sandy beaches where rotting seaweed is buried under a thin layer of sand (C.D.T. Minton 2002, pers. comm.). Feeding behaviours that may make the species vulnerableThe Ruddy Turnstone is diurnal and nocturnal and may feed in different areas depending on the stage of the tidal cycle. They are generally alert, bustling and tame. Their foraging behaviour is distinctive: they feed busily by probing, pecking and prying into crevices, using their sturdy bill to flip over stones, shells, seaweed and other objects. They often dig large holes in sandy areas. They occasionally scavenge on mussels broken open by oystercatchers,  Haematopus  spp., or on tern eggs broken open by Silver Gulls ( Larus novaehollandiae)  and, once, on a beachcast human corpse (Higgins & Davies 1996). They also take scraps thrown by humans (de Rebeira 1997; Lane 1987; Schipper et al. 1996). In Roebuck Bay, Western Australia, they are known to hunt slow-moving prey. Some Turnstones feed on rocky reefs, some feed at the sea edge, and some were found feeding mainly on sandy flats (Rogers 1999a).','Global ThreatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area (Barter 2005c).Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006). Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).Hunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Ruddy Turnstone.Habitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj).Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialized feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation include (but are not restricted to): (1) loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflats; (2) invasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grass; (3) water pollution and changes to the water regime; (4) changes to the hydrological regime and (5) exposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site (DEWHA 2009aj).DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including; fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (i.e. construction sites) and approaching objects (i.e. boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=872'),('874','Calidris acuminata','','Aves','Scolopacidae','The Sharp-tailed Sandpiper is a small-medium wader. The bird has a length of 17–22 cm, a wingspan of 36–43 cm and a weight of 65 g. It is a portly sandpiper with a flat back, pot belly and somewhat drawn-out rear end. It has a small flat head on a short neck with a short and slightly decurved bill. The species has medium length legs. At rest, the primaries are level with or slightly short of the tip of the tail. The primary projection is short in adults and moderately long in juveniles. The sexes are similar and there is marked seasonal variation (Higgins & Davies 1996).','In Australasia, the Sharp-tailed Sandpiper prefers muddy edges of shallow fresh or brackish wetlands, with inundated or emergent sedges, grass, saltmarsh or other low vegetation. This includes lagoons, swamps, lakes and pools near the coast, and dams, waterholes, soaks, bore drains and bore swamps, saltpans and hypersaline saltlakes inland. They also occur in saltworks and sewage farms. They use flooded paddocks, sedgelands and other ephemeral wetlands, but leave when they dry. They use intertidal mudflats in sheltered bays, inlets, estuaries or seashores, and also swamps and creeks lined with mangroves. They tend to occupy coastal mudflats mainly after ephemeral terrestrial wetlands have dried out, moving back during the wet season. They may be attracted to mats of algae and water weed either floating or washed up around terrestrial wetlands, and coastal areas with much beachcast seaweed. Sometimes they occur on rocky shores and rarely on exposed reefs (Higgins & Davies 1996).ForagingThey forage at the edge of the water of wetlands or intertidal mudflats, either on bare wet mud or sand, or in shallow water. They also forage among inundated vegetation of saltmarsh, grass or sedges. They forage in sewage ponds, and often in hypersaline environments. After rain, they may forage in paddocks of short grass, well away from water. They may forage on coastal mudflats at low tide, and move to freshwater wetlands near the coast to feed at high tide. Occasionally they forage on wet or dry mats of algae and among rotting beachcast seagrass or seaweed, and sometimes they are recorded foraging around the edges of stony wetlands or among rocks in water, and rarely on exposed reef (Higgins & Davies 1996).RoostingRoosting occurs at the edges of wetlands, on wet open mud or sand, in shallow water, or in short sparse vegetation, such as grass or saltmarsh. Occasionally, they roost on sandy beaches, stony shores or on rocks in water (Higgins & Davies 1996). They have also been recorded roosting in mangroves (Minton & Whitelaw 2000).','The Sharp-tailed Sandpiper forages on seeds, worms, molluscs, crustaceans and insects (Higgins & Davies 1996).The Sharp-tailed Sandpiper is recorded to eat the following plant seeds:  Paspalum  spp.; clover ( Trifolium  spp.);  Medicago  sp., Lucerne ( M. sativa );  Ruppia  spp . ; goosefoot ( Chenopodium  spp.) and knotweed ( Polygonum  spp.) (Higgins & Davies 1996). The Sharp-tailed Sandpiper is recorded to eat various insects, including the larvae, and molluscs and crustaceans. They also ingest grit, sand and charcoal. They are also reported to eat arachnids and dead fish (Barker & Vestjens 1989; Higgins & Davies 1996).','GlobalHabitat lossThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the EAAF. The greatest threat is direct and indirect habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development including aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported 5% of the combined estimated EAAF populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) and will be reclaimed as part of the ongoing Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Birds Korea 2010; Barter 2002, 2005c). As part of the project, a 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, significantly affecting the 40 100 ha area used by the species (Barter 2005c). Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the EAAF, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006).Reduction in water quality and quantityWater regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998). For example, reduction in river flows in parts of China, due to upstream water diversion, represents potentially significant threats to the species which is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998). Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas. As a result, intensive oil exploration and extraction in China are other potentially signficant threats (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006).DisturbanceDisturbance can result from residential and recreational activities including fishing, power boating, four wheel driving, walking dogs, noise and night lighting. While some disturbances may have only a low impact, it is important to consider the combined effect of disturbances with other threats. Roosting and foraging birds are sensitive to discrete, unpredictable disturbances such as loud noises (for example, construction sites) and approaching objects (for example, boats). Sustained disturbances can prevent shorebirds from using parts of the habitat (DEWHA 2009aj). It is likely that human related disturbances will increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).Global warmingGlobal warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).HuntingHunting is still a very serious problem for waders in China, and this species is sometimes caught (Ming et al. 1998).AustraliaHabitat lossThe loss of important habitat reduces the availability of foraging and roosting sites. This affects the ability of the birds to build up the energy stores required for successful migration and breeding. Some sites are important all year round for juveniles who may stay in Australia throughout the breeding season until they reach maturity. A variety of activities may cause habitat loss. These include direct losses through land clearing, inundation, infilling or draining. Indirect loss may occur due to changes in water quality, hydrology or structural changes near roosting sites (DEWHA 2009aj). Habitat degradationAs most migratory shorebirds have specialised feeding techniques, they are particularly susceptible to slight changes in prey sources and foraging environments. Activities that cause habitat degradation include (but are not restricted to):loss of marine or estuarine vegetation, which is likely to alter the dynamic equilibrium of sediment banks and mudflatsinvasion of intertidal mudflats by weeds such as cord grasswater pollution and changes to the surface water regimechanges to the hydrological regimeexposure of acid sulphate soils, hence changing the chemical balance at the site (DEWHA 2009aj).Direct mortalityDirect mortality is a result of human activities around the migration pathways of shorebirds and at roosting and foraging sites. Examples include the construction of wind farms in migration or movement pathways, bird strike due to aircraft, hunting, chemical and oil spills (DEWHA 2009aj).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=874'),('875','Calidris alba','','Aves','Scolopacidae','An active, pale wader reaching 20 cm long, with a wingspan of approximately 40 cm and a weight of approximately 50–60 g. Females are slightly larger than males. The non-breeding adult is pale grey above and white below, with a black patch at the angle of the wing. It has a short, straight, broad-based black bill, blackish-brown wings with broad, white wing-stripes, and short, black legs that only have three toes (no hind toe as in other sandpipers). In flight, it shows the widest white wing-bar of any sandpiper, on a very dark wing. The forehead and eyebrows are white; iris is dark brown. The rump and tail have a brown centre and white sides. Elements of the rufous breeding plumage may be visible in some birds just after their spring arrival or before their autumn departure, and in some overwintering birds (Geering et al. 2007; Higgins & Davies 1996; NSW DECCW 2005nv; Pringle 1987).','In Australia, the species is almost always found on the coast, mostly on open sandy beaches exposed to open sea-swell, and also on exposed sandbars and spits, and shingle banks, where they forage in the wave-wash zone and amongst rotting seaweed. Sanderlings also occur on beaches that may contain wave-washed rocky outcrops. Less often the species occurs on more sheltered sandy shorelines of estuaries, inlets and harbours. Rarely, they are recorded in near-coastal wetlands, such as lagoons, hypersaline lakes, saltponds and samphire flats. There are rare inland records from sandy shores of ephemeral brackish lakes and brackish river-pools (Higgins & Davies 1996).They roost on/behind:bare sand high on the beachclumps of washed-up kelpcoastal dunesrocky reefs and ledges (Higgins & Davies 1996).Breeding habitat is usually open ground, sometimes on raised hummocks or ridges, in the Arctic tundra of Greenland, Canada and Siberia (Cramp 1985; Pringle 1987).In south-east Queensland, they are occasionally recorded sheltering on tidal flats during storms (Roberts 1979).','The Sanderling is omnivorous, foraging on plants, seeds, worms, crustaceans, spiders, insects, and occasionally on medusae, fish and larger molluscs and crustaceans taken as carrion.Birds are very active when foraging, often in tightly synchronised flocks, darting onto moist sand between breaking waves picking up food items from the surface of the wet beach (Higgins & Davies 1996). Foraging may also occur at the edges of shallow pools on sandspits and on nearby mudflats (NSW NPWS 1999cc). Individuals may also defend a feeding territory during the non-breeding period (Higgins & Davies 1996).','Habitat lossThe greatest threat facing waders is habitat loss, both direct and indirect (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for future development (Barter 2002, 2005b, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Moores 2006; Rogers et al. 2006; Round 2006). In many suitable staging areas along the East Asia Flyway many intertidal areas have been reclaimed, and the process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005b, 2005c). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows, which compound the problem (Barter 2002, 2005b; Barter et al. 1998; Melville 1997).Global warmingGlobal warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997).Recreation and disturbanceThe Sanderling is suggested to be sensitive to displacement by active recreation on beaches in south-east Australia, and in other areas of their range (Lane 1987; Thomas et al. 2003; Watkins 1993). They are noted to occur at less disturbed ocean beaches and to move to undisturbed refuges when disturbance becomes too intense. It is suggested that the most important beaches should be kept free from human disturbance by locating access points to the beach away from important sites (Lane 1987; Watkins 1993). Disturbance from human activities, such as recreational activities, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture in both Australia and other areas of the species range, is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter 2005b; Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).Pollution and diseaseMigratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, such as organochlorines or heavy metals discharged into the sea from industrial or urban sources, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Barter 2005b; Blomqvist et al. 1987; Harding et al. 2007; Huettmann & Gerasimov 2006; Melville 1997; Schick et al. 1987). The Sanderling is also susceptible to avian influenza so may be threatened by future outbreaks of the virus (Melville & Shortridge 2006).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=875'),('87597','Tachyglossus aculeatus multiaculeatus','Endangered','Mammalia','Tachyglossidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87597'),('87605','Petrogale concinna concinna','Critically Endangered','Mammalia','Macropodidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87605'),('87606','Petrogale concinna canescens','Endangered','Mammalia','Macropodidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87606'),('87607','Petrogale concinna monastria','Endangered','Mammalia','Macropodidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87607'),('87608','Petrogale xanthopus celeris','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Macropodidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87608'),('87611','Pteropus natalis','Critically Endangered','Mammalia','Pteropodidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87611'),('87617','Mastacomys fuscus mordicus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Muridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87617'),('87618','Mesembriomys gouldii gouldii','Endangered','Mammalia','Muridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87618'),('87619','Mesembriomys gouldii melvillensis','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Muridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87619'),('87620','Mesembriomys gouldii rattoides','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Muridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87620'),('87639','Rhinolophus robertsi','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Rhinolophidae','The Greater Large-eared Horseshoe Bat has enormous ears and nose-leaf. The fur is long, fine, grey-brown and peppered with white hairs. The fur on the belly is paler in colour. In some individuals, the skin of the nose-leaf, anus and penis or pubic false teats is bright yellow, but the most common colour is greyish. Sexes are similar in appearance and measurements. The fur colour of this species is also very similar to the Lesser Large-eared Horseshoe Bat and some individuals of this latter form may also have yellow skin (Churchill 1998, 2009).','The Greater Large-eared Horseshoe Bat is found in lowland rainforest, along gallery forest-lined creeks within open eucalypt forest,  Melaleuca  forest with rainforest understorey, open savannah woodland and tall riparian woodland of  Melaleuca , Forest Red Gum ( E. tereticornis ) and Moreton Bay Ash ( E. tesselaris ) (Churchill 2009; Pavey & Kutt 2008).Daytime roosting habitat for the Greater Large-eared Horseshoe Bat includes caves and underground mines located in rainforest, and open eucalypt forest and woodland (Pavey 2002). Roosts have also been observed in road culverts, and it is suspected that the species uses basal hollows of large trees, dense vegetation, rockpiles and areas beneath creekbanks (AMBS 2004a; B. Thomson 2007a, pers. comm.; Thomson et al. 2001). Some mines and caves have resident colonies, however most appear to be used irregularly (AMBS 2004a). Non-cave/mine roost habitats might be used more regularly, as individuals captured in flight do not typically display fur bleaching as is characteristic of other species such as  Rhinolophus megaphyllus  that roost deep in mines (B. Thomson 2007a, pers. comm.).At night, they forage mainly in open forest and wattle-dominated ridges in rainforest (Duncan et al. 1999). In open forest and woodland, they prefer to forage amongst the thicker vegetation in gullies and along creeks, though they have been observed at the edge of grassy clearings in rainforest and road edges (Churchill 2009; Pavey 1999, 2002; Pavey & Kutt 2008). They usually fly within the lower half of the canopy between one and eight metres, using gaps such as tracks within rainforest (Churchill 2009; Pavey 2002).  The species has also been observed regularly at canopy height (around 25 m; Whybird 1996; O. Whybird pers. comm. in AMBS 2004a).Daytime refuge habitats for the Greater Large-eared Horseshoe Bat are caves and mines; however, movement between roosts according to seasonal or stochastic factors has not been studied.The species is not associated with a listed threatened ecological community. It may share roosts on occasions with Semon\'s Leaf-nosed Bat ( Hipposideros semoni ), listed as endangered under the EPBC Act, possibly in the Iron and McIlwraith Ranges (B. Thomson 2007a, pers. comm.).','Insect prey items for the Greater Large-eared Horseshoe Bat include mainly moths, with a small proportion of beetles, grasshoppers or crickets (Churchill 2009; Pavey 1999, 2002). It is likely that most moths would be of non-eared families such as the  Anthelidae ,  Lasiocampidae  and  Cossidae , because the call frequency is within the range of hearing of eared moths (Pavey 1999).Insect prey is taken by aerial hawking and to a lesser extent gleaning (picking prey from surfaces), often very close to the ground, or from the ground. Flight is slow and fluttery, with sudden changes of direction and height to capture prey. Bats roost on tree branches for short periods to consume larger prey items or rest, but perch hunting has not been observed. Flights across open spaces are fast and direct, and without foraging (Pavey 1999, 2002; Pavey & Kutt 2008; Whybird 1996).While they have been observed on occasions foraging in rainforest clearings and around a light near a patch of rainforest, they are thought to prefer to remain within canopy (Pavey 1999). Therefore, the loss of native vegetation remNAts and understorey would limit their local distribution.','Documented examples of past habitat loss or disturbance for the Greater Large-eared Horseshoe Bat include:Destruction of five caves used by Greater Large-eared Horseshoe Bats and Ghost Bats ( Macroderma gigas ) at the Mt Consider limestone outcrop, north of Mareeba. The entire outcrop was completely removed and crushed for fertilizer for cane fields.The Paluma mine was closed in 1994 as part of a programme to \"Clean up the Wet Tropics World Heritage Area\"\" (Duncan et al. 1999). This effectively reduced the extent of occurrence of the species',' since this was the most southerly record.The entrance to the Old Collingwood mine at Shipton\'s Flat (near Cooktown) was bulldozed for public safety. A small entrance was reopened illegally to allow bats to enter'),('87645','Miniopterus orianae bassanii','Critically Endangered','Mammalia','Miniopteridae','The Southern Bent-wing Bat is an insectivorous cave dwelling bat. The subspecies has dark reddish-brown to dark-brown fur on the back, grey-brown fur underneath and pale brown areas of bare skin. It has a distinctive short muzzle, a high crowned/domed head and small eyes. The ears are short, rounded and roughly triangular. Head and body length is 52–58 mm, with a forearm length of 45–49 mm. It has the longest wing length of all the Vespertilionidae, being nearly two and half times longer than the head and body. The last phalanx on the third finger of the wing is about four times the length of the middle phalanx, giving a bent wing appearance (Churchill 1998; Hall & Woodside 1989; Menkhorst & Lumsden 1995).','Habitat preference is associated with the availability of foraging areas and proximity to suitable roosting caves.Foraging habitatForaging areas include forested areas, volcanic plains, wetlands, coastal vegetation (including beaches) and urban areas. Primary habitat is predomiNAtly woodlands near large natural wetlands, river basins and agricultural areas (Churchhill 1998). The bat is likely to be associated with several EPBC-listed ecological communities, including the Seasonal Herbaceous Wetlands (Freshwater) of the Temperate Lowland Plains, which is listed as Critically Endangered under the EPBC Act (DSEWPaC 2012t).Roost sitesThe Southern Bent-wing Bat roosts underground, predomiNAtly in caves and mines, however, coastal cliff rock crevices, tunnels and road culverts are also used in some areas (Churchill 2008 cited in Kerr & Bonifacio 2009). The species is likely to be dependent upon the only two known maternity caves (Naracoorte Bat Cave and Starlight Cave) for its survival (Duncan et al. 1999).Each cave has structural characteristics which allow heat and humidity to build up so that conditions are suitable for the nursing of young bats (Dwyer & Hamilton-Smith 1966 cited in Kerr & Bonifacio 2009). Naracoorte Bat Cave is a large dome with high relative humidity (80%) and temperatures of around 30 °C; which is 10 °C above temperatures in the remainder of the cave (Baudinette et al. 1994 cited in Kerr & Bonifacio 2009). Heat production of the bats seems to be the prime factor affecting the microclimate necessary for breeding (Baudinette et al. 1994 cited in Kerr & Bonifacio 2009).Dispersal from maternal caves is probably related to a decrease in prey availability, although some bats remain in maternal caves (Kerr & Bonifacio 2009). Overwintering caves are cool, facilitating entry into torpor and reducing the bats\' net energy expenditure (Kerr & Bonifacio 2009).During the colder months of the year (April–August) the Southern Bent-wing Bat is dispersed over a wide region of south-east South Australia and western Victoria. Over 50 caves are known to be used as overwintering sites, although surveys of these caves have only accounted for a portion of the total population suggesting that there are further sites (Mott & Aslin 2000 cited in Kerr & Bonifacio 2009). During the winter torpor period, bats are particularly affected by disturbance during cooler periods due to their reliance on body fat reserves (Kerr & Bonifacio 2009). Over the winter months, when insect activity is low and food is not readily available, the bats go into a deep hibernation and select the coolest parts of the coolest caves. During this time their body temperature can be down to 2°C, which limits the loss of body fat through winter (Speakman & Thomas 2003).','The Southern Bent-wing Bat is nocturnal and uses echolocation (emission of ultrasonic sounds) for navigation and feeding. Feeding is carried out during flight and prey is caught in the tail or wing membrane and transferred to the mouth whilst in flight; sometimes insects are caught in the mouth (Hall & Woodside 1989). Diet consists of a range of night flying insects such as  Diptera  (mosquitos, midges),  Lepidoptera  (moths),  Orthoptera  (crickets),  Coleoptera  (beetles),  Hemiptera  (bugs) and  Hymenoptera  (ants) species. It is estimated the Southern Bent-wing Bat can consume about 25% of its 15 g body weight per meal and may eat two or three meals per night. Therefore a population of 1000 bats could consume several kilograms of insects per night (SWIFFT 2007).Known foraging sites include: Deadmans Swamp (eucalypt scrubland and swamp); east, south and north-east of Russet Ridge (Sparse Red Gum over pasture and remNAt scrub); Kay Swamp (ephemeral swamp); Kay Park; Wirreebilla/Durr Swamp; Stoney Point; and Prospect Pines (Grant 2004 cited in Kerr & Bonifacio 2009).','A number of threats to the Southern Bent-wing Bat have been identified, but the severity of their impact is not well understood. Threats include:ThreatCommentsHabitat damage or lossIncludes loss of wetlands (including over-exploitation of groundwater), degradation of rivers, loss of foraging habitat (including clearing of linear elements) and agriculture intensification (TSSC 2007t; Kerr & Bonifacio 2009). Ninety percent of native vegetation in the subspecies\' range has been cleared (TSSC 2007t). Revegetation programs to provide feeding habitat and corridors could mitigate the decline (TSSC 2007t).DroughtExtended low rainfall and impacts on prey availability may cause impacts (TSSC 2007t).Pesticide ingestionThe discovery of insecticides in bat guano in Naracoorte Bat Cave, as well as DDT and its metabolites in the bats themselves, suggest that declines may be linked to pollutants. This accumulation may be the result of ingestion of insects exposed to insecticides (Racey & Entwistle 2003; SWIFFT 2007).Maternity roost loss or damageLoss of either one or both maternity roosts, or significant disturbance at critical times, could be catastrophic for the entire population of Southern Bent-wing Bats. Disturbance at maternity caves is considered a major threat because it could cause cave abandonment or impact on the breeding success of the population (TSSC 2007t; Duncan et al. 1999).Roost disturbanceDuring a state of torpor, and particularly over winter when the bats are in a deep hibernation, human disturbance in the form of noise, lights and handling can cause a rise in body temperature and metabolism of body fat, which may reduce survival rates over the period (SWIFFT 2007).  During summer, tourists may enter caves causing bats to flee caves in daylight. Repeated disturbance can result in abandonment of the cave. Some areas along the coast have been rendered unsuitable, sometimes forcing bats to use smaller caves that are in marginal habitat (Lumsden 1998; SWIFFT 2007).  Cave abandonment most likely causes mortality (rather than dispersal to other caves) (SWIFFT 2007).PredationOwls, rats ( Rattus  spp.), the Feral Cat ( Felis catus ) and the Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) may predate the Southern Bent-wing Bat (SWIFFT 2007).WindfarmsWind turbines located near roosting caves (particularly near a maternity cave) can kill significant numbers of bats, particularly if the caves attract bats from around the region and there is frequent flying to and from the maternity cave. A full assessment of potential impacts on bats should be part of any development proposal, which includes assessment of flight paths between the maternity cave and roost sites, between maternity cave and feeding sites, and between roost sites and feeding areas (SWIFFT 2007).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87645'),('877','Charadrius leschenaultii','Vulnerable','Aves','Charadriidae','The Greater Sand Plover is a medium-sized (length: 22–25 cm; weight 75–100 g) brown-and-white plover. Sexes differ when in breeding plumage, but are inseparable when in non-breeding plumage; juveniles are also separable from adults (Marchant & Higgins 1993; Stewart et al. 2007).','In the non-breeding grounds in Australasia, the species is almost entirely coastal, inhabiting littoral and estuarine habitats. They mainly occur on sheltered sandy, shelly or muddy beaches with large intertidal mudflats or sandbanks, as well as sandy estuarine lagoons (Bamford 1988; Blakers et al. 1984; Lane 1987; Sibson 1948; Stewart et al. 2007), and inshore reefs, rock platforms, small rocky islands or sand cays on coral reefs (Abbott 1982; Morris 1989; Sedgwick 1978). They are occasionally recorded on near-coastal saltworks and saltlakes, including marginal saltmarsh, and on brackish swamps (C.D.T. Minton 2002 pers.comm; Sibson 1953; Storr 1964b, 1977; Storr et al. 1986). They seldom occur at shallow freshwater wetlands (Storr 1977). Once, during a severe drought, the species was recorded in a poorly grassed paddock with large bare areas, more than 1 km from the nearest water (Eckert 1968).Feeding habitatGreater Sand Plovers usually feed from the surface of wet sand or mud on open intertidal flats of sheltered embayments, lagoons or estuaries (Ewart 1973; Sibson 1948; Marchant & Higgins 1993), more often on firm sandy flats than on soft muddy ones (Rogers 1999b).Roosting habitatThey usually roost on sand-spits and banks on beaches or in tidal lagoons, and occasionally on rocky points (Bamford 1988; Ewart 1973; Pegler 1983; Sibson 1948, 1953), or in adjacent areas of saltmarsh (Gosper & Holmes 2002) or claypans (Collins et al. 2001). They tend to roost further up the beach than other waders, sometimes well above high-tide mark (C.D.T Minton, 2002 pers.comm).Breeding habitatThe species does not breed in Australia. Greater Sand Plovers breed in open deserts or semi-arid areas which either support very sparse xerophytic vegetation or are completely barren, with expanses of bare gravel, clay or salt, or occasionally in sandhills or heavily grazed plateaux (Cramp & Simmons 1983; Dement\'ev & Gladkov 1951; Wiersma 1996).Approximately one day after a cyclone at Broome, Western Australia, Greater Sand Plovers were recorded in lower than expected numbers; it was thought that birds may have moved to sheltered areas to avoid the high winds and heavy rain associated with the cyclone (Jessop & Collins 2000).The species does not rely on a listed threatened ecological community.','During the non-breeding season, Greater Sand Plovers mostly eat molluscs, worms, crustaceans (especially small crabs and sometimes shrimps) and insects (including adults and larvae of termites, beetles, weevils, earwigs and ants) (Barker & Vestjens 1989; Jessop 2003; MacGillivray 1914; McLenNA 1917; Serventy 1952a; Thomas 1986; van Tets et al. 1969, 1977). They are said to have been recorded eating lizards and plant material (Marchant & Higgins 1993); they may also eat shell grit (Hall 1974). During the breeding season they probably eat insects, including beetles and ants (Dement\'ev & Gladkov 1951).The Greater Sand Plover usually forages visually, with a running, stopping and pecking action typical of many species of plovers, gleaning the surface of the substrate or probing just below the surface (Cramp & Simmons 1983; Jessop 2003; Marchant & Higgins 1993; Rogers 1999a), though some may foot-tremble in the mud or sand to disturb prey (Keeling 1982). They have been recorded wading in water up to belly deep, occasionally putting their heads under water (Glutz von Blotzheim et al. 1975). The species often forages singly or in loose flocks, often with other waders, but tends to avoid foraging in areas where the density of foraging shorebirds is high (Rogers 1999a).','Global ThreatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development or developing them for aquaculture (Barter 2002, 2005c; Ge et al. 2007; Round 2006). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005c). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported  5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005c). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area.Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Round 2006; Wei et al. 2006). Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005c; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Greater Sand Plover.Loss/modification of habitatThe demands of long flights make migratory shorebirds particularly susceptible to loss of, or changes to, the habitat of resting or foraging grounds along their route (DEH 2005c). Site fidelity is another feature of migratory shorebird behaviour which can compound the risk that habitat modification or loss can represent. Residential, farming, industrial and aquaculture/fishing activities represent the major cause of habitat loss or modification in Australia. Residential or other development of saltworks or land adjacent to mudflats near the outskirts of built-up areas can reduce suitable habitat for the species and increase levels of disturbance (Straw 1992a).Increased silt in the water, pollution and  weed or pest invasion of habitats can change the quality or quantity of food available from the sites or modify important biophysical aspects. Pollution is a particular threat as pollutants tend to accumulate and concentrate in wetlands (DEH 2005c). Excess nutrients, including from offsite, diffuse sources, can lead to eutrophication which in turn can impact on the availability of benthic prey species (Harding et al. 2007; Straw 1992a). Industrial pollution, such as in the case of accidental release, can lead to the build up of heavy metals or toxic elements in the substrate of wetlands which, in turn, can affect benthic prey fauna (DEH 2005c). Conversely, efforts to treat effluent before it is released into the greater environment may result in lower levels of bacteria and invertebrates and their larvae which constitute a major proportion of the diet of the Greater Sand Plover.DisturbanceWith increasing tourist visitation and development around Broome, Western Australia, increasing levels of disturbance from human recreational activity are likely. Recreational fishing, four-wheel driving, unleashed dogs and jet-skiing may disturbe the foraging or roosting behaviour of migratory shorebirds. Migratory shorebirds are most susceptible to disturbance during daytime roosting and foraging periods (DEH 2005c). Disturbance can lead to reduced energy reserves required by the birds prior to migration.Introduced SpeciesIntroduced plants, such as Water Hyacinth ( Eichhornia crassipes ) can lead to long-term changes to the nature and biodiversity of wetlands which in turn can affect their suitability for use by migratory shorebirds (DEH 2005c). Introduced plants, such as Cord Grass  Spartinia , can invade intertidal mudflats and reduce the amount of suitable foraging areas, as has already occurred in other countries (Goss-Custard & Moser 1988). Exotic marine pests may also result in the loss of benthic food sources (DEH 2005c).The biological characteristic of the species which poses a key threat to its survival is that it regularly flies for thousands of kilometres over some of the most densely populated areas of the world. Pressures on natural resources in Asia, which may be vital to birds wintering in South-East Asia or possibly those migrating through that region, are highly likely to impact on the species.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=877'),('87732','Hypotaenidia sylvestris','Endangered','Aves','Rallidae','The Lord Howe Woodhen is a large (male 34–42 cm; female 32–37) flightless rail. It has an olive-brown body and bright chestnut wings with narrow dark brown bars on the primaries and primary coverts. It has a long downward-curved bill that is brown at the tip and pink at the base. It has light pinkish-brown legs. Males and females are similar in appearance. Adults have red irides and juveniles have dark irides. The species is highly territorial and occurs in pairs (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','Lord Howe Woodhens occupy the subtropical forests of the oceanic Lord Howe Island (Marchant & Higgins 1993). Woodhens occur in closed forest on boulder covered slopes, steep scree, valleys, plateaus and near cliffs (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hindwood 1940; Hutton 1991; Marchant & Higgins 1993). This species is rarely found in rainforest, the most widespread habitat on the island, but prefers palm dominated lowland closed forest on igneous soils, possibly because this vegetation type has more available food (Hutton 1991; Marchant & Higgins 1993). They also occur in forest bordering pasture and gardens, paddocks and small reedy swamps (Marchant & Higgins 1993).Mountain habitatAt high altitudes, Lord Howe Woodhens occur in gnarled mossy-forest which is unique to the mountain summits. The forest is dominated by Hot Bark ( Zygogynum howeanum ), Fitzgerald ( Dracophyllum fitzgeraldii ), Pumkin Tree ( Negria rhabdothamnoides ), palms and Wild May ( Leptospermum polygalifolium ), with an understorey of tree ferns ( Cyathea ) (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hutton 1991; Marchant & Higgins 1993).Lowland habitatAt lower altitudes, woodhens are largely confined to megaphyllous broad sclerophyll forest, especially stands of Kentia Palm ( Howea forsteriana ) that grow on igneous soils, but also Banyan ( Ficus macrophylla  subsp.  columnaris ), Yellow Tulipwood ( Drypetes australasica ) and Three-veined Laurel ( Cryptocarya triplinervis ) (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hutton 1991; Marchant & Higgins 1993).Nesting, feeding and roosting habitatLord Howe Woodhens have been known to nest on the ground in thick vegetation, under tree roots and fallen logs, and even in a 10–65 cm deep petrel ( Pterodroma ) burrow (Hindwood 1940; Marchant & Higgins 1993).Woodhens feed on the forest floor among soil, leaf litter, palm fronds, rotting logs, moss and lichens (Fullagar 1985; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hindwood 1940; Hutton 1991; Marchant & Higgins 1993). Of 1472 identified feeding sites 52.2% were in soil dominated sites, 30.7% in leaf litter, 4.5% in rotting logs, 5.8% in patches of moss, 3.1% on tree trunks, 1.1% in fern glades and 2.6% in \'other\' areas (Marchant & Higgins 1993).Roost sites are difficult to find because they are often in dense vegetation (Marchant & Higgins 1993). These include petrel burrows, thick clumps of ferns, small caves or open tracks (where birds may huddle). When with young, adult birds may use brood-nests at night or during inclement weather (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','Lord Howe Woodhens mainly eat worms, insect larvae, gastropods and crustaceans (Fullagar 1985; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hindwood 1940; Hutton 1991; Marchant & Higgins 1993). On Mount Gower, 203 feedings were observed, and faecal samples examined (Marchant & Higgins 1993). Plant material comprised a small proportion of the diet, and included: lichen (0.5%); fungi (1.0%); fern fronds (Blechnaceae) (1.5%); and  Randia stipulosa  (Rubiaceae) flowers (4.5%). Invertebrate material included: earthworms (Annelida, Oligochaeta, Lumbricidae) (80.7%); land snails (Mollusca, gastropoda) (0.5%); Amphipods and Isopods (Crustacea, Amphipoda, Isopoda) (2.0%); spiders (Arachnida, Araneae) (0.5%); millipedes (Myriopoda) (1.0%, but generally avoided); and beetle larvae (Insecta, Coleopotera) (7.9%). Other foods reported to be eaten include plant fruits, birds eggs (e.g. often the eggs of Providence Petrels ( Pterodroma solandri ), particularly those dumped on the ground by unsuccessful breeders), bird chicks and human-generated foods (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','PredationPredation by humans and a variety of introduced animals is thought to have been a factor in the decline of the Lord Howe Woodhen (Etheridge 1889; Fullagar & Disney 1975; Hindwood 1940; Hull 1909; NSW NPWS 2002).HumansHunting by humans was probably the primary cause of the initial decline of the woodhen in the settled lowland areas of the island (NSW NPWS 2002). The tame and unsuspecting nature of the woodhen made it an easy target for human hunters (Fullagar & Disney 1975; Hull 1909). It was reported to be the principal food of the early settlers (Hutton 1991) and 82 of the birds were collected on a scientific expedition in 1913–1914 (Fullagar & Disney 1975). Hunting by humans is no longer a threat to the woodhen.PigsPredation by feral Pigs ( Sus scrofa ), probably in combination with associated adverse effects of Pigs on habitat quality, was probably responsible for the decline of the woodhen in the southern mountainous region and in settled areas (Fullagar & Disney 1975; Hull 1909; NSW NPWS 2002). Feral Pigs have now been eradicated from Lord Howe Island (NSW NPWS 2002).DogsPredation by domestic Dogs ( Canis familiaris ) is reported to have contributed to the decline of the woodhen in the settled area of Lord Howe Island (Hindwood 1940; Hull 1909). Predation by uncontrolled domestic Dogs is likely to be minimal today because of more stringent regulations and strong community support for the recovery effort (Garnett & Crowley 2000).CatsPredation by feral Cats ( Felis catus ) was probably partly responsible for the initial decline of the woodhen in the settled lowland areas (Etheridge 1889; Hull 1909; Hutton 1991; NSW NPWS 2002), but feral Cats were uncommon in the southern mountains (Miller & Mullette 1985; NSW NPWS 2002). Feral Cats have now been eradicated from Lord Howe Island and the importation of domestic Cats has been banned (NSW NPWS 2002).RatsThe Black Rat ( Rattus rattus ) is a known predator of woodhen eggs and young (Marchant & Higgins 1993), but its role in the decline of the woodhen is unclear. The Black Rat is found across Lord Howe Island and is present in high densities on the summit of Mount Gower. However, the persistence of the woodhen on the summit of Mount Gower suggests that predation by the Black Rat is having a negligible impact on the woodhen population (Fullagar & Disney 1975; Miller & Mullette 1985).Masked OwlThe only known predator considered to be a significant threat to the woodhen at the present time is the Masked Owl ( Tyto novaehollandiae ) (Garnett & Crowley 2000; NSW NPWS 2002). The Masked Owl was introduced to Lord Howe Island in the 1920s in a failed attempt to control the Black Rat (Hutton 1991). In 1989 the Masked Owl has since been implicated in the decline of woodhen numbers at Little Slope (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Harden 1990a; NSW NPWS 2002) and identified as a possible barrier to population growth in some parts of the islands (NSW NPWS 2002).Loss and degradation of habitatHabitat of the woodhen has been degraded by feral Pigs and Goats ( Capra hircus ). Degradation includes reducing vegetation density, inhibiting natural regeneration of native forest, reducing soil invertebrate diversity and resultant soil erosion. Destructive behaviour includes grazing, digging and uprooting plants (Miller & Mullette 1985; NSW NPWS 2002). Feral Pigs have now been eradicated from Lord Howe Island and feral Goats are near eradication (NSW NPWS 2002).Weeds on Lord Howe Island may pose a threat to woodhen habitat quality (NSW NPWS 2002).Some habitat has been lost through the clearance and disturbance of the island\'s forests for residential and other purposes (NSW NPWS 2002). However, this probably caused the loss of only a small number of birds. Further significant clearing of habitat is unlikely because approximately 75% of the land area of the Lord Howe Island group is located within the Lord Howe Island Permanent Park Preserve. Any changes to the remaining habitat on leasehold land is subject to approval under the Regional Environmental Plan (NSW NPWS 2002).Accidental and incidental mortalityWoodhens are sometimes killed by collisions with motor vehicles or after ingesting poisoned rat bait. A proposal to implement a large scale baiting program to eradicate the Black Rat is currently being planned by the Lord Howe Island Board. The program is to be implemented in a manner that minimises the potential for non-target poisoning of woodhens. This will likely involve the capture and temporary detention of most of the population in captivity during the period over which baits remain viable (D. Priddel 2007, pers. comm.).Competition for food with other speciesIn the settled area of the island, the Common Blackbird ( Turdus merula ) and Song Thrush ( T. philomelos ), which colonised the island in the 1950s, in combination with apparently increasing numbers of the endemic Buff-banded Rail ( Gallirallus philippensis ) and Purple Swamphen ( Porphyrio porphyrio ), may be competing with the Lord Howe Woodhen for food (Fullagar & Disney 1975; NSW NPWS 2002). Feral Pigs might also have competed with the woodhen for food before they were eradicated from the island (Miller & Mullette 1985; NSW NPWS 2002).Decline in supplementary feedingThe cessation of supplementary feeding of woodhens by island residents at some settled areas may have contributed to the low number of woodhens recorded in April 2001. Numbers in the settlement have increased since then, but a future decline in supplementary feeding could have an adverse impact on the woodhen population (NSW NPWS 2002).Limited size and restricted distribution of the populationThe Lord Howe Woodhen is confined to one island location and is vulnerable to disease outbreak or a catastrophic event such as a natural disaster (NSW NPWS 2002). Disease had been suggested as a possible factor in the decline of the woodhen by one island resident (Miller & Mullette 1985). However, studies have found no evidence of disease in the Lord Howe Woodhen (Harden & Robertshaw 1988; Miller & Mullette 1985).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87732'),('87765','Litoria kroombitensis','Critically Endangered','Amphibia','Hylidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87765'),('87805','Trioza barrettae','Endangered','Insecta','Triozidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87805'),('87888','Tympanocryptis condaminensis','Endangered','Reptilia','Agamidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=87888'),('879','Charadrius mongolus','Endangered','Aves','Charadriidae','The Lesser Sand Plover is a small to medium-sized grey-brown and white plover which has a dark eye-stripe and which reaches 18–21 cm in length and 56–71 g in weight. Sexes differ when in breeding plumage, but are inseparable when in non-breeding plumage. Juveniles are distinguishable (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','In non-breeding grounds in Australia, this species usually occurs in coastal littoral and estuarine environments. It inhabits large intertidal sandflats or mudflats in sheltered bays, harbours and estuaries, and occasionally sandy ocean beaches, coral reefs, wave-cut rock platforms and rocky outcrops. It also sometime occurs in short saltmarsh or among mangroves. The species also inhabits saltworks and near-coastal saltpans, brackish swamps and sandy or silt islands in river beds (Marchant & Higgins 1993). In north-western Australia, the species appears to use the Port Hedland saltworks in preference to nearby beaches (C. Minton 2002, pers.comm.). The species is seldom recorded away from the coast, at margins of lakes, soaks and swamps associated with artesian bores (Marchant & Higgins 1993). On its breeding grounds it occurs in alpine valleys (Dement\'ev & Gladkov 1951).Feeding habitatThe species feeds mostly on extensive, freshly-exposed areas of intertidal sandflats and mudflats in estuaries or beaches, or in shallow ponds in saltworks (Evans 1975; Hindwood & Hoskin 1954; Johnstone & Storr 1998; McGill & Keast 1945; Thomas 1968). They also occasionally forage on coral reefs and on sandy or muddy river margins (Booth 1982; Evans 1975; McGill & Keast 1945; Pegler 1983). At inland sites, they have been recorded foraging in muddy areas around lakes, soaks and bores (Badman & May 1983; Henle 1989; McGill & Keast 1945).Roosting habitatThey roost near foraging areas, on beaches, banks, spits and banks of sand or shells (McGill & Keast 1945; Pegler 1983), and occasionally on rocky spits, islets or reefs (McGill & Keast 1945). They rarely roost in mangroves (Hindwood & Hoskin 1954). At inland sites, the species has been recorded roosting on a sandbank in swamp associated with an artesian bore (Badman & May 1983), on the grassy margins of temporary pools on low-lying river islets (McGill & Keast 1945), and on an inland claypan (Collins et al. 2001).Breeding habitatThe species does not breed in Australia. Breeding grounds are characterised by being at high elevations, above the tree-line, in tundra on steppes and in flat, barren valleys and basins; usually in boggy areas, such as the margins of a lake or a bog, or in channelised areas of the upper reaches of rivers (Ali & Ripley 1980; Cramp & Simmons 1983; Dement\'ev & Gladkov 1951).At Roebuck Bay, Western Australia, only two Plovers could be found about a day after a cyclone passed nearby; the rest of the birds are thought to have moved to sheltered areas to avoid the high winds and heavy rain (Jessop & Collins 2000).The species does not rely on the habitat of ecological communities listed under the EPBC Act.','During the non-breeding season Lesser Sand Plovers eat invertebrates, such as molluscs (especially bivalves), worms, crustaceans (especially crabs) and insects (Domm & Recher 1973; Lane 1987). On the breeding grounds, they mostly eat beetles and fly larvae (Dement\'ev & Gladkov 1951; Wiersma 1996).Prey is located by sight, using the typical run-stop-peck method used by most  Charadrius  plovers to glean its prey from the moist substrate (Domm & Recher 1973; Marchant & Higgins 1993), gleaning the surface of the substrate or probing just below the surface, and they sometimes dig in the sand for prey, or lunge or dart at prey (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','Global ThreatsThere are a number of threats that affect migratory shorebirds in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. The greatest threat is indirect and direct habitat loss (Melville 1997). Staging areas used during migration through eastern Asia are being lost and degraded by activities which are reclaiming the mudflats for development (Barter 2002, 2005; Ge et al. 2007). This is especially evident in the Yellow Sea, where at least 40% of intertidal areas have been reclaimed. This process is continuing at a rapid rate and may accelerate in the near future (Barter 2002, 2005). For example, in South Korea, the Mangyeung and Dongjin River estuaries each supported  5% of the combined estimated Flyway populations (and are the most important sites for this species on both northern and southern migration) but they are currently being reclaimed as part of the Saemangeum Reclamation Project (Barter 2002, 2005). The 33 km sea-wall across these two estuaries was completed in April 2006, resulting in significant change in the 40 100 ha area.  Moores (2008) has documented the change in species\' composition and numbers since the sea-wall was completed and there is some indication of a drop in the number of Lesser Sand Plovers recorded since 2006 (Moores 2006, 2008).Reclamation is also a threat in other areas of the Flyway, such as in Malaysia (Wei et al. 2006). In addition, water regulation and diversion infrastructure in the major tributaries have resulted in the reduction of water and sediment flows (Barter 2002; Barter et al. 1998).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997; Wei et al. 2006). Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).It is predicted that the rate of decrease in the intertidal area in the Yellow Sea will accelerate (Barter 2002). In addition, intensive oil exploration and extraction, and reduction in river flows due to upstream water diversion, are other potentially significant threats in parts of China where this species is present in internationally significant numbers (Barter 2005; Barter et al. 1998).Global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of migratory waders (Harding et al. 2007).AustraliaWithin Australia, there are a number of threats common to most migratory shorebirds, including the Lesser Sand Plover.Loss/modification of habitatThe demands of long flights make migratory shorebirds particularly susceptible to loss of, or changes to, the habitat of resting or foraging grounds along their route (DEH 2005c). Site fidelity is another feature of migratory shorebird behaviour which can compound the risk that habitat modification or loss can represent. Residential, farming, industrial and aquaculture/fishing activities represent the major cause of habitat loss or modification in Australia. Residential or other development of saltworks or land adjacent to mudflats near the outskirts of built-up areas can reduce suitable habitat for the species and increase levels of disturbance (Straw 1992a).Increased silt in the water, pollution and  weed or pest invasion of habitats can change the quality or quantity of food available from the sites or modify important biophysical aspects. Pollution is a particular threat as pollutants tend to accumulate and concentrate in wetlands (DEH 2005c). Excess nutrients, including from offsite, diffuse sources, can lead to eutrophication which in turn can impact on the availability of benthic prey species (Harding et al. 2007; Straw 1992a). Industrial pollution, such as in the case of accidental release, can lead to the build up of heavy metals or toxic elements in the substrate of wetlands which, in turn, can affect benthic prey fauna (DEH 2005). Conversely, efforts to treat effluent before it is released into the greater environment may result in lower levels of bacteria and invertebrates and their larvae which constitute a major proportion of the diet of the Lesser Sand Plover.DisturbanceWith increasing tourist visitation and development along the Queensland coast and around Broome, Western Australia, increasing levels of disturbance from human recreational activity are likely. Recreational fishing, four-wheel driving, unleashed dogs and jet-skiing may disturbe the foraging or roosting behaviour of migratory shorebirds. Migratory shorebirds are most susceptible to disturbance during daytime roosting and foraging periods (DEH 2005c). Disturbance can lead to reduced energy reserves required by the birds prior to migration.Introduced SpeciesIntroduced plants, such as Water Hyacinth ( Eichhornia crassipes ) can lead to long-term changes to the nature and biodiversity of wetlands which in turn can affect their suitability for use by migratory shorebirds (DEH 2005c). Introduced plants, such as Cord Grass  Spartinia , can invade intertidal mudflats and reduce the amount of suitable foraging areas, as has already occurred in other countries (Goss-Custard & Moser 1988). Exotic marine pests may also result in the loss of benthic food sources (DEH 2005c). The biological characteristic of the species which poses a key threat to its survival is that it regularly flies for thousands of kilometres over some of the most densely populated areas of the world. The huge human population in east Asia places enormous pressure on natural resources, and manifests itself in activities such as the reclamation of mudflats (Barter 2002, 2005).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=879'),('88','Pseudomys fumeus','Endangered','Mammalia','Muridae','The Konoom is an Australian native rodent with pale grey to black fur, a grey to white belly and ears and feet that are flesh-coloured with sparse white hair. A ring of dark hairs may be present around the eye. The length of individuals, including the tail, is between 180–250 mm. The tail is narrow, flexible, sparsely furred, and white to pale pinkish grey underneath with a narrow dark strip along its upper surface and up to 145 mm in length. The ears are 18–22 mm long and the hind feet 25–29 mm long. Adult weight varies widely between 25–86 g (Edwards 2009; Ford 2008; NSW OEH 2012; Menkhorst 2003).','The Konoom occurs in a wide variety of habitats, from heath to dry sclerophyll forest, especially along ridgetops with a heath understorey, and occasionally adjacent wetter habitats such as fern gullies. A characteristic of many localities, except those in wet gullies, is a floristically diverse shrub layer with members of the plant families Epacridaceae, Fabaceae and Mimosaceae well represented (Cockburn 1981a; Ford et al. 2003; Jurskis et al. 1997; Lee 1995; Menkhorst & Seebeck 1981). Ground cover is often dense and low, such as occurs in heaths, or grass tussocks, rocks and logs in more open habitats that provides shelter sites. Soil conditions also need to be conducive to burrowing and growth of hypogeal fungi, a major component of the diet (Menkhorst & Broome 2008a; Menkhorst 2003). Nesting burrows have been found in rocky localities among tree roots and under the skirts of Grass Trees ( Xanthorrhoea  spp.) (NSW NPWS 1999bu; NSW OEH 2012).The Konoom is not found in disturbed areas (Menkhorst & Broome 2008a) and requires stable habitats, with access to well-developed, diverse, heathy understoreys in which to live and breed successfully (Menkhorst 2003). Schulz and Wilks (2017) however did capture four males in a artificial boulderfield in Kosciuszko National Park. The species has also been found in severely burnt habitat 7 and 21 months following a severe fire (Burns et al. 2016).Capture sites range from near sea level to at least 1800 m altitude (Menkhorst & Broome 2008a).','The Konoom has a seasonal diet that is based on food availability and energetic demands, and relies on nitrogen-rich food sources (Cockburn 1981a). Seeds and fruits from leguminous shrubs and epacrid berries form the main diet in summer and autumn. Some invertebrates, such as Bogong Moths ( Agrostis infusa ), are taken in areas where they occur, for example in early summer as other resources become scarcer. Underground hypogeal (truffle-like) fungi, common round the roots of certain shrubs and grasses, predominate in their winter and spring diets, with some flowers, mosses, seeds and soil invertebrates also taken (ACT TAMS 2010a; Cockburn 1981a; NSW OEH 2012).In spring, as the soil dries and fungi become unavailable, animals living in marginal habitats decline in numbers, especially males (Cockburn 1981b).','Predation by introduced speciesThe relatively low reproductive rate of the Konoom combined with its use of vegetation with an open ground layer, and reliance on shallow burrows and surface nests for shelter make the species highly vulnerable to predation. Predators include introduced species and native predators such as the Spot-tailed Quoll ( Dasyurus maculatus ), pythons ( Morelia  spp.), owls ( Tyto  spp.) and goannas ( Varanus  spp.) (Menkhorst & Broome 2008a). Studies on Cat ( Felis catus ) predation of  Pseudomys  species show that the Cat will \'stake out\' communal nests and potentially eliminate small breeding populations quickly (Ford et al. 2003; Risby et al. 2000 cited in Menkhorst & Broome 2008a).Predator control programs aimed at one species, for example Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) control, may alter population dynamics of other predators, such as the Dingo ( Canis lupus dingo ), the Cat, the Spot-tailed Quoll, and goannas, with subsidiary affects on Konoom populations (Menkhorst & Broome 2008a).Inappropriate fire regimesThe floristic composition and structure of heath and heathy forest plant communities are strongly influenced by fire regimes. Changes to floristics of an area due to frequent burning, such as repeated prescribed burns, has been shown to simplify heath understorey in dry forests and lead to increased predation levels, with the resultant loss of  Pseudomys  species (Catling 1986, 1991 cited in Menkhorst 2003).Frequent burning may also impact on the fungal food resources, which prefer thick litter layers (Claridge & Cork 1997 cited in Menkhorst 2003), and remove hollow logs, which are used for hiding (Ford 1998b cited in Menkhorst 2003). Lack of burning is also deleterious and leads to the senescence of foraging shrubs. Intense, large-scale wildfires are liable to eliminate metapopulations. Fire regimes of moderate frequency (15–20 but up to 40 year intervals) and moderate intensity may maintain preferred understorey floristics at Konoom sites in heath and dry forests (Ford et al. 2003; Menkhorst 2003).Timber harvestingClear-fell logging, and the associated soil disturbance and regeneration burns, destroy Konoom habitat (Menkhorst 2003). Whilst heath species regenerate quickly following clearing, it takes some time for these plants to provide food and for suitable nesting sites to become available. Intensively logged areas often form thick stands of regrowth consisting of  Eucalyptus  and  Acacia  species and the Konoom has not been shown to occupy this type of vegetation. The species may eventually re-inhabit logged areas once suitable habitat has established, however logging cycles undertaken in shorter time frames may not allow for this regeneration (Menkhorst & Broome 2008a).Roads and tracksThe construction of roads and tracks in forests for logging and fire control activities is a threat to a ridge-dependent species such as the Konoom, reducing and fragmenting suitable habitat. This fragmentation can interrupt movement patterns of small mammals (Andrews 1990 cited in Menkhorst 2003). Roads and tracks are also likely to facilitate movement of the Fox (Catling & Burt 1995 cited in Menkhorst 2003) and the Cat, creating further predator pressure on local populations of the Konoom (Menkhorst 2003).Habitat fragmentationHabitat fragmentation, especially the proximity of forested areas to cleared freehold land, has been associated with an increased Fox abundance (Catling & Burt 1995 cited in Menkhorst 2003) that has been shown to impact on similar small mammal species, such as the Hastings River Mouse ( Pseudomys oralis ) (Smith et al. 1996 cited in Menkhorst & Broome 2008a). Dieback caused by  Phytophthora cinnamomiMany of the plant families and genera characteristic of Konoom habitat are known to be susceptible to the  Phytophthora cinnamomi , including the Epacridaceae ( Epacris  spp. , Monotoca  spp.,  Leucopogon  spp.), Fabaceae ( Daviesia  spp. , Pultanaea  spp.), Dillenaceae ( Hibbertia  spp.), Tremandraceae ( Tetratheca  spp.) and Xanthorrhoeacae ( Xanthorrhoea  spp. , Lomandra  spp.).  A decline in understorey species richness of up to 60% has been recorded at sites infected with the  Phytophthora cinnamomi  (Kennedy & Weste 1986 cited in Menkhorst & Broome 2008a). This pathogen has been recorded affecting habitat in some areas known or predicted to contain Konoom populations, such as East Gippsland, the Victorian highlands and the Eden hinterland (Menkhorst & Broome 2008a). Studies on other small mammal groups have shown that this impact on vegetation is a significant variable as it affects vegetation diversity and density (Newell & Wilson 1993 cited in Menkhorst & Broome 2008a; Wilson et al. 1994 cited in Menkhorst & Broome 2008a). The pathogen is more active in low fertile soils, and areas of little leaf litter, likely due to antagonistic actions of other microflora in the litter layer. The impact of infection at some sites may be more virulent due to other stresses present, such as wildfire. The disease is of particular concern where it is widespread and the likelihood of soil movement is high, for example due to forestry activities.Climate changeWith the small amount of suitable habitat available to the Konoom, small increases in annual temperatures are predicted to impact on the species. With habitats shifting latitudinally, as well as to higher altitudes, the species\' habitat is predicted to reduce in size to pockets of habitat in suitable bioclimatic conditions. These changes may increase the distances between populations, impacting on gene flows and population viability (Bennet et al. 1991). BIOCLIM modeling of habitat in Victoria suggests that with a 3 °C rise in temperature, there would be a 66 to 84 % decrease in available habitat in reserved areas known to contain the Konoom (Bennett et al. 1991).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=88'),('88019','Lagorchestes hirsutus Central Australian subspecies','Endangered','Mammalia','Macropodidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=88019'),('88020','Perameles gunnii Victorian subspecies','Endangered','Mammalia','Peramelidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=88020'),('88021','Bettongia lesueur Barrow and Boodie Islands subspecies','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Potoroidae','The Barrow and Boodie Islands subspecies of the Burrowing Bettong is a compact marsupial with grey fur, and a ventral surface that tends to be lighter. Legs, feet and tail are yellowish in colour. It has short, rounded ears, grows to 28 cm in length and has a fat tail which grows to 21.5 cm in length. In some animals, the tail has a distinctive white tip (Strahan 1998).','Burrowing Bettongs live in extensive burrow systems or warrens generally located under limestone caprock on higher ground (Burbidge 1995; Short & Turner 1993), though sandy areas are also used with simpler burrow construction (Sander et al. 1997).Barrow Island is a small limestone island dominated by  Triodia  grasslands (Short & Turner 1991). The distribution of the subspecies across Barrow Island is limited to areas where nearby sites for construction of warrens are available. Rocky substrate areas are avoided (Short & Turner 1994, cited in Richards 2007). Warren systems on Barrow Island have been recorded as extensive, with up to 90 openings and 20–40 bettongs inhabiting these warrens, suggesting a defense mechanism against predation (Sander et al. 1997).The former distribution of the Burrowing Bettong indicates a wider variety of open habitat was utilised (Seebeck et al. 1989 cited in Richards 2007). Suggested former habitat includes the  Triodia  desert, sandhill and claypan country and saltbush scrub on limestone karst (Finlayson 1958; Jones 1923; Short 1999a cited in Richards 2007).Burrowing Bettongs are considered gregarious, sharing warrens or daytime shelter. Often one male is found with many females, or travels to numerous warrens containing females. Females often share with other females but males not with other males. Males can be aggressive in defending females, though it is uncertain if they defend a defined territory (Sander et al. 1997).Burrowing Bettongs reintroduced to Scotia Sanctuary have been shown to utilise microhabitat with slightly denser canopy cover, but not areas of dense canopy cover or groundcover (Pizzuto et al. 2007). Greater movement occurs on sandier areas (including tracks) and these types of habitat may be traversed between foraging areas (Pizzuto et al. 2007). Actvity also centred on areas of reduced duricrust and it has been suggested that a thick crust may mask the scent of food items below the surface (Pizzuto et al. 2007). Also, Burrowing Bettongs were shown to prefer areas of slightly thicker litter depth (1–2 cm) compared with a mean of <1 cm at the site (Pizzuto et al. 2007).','The Burrowing Bettong feeds on a variety of food items, including figs, seeds, roots, termites and fungi (Burbidge 1995).In a study to determine competition with European Rabbits at Shark Bay, the Shark Bay subspecies of the Burrowing Bettong was found to adjust its diet over winter and summer with minimal competition occurring with rabbits at a time of limited food resources. The winter diet of Bettongs included hypogeal fungi, fruit and forbs, whilst their summer diet included seed, stem, and the foliage of shrubs (Robley et al. 2001). It is thought that Burrowing Bettongs will also scavenge carcasses, such as rabbits (Robley et al. 2001).','Threats to the habitat of the Barrow and Boodie Islands subspecies include: disturbance by oilfield activities, especially gravel extraction and road construction; fire; and exotic invasive species (Butler 1987). Disease and climate change are also identified as potential threats (Richards 2007).Feral cats and grazing by domestic stock have been implicated in the disappearance of the Shark Bay subspecies from Dirk Hartog Island.  These threats along with foxes are considered the main causes responsible for the Burrowing Bettong\'s disappearance from the mainland (Short & Turner 1993). Monitors ( Varanus giganteus ) are also reported to be major predators of the species (Short & Turner 1999).An attempt to reintroduce Barrow Island sourced Burrowing Bettongs to the Gibson Desert, following fox and dingo removal, was thwarted by feral cats which killed all released Bettongs within two months (Christensen & Burrows 1995).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=88021'),('88022','Petaurus australis Wet Tropics subspecies','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Petauridae','The Yellow-bellied Glider (Wet Tropics) is a rabbit-sized gliding marsupial with grey-brown fur and a distinctive off-white to yellow-orange belly.  It has a fluffy tail growing to 48 cm long and large, bare ears.  This glider grows to 30 cm long and can weigh up to 700 g (Cronin 1991; Strahan 1998).','The Yellow-bellied Glider inhabits tall open forest on the western fringe of the Wet Tropics Heritage Area.  Floristics of the forest may vary from one location to another but the presence of two eucalypt species,  Eucalyptus resinifera  and  Eucalyptus grandis , is essential. The first is used for sap-feeding (Quin et al. 1996; Russell 1984) and the second as a den tree (Bradford & Harrington 1999; Russell 1984). These occur most commonly in the wetter areas of the open eucalypt forest (Harrington & Sanderson 1994). These two species of eucalypt also have disjunct distributions with isolated populations west of Mackay and in the Atherton region and main distributions further south (Chippendale 1988).','There are two detailed studies of feeding behaviour and diet of the Yellow-bellied Glider in north Queensland (Quin et al. 1996; Smith & Russell 1982). Observations of feeding behaviour indicate sap of  Eucalyptus resinifera  is the most important item (over 80% of observations year round), while nectar and pollen of  Banksia integrifolia  are a secondary component of autumn and winter diet. Feeding on other sources (arthropods, honeydew, manna and nectar or pollen of other tree species) has been observed much less frequently. Faecal analysis indicates that sap and eucalypt flowers or pollen are consumed by over 50% of animals throughout the year, and confirms the importance of  Banksia  pollen in autumn and winter. Pollen from a wide variety of other tree species is also prevalent, particularly in summer and autumn samples. Arthropods are present in faeces throughout the year (Quin et al. 1996).While sap from   Eucalyptus resinifera  is the most important dietary item, each group of gliders maintains an average of only two active feeding trees per group (Quin et al. 1996) although earlier observations indicate three or more trees may be used (Russell 1984). In any event the proportion of available feed trees used is very small, estimated to be less than 1% of available trees (Bradford & Harrington 1999). The reasons for the low proportion of available trees actually used is unknown but speculations have included elevated sap flow in certain individual trees (Goldingay & Kavanagh 1991). This selectivity on the part of the gliders contributes to their vulnerability to habitat destruction or alteration.','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=88022'),('88056','Argynnis hyperbius inconstans','Critically Endangered','Insecta','Nymphalidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=88056'),('882','Charadrius veredus','','Aves','Charadriidae','The Oriental Plover is an elegant, medium-sized (length: 21–25 cm; weight: 95 g) plover with long legs. Sexes differ when in breeding plumage, but are inseparable when in non-breeding plumage; juveniles are separable from adults.','Immediately after arriving in non-breeding grounds in northern Australia, Oriental Plovers spend a few weeks in coastal habitats such as estuarine mudflats and sandbanks, on sandy or rocky ocean beaches or nearby reefs, or in near-coastal grasslands, before dispersing further inland (Bigg 1981; Bransbury 1985; Crawford 1972; Murlis et al. 1988; Serventy & Whittell 1976; Storr 1977, 1980, 1984b). Thereafter they usually inhabit flat, open, semi-arid or arid grasslands, where the grass is short and sparse, and interspersed with hard, bare ground, such as claypans, dry paddocks, playing fields, lawns and cattle camps (Boekel 1980; Carruthers 1966; Close 1982; Fletcher 1980; Pedler 1982; Storr 1980), or open areas that have been recently burnt (Boekel 1980; Chatto 2003; Crawford 1972; Garnett 1986; Storr 1977). At the onset of the Wet Season, some may move into lightly wooded grasslands (Storr 1977). Some remain in estuarine and littoral environments, and a few are occasionally recorded around terrestrial wetlands or flooded paddocks (Boekel 1980; Close 1982; McCrie 1984). Vagrants in southern Australia have been recorded in saltmarsh (Park 1983; Patterson 1983; Pedler 1982).Feeding habitatOriental Plovers usually forage among short grass or on hard stony bare ground (McCrie 1984), but also on mudflats or among beachcast seaweed on beaches (Bigg 1981; Close 1982).Roosting habitatOriental Plovers sometimes roost on soft wet mud or in shallow water of beaches and tidal mudflats (Bransbury 1985; Close 1982; Cox 1988; McCrie 1984; Serventy & Whittell 1976), and also occasionally in dry, open habitats, such as saltmarsh or paddocks (McCrie 1984; Park 1983; Patterson 1983).Breeding habitatThe species does not breed in Australia. The secies breeds in western, northern and eastern Mongolia, with some irregular breeding grounds in Russia, close to the Mongolian border (Marchant & Higgins 1993). Oriental Plovers usually breed in arid elevated areas on extensive open upland flats, mountain ridges or plateaux where sparse vegetation such as moss, lichen or short grass is interspersed with patches of bare rock (Wiersma 1996).The species does not rely on a listed threatened ecological community.','Little is known of this species\' diet. It has only been recorded eating insects, including termites, beetles, grasshoppers, crickets and bugs (Berney 1907; van Tets et al. 1969).The Oriental Plover sometimes feeds at night (Wiersma 1996). They feed with a running, stopping and pecking action typical of many species of plovers, gleaning and probing the substrate, and may forage in loose flocks, often with other waders and waterbirds (Lane 1987; Marchant & Higgins 1993).','Though there are no threats that apply specifically to Oriental Plovers, there are a number of threats that will affect all migratory waders.Australia   In Australia, the species occurs in sparsely-settled areas, and there are no immediate threats to its survival (Marchant & Higgins 1993).  Little is known about the inland ephemeral wetlands that occur over vast areas of northern Australia, nor about the effects of grazing on this species\' grassland habitat (Watkins 1993). If the pattern of grazing on these grasslands was to change or stop, or pastures were modified (for example, replaced by exotic grasses, or fertilized so that it grew denser) it could become too long or dense for use by Oriental Plovers. Neither of these scenarios appears likely.With increasing tourist visitation around Broome, and subsequent development, increasing levels of disturbance from human recreation are likely (Rogers 1999b).The species often forages on airfields at night, when large numbers may be struck by aircraft (van Tets et al. 1969). Oriental Plovers are occasionally recorded being killed by vehicles on roads (Marchant & Higgins 1993), but the occurrence of such incidents is likely to be greatly under-reported (C.D.T. Minton 2002, pers. comm.).Elsewhere  There are a number of threats that affect migratory waders in the East Asian-Australasian Flyway. During migration the species occurs only in small numbers in the Yellow Sea, and mainly in non-tidal habitats, so they are largely unaffected by land reclamation schemes in intertidal areas (Barter 2002, 2005c). Nevertheless, the greatest threat facing all migratory shorebirds is habitat loss, both direct and indirect (Melville 1997). Staging areas used by Oriental Plovers during migration are unknown (Branson & Minton 2006). These may be threatened by degradation, modification or may be lost altogether.In addition, global warming and associated changes in sea level are likely to have a long-term impact on the breeding, staging and non-breeding grounds of all migratory shorebirds (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997).Migratory shorebirds are also adversely affected by pollution, both on passage and in non-breeding areas (Harding et al. 2007; Melville 1997).Disturbance from human activities, including recreation, shellfish harvesting, fishing and aquaculture is likely to increase significantly in the future (Barter et al. 2005; Davidson & Rothwell 1993).The biological characteristic of the species which poses a key threat to its survival is that it regularly flies for thousands of kilometres over densely populated areas where pressure on natural resources, and the modification or destruction of key habitats will have serious detrimental effects on populations of migratory waders.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=882'),('88217','Antechinus arktos','Endangered','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=88217'),('88218','Antechinus argentus','Endangered','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=88218'),('88315','Nannoperca pygmaea','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Percichthyidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=88315'),('88328','Saiphos reticulatus','Vulnerable','Reptilia','Scincidae','The Three-toed Snake-tooth Skink has reduced limbs, each with three digits (Cogger 2000). Snout-vent length (SVL) is reported as 180 mm (Cogger 2000), 195 mm (Wilson 2005; Wilson & Swan 2000) and 231 mm (McDonald 1977). Two hatchlings had a SVL of 60 mm and 58 mm and a total length of 113 mm and 112 mm (Couper et al. 1992). Measurements of nine intact specimens had tails that were 9–45% longer than their SVL (McDonald 1977), which suggests a total length of 483–565 mm.','The Three-toed Snake-tooth Skink has been found in loose, well mulched friable soil, in and under rotting logs, in forest litter, under fallen hoop pine bark and under decomposing cane mulch (DERM 2009a cited in Borsboom 2009; Duncan 209; Ehmann 1987; McDonald 1977; Queensland Museum 2009 cited in Borsboom 2009). Projected foliage cover was estimated at 70–80% at two sites (Ehmann 1987). In the Cooloola and Fraser Island area, the species is found in forest that grows on silica sand (McDonald 1977); in upland areas, the species is found in forests occuring on basalt derived soils (Couper et al. 1992).In Queensland, the Three-toed Snake-tooth Skink has been recorded in rainforest, closed forest, wet sclerophyll forest, tall open Blackbutt ( Eucalyptus pilularis ) forest, tall layered open eucalypt forest and closed Brush Box ( Lophostemon confertus ) forest (Couper et al. 1992; DERM 2009a cited in Borsboom 2009; Ehmann 1987; Greer & Cogger 1985; McDonald 1977; Queensland Museum 2009 cited in Borsboom 2009). It has also been recorded from extensive regrowth in heavily logged areas (Czechura 1974).In NSW, the Three-toed Snake-tooth Skink has been recorded in dry rainforest, northern warm temperate rainforest, subtropical rainforest, grassy wet sclerophyll forest and shrubby sclerophyll forest (NSW DECCW 2009b cited in Borsboom 2009; NSW OEH 2013c). Records have been made in logged and unlogged forest (NSW DECCW 2009b cited in Borsboom 2009).','Examination of the Three-toed Snake-tooth Skink\'s stomach contents has found earthworms, a beetle larva, insect remains and mud (McDonald 1977). It is believed the Three-toed Snake-tooth Skink would encounter earthworms on the forest floor at night and in the loose soil that the skink burrows (McDonald 1977). In captivity the skink feeds on worms while beneath the soil surface (Ehmann 1987). It has been suggested the pointed and recurved teeth of the skink are an adaptation for preying on worms (Greer & Cogger 1985).','The Three-toed Snake-tooth Skink is currently threatened by (NSW OEH 2013c):Clearing of habitat.Removal of fallen logs and leaf litter through frequent fire.Loss of leaf litter and compaction of soil through grazing by stock.Habitat degradation and loss of shelter and forage habitat through habitat degradation caused by the Pig ( Sus scrofa ).Fire causing loss of habitat at the edge of and within rainforest.Much of the lowland closed forest within the species\' range has been cleared for agriculture and grazing, pasture improvement, crop production, tropical fruit production and native forest logging. Suitable habitat has generally been reduced to patches, especially in lowland areas (Cogger et al. 1993). Broad scale clearing of remNAt vegetation on Queensland freehold and leasehold land ceased in December 2006, as part of a phase out of such clearing through legislation enacted in 2004 (Qld DERM 2009d). Some clearing is exempt (fencing, roads, firebreaks, infrastructure construction) (Qld DERM 2009d) and the impact of such activity is likely to be greater in fragmented habitat.The Cat ( Felis catus ) and the Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ) are known to prey on skinks and are mapped as widespread at varying densities across the Three-toed Snake-tooth Skink\'s range (Borsboom 2009). The Pig ( Sus scrofa ) is likely to pose a more significant threat given the degradation that it can cause to ground and litter layers (Laurance & Harrington 1997; Mitchell & Mayer 1997; Mitchell et al. 2007), although the species is absent across some of the skink\'s range (Borsboom 2009).Rotation logging is predicted to reduce the long-term number of large fallen logs (Parsonson 1994), which is preferred refuge for the Three-toed Snake-tooth Skink. Rotation logging will leave smaller logs and other logging debris, provided that that they are not burnt in post-logging regeneration burns (Parsonson 1994).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=88328'),('88453','Phascogale tapoatafa kimberleyensis','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Dasyuridae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=88453'),('88677','Galaxiella nigrostriata','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Galaxiidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=88677'),('88994','Hypotaenidia philippensis andrewsi','Endangered','Aves','Rallidae','The Buff-banded Rail (Cocos (Keeling) Islands) is a short billed rail, with a slight size difference between males and females (male 300-316mm, female 280-294mm) (Johnstone & Darnell 2004). Both sexes are similar in appearance with russet-flecked dusky crown, a light rust nape and dark grey-black feathers with a tinge of brown on the mantle, back and scapular (Reid 2000; Schodde & Tidemann 1986). The back is heavily spotted with white all the way down to, and including, the rump. Prominent white barring occurs on the dark grey-black tail (Reid 2000). Wings are dusky with broad rust-buff bars grading whiter. The face has a prominent white-grey eyebrow, a broad rust stripe through the eye to the nape and grey cheeks. The eye is red. The sides of the throat and neck are pale grey (Johnstone &  Darnell 2004). Black and white bars cover the ventral surface broken at the breast centre by a wide vertical buff band. The bill is brown, and legs and feet are light brown. Immature birds are duller without russet on the hind neck or buff band on the breast, and the eye is brown. Downy young are sooty black (Schodde & Tidemann 1986).','The following information describes habitat for the species as a whole.Buff-banded Rails occupy permanent and ephemeral (non-permanent), fresh and saline, terrestrial, estuarine and littoral (costal) wetlands. These include swamps, marshes, lakes, coastal lagoons, billabongs, rivers, creeks, pools, temporarily inundated depressions, saltmarsh, tidal mudflats and artificial wetlands, such as sewage farms, farm dams, channels and ditches (Marchant & Higgins 1993).In coastal areas, they may occur on beaches, reef flats and sand banks. They also occur in damp grasslands, heathland, woodlands and forests, and on coral cays and other islands. They are usually found in dense vegetation, including overgrown grass, reeds, rushes, sedges and other rank vegetation, and sometimes in mangroves. They also occur in non-wetland vegetation, including grasslands, pastures, crops, forests, rainforests and woodlands (Reid 2000). The Buff-banded Rail (Cocos (Keeling) Islands) utilises all habitats equally and occurs throughout North Keeling Island (Reid 2000), even foraging occasionally in the intertidal zone and venturing into shallow rock pools to bathe (Reid & Hill 2005). Up to 40 birds at one time have been seen foraging on the lagoon shore, and this seems to be a preferred feeding habitat (Hopton 2003; Reid & Hill 2005).The Cocos-Keeling Islands are situated in the tropics and comprise two coral atolls, the islands of which attain only a few metres height above sea level (Reid 2000). On North Keeling Island, the Buff-banded Rail (Cocos (Keeling) Islands) occurs in all habitats, including  Pisonia grandis  forest (53% of North Keeling Island),  Cordia  woodland (8%), coconut plantation (5%), mixed  Pisonia  forest and coconut plantation (29%) and along the lagoon shore (5%); they appear to use each habitat in approximate proportion to each habitats\' occurrence (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Reid 2000; Stokes 1984). On West Island, the Buff-banded Rail (Cocos (Keeling) Islands) formerly used an airstrip for feeding, and sheltered in thickets of  Scaevola taccada  (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Stokes 1984).Breeding:In general, Buff-banded Rails often nest on or close to the ground (< 1.5 m) around wetlands or in pasture or crops among tall and dense clumps of grass, rushes, sedges, samphire, shrubs e.g.  Melaleuca  or fallen timber (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Gibson-Hill 1949; Marchant & Higgins 1993; Reid 2000; Stokes 1984). On North Keeling Island, the Buff-banded Rail (Cocos (Keeling) Islands) nests in the fallen debris of  Pisonia  trees, including among logs, in the hollows of stumps, and in the forks. They may also nest at the base of a frond in a Coconut Palm  Cocus nucifera  or in grass tussocks or other similar ground vegetation (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Reid 2000; Stokes 1984).Feeding:In general, Buff-banded Rails forage around the vegetated margins of wetlands on mud among or adjacent to tall grass, rushes, sedges and samphire. They feed at grassy banks or flats next to wetlands, or among other concealing vegetation such as shrubs or willows  Salix . They also feed among mangroves at low tide; on beaches and reef flats; in heathlands, especially those intersected by creeks; in pastures; on lawns and pathways in gardens; and in rubbish tips (Marchant & Higgins 1993). Rails may also feed from the trunks of mangrove trees, from which they take encrusting invertebrates (Robertson 1985).On North Keeling Island, the Buff-banded Rail (Cocos (Keeling) Islands) forages along the lagoon shore taking crustaceans from stranded sea grass, or on the forest floor and in open purslane herbland; on West Island, birds fed on the airstrip (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Reid 2000; Stokes 1984).Roosting:The Buff-banded Rail (Cocos (Keeling) Islands) either roost in trees (e.g.  Pisonia  trees) and shrubs to a height of 2 m above the ground, or on the ground amongst rank grass (Reid 2000).Loafing and perching:There is no specific information for the Buff-banded Rail (Cocos (Keeling) Islands). In general, the species roosts, loafs and perches in thick, tall clumps of concealing vegetation, such as grass, reeds, rushes or shrubs. On Raine Island, rails have been recorded sheltering in petrel burrows and under coralline rocks during the heat of the day (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','In general, Buff-banded Rails are omnivorous, taking mostly crustaceans, molluscs, worms and other invertebrates (e.g. insects), but also plants, seeds, fruits, frogs, eggs, carrion and refuse (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Marchant & Higgins 1993). The Cocos (Keeling) Islands population behaves like small chickens and the birds appeared to have a fairly generalised diet (Reid 2000). The Buff-banded Rail (Cocos (Keeling) Islands) share a similar diet to that of Jungle Fowls which have been introduced to many islands on the southern atoll of the Cocos (Keeling) Islands. Although there have been no studies focusing on dietary overlap it is possible that the Buff-banded Rail (Cocos (Keeling) Islands) may have to compete with the larger Jungle Fowl where they co-occur in the low nutrient environment of the Cocos (Keeling) Islands (Reid 2000).','The conversion of diverse  Pisonia  forests to simplified coconut plantations, predation by feral cats, Black Rats, Brown Rats and perhaps people (hunting), and competition for food with feral chickens have all probably contributed to the extinction of  Gallirallus philippensis andrewsi  on the main (southern) atoll (DEH 2005; Garnett & Crowley 2000; Gibson-Hill 1949b; Reid 2000; Stokes 1984). It is difficult to retrospectively identify which is the most important factor in the decline of the subspecies (Reid 2000).The loss of critical food resources on the southern islands may have also contributed to the decline of the species (Reid 2000), although Reid (2000) considers that the most significant agent of decline on the southern islands is predation by cats. North Keeling Island escaped the worst of the habitat transformation and other threatening factors associated with human settlement due to its isolation and lack of a safe landing place for settlers (Reid 2000). Nonetheless, the population of North Keeling Island supports less than 1000 mature individuals in a small area of 120-130 ha (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Reid 2000).For the Buff-banded Rail (Cocos (Keeling) Islands), the genetic problems associated with small populations (e.g. genetic and demographic failure, inbreeding depression, genetic bottlenecks), as well as environmental catastrophes (e.g. cyclones, droughts) also threaten this small and sole population (Reid 2000). Environmental catastrophes pose the biggest threat to the security of this population (Reid 2000). Rising sea levels associated with climatic change, poses a significant future threat to the islands, which attain no more than 4 m in height above sea level (JR Reid 2002, pers. comm.). Furthermore, the potential for more extreme cyclones in the Cocos (Keeling) Islands region associated with climatic change warrants further investigation (JR Reid 2002, pers. comm.).An additional threat is the introduction of any threatening processes to North Keeling Island. These include rats, cats and chickens and also other diseases, parasites or invertebrates (such as the scale insect that allows crazy ants to create supercolonies) (DEH 2005a). North Keeling Island has quarantine procedures in place to reduce the possibility of this threat (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Reid 2000). Tropical cyclones occur throughout the region. In the past 40 years, 30 have passed within 100 km of the Cocos (Keeling) Islands (Director of National Parks 2004). Recently, Tropical Cyclone Walter passed within 19 km of North Keeling Island. Although there was damage to the vegetation, the cyclone had little medium-term impact on the Buff-banded Rail (Cocos (Keeling) Islands) population (Reid & Hill 2005). Biological characteristics threatening to the survival of the species are currently not known. Given the isolation and small population size it is likely that the North Keeling Island population has low genetic diversity (D. Alpers 2005, pers comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=88994'),('89125','Bertmainius colonus','Vulnerable','Arachnida','Migidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=89125'),('89126','Bertmainius tingle','Endangered','Arachnida','Migidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=89126'),('89221','Diomedea epomophora','Vulnerable','Aves','Diomedeidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=89221'),('89223','Diomedea exulans','Vulnerable','Aves','Diomedeidae','The Wandering Albatross has the longest wing-span of any ocean bird, spanning 2.5 - 3.5 m. In flight, the Wandering Albatross may appear somewhat humpbacked, and with pink toes visible.','The Wandering Albatross is marine, pelagic and aerial (Falla 1937; Hicks 1973). It occurs where water surface temperatures range from -2° to 24°C (Biermann & Voous 1950, Grindley 1981).In the Antarctic, the Wandering Albatross occurs in open water, rarely entering the belt of icebergs (Falla 1937; Hicks 1973). In late summer, it may approach the edge of the pack-ice (Darby 1970).In the Antarctic, it concentrates near submarine plateaux, banks and ridges (Johnstone & Kerry 1976). In the Australasian region, it occurs inshore, offshore and in pelagic waters (Barton 1979, 1980; Blaber 1986; Norris 1967). It flies within 15 m of the sea surface, using the updraft from wave fronts for lift. It circles over breeding islands to heights of at least 1500 m (Marchant & Higgins 1990).On breeding islands, the Wandering Albatross nests on coastal or inland ridges, slopes, plateaux and plains, often on marshy ground (Falla 1937; Warham & Bell 1979). Nests of the Wandering Albatross are sited on moss terraces, in dense tussocks, and often in loose aggregations on the west (windward) side of islands. It prefers open or patchy vegetation (tussocks, ferns or shrubs), and it requires nesting areas that are near exposed ridges or hillocks so that it can take off (Warham & Bell 1979).','The Wandering Albatross eats mainly squid and fish, but also crustaceans and carrion (Marchant & Higgins 1990).The Wandering Albatross feeds mainly in pelagic, offshore and inshore waters. It feeds from the sea surface or just below it, or makes shallow dives from heights of 2-5 m (Harper 1987; Voisin 1981). It regularly feeds in sheltered harbours and straits (Secker 1969), and sometimes gathers at outfalls of unmodified sewage (Milledge 1977). Foraging behaviours such as flying long distances to search for food, following boats, feeding aggressively on offal and diving for baits makes the species susceptible to being drowned in longline fishing gear (DEH 2006).','The mobility of the Wandering Albatross means that individuals have a high probability of encountering longline fishing boats from which they take bait, frequently swallowing hooks and drowning, or dying from injuries after release (Brothers 1991; Gales et al. 1998). Oceanic longline fishing has been used to target pelagic and demersal fish in the southern oceans since the 1950s, and is used in almost all Australian waters today (DEH 2006). Gales and Brothers (1995) reported that 75% of the birds killed on longlines and retained for identification were albatrosses. Internationally, some longline fishing fleets still operate without substantial by-catch mitigation measures. Therefore, birds breeding within the Australian Fishing Zone are still killed on longlines from vessels operating outside the Australian Fishing Zone (AGDEH 2006q). Hook and plastic ingestion also potentially threaten the Wandering Albatross. Hook ingestion by albatross and giant-petrels appears to have increased in recent years. Between 50 and 100 million hooks are set each year in the Southern Ocean and as many as 1.1 billion hooks are set globally. Both seabirds and fishing vessels concentrate in areas of high biological productivity (AGDEH 2006q).The population of the Wandering Albatross breeding on Macquarie Island was devastated by sealers during the 19th century. There was an initial population increase on Macquarie Island following the cessation of sealing. This has now been reversed since the advent of longline fishing, because high bycatch and mortality rates of Wandering Albatrosses are decreasing the size of breeding colonies (Garnett & Crowley 2000).The Wandering Albatross is shot for bait, or to prevent it from scavenging bait from dropline fisheries (Environment Australia 2001f). It may also be threatened by ingestion of plastics and hooks and regurgitation of these to chicks, entanglement in marine debris and accumulation of chemical contamiNAts (Environment Australia 2001f; Marchant & Higgins 1990). The species may also die from collisions with cables and warps used on fishing trawlers. Outside of the Australian Fishing Zone, trawlers carrying netsonde monitor cables or their equivalent may cause substantial mortality in albatrosses (Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1998; Weimerskirch et al. 1997; Weimerskirch & Jouventin 1998). Trolling (trailing a line with baited hooks) for pelagic species such as Albacore Tuna  Thunnus alalunga  is another potential threat (Environment Australia 2001f; Gales 1998; Weimerskirch et al. 1997; Weimerskirch & Jouventin 1998).Breeding success and/or nest-site selection of the Wandering Albatross on Macquarie Island since the cessation of hunting by sealers has probably been adversely affected by the increased population of Subantarctic Skuas  Catharacta lonnbergi , and human disturbance (Environment Australia 2001f).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=89223'),('89224','Thalassarche cauta','','Aves','Diomedeidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=89224'),('89262','Osphranter robustus isabellinus','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Macropodidae','The Barrow Island Wallaroo is a stocky, dark-backed marsupial with a paler coloured belly and coarse, shaggy fur (Strahan 2002; van Dyck & Strahan 2008). It is smaller than the mainland form of the Wallaroo. While the mainland form have an average weight of 35 kg (male) and 16 kg (female), the Barrow Island Wallaroo is much smaller, with an average weight of 20 kg (male) and 8 kg (female). This species has a relatively short, thick tail (Cronin 1991; Strahan 2002).','Barrow Island is a small, limestone island dominated by  Triodia  grasslands. Barrow Island Wallaroos occur mainly in the deeply dissected country in the central west of the island, along coastal fringes where low cliffs provide shade and in flood-out flats where grasses other than  Triodia  dominate (Short & Turner 1991).','The Barrow Island Wallaroo is reported to feed on growing flower stalks of  Triodia  (Short & Turner 1991).','The introduction of invasive animals and plants to Barrow Island and inappropriate fire regimes represent the greatest potential threats to the population of the Barrow Island Wallaroo.Processing facilities have been present on the Island since the mid 1960s and there have been approximately 10 000 cargo landings of both marine barges and aircraft since the 1960s (Bowen 2005) while there have also been several hundred thousand movements of people on and off the Island. Two breaches of quarantine have resulted in vertebrate introductions, including two house mice found in a drilling rig in 1995 and a single mouse found in a car wreck imported for emergency training purposes in 1998. These mice were contained and eradicated (Lagdon 2002 cited in Bowen 2005). There are four introduced weed species which have a small presence around the airport and camp facilities (Lagdon 2002 cited in Bowen 2005).Casson (2003) reports that naturally occuring fires on Barrow Island have been suppressed over the last 40 years or so and that the continued surpression of naturally occuring fires may eventually alter the vegetation structure, particularly the ratio of fire sensitive/fire adapted species.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=89262'),('89284','Pterodroma arminjoniana','Critically Endangered','Aves','Procellariidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=89284'),('895','Charadrius bicinctus','','Aves','Charadriidae','The Double-banded Plover is a medium sized dotterel, growing to approximately 20 cm and weighing 60 g.  This species has a range of plumages according to age, sex and time of year. The breeding adult has white underparts except for two bands, a thin black band on the lower neck and a broad chestnut band on the breast. All have a short dark grey bill, black eye and yellowish, grey, green legs (New Zealand Birds 2005).','The Double-banded Plover is found on littoral, estuarine and fresh or saline terrestrial wetlands and also saltmarsh, grasslands and pasture. It occurs on muddy, sandy, shingled or sometimes rocky beaches, bays and inlets, harbours and margins of fresh or saline terrestrial wetlands such as lakes, lagoons and swamps, shallow estuaries and rivers. The species is sometimes associated with coastal lagoons, inland saltlakes and saltworks. It is also found on seagrass beds, especially  Zostera , which, when exposed at low tide, remain heavily saturated or have numerous water-filled depressions. This species sometimes utilises kelp beds (R.J. Pierce in Marchant & Higgins 1993).The Double-banded Plover is found on open grassy areas including short pasture, ploughed or newly cropped paddocks, swards, airstrips, and sports grounds such as golf courses or race-tracks near the coast and further inland (R.J. Pierce in Marchant & Higgins 1993).The species is sometimes found on exposed reefs and rock platforms with shallow rock pools and also on coastal sand dunes. It sometimes takes advantage of floodwaters, drowned river valleys and occasionally areas of bare pumice or scoria (R.J. Pierce in Marchant & Higgins 1993).At high altitudes in New Zealand, the Double-banded Plover utilises dry montane habitats with short vegetation, including subalpine meltwater basins and streams, cirques, tarns and swamps, tundra, fellfields, herbfields and tussock grasslands and also wet, mossy and shingly depressions below snow-banks (R.J. Pierce in Marchant & Higgins 1993).On Chatham Island, the species inhabits boggy moorlands with sparse stunted bracken and heath. The Double-banded Plover is also found around sewage farms and saltworks, gravel roads and quarries, and (occasionally) artificial islands created by spoil heaps (Marchant & Higgins 1993).Usually the Double-banded Plover spends winter on estuaries and other coastal habitats such as lagoons, saltmarsh, beaches and pasture. In inland New Zealand, some birds winter on gravel river deltas, lake shores and pasture (R.J. Pierce in Marchant & Higgins 1993).The Double-banded Plover usually breeds in dry open areas of shingle, sand or stones, though mainly on old river terraces in valleys, delta or alluvial fans. They prefer stable, flat or gently sloping shingle banks of braided streams with substrate often graded, ranging from large stones to shingle, gravel and fine sand. The species prefers to breed on gravel, and avoids boulders and areas cluttered with drift, vegetation or trees and on banks often stabilized by low plant cover, such as short coarse grass, but nests are usually placed in adjacent bare areas (Marchant & Higgins 1993).In coastal regions, the species breeds on sandy, shelly or shingly beaches, spits and backing dunes, especially around estuaries. They also use shingle and sandy beaches of lakes. The Double-banded Plover sometimes nests at high altitudes, including on Auckland Island, (up to 1646 m above sea level) in montane habitats, where breeding may also occur on bare rock. Other habitats include pasture, ploughed or stony paddocks, areas of bare pumice, gravel pits, quarries, gravel tracks and roads with wide gravel edges (Marchant & Higgins 1993). The species does not necessarily nest close to water, and is known to use racecourses and airstrips. On Chatham Island, the species breeds on sparsely covered, boggy, peaty moorlands with stunted bracken and heath (Marchant & Higgins 1993).After breeding and before migration the Double-banded Plover remains close to inland and coastal breeding areas, on wide river deltas and river beds, drying ponds, lagoons, tidal flats, beaches, herbfields, pasture and saltmarsh. In inland areas, the species depends less on herbfields than during breeding, and often relies on expanses of bare shingle, sand and pumice (R.J. Pierce in Marchant & Higgins 1993).This species often forages in river beds during cold weather (usually adults after breeding) and often uses wet paddocks during mild weather (usually juveniles). Occasionally the species wades into belly-deep water (Marchant & Higgins 1993).The Double-banded Plover roosts on bare open areas or among vegetation and also on offshore islets. Roosting sites may be near feeding areas or hundreds of metres away (Marchant & Higgins 1993).During strong winds the Double-banded Plover may shelter behind rocks, small clods of earth, clumps of vegetation or seaweed, or in depressions in the ground (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','The Double-banded Plover eats molluscs, insects, worms, crustaceans and spiders and sometimes seeds and fruits (Marchant & Higgins 1993).Double-banded Plovers are diurnal and nocturnal. The species forages on vegetated shingle beds, closely cropped pasture, tilled ground and mudflats. In harbours, the species forages on pasture and sandflats at high tide. Feeding method varies with time, tide and weather. Their large eyes reflect the importance of visual location of prey (Marchant & Higgins 1993).Little is known about the foraging of this species although some general observations of diets of young and adult birds have been made on the breeding grounds (Dann 1999b; Pierce 1989).  Specifically, a population of Double-banded Plovers at Botany Bay, NSW, Australia are known to forage at night in the proximity of the Sydney Airport runways (Ross & Weekes 2003).','The biggest threat to Double-banded Plovers wintering in Australia would be cessation of grazing. At least three important wintering sites in Victoria have been rendered unsuitable in the last 20 years by the cessation of grazing (C.D.T. Minton, 2002 pers. comm.). In Australia and New Zealand, the species is favoured by clearing of wooded lands and conversion to pasture, where Double-banded Plovers regularly feed, roost and occasionally breed (Marchant & Higgins 1993).The conversion of bare pumice nesting ground to a golf course is thought to have caused local extinction at one site. Flood mitigation and planting of willows ( Salix  spp) have decreased the amount of available nesting habitat (Marchant & Higgins 1993).  The loss of wetlands in some regions of Australia has been severe and allocation of water from regulated river systems is also an issue. Including specific habitat in a reserve or protection zone is an important step towards conserving the habitat but does not in itself ensure an appropriate water supply (Maddock 2000).Pollution, including nutrient enrichment and industrial discharge, and inappropriate land management practices can lead to habitat degradation. This could make birds more vulnerable to diseases and parasites.The introduced coastal grass  Spartina anglica  invades intertidal flats rich in invertebrates and is regarded as potentially harmful to wader habitat (Melville 1997).Disturbance, especially from human recreational activities, is another significant threat that has increased in recent years and which will probably continue to increase (Davidson & Rothwell 1993).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=895'),('896','Charadrius dubius','','Aves','Charadriidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=896'),('89857','Galaxias truttaceus (Western Australian population)','Endangered','Actinopterygii','Galaxiidae','The Western Trout Minnow is a large, elongate, relatively deep-bodied and scaleless galaxiid reaching a maximum size of 12–14 cm (Allen et al. 2002). The Western Trout Minnow has brown to olive colouring with unmistakable pale-edged dark spots on the upper sides, a dark diagonal stripe below the eye, and reddish-orange median fins and pelvics with a dark posterior margin (Allen et al. 2002; Morgan et al. 1998). Juveniles have a dark bar on each side that fragments with age. There may be 11–15 (usually 12–14) dorsal rays, 14–19 anal rays, and 13–16 (usually 14–15) pectoral rays (Allen et al. 2002; Morgan et al. 1998).','Museum records show that the Western Trout Minnow is usually found around plants, rocks or logs on the shore margins of still or flowing rivers, streams and lakes where they feed on aquatic and terrestrial insects (Morgan et al. 1998). The streams are generally shallow (< 1.5 m) and are between 0.5 and 5 m wide. The species is most common at lower elevations close to the coast (Allen et al. 2002).The Western Trout Minnow is confined to cooler climate rivers. Mean water temperatures of the Goodga River follow a seasonal pattern, reaching 20–23 °C in summer and dropping to 11.7 °C in mid-winter (Morgan 2003). It is thought that the restricted distribution of the Western Trout Minnow is due to its sensitivity to the higher water temperatures encountered in most of the inland rivers of south-west Western Australia (Morgan et al. 1998). The waters of Goodga River, where a viable population of Western Trout Minnow exists, are acidic and non-saline (Morgan 2003; TSSC 2006cm).The juveniles and adults of the Goodga suite population occur in the narrow riverine environments of the Goodga River and Black Cat Creek, while the larval fish use Moates Lake as a nursery (Morgan 2003 in WA DEC 2008c). The Western Trout Minnow is not known to associate with any listed threatened ecological communities, however, Balston\'s Pygmy Perch ( Nannatherina balstoni ), listed as vulnerable under the EPBC Act, occurs in a similar area.','Larval fish feed exclusively on surface plankton (copepods) in their nursery-lakes, and then migrate back to the river system where the predomiNAt prey species are terrestrial insects, such as coleopterans and hymenopterans, that fall on the water surface. Other items consumed include dipterans, arachnids, orthopterans, aphids, decapods ( Palaemonetes australis ), amphipods and fish ( Pseudogobius olorum ) (Morgan et al. 1998).','There are a number of threats to the Western Trout Minnow including physical barriers restricting the species\' spawning movements upstream; predation and competition from introduced fish species; the impact of a parasite and subsequent bird predation; and hydrological changes such as elevated water temperatures and increasing water salinity levels.Introduced SpeciesThe deliberate or inadvertent introduction of species such as Rainbow Trout, Brown Trout, European/Redfin Perch or competitive fish (such as Mosquitofish) pose a significant threat to the Western Trout Minnow (Morgan 2003). Unlike King River and Kalgan River, Goodga River and Angove River are currently free from introduced fishes, particularly Mosquitofish, which is a known aggressor towards native fishes in south-west Western Australia (Gill et al. 1999). However, Mosquitofish are known to occur within the catchment area of the Goodga River in dams on private properties (Morgan et al. 1998). It is possible that these species could be introduced to the Goodga and Angove Rivers in the near future, which would likely result in the elimination of the remaining Western Trout Minnow populations (TSSC 2006cm).The Department of Fisheries have reviewed proposals to introduce three other native fish from the Murray-Darling (Golden Perch,  Macquaria ambigua , Murray Cod,  Maccullochella peelii peelii  and Australian Bass,  Macquaria novemaculeata ) into Western Australian river systems for the purposes of recreational stocking, domestic stocking and commercial and non-commercial aquaculture (Department of Fisheries 2003). As these three species are top-order predators, they are likely to compete with, or prey on, existing native fishes (Department of Fisheries 2003; TSSC 2006cm). This review does not state what rivers translocated fish would be released in, the time frame in which such a program would occur or the management precautions that would be undertaken to protect threatened fish in south-west Western Australia (Department of Fisheries 2003).There is concern that the introduced aquatic plant  Typha orientalis , present in the Goodga River, may block water flow, thereby affecting water levels, food availability and movement of the Western Trout Minnow (WA DEC 2008c).Impediments to spawning and susbsequent predationA biological study conducted by Morgan (2003) showed that the Goodga River population of Western Trout Minnow had its upstream spawning migration impeded by a weir (Goodga River gauging station). Weirs restrict the upstream movements of Western Trout Minnows and prevent them from spawning in their traditional freshwater spawning grounds (Morgan 2003). Large numbers (and a high proportion of the total population) of Western Trout Minnow congregated below the weir where they were at increased risk from avian predation (Morgan 2003). This threat of predation was further increased when they became infected with the parasite  Ligula intestinalis , a Northern Hemisphere species of cestode. To prevent such obstruction, a fish ladder was constructed at the Goodga River weir in 2003 to facilitate migration of the Western Trout Minnow, effectively doubling the species\' range (previously only 2 km downstream of the weir, now includes a further 2 km of upstream habitat) (TSSC 2006cm).The Goodga River has been considered as a possible water source for the City of Albany (Water and Rivers Commission 1997): no current information is available regarding whether or not authorities are still considering this project.DiseaseThe population of Western Trout Minnow in the Goodga River has recently been found to be infected with Pseudophyllidea cestode  Ligula intestinalis . The parasite has been found in the body cavity of approximately 7% of juvenile Western Trout Minnow (Morgan 2003). The cestode is known to infect numerous freshwater fish species in the Northern Hemisphere but has only recently been recorded in the Southern Hemisphere. This parasite causes gonadal retardation, gross morphological deformities and reduced swimming ability (Morgan 2003; Owen & Arme 1965; Pollard 1974). It is likely that Western Trout Minnows are infected during their larval phase in Moates Lake  as no fish bigger than 80 mm total length have been found to be infected. It is likely that infection with the parasite and subsequent disfiguration makes them vulnerable to avian predation (Morgan 2003). Birds are a significant part of the lifecycle of  L. intestinalis , acting as an additional host .  The introduction of a parasite into the Moates lake system may have occurred during the unsuccessful Brown and Rainbow Trout releases in the 1950s and 1960s, or by an avian host migrating from south-east (or south-west) Australia (Morgan 2003).Altered hydrology and salinityIt is unknown whether water extraction, flow alteration and increased salinity are impacting the Western Trout Minnow (WA DEC 2008c).Water extraction from Angove River increased in 2001, removing 67–82 % of mean annual flow (WA DEC 2008c). The Kent River catchment has also been identified as a possible source of potable water, in which case the impact of water extraction on the Western Trout Minnow should be considered (WA DEC 2008c).Recent surveys failed to capture any Western Trout Minnow in King River or Kalgan River. The increasing salinity of these rivers may have caused local extinction of the species. Most of the larger river systems in the Albany Coast Basin are brackish to saline, attributed to hinterland salt lakes, saline groundwater and clearing in the upper catchments. Clearing in the upper catchments has contributed to erosion problems and increased sedimentation of many river channels, pools and in some cases the filling of coastal lagoons (TSSC 2006cm). It is thought unlikely that salinity would be having a considerable impact on the Western Trout MInnow in the Goodga and Angove Rivers as these rivers naturally experience seasonal variation in salinity (WA DEC 2008c). The impact of increasing salinity in the Kent River on the Western Trout Minnow population is unknown (WA DEC 2008c).Changes in hydrology can also affect water temperature. There may be alterations to the groundwater recharge of the Goodga and Angove Rivers due to the Blue Gum plantations in the upper Goodga catchment. Groundwater-fed rivers are cooler and a change in the groundwater input may lead to changes in river water termperature. This is potentially a significant issue for the Western Trout Minnow which is sensitive to change in water temperature (WA DEC 2008c).Land ClearingThe upper lethal temperature tolerance for the Western Trout Minnow is 30 °C (Morgan 2003).  Land clearing in the Albany Coast Basin has led to elevated water temperatures and salinity, which may pose a threat to the persistence of the Western Trout Minnow should water temperatures exceed their tolerance limits over the summer months (TSSC 2006cm).Livestock access to riparian habitatWhile much of the Two Peoples Bay Reserve is protected from cattle access, some stock access to riparian habitat is still available in some stretches of the Western Minnow Trout habitat (WA DEC 2008c). Protection of Western Trout Minnow habitat from stock access is considered vital (WA DEC 2008c).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=89857'),('906','Pedionomus torquatus','Critically Endangered','Aves','Pedionomidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=906'),('923','Turnix melanogaster','Vulnerable','Aves','Turnicidae','The Black-breasted Button-quail is a large, plump, pale-eyed button-quail. It is similar in size to the Painted Button-quail. The male Black-breasted Button-quails are about 18 cm long, with a wingspan of 32-35 cm, and weighing 65g. The females are larger, weighing 100g. The sexes differ in plumage, and there is no seasonal variation. Males have finely patterned backs and wings with brown, black, grey and white mottling. The face and throat are whitish and the breast is black with numerous white half-moon markings. The female is similar in all respects except for having a black face and throat, a larger dark area over the upper and lower breast and heavier white half-moon markings on the upper and lower breast. The bill is grey and the legs are pale yellow. Juveniles resemble males but are duller (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','The Black-breasted Button-quail is restricted to rainforests and forests, mostly in areas with 770-1200 mm rainfall per annum (Bennett 1985; Hughes & Hughes 1991; Marchant & Higgins 1993). They prefer drier low closed forests, particularly semi-evergreen vine thicket, low microphyll vine forest, araucarian microphyll vine forest and araucarian notophyll vine forest (Bennett 1985; Hughes & Hughes 1991; Marchant & Higgins 1993; Milledge 2000; Smyth et al. 2001). They may also be found in low, dense acacia thickets and, in littoral area, in vegetation behind sand dunes (Smith & Mathieson 2004).Many areas of optimum habitat are located on highly fertile soils. It is believed that the highly fertile soils promote rapid leaf growth on plants. During dry periods, much of the foliage then drops to the ground thus maintaining the deep leaf litter layer which is crucial to the foraging requirements of the species (Smith & Mathieson 2004).Many reports are from dry forest described as Bottletree Scrub, comprising Brigalow ( Acacia harpophylla ), Belah ( Casuarina cristata ) and Bottletree ( Brachychiton rupestris ), with or without emergent Hoop Pine (Araucaria cunninghamii), with a shrub understorey and thick litter layer (Barnard 1925; Bennett 1985). Much of this vegetation type, especially in the Fitzroy and Dawson valleys has been grossly depleted (Hamley et al. 1997).In Googa State Forest, south-eastern Queensland, birds are most commonly associated with remNAt microphyll vine forest with no lantana in the understorey, but lantana is often used for diurnal foraging and nocturnal roosting. This species has been recorded as far as 60 m into mature Hoop Pine plantations. A mosaic of Lantana and emergent vine forest species appears to be important for cover (Smith et al. 1998).In littoral areas, the species associates with vegetation behind dunes, namely vine scrubs and thickets, acacia thickets and areas densely covered in shrubs, particularly Midgen Berry Austromyrtus dulcis and Lantana. (Smith & Mathieson 2004). In the Great Sandy region of southeast Queensland, Black-breasted button-quail occur in Brush Box (Tristania conferta), Pink Bloodwood ( Eucalyptus intermedia ) and Forest Red Gum ( E. tereticornis ) forest, with an understorey of Black She-oak ( Allocasuarina littoralis ), acacias, lantana and berry-bearing shrubs (Bennett 1985).In south-eastern Queensland, they are recorded on rare occasions in open eucalypt forest: for example, Smyth et al. (2001) recorded a bird (almost certainly transient) in Grey Ironbark ( Eucalyptus siderophloia ) with a low sparse shrub layer of eucalypt and acacia seedlings, and a sparse ground cover of short tussock grasses and leaf litter. An extensive dense leaf-litter layer is required for foraging (Hughes & Hughes 1991) and possibly also roosting (McConnell & Hobson 1995). Fallen logs and a dense, heterogeneously distributed shrub layers are also considered to be important habitat characteristics for shelter and breeding (Smith et al. 1998; Smyth & Young 1996).The species has also recorded from vine forest remNAts between Hoop Pine plantations and agricultural land (Smith et al. 1998) and occasionally in areas of pasture grass adjacent to habitat areas (Hughes & Hughes 1991). No information is available on the species\' preferences for refuge habitat but areas geographically protected from frequent burning where deep leaf litter can accumulate and persist are likely to be of importance (M. Mathieson July 2005 pers. comm.).','The diet is mostly invertebrates, taken from litter on the forest floor (Hughes & Hughes 1991; Lees & Smith 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1993; McConnell & Hobson 1995), but seeds are also possibly taken (Smyth 1997).Analysis of fresh faecal pellets indicates prey items include spiders, ants, centipedes, millipedes, beetles and land snails (Nitor pudibundus). Beetles, ants and spiders are possibly the major food items (McConnell & Hobson 1995). Spilled grain and chicken food are also reported food items (Bennett 1985). The presence of this species in areas with a diverse understorey of berry producing shrubs may indicate that berries provide an important seasonal food resource (M. Mathieson July 2005 pers. comm.).Birds use a pivot foraging action, digging in leaf litter with their feet and pivoting in a circular fashion before moving onto a new location (McConnell & Hobson 1995). Foraging birds create distinctive crater-like depressions (called platelets) in the leaf litter (Hughes & Hughes 1991; Marchant & Higgins 1993).The ground-foraging behaviour and noise of rustling leaf litter may render this species susceptible to predation by native and introduced predators. The impact of this remains to be quantified (Birds Australia July 2005, pers comm).','In the past this species may have been trapped (Sharland 1959 in Marchant & Higgins 1993) for aviculture (Jack 1961 in Marchant & Higgins 1993). However, trapping is unlikely to be impacting upon the current population due to the abundance and low cost of the species in the aviary trade (M. Mathieson July 2005, pers. comm.).Massive clearance of forest for agriculture and forestry has reduced the species habitat by an estimated 90% (Bennett 1985; Garnett & Crowley 2000). This has been particularly exacerbated by the preference of this species, in some areas, for vegetation on highly fertile soils which was preferentially cleared for agriculture (DPI & F 1996; Smith & Mathieson 2004). The clearance of Bottletree Scrubs as part of the Fitzroy Development Scheme during the 1950s and 60s is believed to have eliminated up to 95% of the species\' habitat in the Fitzroy-Dawson valleys, resulting in its near extinction within that region (Bennett 1985; Hamley et al.1997). Timber harvesting continues to threaten the species today (M. Mathieson July 2005, pers. comm.).Sub-populations in the remaining fragmented habitats are affected by grazing and other disturbances caused by cattle, horses and feral pigs. Excessive grazing and trampling may reduce the amount of understorey vegetation and deep leaf litter on which the species relies. This impact can be exacerbated during periods of drought when pasture in surrounding areas is diminished. Wallabies have also been implicated as a cause of habitat disturbance (Marchant & Higgins 1993; DPI & F 1996; Garnett & Crowley 2000), but other observers believe that wallabies are not a concern (M. Mathieson July 2005, pers. comm.).Frequent fire eliminates shrubby understorey in dry rainforest remNAts and can reduce the amount of leaf litter on the ground, rendering habitat unsuitable (Garnett & Crowley 2000; Hughes & Hughes 1991). Numbers of this species increased near Widgee, Queensland, once burning off at 2-4 year intervals had ceased and a deep leaf litter layer was allowed to develop (Hughes & Hughes 1991).RemNAt vine forest adjacent to Hoop Pine plantations and agricultural land is an important refuge for the species. Potential agricultural intensification and plantation management may adversely affect this habitat through clearing or slashing and burning to reduce fire risk (Smith et al. 1998; Garnett & Crowley 2000).Being ground-nesters, they are also affected by predation by cats, foxes and pigs (Garnett & Crowley 2000; M. Mathieson July 2005, pers. comm.) although this may only pose a minor risk for this species (Hughes & Hughes 1991).Urban development is also considered to be a threat for the species where suitable habitat occurs on the outskirts of population centres, however the impact of this threat remains to be quantified (Garnett & Crowley 2000).Due to the fragmented nature of the species\' habitat and its populations, all of the above threats have the potential to cause local extinction if nearby source populations do not exist to colonise affected remNAts in the future. The synergistic impacts of the threats outlined above are likely to continue to cause incremental population and habitat decline in the absence of effective management strategies (Garnett & Crowley 2000; M. Mathieson July 2005, pers. comm.).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=923'),('934','Leipoa ocellata','Vulnerable','Aves','Megapodiidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=934'),('942','Erythrotriorchis radiatus','Vulnerable','Aves','Accipitridae','The Red Goshawk is a large, swift and powerful rufous-brown hawk, growing to a length of 45–60 cm, with a wingspan of 100–135 cm. The two sexes of this species are quite different in size and appearance (Baker-Gabb 1984 in NPWS 2002). The females weigh approximately 1.1 kg, the males approximately 0.63 kg. The Red Goshawk is boldly mottled and streaked, with rufous scalloping on the back and upper wings, rufous underparts that are brightest and lack streaking on the thighs, and with massive yellowish legs and feet, and boldly barred underwings. Females are larger, more powerfully built, paler and more heavily streaked below, showing some white on the under body. Juveniles have redder upperparts, and the head and underparts are rich rufous with fine dark streaks. The juvenile\'s rufous head distinguishes it from adults.','The Red Goshawk occurs in coastal and sub-coastal areas in wooded and forested lands of tropical and warm-temperate Australia (Marchant & Higgins 1993). Riverine forests are also used frequently (Debus 1991, 1993). Such habitats typically support high bird numbers and biodiversity, especially medium to large species which the goshawk requires for prey. The Red Goshawk nests in large trees, frequently the tallest and most massive in a tall stand, and nest trees are invariably within one km of permanent water (Aumann & Baker-Gabb 1991; Debus & Czechura 1988b). The Red Goshawk occurs over wooded and forested lands of tropical and warm-temperate Australia, coastal and sub-coastal (Marchant & Higgins 1993). Use of its habitat is summarised by Aumann and Baker-Gabb (1991) and Debus and Czechura (1988b).This species prefers forest and woodland with a mosaic of vegetation types, large prey populations (birds), and permanent water. The vegetation types include eucalypt woodland, open forest, tall open forest, gallery rainforest, swamp sclerophyll forest, and rainforest margins.In NSW favoured habitat is mixed subtropical rainforest and Melaleuca forest along coastal rivers, often in rugged terrain (Debus 1993, 1991).In the Northern Territory and the Kimberley, Western Australia, tall open forest and woodland, or tall fringing woodlands along rivers in grasslands, shrub-lands, and low open woodlands are preferred (Aumann & Baker-Gabb 1991).Habitat has to be open enough for fast attack and manoeuvring in flight, but provide cover for ambushing of prey. Therefore, forests of intermediate density are favoured, or ecotones between habitats of differing densities, e.g. between rainforest and eucalypt forest, between gallery forest and woodland, or on edges of woodland and forest where they meet grassland, cleared land, roads or watercourses.  They avoid very dense and very open habitats (Marchant & Higgins 1993).  These habitats provide appropriate foraging conditions for the large Red Goshawk, and a diversity and abundance of the medium to large birds taken as food (Aumann & Baker-Gabb 1991).Immature birds have been reported from mangroves, open river floodplains, low open woodland, agricultural land and pasture, but such habitats are not used regularly (Marchant & Higgins 1993).Nests are in tall trees within one km of and often beside, permanent water (river, swamp, pool), usually in fairly open, biologically rich forest or woodland. The average distance of the nest tree to water was 164 m (n=18). Nest trees were significantly taller, with larger crown diameters, greater girth at breast height, and the height of the lowest live branch was higher than the tallest trees found in the immediate vicinity of random locations along rivers. Nest trees had an average height of 31.4 m, and an average girth at breast height of 2.9 m. Trees in 0.2 ha plots around the nest tree also had significantly higher canopy height, fewer small trees (girth less than 0.5 m), and more large trees (girth greater than 1 m) than random plots (Aumann & Baker-Gabb 1991). Nests tend to be placed on a substantial horizontal limb often against a vertical branch arising from it. There is an open space below and to one side at least to enable the birds to easily access the nest and manoeuvre sticks during nest building (Czechura 2005, pers. comm.). Observation suggests that Red Goshawks may use dense forests (rainforest or tall wet forest) as a drought refuge (Bravery 1970).','The Red Goshawk\'s diet is 95% birds. An analysis of 501 prey items taken from around 13 nests in northern Australia revealed only 1.3% of the prey items were in the size class 0–50 g, with 12.9% at 51–100 g, 53.7% at 101–250 g, and 32% over 250 g. The same study estimated that Psittaciformes contributed 51.9% of dietary biomass, followed by Passeriformes (14.8%), Coraciiformes (9.7%), Columbiformes (9.7%), and Cuculiformes (5.2%) (Aumann & Baker-Gabb 1991). Red Goshawks occasionally take large prey including species of duck, Rufous Night Heron  Nycticorax caledonicus , and even Australian Brush-Turkeys  Alectura lathami  (2300 g). Mammals, reptiles and insects are rarely taken (Marchant & Higgins 1993).The usual method of capture is hunting from concealed or, occasionally, exposed perches, usually changing perches every one to five minutes (Aumann & Baker-Gabb 1991; Hughes & Hughes 1988; Lord 1952). They also soar and prospect above the forest for 30+ minutes at a time, occasionally using rapid contour hunting (Aumann & Baker-Gabb 1991). They sometimes attack, launch from high in the air, occasionally in a stoop (Barnard 1934; Lord 1952; Hughes & Hughes 1988), or fly low through or over forest canopy or partly cleared land, marshes, rivers and ecotones, peering downwards (Debus & Czechura 1988b). They often seize prey in flight after a stealthy glide, or during a direct flying attack (Olsen & Debus 2002). This species also attends fires or human activities, where prey is flushed (Debus & Czechura 1988b; Slater 1976), and take nestling birds, sometimes returning repeatedly to a known source (Lord 1952, 1956). Prey is plucked and eaten on the ground (Barnard 1934; Hughes & Hughes 1988) or at perch (Lord 1952; Morris 1973). They often hunt from perches during early hours of morning and last hours of daylight (Aumann & Baker-Gabb 1991).','Current threatsHabitat loss has been, and is likely to continue to be the biggest threat to the viability of the Red Goshawk, especially in eastern Australia. Widespread deforestation, particularly of lowland and riverine forests, is thought to have caused the historical decline in northeastern NSW and Queensland (Aumann & Baker-Gabb 1991; Debus 1993; Debus & Czechura 1988b; Olsen 1998), and may affect more northerly birds as clearing continues (Baker-Gabb 1998).The effect fragmentation of habitat has on the Red Goshawk is yet to be determined. Future coastal and sub-coastal development in Queensland may continue to be an important threat (G. Czechura July 2005, pers. comm.). On Melville Island in the Northern Territory, it is thought that the suspected 120 Red Goshawks are likely to be reduced by 10% as a result of proposed forestry operations (NTDIPE 2002; Woinarski et al. 2000).Illegal egg collecting still results in the failure of some nests, which poses a threat to productivity (Aumann & Baker-Gabb 1991).Potential threatsIt has been suggested that there may be a threshold above which habitat alterations within a breeding pairs home range will not be tolerated (Debus & Czechura 1988b);application of persistent pesticides such as DDT may have caused a historic reduction in population. The past impact of pesticides on breeding Red Goshawks remains speculative, but breeding failure due to eggshell thinning caused by organochlorines has been detected among other raptor species that occur within the range of the Red Goshawk (Olsen et al. 1993). In 1989, Australia ceased widespread use of organochlorine pesticides, and most affected species have now recovered;overgrazing, or other changes in land management could reduce prey availability, which may reduce productivity. It is suggested that Red Goshawks appear to be tolerant of moderate stocking levels, but that overgrazing can reduce the viability of riparian trees used for nesting, and could reduce prey availability (Aumann & Baker-Gabb 1991). Increased Red Goshawk sightings were preceded by a cessation of stock grazing and annual burning resulting in an increase in ground cover and ground dwelling birds (Hughes & Hughes 1988);fire, and changed burning regimes have the potential to impact breeding sites and reduce prey availability, thus reducing productivity;shooting of Red Goshawks, particularly by owners of poultry and pigeons;disease;catastrophic events, such as wildfire and tropical stroms, which may exaggerate the impact of existing threats;possible genetic bottlenecks in the population;secondary poisoning;persistent disturbance by birdwatchers at know nests (G. Czechura July 2005, pers. comm.).The Red Goshawk may exhibit low productivity. An overall success rate of 0.9 fledged/attended nest (n=26) was recorded, due to lower productivity observed in two of four years (Aumann & Baker-Gabb 1991). The reasons for this diminished productivity were not known, and productivity of the Red Goshawk has not been otherwise assessed.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=942'),('952','Pandion haliaetus','','Aves','Accipitridae','The Eastern Osprey is a medium-sized raptor (length 50–65 cm; wingspan 145–170 cm; weight 1.0–1.1 kg in adult males and 1.2–1.9 kg in adult females). Adults are mainly dark-brown to blackish-brown above and white below with a white head and neck, streaked blackish-brown; a dark-brown to blackish-brown crest; a black stripe across the eye and ear; a band of reddish-brown, brown or dark-brown streaking across the breast (sparse or absent in males); a white and pale greyish-brown underwing with black carpal patches and black trim; a white to pale greyish-brown undertail; yellow irides; a black bill; and white to pale grey legs and feet (Johnstone & Storr 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1993). The sexes are similar in appearance but can be distinguished when together by differences in size and plumage (females are typically larger than males and usually have darker and more distinct streaking on the breast). Juveniles are similar in appearance to adults, but can be distinguished by multiple differences in plumage and their darker, yellow-orange irides (Marchant & Higgins 1993).','Eastern Ospreys occur in littoral and coastal habitats and terrestrial wetlands of tropical and temperate Australia and offshore islands. They are mostly found in coastal areas but occasionally travel inland along major rivers, particularly in northern Australia (Johnstone & Storr 1998; Marchant & Higgins 1993; Olsen 1995). They require extensive areas of open fresh, brackish or saline water for foraging (Marchant & Higgins 1993). They frequent a variety of wetland habitats including inshore waters, reefs, bays, coastal cliffs, beaches, estuaries, mangrove swamps, broad rivers, reservoirs and large lakes and waterholes (Czechura 1985; Domm 1977; Fleming 1987; Gosper 1983; Gosper & Holmes 2002; Johnstone & Storr 1998; Olsen 1995; Roberts & Ingram 1976). They exhibit a preference for coastal cliffs and elevated islands in some parts of their range (Boekel 1976; Domm 1977), but may also occur on low sandy, muddy or rocky shores and over coral cays (Marchant & Higgins 1993). They may occur over atypical habitats such as heath, woodland or forest when travelling to and from foraging sites (Czechura 1985; Hembrow 1988; Pruett-Jones & O\'Donnell 2004; Roberts & Ingram 1976).Eastern Ospreys occur sympatrically and sometimes interact with White-bellied Sea-Eagles (Barrett et al. 2003; Clancy 2006; Dennis & Baxter 2006; Kennard & Kennard 2006), which is also listed as Marine and Migratory under the EPBC Act.','In Australia, Eastern Ospreys mainly feed on fish, especially mullet where available, and rarely take molluscs, crustaceans, insects, reptiles, birds and mammals (Clancy 1989, 2005a; Johnstone & Storr 1998; Kennard & Kennard 2006; Marchant & Higgins 1993; Olsen 1995; Rose 2000c; Saunders & de Rebeira 1985; Smith 1985).Eastern Ospreys usually forage diurnally, but have also been observed hunting prey at night (Hollands 2003). They generally search for prey by soaring, quartering or circling above a body of water and scanning below for fish. They occasionally search for prey by scanning from a perch. When a prey item is located while soaring or circling, they hover momentarily and then dive down, sometimes in stages, before snatching prey from the near the surface with the feet or by plunging into the water feet first. When a prey item is located from a perch, they align themselves in the direction of their target and then alight and dive down directly into the water at their target (Clancy 1991, 2005b; Cupper & Cupper 1981; Hollands 2003; Olsen 1995). When attacking aquatic targets, Eastern Ospreys may submerge completely to a depth of about one metre (Cupper & Cupper 1981; Olsen 1995). Eastern Ospreys have also been observed snatching birds in flight (Mooney 1987). Captured prey items are carried to a feeding perch for consumption (Olsen 1995).','The current main threat to the Eastern Osprey in Australia is loss, degradation or alteration of habitat for urban or tourism development (Clancy 1989, 1991; Dennis 2007a; Olsen 1998). In the Chain of Bays region of the Eyre Penninsula, South Australia, where Ospreys nest on the ground due to the lack of trees, human disturbance is an increasing threat (Ecos 2008).Other current but presently less pervasive threats include ingestion of prey items containing pollutants such as pesticides, heavy metals or fishing tackle; competition for food with commercial and recreational fisheries; reduced water quality at foraging grounds caused by discharge of effluent or runoff; disturbance or persecution by humans; and accidental mortality arising from collisions with powerlines (Clancy 1991, 2005a; Department of Environment and Climate Change 2005; Olsen 1995, 1998; Poole 1989).Poisoning by organochlorine pesticides and persecution by humans are considered the likely causes of a post-settlement decline in Eastern Osprey numbers in south-eastern Australia (Clancy 1991, 2005a; Garnett 1993; Olsen 1995). The impacts of these threats have subsided in recent decades following the introduction of Commonwealth regulations to reduce non-target poisoning by organochlorine pesticides and the listing of the Eastern Osprey as a protected species under Commonwealth and state government legislation (Olsen 1995, 1998). Falkenberg et al. (1994) reported low levels of organochlorine pesticides in Eastern Ospreys in South Australia soon after regulations were introduced. Recent studies suggest that Eastern Ospreys in north-eastern NSW are not significantly affected by pesticides and do not face a shortage of food at the present time (Clancy 2005b, 2006).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=952'),('96','Pseudomys novaehollandiae','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Muridae','A small, burrowing native rodent, the New Holland Mouse is similar in size and appearance to the introduced House Mouse ( Mus musculus ), although it can be distinguished by its slightly larger ears and eyes, the absence of a notch on the upper incisors and the absence of a distinctive \'mousy odour\' (Menkhorst & Knight 2001).','LandformsThe New Holland Mouse has been found from coastal areas and up to 100 km inland on sandstone country (Wilson & Laidlaw 2003). The species has been recorded from sea level up to around 900 m above sea level (Menkhorst et al. 2008).SoilsSoil type may be an important indicator of suitability of habitat for the New Holland Mouse, with deeper top soils and softer substrates being preferred for digging burrows (Wilson & Laidlaw 2003).  In Victoria, the species has been recorded on deep siliceous podsols, sandy clay, loamy sands, sand dunes and coastal dunes (Menkhorst & Seebeck 1995 cited in Wilson & Laidlaw 2003). Other factors such as slope, geology and the amount of sun received in an area may also influence site selection (Wilson & Laidlaw 2003).Vegetation associationsAcross the species\' range, the New Holland Mouse is known to inhabit the following types of habitat  (Fox & Fox 1978; Fox & Mckay 1981; Hocking 1980; Keith & Calaby 1968; Lazenby et al. 2008; Norton 1987; Posamentier & Recher 1974; Pye 1991; Wilson 1991):open heathlandopen woodland with a heathland understoreyvegetated sand dunes.Specific vegetationDue to the largely granivorous diet of the species, sites where the New Holland Mouse is found are often high in floristic diversity, especially leguminous perennials (Haering & Fox 1997; Kemper & Wilson 2008). The Victorian action statement has descriptions of the vegetation of sites where the New Holland Mouse has been found (Seebeck et al. 2003).Fire ecologyOn mainland Australia the species has been found to peak in abundance during the early to mid stages of vegetation succession three to five years after fire (Braithwaite & Gullan 1978; Fox & Fox 1978; Fox & Mckay 1981; Posamentier & Recher 1974).','The New Holland Mouse is nocturnal and omnivorous, with seeds forming a main component of its diet (Tas. TSS 2009), though leaves, fungi and invertebrates are consumed based on seasonal or floristic characteristics of individual sites (Wilson & Bradtke 1999). The species are proposed to play an important role in seed dispersal and fungal spore dispersal (Seebeck et al. 1996; Smith & Quin 1996).The New Holland Mouse spends considerable time foraging above ground for food, predisposing it to predation by native predators and introduced species, including the Red Fox ( Vulpes vulpes ), Cat ( Felis catus ) and Dog ( Canis familiaris ) (Seebeck et al. 1996; Smith & Quin 1996).','Habitat loss and modificationLoss and modification of habitat due to land development, forestry plantations, and agriculture, along with weed invasion and dieback caused by the fungus  Phytophthora cinamomi , are considered threats to the New Holland Mouse and the habitat it requires (Seebeck et al. 1996).Inappropriate fire regimesInappropriate fire management may result in a lack of habitat patches of suitable successional age, size and distribution required by the species (Seebeck & Menkhorst 2000).Predation and competitionPredation by introduced species, including the Red Fox, Cat and Dog is a threat to the New Holland Mouse (Ford 2003; Seebeck et al. 1996; Smith & Quin 1996). Competition from introduced rodents, such as the House Mouse is suggested as a potential threat (Fox & Gullick 1989; Seebeck et al. 1996) though Haering and Fox (1997) found that the two species co-existed when floristic and structural elements of habitat allowed for microhabitat partitioning. One local case study found dietary separation between the two species, with the New Holland Mouse preferring seeds and vegetative material at times when the House Mouse was almost completely insectivorous (Cockburn 1980) (although in other environments, the House Mouse is omnivorous).Climate changeClimate change has been identified as a potential threat to the New Holland Mouse through alteration and further fragmentation of the species\' habitat. Brereton and colleagues (1995) modeled the impact of a number of potential climate change scenarios on the distribution of a range of small mammals, including the New Holland Mouse, and concluded that future climate change could result in a decline of up to 50% in distribution (TSSC 2010j). As rainfall has been shown to affect the length of the breeding season for the New Holland Mouse, a reduction in rainfall as a result of climate change may significantly threaten the species (TSSC 2010j). The interaction of these threats with each other may substantially increase risks to the species, for example fire may allow easier access/hunting for feral species (TSSC 2010j). Small, fragmented populations are also more vulnerable to local extinction through stochastic risks (TSSC 2010j).Factors limiting effective managementThe Tasmanian listing advice outlines the following factors that are limiting effective management of the New Holland Mouse (Tas. TSS 2009):current distribution of the New Holland Mouse within Tasmania is unknownlack of appropriate fire management planninglack of understanding of the magnitude of threats to the species including the impact of the Cat and Foxlack of understanding of the causal factors underlying the species\' apparently specific habitat requirements including the effect of potential competition with the introduced House Mousethe need for an assessment of the effectiveness of different monitoring methods in order to understand the probability of detecting the species and therefore interpret apparent ‘negative’ detection resultslack of understanding of the short and long term impacts of variations in rainfall on the population viability of the New Holland Mouse.','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=96'),('98','Pseudomys oralis','Endangered','Mammalia','Muridae','The Hastings River Mouse is a brownish-grey rodent with a greyish-white belly.  It grows to 17 cm long and weighs up to 100 g.  Its tail is brown on the upper surface, white underneath and grows to 15 cm long (Strahan 1998).','The main factors determining the species\' presence appear to be an open canopy and shrub layer (Read & Tweedie 1996) between 410 and 1100m elevation.  Ground cover varies from almost no cover to a dense, rank cover of grasses, herbs and sedges. Sedges, particularly  Carex, Juncus  and  Cyperus  spp. are common to most sites. This habitat occurs beside creeks (permanent and ephemeral) and soakages, but is also found on ridges and grassy plains. In 1986, skull and mandible fragments of a Hastings River Mouse were found in a pellet from an owl ( Tyto sp. ) in coastal wet heath near Wardell, NSW, at a site less than 10m altitude. Subsequent trapping failed to verify a presence (Lee 1995).','The diet of the Hastings River Mouse has been studied by examining faecal samples from nine localities (Fox et al. 1994).  Unlike other species of  Pseudomys , this species has a broader feeding niche in summer than in winter.  In summer samples both seeds and leaf material were codomiNAt with insects, pollen, flowers, ferns and fungi being minor components of the diet.  In winter samples the seed component declined and leaf material was the main dietary component.  In both seasons this leaf component was primarily fresh green leaves.  No between-site or sex difference was found  (Fox et al. 1994).  Although the species of food items has not been determined, a single faecal sample from Mount Boss State Forest contained identifiable remains of  Restio  (King 1984).In many respects the diet of the Hastings River Mouse is more similar to  Mastacomys  (Carron et al. 1990) than to other  Pseudomys , and the species could be considered a herbivore rather than a granivore/herbivore.','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=98'),('99','Pseudomys pilligaensis','Vulnerable','Mammalia','Muridae','The Pilliga Mouse is a small rodent with grey fur and a white belly. Its dark tail ends with a small, black tuft. This species grows to 8 cm long, with a tail to 8 cm long, and weighs 6–16.5 g (mean 11 g and larger weights are recorded in peak population periods). This species is distinguished by its relatively long hindfeet (Strahan 1998; Tokushima & Jarman 2008).','No specific habitat type has been identified for the Pilliga Mouse as specimens have been captured in different vegetation types within the Pilliga Scrub (Fox & Briscoe 1980). These included mixed  Eucalyptus ,  Acacia  and  Callitris  open forest. The Pilliga Mouse is found in greatest abundance in recently burnt moist gullies, areas dominated by Broombush ( Melaleuca uncinata ) and areas containing an understorey of  Acacia burrowii  with a  Corymbia trachyphloia  overstorey. Consistent features of the latter two habitats were: a relatively high plant species richness; a moderate to high low-shrub cover; site moisture retention; and groundcover of plants, litter and fungi. Areas with high rates of capture have extensive low grasses and sedges, with little shrub cover and large areas of ash-covered ground (Fox & Briscoe 1980; NSW DECC 2005ad; Tokushima et al. 2008).Breeding habitat for the species has been recorded as Broombush scrub,  Corymbia / Acacia  woodlands and Red Gum ( Eucalyptus chloroclada )/Rough-barked Apple ( Angophora floribunda )/ Corymbia  heathy woodlands. In some instances Broad-leaved Ironbark ( Eucalyptus fibrosa ), Dwyer\'s Red Gum ( Eucalyptus dwyeri ) and Scribbly Gum ( Eucalyptus rossii ) dominate overstorey, and  Calytrix tetragona  dominates the understorey of breeding habitat (Paull & Milledge 2011). Broombush used as over wintering and breeding sites tend to consist of young (1.5–3 year regrowth) or mature (>25 years old) trees (Paull 2009; Paull & Milledge 2011).Topography of sites where this species is found include rolling landscapes with low relief on sandy soil and sandstone ridges (Lee 1995; Tokushima et al. 2008). This species occurs in an area of of low-nutrient deep sands with mean annual rainfall of approximately 750 mm (Tokushima et al. 2008).During non-peak population periods distribution is patchy and during peak periods distribution is ubiquitous (Tokushima et al. 2008). No low density non-peak refugia have been identified.','Seed is the main food of the Pilliga Mouse (95% of its diet in spring and summer and 62% in winter). Leaf matter makes up the remainder of the diet (Jefferys & Fox 2001).','Exploration, infrastructure construction and infrastructure mainteNAce associated with coal seam gas threatens the Pilliga Mouse. Paull and Milledge (2011) estimate that 20–50 000 ha of suitable/marginal Pilliga Mouse habitat occurs within the Pilliga East State Forest, which is a focal point of the the coal seam gas activity.Identified threats to the Pilliga Mouse include loss or degradation of habitat through inappropriate fire regimes, forestry operations and broombrush harvesting; predation by feral cats ( Felis catus ) and foxes ( Vulpes vulpes ); and competition from the common house mouse ( Mus musculus ) (Dickman et al. 2000; Threatened Species Scientific Committee 2008dg). Forestry associated threats are particularly important in forests with > 30% cover of low shrubs (below 50 cm in height), an absence of tall understorey (at 2 m height) and a > 20 cm layer of sand (NSW DECC 2005ad).','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=99'),('994','Phaethon rubricauda','','Aves','Phaethontidae','NA','NA','NA','NA','http://www.environment.gov.au/cgi-bin/sprat/public/publicspecies.pl?taxon_id=994');
/*!40000 ALTER TABLE `animals_profile` ENABLE KEYS */;
UNLOCK TABLES;
/*!40103 SET TIME_ZONE=@OLD_TIME_ZONE */;

/*!40101 SET SQL_MODE=@OLD_SQL_MODE */;
/*!40014 SET FOREIGN_KEY_CHECKS=@OLD_FOREIGN_KEY_CHECKS */;
/*!40014 SET UNIQUE_CHECKS=@OLD_UNIQUE_CHECKS */;
/*!40101 SET CHARACTER_SET_CLIENT=@OLD_CHARACTER_SET_CLIENT */;
/*!40101 SET CHARACTER_SET_RESULTS=@OLD_CHARACTER_SET_RESULTS */;
/*!40101 SET COLLATION_CONNECTION=@OLD_COLLATION_CONNECTION */;
/*!40111 SET SQL_NOTES=@OLD_SQL_NOTES */;

-- Dump completed on 2020-05-05 18:17:02
